1:1 In the beginning God created the heaven and the earth.
without form, and void; and darkness was upon
of God moved upon the face of the

and there was light.
e light, that it was good: and God divided the light
God called the light Day, and the darkness he called Night.
 morning were the first day.
d said, Let there be a firmament in the midst of the waters,
waters from the waters.
e the firmament, and divided the waters which were
ers which were above the firmament:
t was so.
ent Heaven. And the evening and the
ng were the second day.
d, Let the waters under the heaven be gathered together
 dry land appear: and it was so.
nd God called the dry land Earth; and the gathering together of
e Seas: and God saw that it was good.
:11 And God said, Let the earth bring forth grass, the herb yielding
fruit tree yielding fruit after his kind, whose seed is
and it was so.
ht forth grass, and herb yielding seed after
 whose seed was in itself, after
: and God saw that it was good.
d the evening and the morning were the third day.
 lights in the firmament of the heaven
 divide the day from the night; and let them be for signs, and for
 days, and years: 1:15 And let them be for lights in
 give light upon the earth: and it was
.
he greater light to rule the day,
 lesser light to rule the night: he made the stars also.
 the firmament of the heaven to give light
e day and over the night, and
he light from the darkness: and God saw that it was good.
d the morning were the fourth day.
 And God said, Let the waters bring forth abundantly the moving
life, and fowl that may fly above the earth in the
1 And God created great whales, and every living creature that
ters brought forth abundantly, after their kind,
nd: and God saw that it was good.
And God blessed them, saying, Be fruitful, and multiply, and fill
 seas, and let fowl multiply in the earth.
ere the fifth day.
et the earth bring forth the living creature after
hing, and beast of the earth after his
nd: and it was so.
e beast of the earth after his kind, and cattle
hat creepeth upon the earth after
d: and God saw that it was good.
nd God said, Let us make man in our image, after our likeness:
minion over the fish of the sea, and over the fowl
 and over all the earth, and over
reeping thing that creepeth upon the earth.
age, in the image of God created
male and female created he them.
nd God blessed them, and God said unto them, Be fruitful, and
sh the earth, and subdue it: and have dominion
he fowl of the air, and over every
 thing that moveth upon the earth.
 And God said, Behold, I have given you every herb bearing seed,
face of all the earth, and every tree, in the which
 seed; to you it shall be for meat.
0 And to every beast of the earth, and to every fowl of the air,
 that creepeth upon the earth, wherein there is
 for meat: and it was so.
saw every thing that he had made, and, behold, it was
d the morning were the sixth day.
hus the heavens and the earth were finished, and all the host of
n the seventh day God ended his work which he had made; and
h day from all his work which he had made.
nd sanctified it: because that
ad rested from all his work which God created and made.
ions of the heavens and of the earth when
RD God made the earth and the
5 And every plant of the field before it was in the earth,
eld before it grew: for the LORD God had not
there was not a man to till the

rth, and watered the whole
ound.
f the dust of the ground, and
to his nostrils the breath of life; and man became a living
RD God planted a garden eastward in Eden; and there he
ed.
LORD God to grow every tree that is
ant to the sight, and good for food; the tree of life also in the
en, and the tree of knowledge of good and evil.
 to water the garden; and from thence
was parted, and became into four heads.

 is it which compasseth the
 Havilah, where there is gold; 2:12 And the gold of that
llium and the onyx stone.
name of the second river is Gihon: the same is it that
 Ethiopia.
rd river is Hiddekel: that is it which
eth toward the east of Assyria. And the fourth river is Euphrates.
ORD God took the man, and put him into the garden of
t.
man, saying, Of every tree of the
thou mayest freely eat: 2:17 But of the tree of the knowledge
u shalt not eat of it: for in the day that thou
e.
t good that the man should be
ll make him an help meet for him.
And out of the ground the LORD God formed every beast of the
of the air; and brought them unto Adam to see
er Adam called every living
t was the name thereof.
ave names to all cattle, and to the fowl of the air,
d; but for Adam there was not found an
lp meet for him.
caused a deep sleep to fall upon Adam, and he
nd closed up the flesh instead
:22 And the rib, which the LORD God had taken from man, made
t her unto the man.
 This is now bone of my bones, and flesh of my
cause she was taken out of Man.
erefore shall a man leave his father and his mother, and shall
: and they shall be one flesh.
 they were both naked, the man and his wife, and were not
erpent was more subtil than any beast of the field which
 he said unto the woman, Yea, hath God said,
garden?  3:2 And the woman said
serpent, We may eat of the fruit of the trees of the garden:
f the tree which is in the midst of the garden,
it, neither shall ye touch it, lest
e.
man, Ye shall not surely die: 3:5
 doth know that in the day ye eat thereof, then your eyes shall
hall be as gods, knowing good and evil.

was good for food, and that
nt to the eyes, and a tree to be desired to make one
ereof, and did eat, and gave also unto
r husband with her; and he did eat.
 And the eyes of them both were opened, and they knew that they
y sewed fig leaves together, and made themselves
voice of the LORD God walking in the garden in
s wife hid themselves from the
f the LORD God amongst the trees of the garden.
Adam, and said unto him, Where art
 3:10 And he said, I heard thy voice in the garden, and I was
 naked; and I hid myself.
aid, Who told thee that thou wast naked? Hast thou eaten
manded thee that thou shouldest not eat?
3:12 And the man said, The woman whom thou gavest to be with me, she
 tree, and I did eat.
 God said unto the woman, What is this that thou hast
 serpent beguiled me, and I did eat.
14 And the LORD God said unto the serpent, Because thou hast done
rsed above all cattle, and above every beast of the
u go, and dust shalt thou eat all the
s of thy life: 3:15 And I will put enmity between thee and the
hy seed and her seed; it shall bruise thy head,
3:16 Unto the woman he said, I will greatly multiply thy sorrow and
 in sorrow thou shalt bring forth children; and thy
 and he shall rule over thee.
unto Adam he said, Because thou hast hearkened unto the voice
 eaten of the tree, of which I commanded thee,
rsed is the ground for thy sake;
w shalt thou eat of it all the days of thy life; 3:18 Thorns
l it bring forth to thee; and thou shalt eat the
at of thy face shalt thou eat bread,
 thou return unto the ground; for out of it wast thou taken: for
 unto dust shalt thou return.
Adam called his wife's name Eve; because she was the mother
Unto Adam also and to his wife did the LORD God make coats of
em.
 the man is become as one of us, to
good and evil: and now, lest he put forth his hand, and take also
fe, and eat, and live for ever: 3:23 Therefore the
 garden of Eden, to till the ground
whence he was taken.
ut the man; and he placed at the east of the garden
g sword which turned every way, to keep
he way of the tree of life.
m knew Eve his wife; and she conceived, and bare Cain, and
n from the LORD.
 his brother Abel. And Abel was a keeper of
und.
 to pass, that Cain brought of the
of the ground an offering unto the LORD.

stlings of his flock and of
of. And the LORD had respect unto Abel and to his
o his offering he had not respect.
in was very wroth, and his countenance fell.
 art thou wroth? and why is thy
ce fallen?  4:7 If thou doest well, shalt thou not be
ot well, sin lieth at the door. And unto
thee shall be his desire, and thou shalt rule over him.
Abel his brother: and it came to pass, when
up against Abel his brother,
.
e is Abel thy brother? And he
w not: Am I my brother's keeper?  4:10 And he said, What
of thy brother's blood crieth unto me from
sed from the earth, which hath opened her
 thy hand; 4:12 When thou
und, it shall not henceforth yield unto thee her
d shalt thou be in the earth.
Cain said unto the LORD, My punishment is greater than I can
thou hast driven me out this day from the face of the
l I be hid; and I shall be a fugitive and
e to pass, that every one
 shall slay me.
unto him, Therefore whosoever slayeth Cain,
ld. And the LORD set a mark
st any finding him should kill him.
6 And Cain went out from the presence of the LORD, and dwelt in the
 the east of Eden.
is wife; and she conceived, and bare Enoch: and he
ame of the city, after the name of his
n, Enoch.
Irad: and Irad begat Mehujael: and
el begat Methusael: and Methusael begat Lamech.
 wives: the name of the one was Adah,
 the name of the other Zillah.
 Adah bare Jabal: he was the father of such as dwell in tents,
cattle.
 Jubal: he was the father of all such
handle the harp and organ.
lah, she also bare Tubalcain, an instructer of every
nd the sister of Tubalcain was Naamah.
4:23 And Lamech said unto his wives, Adah and Zillah, Hear my voice;
mech, hearken unto my speech: for I have slain a man to
n to my hurt.
nged sevenfold, truly Lamech seventy and
sevenfold.
again; and she bare a son, and called his
ted me another seed instead
 Cain slew.
so there was born a son; and he called his
he name of the LORD.
ok of the generations of Adam. In the day that God
God made he him; 5:2 Male and female
ted he them; and blessed them, and called their name Adam, in the
e created.
d and thirty years, and begat a son in his
alled his name Seth: 5:4 And
Adam after he had begotten Seth were eight hundred years:
ghters: 5:5 And all the days that Adam lived
d he died.
d and five years, and begat Enos: 5:7 And
red and seven years, and
aughters: 5:8 And all the days of Seth were nine
ied.
nd begat Cainan: 5:10 And Enos lived
r he begat Cainan eight hundred and fifteen years, and begat sons
11 And all the days of Enos were nine hundred and
And Cainan lived seventy years and begat Mahalaleel: 5:13 And
 begat Mahalaleel eight hundred and forty years,
 And all the days of Cainan were
dred and ten years: and he died.
nd Mahalaleel lived sixty and five years, and begat Jared: 5:16
d after he begat Jared eight hundred and thirty
: 5:17 And all the days of
e eight hundred ninety and five years: and he died.
ed sixty and two years, and he begat
h: 5:19 And Jared lived after he begat Enoch eight hundred years,
d daughters: 5:20 And all the days of Jared were nine
and he died.
 and five years, and begat Methuselah: 5:22
t Methuselah three hundred
at sons and daughters: 5:23 And all the days of Enoch
five years: 5:24 And Enoch walked with
d: and he was not; for God took him.
25 And Methuselah lived an hundred eighty and seven years, and begat
6 And Methuselah lived after he begat Lamech seven hundred eighty
d begat sons and daughters: 5:27 And all the days of
ixty and nine years: and he died.
And Lamech lived an hundred eighty and two years, and begat a
ed his name Noah, saying, This same shall comfort
f our hands, because of the ground
the LORD hath cursed.
ived after he begat Noah five hundred ninety and five
ghters: 5:31 And all the days of Lamech
ere seven hundred seventy and seven years: and he died.
ndred years old: and Noah begat Shem, Ham,
 when men began to multiply on the face of the
them, 6:2 That the sons of God saw
ughters of men that they were fair; and they took them wives of
e.
ll not always strive with man, for
e also is flesh: yet his days shall be an hundred and twenty
re giants in the earth in those days; and also after that,
e in unto the daughters of men, and they bare
hty men which were of old, men of

 man was great in the earth, and
ry imagination of the thoughts of his heart was only evil
t repented the LORD that he had made man on the earth, and it
art.
roy man whom I have created from the
 of the earth; both man, and beast, and the creeping thing, and
r; for it repenteth me that I have made them.
s of the LORD.
tions of Noah: Noah was a just man and perfect
with God.
s, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.
th also was corrupt before God, and the earth was filled
 God looked upon the earth, and, behold, it was corrupt; for
d his way upon the earth.
said unto Noah, The end of all flesh is come before me;
h violence through them; and, behold, I
ill destroy them with the earth.
ake thee an ark of gopher wood; rooms shalt thou make in the
t within and without with pitch.
nd this is the fashion which thou shalt make it of: The length
three hundred cubits, the breadth of it fifty
ubits.
 the ark, and in a cubit shalt thou
h it above; and the door of the ark shalt thou set in the side
 second, and third stories shalt thou make it.
ing a flood of waters upon the
destroy all flesh, wherein is the breath of life, from under
g that is in the earth shall die.
But with thee will I establish my covenant; and thou shalt come
 and thy sons, and thy wife, and thy sons' wives
ving thing of all flesh, two of every sort shalt
hem alive with thee; they shall be
nd female.
nd, and of cattle after their kind, of
ery creeping thing of the earth after his kind, two of every sort
hee, to keep them alive.
thou unto thee of all food that is eaten, and thou shalt
shall be for food for thee, and for them.
at God commanded him, so did
nd the LORD said unto Noah, Come thou and all thy house into the
 I seen righteous before me in this generation.
lt take to thee by sevens, the male
is female: and of beasts that are not clean by two, the male and
 Of fowls also of the air by sevens, the male and the female; to
on the face of all the earth.
et seven days, and I will cause it to rain upon the earth
ts; and every living substance that I have
 the earth.
unto all that the LORD commanded him.
:6 And Noah was six hundred years old when the flood of waters was

 his wife, and his sons' wives
into the ark, because of the waters of the flood.
sts that are not clean, and of fowls,
 of every thing that creepeth upon the earth, 7:9 There went in two
ah into the ark, the male and the female, as God had
 came to pass after seven days, that the waters of the

 life, in the second month,
th day of the month, the same day were all the fountains
p, and the windows of heaven were opened.
rty days and forty nights.
selfsame day entered Noah, and Shem, and Ham, and Japheth,
ah's wife, and the three wives of his sons
every beast after his kind,
attle after their kind, and every creeping thing that
 his kind, and every fowl after his kind,
y went in unto Noah into the ark, two and two of all
f life.
t in male and female of all flesh, as
 had commanded him: and the LORD shut him in.
pon the earth; and the waters
and bare up the ark, and it was lift up above the earth.
ailed, and were increased greatly upon the
 the waters.
led exceedingly upon the earth; and all the
eaven, were covered.
s upward did the waters prevail; and the mountains
esh died that moved upon the earth, both of fowl, and
of every creeping thing that creepeth
n the earth, and every man: 7:22 All in whose nostrils was the
ll that was in the dry land, died.
 And every living substance was destroyed which was upon the face
th man, and cattle, and the creeping things, and the
ere destroyed from the earth: and Noah
ly remained alive, and they that were with him in the ark.
evailed upon the earth an hundred and fifty
nd every living thing, and all the
 that was with him in the ark: and God made a wind to pass over
waters asswaged; 8:2 The fountains also of the deep
stopped, and the rain from heaven was
trained; 8:3 And the waters returned from off the earth
end of the hundred and fifty days the
ers were abated.
 in the seventh month, on the seventeenth day of
rarat.
tinually until the tenth month: in the
nth month, on the first day of the month, were the tops of the
:6 And it came to pass at the end of forty days, that Noah opened the
 ark which he had made: 8:7 And he sent forth a raven,
 until the waters were dried up from off
the earth.
e from him, to see if the waters were
ted from off the face of the ground; 8:9 But the dove found no rest
 her foot, and she returned unto him into the ark, for
of the whole earth: then he put forth his
o him into the ark.
yet other seven days; and again he sent forth the
 dove came in to him in the evening;
 lo, in her mouth was an olive leaf pluckt off: so Noah knew that
bated from off the earth.
tayed yet other seven days; and sent forth the dove;
him any more.
in the six hundredth and first year, in the
, the waters were dried up from
arth: and Noah removed the covering of the ark, and looked,
f the ground was dry.
econd month, on the seven and twentieth day of the
:15 And God spake unto Noah, saying, 8:16 Go forth of the ark, thou,
and thy sons, and thy sons' wives with thee.
ing thing that is with thee, of
, both of fowl, and of cattle, and of every creeping thing
arth; that they may breed abundantly in the
on the earth.
 and his sons, and his wife, and his sons'
creeping thing, and every
oever creepeth upon the earth, after their kinds, went
0 And Noah builded an altar unto the LORD; and took of every clean
ery clean fowl, and offered burnt offerings on the
led a sweet savour; and the LORD said in his
nd any more for man's sake; for
nation of man's heart is evil from his youth; neither will I
very thing living, as I have done.
 While the earth remaineth, seedtime and harvest, and cold and
 winter, and day and night shall not cease.
, and said unto them, Be
ltiply, and replenish the earth.
d the fear of you and the dread of you shall be upon every beast
upon every fowl of the air, upon all that moveth
ishes of the sea; into your hand are
 delivered.
 liveth shall be meat for you; even as the

ich is the blood thereof, shall
t.
ves will I require; at the hand of
beast will I require it, and at the hand of man; at the hand of
 will I require the life of man.
oso sheddeth man's blood, by man shall his blood be shed: for in
ade he man.
, and multiply; bring forth abundantly in
nd God spake unto Noah, and to his sons with him, saying, 9:9 And
blish my covenant with you, and with your seed after
g creature that is with you, of the
 of the cattle, and of every beast of the earth with you; from
he ark, to every beast of the earth.
11 And I will establish my covenant with you, neither shall all
y more by the waters of a flood; neither shall
 the earth.
the token of the covenant which I make
tween me and you and every living creature that is with you, for
ons: 9:13 I do set my bow in the cloud, and it shall
etween me and the earth.
all come to pass, when I bring a cloud over the earth,
n the cloud: 9:15 And I will remember my
covenant, which is between me and you and every living creature of all
he waters shall no more become a flood to destroy all
all be in the cloud; and I will look upon it, that
ovenant between God and every living
ture of all flesh that is upon the earth.
e token of the covenant, which
ablished between me and all flesh that is upon the earth.
ah, that went forth of the ark, were Shem, and
her of Canaan.
 sons of Noah: and of them was the whole earth
o be an husbandman, and he planted a vineyard:
as drunken; and he was uncovered
is tent.
naan, saw the nakedness of his father,
d told his two brethren without.
nd Shem and Japheth took a garment, and laid it upon both their
 backward, and covered the nakedness of their
, and they saw not their father's
ss.
and knew what his younger son had
to him.
aan; a servant of servants shall he be
to his brethren.
sed be the LORD God of Shem; and Canaan shall be
arge Japheth, and he shall dwell in the tents of
ant.
d three hundred and fifty years.
nd all the days of Noah were nine hundred and fifty years: and
 these are the generations of the sons of Noah, Shem, Ham, and
em were sons born after the flood.
 The sons of Japheth; Gomer, and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and
h, and Tiras.
r; Ashkenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah.

Tarshish, Kittim, and
 these were the isles of the Gentiles divided in their lands;
ongue, after their families, in their nations.
d Mizraim, and Phut, and Canaan.
nd the sons of Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabtah, and Raamah,
the sons of Raamah; Sheba, and Dedan.
0:8 And Cush begat Nimrod: he began to be a mighty one in the earth.
a mighty hunter before the LORD: wherefore it is said,
nter before the LORD.
inning of his kingdom was Babel, and Erech, and
hinar.
h Asshur, and builded Nineveh, and the
ty Rehoboth, and Calah, 10:12 And Resen between Nineveh and Calah:
eat city.
, and Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim,
f whom came Philistim,) and

rn, and Heth, 10:16 And the
 the Amorite, and the Girgasite, 10:17 And the Hivite,
te, 10:18 And the Arvadite, and the
ite, and the Hamathite: and afterward were the families of the
road.
nites was from Sidon, as thou comest
erar, unto Gaza; as thou goest, unto Sodom, and Gomorrah, and
en unto Lasha.
 of Ham, after their families, after their
r nations.
ther of all the children of Eber, the
ther of Japheth the elder, even to him were children born.
Shem; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud,
of Aram; Uz, and Hul, and Gether, and Mash.
alah begat Eber.
re born two sons: the name of one was Peleg; for
 and his brother's name was Joktan.
26 And Joktan begat Almodad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and
oram, and Uzal, and Diklah, 10:28 And Obal, and
, and Havilah, and Jobab: all these
the sons of Joktan.
lling was from Mesha, as thou goest unto Sephar a
 are the sons of Shem, after their families, after their
fter their nations.
 families of the sons of Noah, after their
ese were the nations divided
 after the flood.
rth was of one language, and of one speech.
rneyed from the east, that they
lain in the land of Shinar; and they dwelt there.
er, Go to, let us make brick, and burn
em thoroughly. And they had brick for stone, and slime had they for
 And they said, Go to, let us build us a city and a tower, whose
 heaven; and let us make us a name, lest we be
e whole earth.
own to see the city and the tower, which the
he LORD said, Behold, the people is one, and they have all
hey begin to do: and now nothing will be
restrained from them, which they have imagined to do.
 and there confound their language, that
they may not understand one another's speech.
oad from thence upon the face of
earth: and they left off to build the city.
ed Babel; because the LORD did
ound the language of all the earth: and from thence did the
d upon the face of all the earth.
 These are the generations of Shem: Shem was an hundred years
ad two years after the flood: 11:11 And Shem
dred years, and begat sons and

ty years, and begat Salah: 11:13
axad lived after he begat Salah four hundred and three years,
ughters.
ears, and begat Eber: 11:15 And Salah
ed after he begat Eber four hundred and three years, and begat sons

ars, and begat Peleg: 11:17 And
d after he begat Peleg four hundred and thirty years, and

d begat Reu: 11:19 And Peleg
he begat Reu two hundred and nine years, and begat sons
 Reu lived two and thirty years, and begat Serug: 11:21 And
t Serug two hundred and seven years, and begat
ug lived thirty years, and begat Nahor: 11:23 And Serug
two hundred years, and begat sons and
ghters.
twenty years, and begat Terah: 11:25
Nahor lived after he begat Terah an hundred and nineteen years,
daughters.
y years, and begat Abram, Nahor, and
n.
of Terah: Terah begat Abram,
aran; and Haran begat Lot.
ran died before his father Terah in the land of his
.
ives: the name of Abram's wife
 and the name of Nahor's wife, Milcah, the daughter of
 and the father of Iscah.
ai was barren; she had no child.
And Terah took Abram his son, and Lot the son of Haran his son's
 daughter in law, his son Abram's wife; and they
e Chaldees, to go into the land of
; and they came unto Haran, and dwelt there.
 hundred and five years: and Terah
n Haran.
o Abram, Get thee out of thy country,
 from thy kindred, and from thy father's house, unto a land that I
12:2 And I will make of thee a great nation, and I
me great; and thou shalt be a
2:3 And I will bless them that bless thee, and curse him
thee shall all families of the earth be
lessed.
LORD had spoken unto him; and Lot went
th him: and Abram was seventy and five years old when he departed
12:5 And Abram took Sarai his wife, and Lot his brother's son, and all
nce that they had gathered, and the souls that they had
ent forth to go into the land of Canaan;
and into the land of Canaan they came.
12:6 And Abram passed through the land unto the place of Sichem, unto
Moreh. And the Canaanite was then in the land.
ram, and said, Unto thy seed will I
this land: and there builded he an altar unto the LORD, who
2:8 And he removed from thence unto a mountain on the east of Bethel,
is tent, having Bethel on the west, and Hai on the east:
tar unto the LORD, and called upon the name
d, going on still toward the south.
10 And there was a famine in the land: and Abram went down into
ere; for the famine was grievous in the land.
was come near to enter into Egypt,
e said unto Sarai his wife, Behold now, I know that thou art a
pon: 12:12 Therefore it shall come to pass, when
 they shall say, This is his wife:
ey will kill me, but they will save thee alive.
my sister: that it may be well with
r thy sake; and my soul shall live because of thee.
at, when Abram was come into Egypt, the
gyptians beheld the woman that she was very fair.
oh saw her, and commended her before
aoh: and the woman was taken into Pharaoh's house.
ell for her sake: and he had sheep, and
xen, and he asses, and menservants, and maidservants, and she asses,

s house with great plagues
ai Abram's wife.
ed Abram and said, What is this that thou hast
l me that she was thy wife?  12:19
idst thou, She is my sister? so I might have taken her to me to
 behold thy wife, take her, and go thy way.
oncerning him: and they sent him
d his wife, and all that he had.
nd Abram went up out of Egypt, he, and his wife, and all that he
him, into the south.
 very rich in cattle, in silver, and in gold.
om the south even to Bethel, unto
ce where his tent had been at the beginning, between Bethel and
place of the altar, which he had make there at the
 the name of the LORD.
o, which went with Abram, had flocks, and herds, and
s not able to bear them, that they might dwell
eat, so that they could not dwell
r.
the herdmen of Abram's cattle and
dmen of Lot's cattle: and the Canaanite and the Perizzite

e be no strife, I pray thee,
nd thee, and between my herdmen and thy herdmen; for we be
 the whole land before thee? separate thyself, I pray thee,
ake the left hand, then I will go to the right;
, then I will go to the left.
 Lot lifted up his eyes, and beheld all the plain of Jordan,
ed every where, before the LORD destroyed Sodom
 the LORD, like the land of Egypt,
u comest unto Zoar.
e him all the plain of Jordan; and Lot journeyed
s the one from the other.
welled in the land of Canaan, and Lot dwelled in the
ed his tent toward Sodom.
 men of Sodom were wicked and sinners before the LORD
 LORD said unto Abram, after that Lot was separated from
s, and look from the place where thou art
nd westward: 13:15 For all
 thou seest, to thee will I give it, and to thy seed for
make thy seed as the dust of the earth: so that if a
 earth, then shall thy seed also be
red.
 in the length of it and in the
f it; for I will give it unto thee.
18 Then Abram removed his tent, and came and dwelt in the plain of
in Hebron, and built there an altar unto the LORD.
e days of Amraphel king of Shinar,
 king of Ellasar, Chedorlaomer king of Elam, and Tidal king of
hese made war with Bera king of Sodom, and with
g of Admah, and Shemeber king of
 and the king of Bela, which is Zoar.
4:3 All these were joined together in the vale of Siddim, which is

r, and in the thirteenth year
ed.
e Chedorlaomer, and the kings that
ith him, and smote the Rephaims in Ashteroth Karnaim, and the
e Emins in Shaveh Kiriathaim, 14:6 And the
n, which is by the wilderness.
 they returned, and came to Enmishpat, which is Kadesh, and
f the Amalekites, and also the Amorites, that
ere went out the king of Sodom, and the king of Gomorrah,
d the king of Zeboiim, and the king of Bela
tle with them in the vale of
 With Chedorlaomer the king of Elam, and with Tidal king
ing of Shinar, and Arioch king of Ellasar;
ale of Siddim was full of slimepits; and the kings of
fell there; and they that remained fled
o the mountain.
 the goods of Sodom and Gomorrah, and all their
:12 And they took Lot, Abram's brother's son, who dwelt in Sodom,
d departed.
at had escaped, and told Abram the Hebrew;
morite, brother of Eshcol, and
 Aner: and these were confederate with Abram.
 brother was taken captive, he
trained servants, born in his own house, three hundred and
em unto Dan.
lf against them, he and his servants, by
night, and smote them, and pursued them unto Hobah, which is on the
mascus.
he goods, and also brought again his
her Lot, and his goods, and the women also, and the people.
 Sodom went out to meet him after his return from
d of the kings that were with him, at
 valley of Shaveh, which is the king's dale.
brought forth bread and wine: and
the priest of the most high God.
And he blessed him, and said, Blessed be Abram of the most high
eaven and earth: 14:20 And blessed be the most high
 enemies into thy hand. And he gave him
ithes of all.
om said unto Abram, Give me the persons, and
d Abram said to the king of Sodom, I have lift up mine hand
 high God, the possessor of heaven and earth,
ead even to a shoelatchet, and
l not take any thing that is thine, lest thou shouldest say,
: 14:24 Save only that which the young men have
hich went with me, Aner, Eshcol,
e; let them take their portion.
ter these things the word of the LORD came unto Abram in a
, Abram: I am thy shield, and thy exceeding
ORD God, what wilt thou give me, seeing I go
 is this Eliezer of Damascus?
ram said, Behold, to me thou hast given no seed: and, lo,
ine heir.
 the LORD came unto him, saying, This
ll not be thine heir; but he that shall come forth out of thine own
 thine heir.
rth abroad, and said, Look now toward
ven, and tell the stars, if thou be able to number them: and he
hall thy seed be.
in the LORD; and he counted it to him for
im, I am the LORD that brought thee out of Ur
nd to inherit it.
D God, whereby shall I know that I shall inherit
ke me an heifer of three years old,
 she goat of three years old, and a ram of three years old, and a
 young pigeon.
im all these, and divided them in the midst,
r: but the birds divided he not.
And when the fowls came down upon the carcases, Abram drove them
 when the sun was going down, a deep sleep fell upon Abram;
reat darkness fell upon him.
he said unto Abram, Know of a surety that thy seed shall be
at is not their's, and shall serve them; and
ears; 15:14 And also that
ey shall serve, will I judge: and afterward shall they
e.
rs in peace; thou shalt be buried
od old age.
eration they shall come hither again: for
ull.
hen the sun went down, and it was
ehold a smoking furnace, and a burning lamp that passed between
:18 In the same day the LORD made a covenant with Abram, saying,
 I given this land, from the river of Egypt unto the
es: 15:19 The Kenites, and the
, and the Kadmonites, 15:20 And the Hittites, and the
 15:21 And the Amorites, and the
es, and the Girgashites, and the Jebusites.
no children: and she had an
Egyptian, whose name was Hagar.
d Sarai said unto Abram, Behold now, the LORD hath restrained
ay thee, go in unto my maid; it may be that I may
 hearkened to the voice of Sarai.
And Sarai Abram's wife took Hagar her maid the Egyptian, after
years in the land of Canaan, and gave her to her
6:4 And he went in unto Hagar, and she conceived: and when she saw
ceived, her mistress was despised in her eyes.
 wrong be upon thee: I have given my
 into thy bosom; and when she saw that she had conceived, I was
s: the LORD judge between me and thee.
16:6 But Abram said unto Sarai, Behold, thy maid is in thine hand; do
pleaseth thee. And when Sarai dealt hardly with her, she
7 And the angel of the LORD found her by a fountain of water in the
the fountain in the way to Shur.
nd he said, Hagar, Sarai's maid, whence camest thou? and whither
she said, I flee from the face of my mistress Sarai.
RD said unto her, Return to thy mistress,
:10 And the angel of the LORD said unto her, I will multiply thy
that it shall not be numbered for multitude.
 unto her, Behold, thou art with
d shalt bear a son, and shalt call his name Ishmael; because
y affliction.
ld man; his hand will be against every man,
e shall dwell in the presence
brethren.
 of the LORD that spake unto her, Thou
d seest me: for she said, Have I also here looked after him that
herefore the well was called Beerlahairoi; behold,

bram called his son's name,
are, Ishmael.
core and six years old, when Hagar bare
shmael to Abram.
s ninety years old and nine, the LORD appeared
e Almighty God; walk before me,
ou perfect.
enant between me and thee, and will
ply thee exceedingly.
ll on his face: and God talked with him, saying, 17:4
t is with thee, and thou shalt be a
r of many nations.
hy name any more be called Abram, but thy name
ny nations have I made thee.
 will make thee exceeding fruitful, and I will make nations
l come out of thee.
ablish my covenant between me and thee and thy seed
 for an everlasting covenant, to be a
 unto thee, and to thy seed after thee.

y seed after thee, the land
art a stranger, all the land of Canaan, for an
e their God.
aham, Thou shalt keep my covenant therefore,
 generations.
, which ye shall keep, between me and you and
among you shall be circumcised.
nd ye shall circumcise the flesh of your foreskin; and it shall
ovenant betwixt me and you.
e that is eight days old shall be circumcised among you,
nerations, he that is born in the house, or
h is not of thy seed.
born in thy house, and he that is bought with thy
 and my covenant shall be in your
or an everlasting covenant.
he uncircumcised man child whose flesh of his foreskin is
l shall be cut off from his people; he hath
id unto Abraham, As for Sarai thy wife, thou shalt not
ah shall her name be.
bless her, and give thee a son also of her: yea, I
 a mother of nations; kings of people
ll be of her.
pon his face, and laughed, and said in his
at is an hundred years old?
ah, that is ninety years old, bear?  17:18 And Abraham
l might live before thee!  17:19 And God
said, Sarah thy wife shall bear thee a son indeed; and thou shalt call
ac: and I will establish my covenant with him for an
 his seed after him.
shmael, I have heard thee: Behold, I have blessed
and will multiply him exceedingly;
 princes shall he beget, and I will make him a great nation.
t will I establish with Isaac, which Sarah shall
 the next year.
alking with him, and God went up from Abraham.
 son, and all that were born in his
, and all that were bought with his money, every male among the
use; and circumcised the flesh of their foreskin in
id unto him.
ty years old and nine, when he was
cised in the flesh of his foreskin.
25 And Ishmael his son was thirteen years old, when he was
 of his foreskin.
 day was Abraham circumcised, and Ishmael his
house, born in the house, and bought with
ith him.
o him in the plains of Mamre: and he sat
in the tent door in the heat of the day; 18:2 And he lift up his eyes
nd, lo, three men stood by him: and when he saw them, he
tent door, and bowed himself toward the
round, 18:3 And said, My LORD, if now I have found favour in thy
ay, I pray thee, from thy servant: 18:4 Let a little
 and wash your feet, and rest yourselves
under the tree: 18:5 And I will fetch a morsel of bread, and comfort
; after that ye shall pass on: for therefore are ye come
said, So do, as thou hast said.
d Abraham hastened into the tent unto Sarah, and said, Make
sures of fine meal, knead it, and make cakes
an unto the herd, and fetcht a calf tender and good,
and he hasted to dress it.
took butter, and milk, and the calf which he had dressed,
nd he stood by them under the tree, and they
m, Where is Sarah thy wife? And he said,
Behold, in the tent.
 I will certainly return unto thee according to the
y wife shall have a son. And Sarah
it in the tent door, which was behind him.
nd well stricken in age; and it
 be with Sarah after the manner of women.
rself, saying, After I am waxed
 I have pleasure, my lord being old also?  18:13 And the LORD
erefore did Sarah laugh, saying, Shall I of a
8:14 Is any thing too hard for
At the time appointed I will return unto thee, according to
arah shall have a son.
 denied, saying, I laughed not; for she was afraid.
t laugh.
 thence, and looked toward Sodom: and
aham went with them to bring them on the way.
de from Abraham that thing which I
:18 Seeing that Abraham shall surely become a great and mighty
nations of the earth shall be blessed in him?
mmand his children and his
r him, and they shall keep the way of the LORD, to do
e LORD may bring upon Abraham that which
he hath spoken of him.
RD said, Because the cry of Sodom and Gomorrah is
ery grievous; 18:21 I will go down
nd see whether they have done altogether according to the cry of
unto me; and if not, I will know.
 And the men turned their faces from thence, and went toward
od yet before the LORD.
am drew near, and said, Wilt thou also destroy the
4 Peradventure there be fifty
ithin the city: wilt thou also destroy and not spare the
ous that are therein?  18:25 That be far
from thee to do after this manner, to slay the righteous with the
the righteous should be as the wicked, that be far
f all the earth do right?  18:26 And
LORD said, If I find in Sodom fifty righteous within the city,
l the place for their sakes.
Abraham answered and said, Behold now, I have taken upon me
 which am but dust and ashes: 18:28
venture there shall lack five of the fifty righteous: wilt thou
y for lack of five? And he said, If I find there
 it.
ain, and said, Peradventure there
e forty found there. And he said, I will not do it for forty's
e said unto him, Oh let not the LORD be angry, and I will
 shall thirty be found there. And he said, I
.
 taken upon me to speak unto the
radventure there shall be twenty found there. And he said, I
r twenty's sake.
let not the LORD be angry, and I will speak yet
ll be found there. And he said, I
t destroy it for ten's sake.
the LORD went his way, as soon as he had left communing with
eturned unto his place.
came two angels to Sodom at even; and Lot sat in the
them rose up to meet them; and he bowed
imself with his face toward the ground; 19:2 And he said, Behold now,
n in, I pray you, into your servant's house, and tarry
t, and ye shall rise up early, and go on
your ways. And they said, Nay; but we will abide in the street all
nd he pressed upon them greatly; and they turned in unto him,
house; and he made them a feast, and did bake

f the city, even the men of
sed the house round, both old and young, all the people
d they called unto Lot, and said unto him,
this night? bring them out
we may know them.
 at the door unto them, and shut the door after
thren, do not so wickedly.
now, I have two daughters which have not known man; let
out unto you, and do ye to them as is good
hing; for therefore came they
hadow of my roof.
tand back. And they said again, This one fellow
ds be a judge: now will we deal
h thee, than with them. And they pressed sore upon the man,
 to break the door.
ut forth their hand, and pulled Lot into the house

t the door of the house with
oth small and great: so that they wearied themselves to
 the men said unto Lot, Hast thou here any besides? son in
hy daughters, and whatsoever thou hast in the
9:13 For we will destroy this
use the cry of them is waxen great before the face of the
ent us to destroy it.
t out, and spake unto his sons in law, which married
et you out of this place; for the LORD
ll destroy this city. But he seemed as one that mocked unto his sons
15 And when the morning arose, then the angels hastened Lot,
y wife, and thy two daughters, which are here;
y of the city.
red, the men laid hold upon his hand, and upon
and of his two daughters; the LORD
merciful unto him: and they brought him forth, and set him
17 And it came to pass, when they had brought them forth abroad,
pe for thy life; look not behind thee, neither stay
o the mountain, lest thou be consumed.
19:18 And Lot said unto them, Oh, not so, my LORD: 19:19 Behold now,
th found grace in thy sight, and thou hast magnified thy
wed unto me in saving my life; and I cannot
take me, and I die: 19:20
s city is near to flee unto, and it is a little one:
 it not a little one?) and my soul shall
live.
I have accepted thee concerning this
g also, that I will not overthrow this city, for the which thou
22 Haste thee, escape thither; for I cannot do anything till thou
Therefore the name of the city was called Zoar.
earth when Lot entered into Zoar.
 Then the LORD rained upon Sodom and upon Gomorrah brimstone and
 out of heaven; 19:25 And he overthrew those cities,
 inhabitants of the cities, and that
h grew upon the ground.
ife looked back from behind him, and she became a
ham gat up early in the morning to the place where he
And he looked toward Sodom and Gomorrah,
and toward all the land of the plain, and beheld, and, lo, the smoke
 went up as the smoke of a furnace.
29 And it came to pass, when God destroyed the cities of the plain,
ered Abraham, and sent Lot out of the midst of the
 cities in the which Lot dwelt.
nd Lot went up out of Zoar, and dwelt in the mountain, and his
im; for he feared to dwell in Zoar: and he dwelt
s.
e younger, Our father is old, and
s not a man in the earth to come in unto us after the manner of
2 Come, let us make our father drink wine, and we
eserve seed of our father.
ey made their father drink wine that night: and the
 her father; and he perceived not when
e lay down, nor when she arose.
nd it came to pass on the morrow, that the firstborn said unto
 I lay yesternight with my father: let us make him
go thou in, and lie with him, that we
 preserve seed of our father.
 they made their father drink wine that night also: and the
with him; and he perceived not when she lay
 were both the daughters of Lot with child by their father.
orn bare a son, and called his name Moab: the
to this day.
 also bare a son, and called his name
ammi: the same is the father of the children of Ammon unto this
raham journeyed from thence toward the south country, and
d Shur, and sojourned in Gerar.
d Abraham said of Sarah his wife, She is my sister: and
t, and took Sarah.
 Abimelech in a dream by night, and said to him,
or the woman which thou hast taken;
he is a man's wife.
had not come near her: and he said, LORD, wilt thou
20:5 Said he not unto me, She is my
r? and she, even she herself said, He is my brother: in the
nd innocency of my hands have I done this.
 Yea, I know that thou didst
integrity of thy heart; for I also withheld thee from
 suffered I thee not to touch her.
 Now therefore restore the man his wife; for he is a prophet, and
 thee, and thou shalt live: and if thou restore her
surely die, thou, and all that are

 the morning, and called all his
, and told all these things in their ears: and the men were
en Abimelech called Abraham, and said unto him, What hast thou
at have I offended thee, that thou hast brought on
? thou hast done deeds unto me that
 not to be done.
id unto Abraham, What sawest thou, that thou
am said, Because I thought,
ar of God is not in this place; and they will slay me for
And yet indeed she is my sister; she is the daughter of my
hter of my mother; and she became my wife.
used me to wander from my
 that I said unto her, This is thy kindness which thou
 place whither we shall come, say of me,
He is my brother.
ook sheep, and oxen, and menservants, and
, and restored him Sarah his
15 And Abimelech said, Behold, my land is before thee: dwell where
.
 I have given thy brother a
es of silver: behold, he is to thee a covering of the
thee, and with all other: thus she was
proved.
d: and God healed Abimelech, and his
, and his maidservants; and they bare children.
d up all the wombs of the house of
ech, because of Sarah Abraham's wife.
1:1 And the LORD visited Sarah as he had said, and the LORD did unto
d spoken.
 bare Abraham a son in his old age, at
e set time of which God had spoken to him.
s son that was born unto him,
bare to him, Isaac.
rcumcised his son Isaac being eight days old, as
 Abraham was an hundred years old, when his son Isaac was born
d Sarah said, God hath made me to laugh, so that all that hear

unto Abraham, that Sarah should
n children suck? for I have born him a son in his old age.
w, and was weaned: and Abraham made a great
d.
the Egyptian, which she had born
aham, mocking.
 unto Abraham, Cast out this bondwoman and her
hall not be heir with my son, even
saac.
vous in Abraham's sight because of
n.
 it not be grievous in thy sight
of the lad, and because of thy bondwoman; in all that Sarah
arken unto her voice; for in Isaac shall thy
he son of the bondwoman will I make a nation,
Abraham rose up early in the morning, and took bread, and a
ve it unto Hagar, putting it on her shoulder,
 she departed, and wandered in
ness of Beersheba.
was spent in the bottle, and she cast the child
nd she went, and sat her down over against him a good way off,
t: for she said, Let me not see the death of the
m, and lift up her voice, and wept.
17 And God heard the voice of the lad; and the angel of God called
heaven, and said unto her, What aileth thee, Hagar?
e voice of the lad where he is.
rise, lift up the lad, and hold him in thine hand; for I will
on.
she saw a well of water; and she
d filled the bottle with water, and gave the lad drink.
e lad; and he grew, and dwelt in the
erness, and became an archer.
 he dwelt in the wilderness of Paran: and his mother took him
d of Egypt.
t that time, that Abimelech and Phichol the
raham, saying, God is with thee
at thou doest: 21:23 Now therefore swear unto me here by God
l falsely with me, nor with my son, nor with my
dness that I have done unto thee,
alt do unto me, and to the land wherein thou hast sojourned.
id, I will swear.
roved Abimelech because of a well of water, which
y taken away.
 I wot not who hath done this thing; neither
I of it, but to day.
took sheep and oxen, and gave them unto Abimelech;
.
 of the flock by themselves.
Abimelech said unto Abraham, What mean these seven ewe lambs
 themselves?  21:30 And he said, For these seven
nd, that they may be a witness unto
hat I have digged this well.
efore he called that place Beersheba; because there they
32 Thus they made a covenant at Beersheba: then Abimelech rose up,
chief captain of his host, and they returned into the
1:33 And Abraham planted a grove in Beersheba, and called there on
LORD, the everlasting God.
raham sojourned in the Philistines' land many days.
r these things, that God did tempt
m, and said unto him, Abraham: and he said, Behold, here I am.
Take now thy son, thine only son Isaac, whom thou
d of Moriah; and offer him there for
rnt offering upon one of the mountains which I will tell thee of.
m rose up early in the morning, and saddled his ass,
with him, and Isaac his son, and clave
e wood for the burnt offering, and rose up, and went unto the place
d told him.
Abraham lifted up his eyes, and saw the
lace afar off.
to his young men, Abide ye here with the ass;
worship, and come again to you.
d Abraham took the wood of the burnt offering, and laid it upon
he took the fire in his hand, and a knife; and they
22:7 And Isaac spake unto Abraham his father, and said, My father: and
e am I, my son. And he said, Behold the fire and the wood:
r a burnt offering?  22:8 And Abraham said, My
 for a burnt offering: so they
of them together.
 the place which God had told him of; and Abraham
e wood in order, and bound Isaac his
 and laid him on the altar upon the wood.
and, and took the knife to slay

unto him out of heaven, and
, Abraham: and he said, Here am I.
2 And he said, Lay not thine hand upon the lad, neither do thou
 for now I know that thou fearest God, seeing thou
 only son from me.
fted up his eyes, and looked, and behold behind
s horns: and Abraham went and took
m, and offered him up for a burnt offering in the stead of his
raham called the name of that place Jehovahjireh: as it is
 mount of the LORD it shall be seen.
:15 And the angel of the LORD called unto Abraham out of heaven the
:16 And said, By myself have I sworn, saith the LORD,
is thing, and hast not withheld thy son,
thine only son: 22:17 That in blessing I will bless thee, and in
 multiply thy seed as the stars of the heaven, and
a shore; and thy seed shall possess
ate of his enemies; 22:18 And in thy seed shall all the nations
ssed; because thou hast obeyed my voice.

 men, and they rose up and
to Beersheba; and Abraham dwelt at Beersheba.
se things, that it was told
ng, Behold, Milcah, she hath also born children unto thy
is firstborn, and Buz his brother, and
muel the father of Aram, 22:22 And Chesed, and Hazo, and Pildash,
Bethuel.
h: these eight Milcah did bear to Nahor,
Abraham's brother.
ine, whose name was Reumah, she bare also Tebah,
h.
ven and twenty years old: these
years of the life of Sarah.
rah died in Kirjatharba; the same is Hebron in the land of
 to mourn for Sarah, and to weep for her.
is dead, and spake unto the
 saying, 23:4 I am a stranger and a sojourner with you:
uryingplace with you, that I may bury my
dead out of my sight.
dren of Heth answered Abraham, saying unto him, 23:6
ighty prince among us: in the choice of
ur sepulchres bury thy dead; none of us shall withhold from thee his
 that thou mayest bury thy dead.
nd Abraham stood up, and bowed himself to the people of the
ren of Heth.
them, saying, If it be your mind that I
hould bury my dead out of my sight; hear me, and intreat for me to
f Zohar, 23:9 That he may give me the cave of
 the end of his field; for as
as it is worth he shall give it me for a possession of a

en of Heth: and Ephron the
ed Abraham in the audience of the children of Heth, even
 gate of his city, saying, 23:11 Nay, my
lord, hear me: the field give I thee, and the cave that is therein, I
 in the presence of the sons of my people give I it thee:
nd Abraham bowed down himself before the people of the land.
nto Ephron in the audience of the people of the
 it, I pray thee, hear me: I will
ee money for the field; take it of me, and I will bury my dead
Ephron answered Abraham, saying unto him, 23:15 My lord,
is worth four hundred shekels of silver;
what is that betwixt me and thee? bury therefore thy dead.
kened unto Ephron; and Abraham weighed to Ephron
the audience of the sons of Heth,
ndred shekels of silver, current money with the merchant.
Ephron which was in Machpelah, which was before
h was therein, and all the trees
e in the field, that were in all the borders round about, were
 Abraham for a possession in the presence of the
went in at the gate of his city.
And after this, Abraham buried Sarah his wife in the cave of the
 before Mamre: the same is Hebron in the land of
d the cave that is therein, were made sure unto
ngplace by the sons of Heth.
braham was old, and well stricken in age: and the LORD had
hings.
ldest servant of his house, that ruled
er all that he had, Put, I pray thee, thy hand under my thigh: 24:3
 thee swear by the LORD, the God of heaven, and the God
lt not take a wife unto my son of the
ghters of the Canaanites, among whom I dwell: 24:4 But thou shalt
y, and to my kindred, and take a wife unto my son
id unto him, Peradventure the woman will not be
: must I needs bring thy son again
he land from whence thou camest?  24:6 And Abraham said unto
thou bring not my son thither again.
:7 The LORD God of heaven, which took me from my father's house, and
of my kindred, and which spake unto me, and that sware
ed will I give this land; he shall send
is angel before thee, and thou shalt take a wife unto my son from
nd if the woman will not be willing to follow thee, then thou
his my oath: only bring not my son thither again.
nd under the thigh of Abraham his
 and sware to him concerning that matter.
f the camels of his master, and
 for all the goods of his master were in his hand: and he
tamia, unto the city of Nahor.
d he made his camels to kneel down without the city by a well
of the evening, even the time that women go out
 O LORD God of my master Abraham, I pray thee, send
w kindness unto my master Abraham.
3 Behold, I stand here by the well of water; and the daughters of
ty come out to draw water: 24:14 And let it come to
 shall say, Let down thy pitcher, I
thee, that I may drink; and she shall say, Drink, and I will give
also: let the same be she that thou hast appointed
by shall I know that thou hast shewed
dness unto my master.
 to pass, before he had done speaking, that, behold,
 to Bethuel, son of Milcah, the wife of
ahor, Abraham's brother, with her pitcher upon her shoulder.
 was very fair to look upon, a virgin, neither had
down to the well, and filled her
 and came up.
 to meet her, and said, Let me, I pray thee,

she hasted, and let down her
 her hand, and gave him drink.
d when she had done giving him drink, she said, I will draw
so, until they have done drinking.
0 And she hasted, and emptied her pitcher into the trough, and ran
ell to draw water, and drew for all his camels.
r held his peace, to wit whether the
 had made his journey prosperous or not.

 had done drinking, that the
olden earring of half a shekel weight, and two bracelets
ls weight of gold; 24:23 And said, Whose
daughter art thou? tell me, I pray thee: is there room in thy father's
 to lodge in?  24:24 And she said unto him, I am the
 Milcah, which she bare unto Nahor.
25 She said moreover unto him, We have both straw and provender
 lodge in.
 his head, and worshipped the LORD.
27 And he said, Blessed be the LORD God of my master Abraham, who
titute my master of his mercy and his truth: I being
 the house of my master's brethren.
28 And the damsel ran, and told them of her mother's house these
nd Rebekah had a brother, and his name was Laban: and Laban ran
nto the well.
, when he saw the earring and bracelets upon
the words of Rebekah his sister,
Thus spake the man unto me; that he came unto the man; and,
 camels at the well.
 Come in, thou blessed of the LORD; wherefore
pared the house, and room for the

 and he ungirded his camels, and
aw and provender for the camels, and water to wash his feet,
t were with him.
t meat before him to eat: but he said, I will
d. And he said, Speak on.
said, I am Abraham's servant.
 the LORD hath blessed my master greatly; and he is become
 him flocks, and herds, and silver, and gold,
d camels, and asses.
 master's wife bare a son to my master when she was
 all that he hath.
made me swear, saying, Thou shalt not take a wife
 Canaanites, in whose land I dwell:
 But thou shalt go unto my father's house, and to my kindred, and
my son.
, Peradventure the woman will not
me.
, before whom I walk, will send his
 with thee, and prosper thy way; and thou shalt take a wife for
d, and of my father's house: 24:41 Then shalt thou
 thou comest to my kindred; and if
ive not thee one, thou shalt be clear from my oath.
o the well, and said, O LORD God of my
ster Abraham, if now thou do prosper my way which I go: 24:43
e well of water; and it shall come to pass, that
aw water, and I say to her, Give me,
ay thee, a little water of thy pitcher to drink; 24:44 And she say
k thou, and I will also draw for thy camels: let the
D hath appointed out for my master's

n mine heart, behold, Rebekah
with her pitcher on her shoulder; and she went down unto
and I said unto her, Let me drink, I pray
t down her pitcher from her shoulder,
 said, Drink, and I will give thy camels drink also: so I drank,
amels drink also.
, and said, Whose daughter art thou? And she
 son, whom Milcah bare unto him:
t the earring upon her face, and the bracelets upon her hands.
down my head, and worshipped the LORD, and blessed
m, which had led me in the right way
ake my master's brother's daughter unto his son.
ndly and truly with my master, tell
nd if not, tell me; that I may turn to the right hand, or to the
n Laban and Bethuel answered and said, The thing proceedeth
t speak unto thee bad or good.
hold, Rebekah is before thee, take her, and go, and let her be
ife, as the LORD hath spoken.
 it came to pass, that, when Abraham's servant heard their
 LORD, bowing himself to the earth.
53 And the servant brought forth jewels of silver, and jewels of
 and gave them to Rebekah: he gave also to her
hings.
, he and the men that were with him,
tarried all night; and they rose up in the morning, and he said,
my master.
r mother said, Let the damsel abide with
us a few days, at the least ten; after that she shall go.
them, Hinder me not, seeing the LORD hath
 go to my master.
We will call the damsel, and enquire at her
, and said unto her, Wilt thou go with
is man? And she said, I will go.
And they sent away Rebekah their sister, and her nurse, and
his men.
, and said unto her, Thou art our
 be thou the mother of thousands of millions, and let thy seed
those which hate them.
h arose, and her damsels, and they rode upon the
the servant took Rebekah, and went
y.
 the well Lahairoi; for he dwelt
outh country.
to meditate in the field at the eventide: and
behold, the camels were coming.
nd Rebekah lifted up her eyes, and when she saw Isaac, she

 What man is this that walketh
ld to meet us? And the servant had said, It is my master:
, and covered herself.
rvant told Isaac all things that he had done.
s mother Sarah's tent, and took
and she became his wife; and he loved her: and Isaac was
's death.
a wife, and her name was Keturah.
And she bare him Zimran, and Jokshan, and Medan, and Midian, and

n. And the sons of Dedan were
nd Letushim, and Leummim.
sons of Midian; Ephah, and Epher, and Hanoch, and Abidah,
e the children of Keturah.
aham gave all that he had unto Isaac.
5:6 But unto the sons of the concubines, which Abraham had, Abraham
 sent them away from Isaac his son, while he yet lived,
ntry.
e years of Abraham's life which he
 an hundred threescore and fifteen years.
d died in a good old age, an
 full of years; and was gathered to his people.
el buried him in the cave of
n the field of Ephron the son of Zohar the Hittite, which
e field which Abraham purchased of the sons
Sarah his wife.
ss after the death of Abraham, that God blessed
he well Lahairoi.
he generations of Ishmael, Abraham's son, whom
, bare unto Abraham: 25:13 And
the names of the sons of Ishmael, by their names, according
he firstborn of Ishmael, Nebajoth; and Kedar,
hma, and Dumah, and Massa, 25:15
nd Tema, Jetur, Naphish, and Kedemah: 25:16 These are the sons
e are their names, by their towns, and by their
o their nations.
e years of the life of Ishmael, an hundred and
up the ghost and died; and was
nto his people.
om Havilah unto Shur, that is before Egypt, as
ed in the presence of all his

saac, Abraham's son: Abraham
 25:20 And Isaac was forty years old when he took Rebekah
Bethuel the Syrian of Padanaram, the sister
 intreated the LORD for his wife, because she was
d of him, and Rebekah his wife

her within her; and she said, If
, why am I thus? And she went to enquire of the LORD.
o her, Two nations are in thy womb, and two
m thy bowels; and the one
 stronger than the other people; and the elder shall
d when her days to be delivered were fulfilled, behold, there
b.
l over like an hairy garment; and
lled his name Esau.
t came his brother out, and his hand took hold on
led Jacob: and Isaac was threescore
 old when she bare them.
boys grew: and Esau was a cunning hunter, a man of the
 man, dwelling in tents.
c loved Esau, because he did eat of his venison: but
And Jacob sod pottage: and Esau came from the field, and he was
au said to Jacob, Feed me, I pray thee, with that
 therefore was his name called Edom.
:31 And Jacob said, Sell me this day thy birthright.
 I am at the point to die: and what profit
nd Jacob said, Swear to me
he sware unto him: and he sold his birthright unto
Esau bread and pottage of lentiles; and he did
 his way: thus Esau despised his
ht.
land, beside the first famine that
 the days of Abraham. And Isaac went unto Abimelech king of the
rar.
m, and said, Go not down into Egypt;
l in the land which I shall tell thee of: 26:3 Sojourn in this
with thee, and will bless thee; for unto thee, and
hese countries, and I will perform the
th which I sware unto Abraham thy father; 26:4 And I will make thy
 as the stars of heaven, and will give unto thy seed
y seed shall all the nations of the
 be blessed; 26:5 Because that Abraham obeyed my voice, and kept
andments, my statutes, and my laws.
6 And Isaac dwelt in Gerar: 26:7 And the men of the place asked him
d he said, She is my sister: for he feared to say, She
he men of the place should kill me for
bekah; because she was fair to look upon.
een there a long time, that
g of the Philistines looked out at a window, and saw,
ng with Rebekah his wife.
elech called Isaac, and said, Behold, of a surety she is
hou, She is my sister? And Isaac said unto

 thou hast done unto us? one of
e might lightly have lien with thy wife, and thou shouldest
 upon us.
ll his people, saying, He that toucheth
his man or his wife shall surely be put to death.
land, and received in the same year an
ndredfold: and the LORD blessed him.
:13 And the man waxed great, and went forward, and grew until he
 26:14 For he had possession of flocks, and
 servants: and the Philistines
.
her's servants had digged in the
Abraham his father, the Philistines had stopped them, and

from us; for thou art much
we.
d pitched his tent in the valley of
, and dwelt there.
ed again the wells of water, which they had digged
r; for the Philistines had stopped
fter the death of Abraham: and he called their names after the
ather had called them.
s servants digged in the valley, and found there a
0 And the herdmen of Gerar did strive with Isaac's herdmen,
rs: and he called the name of the well Esek;
 And they digged another well, and strove for that also: and he
it Sitnah.
ence, and digged another well; and for
at they strove not: and he called the name of it Rehoboth; and he
 LORD hath made room for us, and we shall be fruitful
went up from thence to Beersheba.
 And the LORD appeared unto him the same night, and said, I am
hy father: fear not, for I am with thee, and will
 for my servant Abraham's sake.
nd he builded an altar there, and called upon the name of the
 tent there: and there Isaac's servants digged a
 to him from Gerar, and Ahuzzath one of his
of his army.
them, Wherefore come ye to me, seeing ye
hate me, and have sent me away from you?  26:28 And they said, We saw
t the LORD was with thee: and we said, Let there be now
twixt us and thee, and let us make a
nant with thee; 26:29 That thou wilt do us no hurt, as we have not
d as we have done unto thee nothing but good, and have
u art now the blessed of the LORD.
0 And he made them a feast, and they did eat and drink.
times in the morning, and sware one to
other: and Isaac sent them away, and they departed from him in
it came to pass the same day, that Isaac's servants came,
he well which they had digged, and said unto
 he called it Shebah: therefore the name of the city is

e took to wife Judith the
ri the Hittite, and Bashemath the daughter of Elon the
grief of mind unto Isaac and to Rebekah.

c was old, and his eyes were
 he could not see, he called Esau his eldest son, and said
 said unto him, Behold, here am I.
 And he said, Behold now, I am old, I know not the day of my
ore take, I pray thee, thy weapons, thy quiver
, and take me some venison; 27:4
 me savoury meat, such as I love, and bring it to me, that I
may bless thee before I die.
ebekah heard when Isaac spake to Esau his son. And Esau went
or venison, and to bring it.
ebekah spake unto Jacob her son, saying, Behold, I heard thy
 thy brother, saying, 27:7 Bring me venison, and
at, and bless thee before the LORD
 my death.
obey my voice according to that which I
ommand thee.
and fetch me from thence two good kids of
eat for thy father, such as
:10 And thou shalt bring it to thy father, that he may
hee before his death.
aid to Rebekah his mother, Behold, Esau my brother is
h man: 27:12 My father peradventure will
feel me, and I shall seem to him as a deceiver; and I shall bring a
and not a blessing.
r said unto him, Upon me be thy curse, my son: only
them.
nd brought them to his mother: and
ther made savoury meat, such as his father loved.
aiment of her eldest son Esau, which
 with her in the house, and put them upon Jacob her younger son:
the skins of the kids of the goats upon his hands,
 27:17 And she gave the savoury meat
the bread, which she had prepared, into the hand of her son Jacob.
ame unto his father, and said, My father: and he said,
son?  27:19 And Jacob said unto his
r, I am Esau thy first born; I have done according as thou badest
 thee, sit and eat of my venison, that thy soul may
id unto his son, How is it that thou hast found it
 Because the LORD thy God brought it
e.
e near, I pray thee, that I may
, my son, whether thou be my very son Esau or not.
 Isaac his father; and he felt him, and
aid, The voice is Jacob's voice, but the hands are the hands of Esau.
e discerned him not, because his hands were hairy, as his
he blessed him.
thou my very son Esau? And he said, I am.
 and I will eat of my son's
 my soul may bless thee. And he brought it near to him,
ght him wine and he drank.
s father Isaac said unto him, Come near now, and kiss me,
ame near, and kissed him: and he smelled the smell of
 and said, See, the smell of my son is as
blessed: 27:28 Therefore God
 the dew of heaven, and the fatness of the earth, and
9 Let people serve thee, and nations bow
down to thee: be lord over thy brethren, and let thy mother's sons bow
: cursed be every one that curseth thee, and blessed be he
7:30 And it came to pass, as soon as Isaac had made an end of
acob was yet scarce gone out from the presence of
rother came in from his hunting.
And he also had made savoury meat, and brought it unto his
s father, Let my father arise, and eat of his
s me.
nto him, Who art thou? And he said, I
thy son, thy firstborn Esau.
Isaac trembled very exceedingly, and said, Who? where is he
, and brought it me, and I have eaten of all
im? yea, and he shall be
4 And when Esau heard the words of his father, he cried with a
bitter cry, and said unto his father, Bless me,
 And he said, Thy brother came with subtilty, and hath taken away
27:36 And he said, Is not he rightly named Jacob? for he hath
wo times: he took away my birthright; and,
ng. And he said, Hast thou not
 blessing for me?  27:37 And Isaac answered and said unto
 him thy lord, and all his brethren have I
 and wine have I sustained
shall I do now unto thee, my son?  27:38 And Esau said
ut one blessing, my father? bless me, even
 his voice, and wept.
is father answered and said unto him, Behold, thy
the earth, and of the dew of heaven
above; 27:40 And by thy sword shalt thou live, and shalt serve
shall come to pass when thou shalt have the
e from off thy neck.
ed Jacob because of the blessing wherewith his
 his heart, The days of mourning
ather are at hand; then will I slay my brother Jacob.
au her elder son were told to Rebekah: and
n, and said unto him, Behold,
 Esau, as touching thee, doth comfort himself, purposing to
 therefore, my son, obey my voice; arise, flee thou to Laban
7:44 And tarry with him a few days, until thy
 thy brother's anger turn away
 and he forget that which thou hast done to him: then I will
rom thence: why should I be deprived also of you
h said to Isaac, I am weary of my
cause of the daughters of Heth: if Jacob take a wife of the
 as these which are of the daughters of the
8:1 And Isaac called Jacob, and
im, and charged him, and said unto him, Thou shalt not take a
 of Canaan.
, to the house of Bethuel thy mother's
ther; and take thee a wife from thence of the daughers of Laban thy
r.
d make thee fruitful, and multiply
that thou mayest be a multitude of people; 28:4 And give thee
am, to thee, and to thy seed with thee; that thou
hou art a stranger, which God gave
braham.
 and he went to Padanaram unto Laban,
 of Bethuel the Syrian, the brother of Rebekah, Jacob's and Esau's
When Esau saw that Isaac had blessed Jacob, and sent him away to
 him a wife from thence; and that as he blessed him
hou shalt not take a wife of the
 of Canaan; 28:7 And that Jacob obeyed his father and his
adanaram; 28:8 And Esau seeing that the
aughters of Canaan pleased not Isaac his father; 28:9 Then went Esau
and took unto the wives which he had Mahalath the
, the sister of Nebajoth, to be his

a, and went toward Haran.
lighted upon a certain place, and tarried there all
 and he took of the stones of that
 and put them for his pillows, and lay down in that place to
 dreamed, and behold a ladder set up on the earth, and the
ven: and behold the angels of God ascending
old, the LORD stood above it, and said, I am the LORD
d the God of Isaac: the land whereon thou
 seed; 28:14 And thy seed
 dust of the earth, and thou shalt spread abroad to the
to the north, and to the south: and in thee
of the earth be blessed.
old, I am with thee, and will keep thee in all places
bring thee again into this land; for I
ll not leave thee, until I have done that which I have spoken to
And Jacob awaked out of his sleep, and he said, Surely the LORD
nd I knew it not.
id, and said, How dreadful is this place! this is
and this is the gate of heaven.
nd Jacob rose up early in the morning, and took the stone that
illows, and set it up for a pillar, and poured oil
 he called the name of that place Bethel: but the name of
at the first.
ow, saying, If God will be with me, and will
l give me bread to eat, and
t on, 28:21 So that I come again to my father's house in
 be my God: 28:22 And this stone, which I
se: and of all that thou
will surely give the tenth unto thee.
9:1 Then Jacob went on his journey, and came into the land of the
t.
l in the field, and, lo, there
 flocks of sheep lying by it; for out of that well they
reat stone was upon the well's mouth.
9:3 And thither were all the flocks gathered: and they rolled the
ll's mouth, and watered the sheep, and put the stone
 his place.
em, My brethren, whence be ye? And they
aid, Of Haran are we.
unto them, Know ye Laban the son of Nahor? And they
he said unto them, Is he well? And they said, He is well:
aughter cometh with the sheep.
 he said, Lo, it is yet high day, neither is it time that the
ered together: water ye the sheep, and go and
cannot, until all the flocks be gathered
together, and till they roll the stone from the well's mouth; then we
ep.
em, Rachel came with her father's
for she kept them.
 pass, when Jacob saw Rachel the daughter of Laban
eep of Laban his mother's brother,
acob went near, and rolled the stone from the well's mouth, and
f Laban his mother's brother.
 Jacob kissed Rachel, and lifted up his voice, and wept.
hel that he was her father's brother, and that
d told her father.
 pass, when Laban heard the tidings of Jacob his
him, and embraced him, and kissed
d brought him to his house. And he told Laban all these things.
aid to him, Surely thou art my bone and my flesh. And
f a month.
cob, Because thou art my brother,
st thou therefore serve me for nought? tell me, what shall thy
 Laban had two daughters: the name of the elder
er was Rachel.
ed; but Rachel was beautiful and well
oured.
d said, I will serve thee seven years
 Rachel thy younger daughter.
 Laban said, It is better that I give her to thee, than that
nother man: abide with me.
cob served seven years for Rachel; and they seemed unto
 love he had to her.
id unto Laban, Give me my wife, for my days are
r.
l the men of the place, and made a

ng, that he took Leah his
rought her to him; and he went in unto her.
r Leah Zilpah his maid for an

orning, behold, it was Leah:
to Laban, What is this thou hast done unto me? did not I
? wherefore then hast thou beguiled me?
9:26 And Laban said, It must not be so done in our country, to give
ore the firstborn.
k, and we will give thee this also for the service
et seven other years.
id so, and fulfilled her week: and he gave him Rachel

er Bilhah his handmaid to be

d he loved also Rachel more
d served with him yet seven other years.

s hated, he opened her womb:
as barren.
d bare a son, and she called his name
ben: for she said, Surely the LORD hath looked upon my affliction;
 husband will love me.
nceived again, and bare a son; and said, Because the
e hath therefore given me this son also:
and she called his name Simeon.
nd she conceived again, and bare a son; and said, Now this time
joined unto me, because I have born him three sons:
evi.
 bare a son: and she said, Now will
ise the LORD: therefore she called his name Judah; and left
en Rachel saw that she bare Jacob no children, Rachel
nto Jacob, Give me children, or else I
e.
gainst Rachel: and he said, Am I
 stead, who hath withheld from thee the fruit of the womb?
d my maid Bilhah, go in unto her; and she
 have children by her.
e him Bilhah her handmaid to wife: and Jacob went in
onceived, and bare Jacob a son.
d Rachel said, God hath judged me, and hath also heard my
a son: therefore called she his name Dan.
 again, and bare Jacob a second
0:8 And Rachel said, With great wrestlings have I wrestled with my
ve prevailed: and she called his name Naphtali.
eft bearing, she took Zilpah her
d gave her Jacob to wife.
pah Leah's maid bare Jacob a son.
 And Leah said, A troop cometh: and she called his name Gad.
h's maid bare Jacob a second son.
 And Leah said, Happy am I, for the daughters will call me
his name Asher.
n the days of wheat harvest, and found
ndrakes in the field, and brought them unto his mother Leah. Then
ah, Give me, I pray thee, of thy son's mandrakes.
 it a small matter that thou hast taken
y husband? and wouldest thou take away my son's mandrakes also? And
erefore he shall lie with thee to night for thy son's
 came out of the field in the evening, and Leah went
u must come in unto me; for surely I
 hired thee with my son's mandrakes. And he lay with her that
od hearkened unto Leah, and she conceived, and bare Jacob
nd Leah said, God hath given me my hire, because I have given
nd: and she called his name Issachar.
0:19 And Leah conceived again, and bare Jacob the sixth son.
 God hath endued me with a good dowry; now will my
 have born him six sons: and she
is name Zebulun.
he bare a daughter, and called her name Dinah.
nd God hearkened to her, and opened
omb.
a son; and said, God hath taken away
eproach: 30:24 And she called his name Joseph; and said, The LORD
nother son.
when Rachel had born Joseph, that Jacob
aid unto Laban, Send me away, that I may go unto mine own place, and

, for whom I have served thee,
 go: for thou knowest my service which I have done thee.
o him, I pray thee, if I have found favour in
 by experience that the LORD hath
 me for thy sake.
point me thy wages, and I will give it.

how I have served thee, and
e was with me.
which thou hadst before I came, and it is now
ORD hath blessed thee since my
d now when shall I provide for mine own house also?  30:31
I give thee? And Jacob said, Thou shalt not
 thing for me, I will again
 thy flock.
ll thy flock to day, removing from thence
all the brown cattle among
 the spotted and speckled among the goats: and of such
o shall my righteousness answer for me in time to come, when it
ire before thy face: every one that is not speckled
d brown among the sheep, that shall be
unted stolen with me.
aid, Behold, I would it might be according to thy
t day the he goats that were ringstraked and
re speckled and spotted, and
at had some white in it, and all the brown among the
hand of his sons.
e days' journey betwixt himself and Jacob: and
.
n poplar, and of the hazel and
ee; and pilled white strakes in them, and made the white
ds.
had pilled before the flocks in the
rs in the watering troughs when the flocks came to drink, that
 when they came to drink.
 flocks conceived before the rods, and brought forth
and spotted.
te the lambs, and set the faces of the
ocks toward the ringstraked, and all the brown in the flock of
s own flocks by themselves, and put them not unto
ame to pass, whensoever the stronger cattle did
before the eyes of the cattle in
ers, that they might conceive among the rods.
le, he put them not in: so the
re Laban's, and the stronger Jacob's.
0:43 And the man increased exceedingly, and had much cattle, and
menservants, and camels, and asses.
1 And he heard the words of Laban's sons, saying, Jacob hath taken
s our father's; and of that which was our father's

 Laban, and, behold, it was
m as before.
o Jacob, Return unto the land of thy
ers, and to thy kindred; and I will be with thee.
Rachel and Leah to the field unto his
ck, 31:5 And said unto them, I see your father's countenance, that
 me as before; but the God of my father hath been with
 with all my power I have served your father.
me, and changed my wages ten times;
od suffered him not to hurt me.
 he said thus, The speckled shall be thy wages; then all the
and if he said thus, The ringstraked shall be
ngstraked.
y the cattle of your father, and given
em to me.
the time that the cattle conceived, that
I lifted up mine eyes, and saw in a dream, and, behold, the rams which
the cattle were ringstraked, speckled, and grisled.
ake unto me in a dream, saying, Jacob:
d I said, Here am I.
 Lift up now thine eyes, and see, all the rams which
traked, speckled, and grisled: for I
 seen all that Laban doeth unto thee.
1:13 I am the God of Bethel, where thou anointedst the pillar, and
st a vow unto me: now arise, get thee out from this
of thy kindred.
ah answered and said unto him, Is there yet any
r father's house?  31:15 Are we not
ed of him strangers? for he hath sold us, and hath quite devoured

taken from our father, that is
our children's: now then, whatsoever God hath said unto
ob rose up, and set his sons and his wives upon camels;
ll his cattle, and all his goods which he
ich he had gotten in
 to Isaac his father in the land of Canaan.
ep: and Rachel had stolen the
 were her father's.
le away unawares to Laban the Syrian, in that he
1 So he fled with all that he had; and he rose up, and passed over
et his face toward the mount Gilead.
:22 And it was told Laban on the third day that Jacob was fled.
 his brethren with him, and pursued after him seven
k him in the mount Gilead.
d came to Laban the Syrian in a dream by night, and said
hou speak not to Jacob either good or bad.
acob had pitched his tent in the
nd Laban with his brethren pitched in the mount of Gilead.
o Jacob, What hast thou done, that thou hast
d away my daughters, as captives
th the sword?  31:27 Wherefore didst thou flee away secretly,
e; and didst not tell me, that I might have sent
gs, with tabret, and with harp?
 hast not suffered me to kiss my sons and my daughters? thou
y in so doing.
 of my hand to do you hurt: but the God of
aying, Take thou heed that
 to Jacob either good or bad.
 now, though thou wouldest needs be gone, because thou sore
er's house, yet wherefore hast thou stolen my
aid to Laban, Because I was
 said, Peradventure thou wouldest take by force thy
h whomsoever thou findest thy gods, let him not live: before
hou what is thine with me, and take it to thee.
stolen them.
Jacob's tent, and into Leah's tent, and into
und them not. Then went he out
tent, and entered into Rachel's tent.
1:34 Now Rachel had taken the images, and put them in the camel's
t upon them. And Laban searched all the tent, but
said to her father, Let it not displease my lord that I
 for the custom of women is upon me. And he
1:36 And Jacob was wroth, and chode with Laban: and Jacob answered
n, What is my trespass? what is my sin, that thou hast
31:37 Whereas thou hast searched all my
tuff, what hast thou found of all thy household stuff? set it here
en and thy brethren, that they may judge betwixt us
s have I been with thee; thy ewes and thy she
the rams of thy flock have I not

ought not unto thee; I bare
t; of my hand didst thou require it, whether stolen by
31:40 Thus I was; in the day the drought consumed me, and the frost by
y sleep departed from mine eyes.
Thus have I been twenty years in thy house; I served thee
o daughters, and six years for thy cattle:
.
e God of Abraham, and the fear of
had been with me, surely thou hadst sent me away now empty. God
iction and the labour of my hands, and rebuked thee
 answered and said unto Jacob, These daughters are my
 are my children, and these cattle are my
and what can I do this day
daughters, or unto their children which they have born?
ou, let us make a covenant, I and thou; and
thee.
 set it up for a pillar.
b said unto his brethren, Gather stones; and they took
d they did eat there upon the heap.
47 And Laban called it Jegarsahadutha: but Jacob called it Galeed.
n said, This heap is a witness between me and thee this
ame of it called Galeed; 31:49 And Mizpah; for he
nd thee, when we are absent one from
her.
ghters, or if thou shalt take other
 beside my daughters, no man is with us; see, God is witness

is heap, and behold this
have cast betwixt me and thee: 31:52 This heap be
ss, that I will not pass over this
o thee, and that thou shalt not pass over this heap and this
rm.
od of Nahor, the God of their
ge betwixt us. And Jacob sware by the fear of his father
 offered sacrifice upon the mount, and called his
id eat bread, and tarried all night
e mount.
 Laban rose up, and kissed his sons and
is daughters, and blessed them: and Laban departed, and returned unto

ngels of God met him.
ob saw them, he said, This is God's host: and he
naim.
fore him to Esau his brother unto the
d of Seir, the country of Edom.
d he commanded them, saying, Thus shall ye speak unto my lord
ob saith thus, I have sojourned with Laban, and
have oxen, and asses, flocks, and
ants, and womenservants: and I have sent to tell my lord, that
thy sight.
rned to Jacob, saying, We came to thy
ther Esau, and also he cometh to meet thee, and four hundred men
Then Jacob was greatly afraid and distressed: and he divided the
th him, and the flocks, and herds, and the camels,
f Esau come to the one company, and
 it, then the other company which is left shall escape.
d of my father Abraham, and God of my father
Return unto thy country, and to
ed, and I will deal well with thee: 32:10 I am not worthy of
ercies, and of all the truth, which thou hast
staff I passed over this Jordan;
I am become two bands.
, I pray thee, from the hand of my brother, from the
lest he will come and smite me, and the
other with the children.
 saidst, I will surely do thee good, and make thy seed
h cannot be numbered for multitude.
13 And he lodged there that same night; and took of that which came
resent for Esau his brother; 32:14 Two hundred she
hundred ewes, and twenty rams, 32:15
ty milch camels with their colts, forty kine, and ten bulls,
ten foals.
into the hand of his servants, every drove
s, Pass over before me, and
etwixt drove and drove.
mmanded the foremost, saying, When Esau my brother
aying, Whose art thou? and whither
thou? and whose are these before thee?  32:18 Then thou shalt
ant Jacob's; it is a present sent unto my lord
 us.
nd, and the third, and all that
the droves, saying, On this manner shall ye speak unto Esau,
2:20 And say ye moreover, Behold, thy servant Jacob is behind us. For
ll appease him with the present that goeth before me, and
face; peradventure he will accept of me.

m: and himself lodged that
ompany.
, and took his two wives, and his two
enservants, and his eleven sons, and passed over the ford Jabbok.
ok them, and sent them over the brook, and sent over
b was left alone; and there wrestled a man with him

 not against him, he touched
f his thigh; and the hollow of Jacob's thigh was out of
him.
the day breaketh. And he said, I
 let thee go, except thou bless me.
27 And he said unto him, What is thy name? And he said, Jacob.
 Thy name shall be called no more Jacob, but Israel:
r with God and with men, and hast
ed.
, Tell me, I pray thee, thy name.
said, Wherefore is it that thou dost ask after my name? And he

lace Peniel: for I have seen
face, and my life is preserved.
nd as he passed over Penuel the sun rose upon him, and he

t not of the sinew which
 upon the hollow of the thigh, unto this day: because
b's thigh in the sinew that shrank.
1 And Jacob lifted up his eyes, and looked, and, behold, Esau came,
ur hundred men. And he divided the children unto Leah,
e two handmaids.
ndmaids and their children foremost, and Leah
d Joseph hindermost.
 over before them, and bowed himself to the ground
to his brother.
et him, and embraced him, and fell on his neck,
3:5 And he lifted up his eyes, and saw the women and the children;
e those with thee? And he said, The children which God
rvant.
ear, they and their children, and they
wed themselves.
 her children came near, and bowed themselves:
l, and they bowed themselves.
he said, What meanest thou by all this drove which I met? And
 find grace in the sight of my lord.
:9 And Esau said, I have enough, my brother; keep that thou hast
3:10 And Jacob said, Nay, I pray thee, if now I have found grace in
 receive my present at my hand: for therefore I have
 seen the face of God, and thou wast
sed with me.
y blessing that is brought to thee; because
because I have enough. And he
and he took it.
us take our journey, and let us go, and I will
 unto him, My lord knoweth that the children are
ith young are with me: and if men
overdrive them one day, all the flock will die.
ass over before his servant: and I
ead on softly, according as the cattle that goeth before me and
e to endure, until I come unto my lord unto Seir.
 leave with thee some of the folk that
e with me. And he said, What needeth it? let me find grace in the

 way unto Seir.
ed to Succoth, and built him an house, and made
e name of the place is called

 Shechem, which is in the
 when he came from Padanaram; and pitched his tent
 bought a parcel of a field, where he had spread his tent,
ren of Hamor, Shechem's father, for an hundred
cted there an altar, and called it EleloheIsrael.
Leah, which she bare unto Jacob, went
 to see the daughters of the land.
 And when Shechem the son of Hamor the Hivite, prince of the
ook her, and lay with her, and defiled her.
e daughter of Jacob, and he loved
sel, and spake kindly unto the damsel.
34:4 And Shechem spake unto his father Hamor, saying, Get me this

 Dinah his daughter: now his
th his cattle in the field: and Jacob held his peace until
And Hamor the father of Shechem went out unto Jacob to commune
d the sons of Jacob came out of the field when they heard it:
ved, and they were very wroth, because he had
 Jacob's daughter: which thing
to be done.
h them, saying, The soul of my son Shechem
ve her him to wife.
rriages with us, and give your daughters unto us,

he land shall be before you;
ade ye therein, and get you possessions therein.
father and unto her brethren, Let me
 grace in your eyes, and what ye shall say unto me I will give.
r so much dowry and gift, and I will give according
ve me the damsel to wife.
 sons of Jacob answered Shechem and Hamor his father
 he had defiled Dinah their sister:
 And they said unto them, We cannot do this thing, to give our
s uncircumcised; for that were a reproach unto us:
t unto you: If ye will be as we be,
every male of you be circumcised; 34:16 Then will we give our
nd we will take your daughters to us, and we will
e one people.
hearken unto us, to be circumcised; then will
gone.
or, and Shechem Hamor's son.
the young man deferred not to do the thing, because he had
ter: and he was more honourable than all the
r and Shechem his son came unto the gate of their city,
f their city, saying, 34:21 These men are
ll in the land, and trade
e land, behold, it is large enough for them; let us
wives, and let us give them our
.
t unto us for to dwell with us,
 people, if every male among us be circumcised, as they are
hall not their cattle and their substance and every beast of
 let us consent unto them, and they will dwell
 unto Shechem his son hearkened all that went
y male was circumcised, all that
 of the gate of his city.
came to pass on the third day, when they were sore, that
Simeon and Levi, Dinah's brethren, took each
boldly, and slew all the males.
nd they slew Hamor and Shechem his son with the edge of the
ut of Shechem's house, and went out.
:27 The sons of Jacob came upon the slain, and spoiled the city,
efiled their sister.
eir sheep, and their oxen, and their asses, and that
t which was in the field, 34:29 And all
heir wealth, and all their little ones, and their wives took they
led even all that was in the house.
30 And Jacob said to Simeon and Levi, Ye have troubled me to make
 the inhabitants of the land, among the Canaanites
few in number, they shall gather
es together against me, and slay me; and I shall be destroyed,
4:31 And they said, Should he deal with our sister as with an harlot?
said unto Jacob, Arise, go up to Bethel, and dwell there:
nto God, that appeared unto thee when thou
er.
hold, and to all that were with
away the strange gods that are among you, and be clean, and
5:3 And let us arise, and go up to Bethel; and
 who answered me in the day of my
s, and was with me in the way which I went.
 strange gods which were in their
nd all their earrings which were in their ears; and Jacob hid
ich was by Shechem.
eyed: and the terror of God was upon the cities
y did not pursue after the sons of

 the land of Canaan, that is,
and all the people that were with him.
35:7 And he built there an altar, and called the place Elbethel:
appeared unto him, when he fled from the face of his
ebekah's nurse died, and she was buried beneath
f it was called Allonbachuth.
God appeared unto Jacob again, when he came out of Padanaram,
5:10 And God said unto him, Thy name is Jacob: thy name shall not be
e Jacob, but Israel shall be thy name: and he called his
God said unto him, I am God Almighty: be fruitful and
any of nations shall be of thee, and
s shall come out of thy loins; 35:12 And the land which I gave
o thee I will give it, and to thy seed after thee
d God went up from him in the place where he talked with him.
 up a pillar in the place where he talked with him,
poured a drink offering thereon, and he
oured oil thereon.
ed the name of the place where God spake with him,
yed from Bethel; and there was but a little way
ailed, and she had hard labour.
nd it came to pass, when she was in hard labour, that the
ar not; thou shalt have this son also.
35:18 And it came to pass, as her soul was in departing, (for she
lled his name Benoni: but his father called him
 and was buried in the way to Ephrath, which is
 pillar upon her grave: that is the pillar of
1 And Israel journeyed, and spread his tent beyond the tower of
it came to pass, when Israel dwelt in that land, that Reuben
ah his father's concubine: and Israel heard it.
35:23 The sons of Leah; Reuben,
irstborn, and Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and
s of Rachel; Joseph, and Benjamin: 35:25 And the
 Dan, and Naphtali: 35:26 And the
 Zilpah, Leah's handmaid: Gad, and Asher: these are the sons of
orn to him in Padanaram.
b came unto Isaac his father unto Mamre, unto the city
here Abraham and Isaac sojourned.
 And the days of Isaac were an hundred and fourscore years.
up the ghost, and died, and was gathered unto his
s: and his sons Esau and Jacob buried
.
 Esau, who is Edom.
wives of the daughters of Canaan; Adah the daughter
amah the daughter of Anah the daughter
 Zibeon the Hivite; 36:3 And Bashemath Ishmael's daughter, sister of
6:4 And Adah bare to Esau Eliphaz; and Bashemath bare Reuel; 36:5 And
re Jeush, and Jaalam, and Korah: these are the sons of
im in the land of Canaan.
 took his wives, and his sons, and his daughters, and all
 and his cattle, and all his beasts, and all
 land of Canaan; and went into
y from the face of his brother Jacob.
6:7 For their riches were more than that they might dwell together;
erein they were strangers could not bear them because
 dwelt Esau in mount Seir: Esau is Edom.

au the father of the Edomites
ir: 36:10 These are the names of Esau's sons; Eliphaz the
sau, Reuel the son of Bashemath the wife of
were Teman, Omar, Zepho, and Gatam, and
enaz.
Eliphaz Esau's son; and she bare to
az Amalek: these were the sons of Adah Esau's wife.
of Reuel; Nahath, and Zerah, Shammah, and
Esau's wife.
ons of Aholibamah, the daughter of Anah the
e bare to Esau Jeush, and
ah.
of Esau: the sons of Eliphaz the
n son of Esau; duke Teman, duke Omar, duke Zepho, duke Kenaz,
e Gatam, and duke Amalek: these are the dukes
dom; these were the sons of Adah.
 And these are the sons of Reuel Esau's son; duke Nahath, duke
 duke Mizzah: these are the dukes that came of
 the sons of Bashemath Esau's
:18 And these are the sons of Aholibamah Esau's wife; duke Jeush,
 Korah: these were the dukes that came of Aholibamah
ife.
who is Edom, and these are their

ite, who inhabited the land;
hobal, and Zibeon, and Anah, 36:21 And Dishon, and Ezer,
dukes of the Horites, the children of Seir
ildren of Lotan were Hori and Hemam; and Lotan's
 children of Shobal were these; Alvan, and Manahath, and

n; both Ajah, and Anah: this
h that found the mules in the wilderness, as he fed the

ese; Dishon, and Aholibamah the
of Anah.
en of Dishon; Hemdan, and Eshban, and
ran, and Cheran.
Ezer are these; Bilhan, and Zaavan, and Akan.
ese; Uz, and Aran.
dukes that came of the Horites; duke Lotan, duke
:30 Duke Dishon, duke Ezer, duke
these are the dukes that came of Hori, among their dukes in
:31 And these are the kings that reigned in the land of Edom, before
any king over the children of Israel.
6:32 And Bela the son of Beor reigned in Edom: and the name of his
h.
on of Zerah of Bozrah reigned in
d.
the land of Temani reigned in his

n of Bedad, who smote Midian in
 of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his city was
dad died, and Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead.
 Saul of Rehoboth by the river reigned in
alhanan the son of Achbor reigned in his
stead.
chbor died, and Hadar reigned in his
d: and the name of his city was Pau; and his wife's name was
r of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab.
6:40 And these are the names of the dukes that came of Esau,
ilies, after their places, by their names; duke
6:41 Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah,
on, 36:42 Duke Kenaz, duke Teman, duke Mibzar, 36:43 Duke
 be the dukes of Edom, according to their
on: he is Esau the father of
.
ein his father was a stranger, in
d of Canaan.
ions of Jacob. Joseph, being seventeen years
ethren; and the lad was with the
Bilhah, and with the sons of Zilpah, his father's wives: and
s father their evil report.
rael loved Joseph more than all his children, because he
: and he made him a coat of many colours.
ir father loved him more than
thren, they hated him, and could not speak peaceably unto
reamed a dream, and he told it his brethren: and they
:6 And he said unto them, Hear, I pray you, this dream which I have
or, behold, we were binding sheaves in the field, and,
 stood upright; and, behold, your sheaves
my sheaf.
 him, Shalt thou indeed reign over us? or
And they hated him yet the
reams, and for his words.
reamed yet another dream, and told it his brethren, and
d a dream more; and, behold, the sun and
the moon and the eleven stars made obeisance to me.
ather, and to his brethren: and his
r rebuked him, and said unto him, What is this dream that thou
 I and thy mother and thy brethren indeed come to
 earth?  37:11 And his brethren
m; but his father observed the saying.
37:12 And his brethren went to feed their father's flock in Shechem.
rael said unto Joseph, Do not thy brethren feed the flock
ill send thee unto them. And he said to him,
, Go, I pray thee, see whether it be well with
ks; and bring me word again. So he
im out of the vale of Hebron, and he came to Shechem.
nd him, and, behold, he was wandering in
the field: and the man asked him, saying, What seekest thou?  37:16
seek my brethren: tell me, I pray thee, where they feed
the man said, They are departed hence; for I heard them say,
nd Joseph went after his brethren, and found
 saw him afar off, even before he came near unto
o slay him.
another, Behold, this dreamer cometh.
7:20 Come now therefore, and let us slay him, and cast him into some
ll say, Some evil beast hath devoured him: and we shall
 dreams.
 he delivered him out of their hands;
 said, Let us not kill him.
euben said unto them, Shed no blood, but cast him into this
erness, and lay no hand upon him; that he might
ver him to his father again.
it came to pass, when Joseph was come unto his brethren,
t of his coat, his coat of many colours that
nd cast him into a pit: and the
mpty, there was no water in it.
nd they sat down to eat bread: and they lifted up their eyes
d, a company of Ishmeelites came from Gilead
balm and myrrh, going to carry
 Egypt.
rethren, What profit is it if we slay
 brother, and conceal his blood?  37:27 Come, and let us sell him
s, and let not our hand be upon him; for he is our
rethren were content.
passed by Midianites merchantmen; and they drew and
, and sold Joseph to the Ishmeelites
twenty pieces of silver: and they brought Joseph into Egypt.
urned unto the pit; and, behold, Joseph was not in
.
en, and said, The child is not;
ither shall I go?  37:31 And they took Joseph's coat, and
, and dipped the coat in the blood; 37:32 And
nd they brought it to their
aid, This have we found: know now whether it be thy son's
he knew it, and said, It is my son's coat; an evil beast
is without doubt rent in pieces.
And Jacob rent his clothes, and put sackcloth upon his loins,
on many days.
d all his daughters rose up to comfort him;
said, For I will go down into
nto my son mourning. Thus his father wept for him.
him into Egypt unto Potiphar, an officer
of Pharaoh's, and captain of the guard.

at Judah went down from his
 turned in to a certain Adullamite, whose name was Hirah.
e a daughter of a certain Canaanite, whose name
t in unto her.
and bare a son; and he called his name Er.
 a son; and she called his name
38:5 And she yet again conceived, and bare a son; and called his name
e was at Chezib, when she bare him.
6 And Judah took a wife for Er his firstborn, whose name was Tamar.
Judah's firstborn, was wicked in the sight of the LORD;
8:8 And Judah said unto Onan, Go in unto thy brother's wife, and
se up seed to thy brother.
n knew that the seed should not be his; and it came to
is brother's wife, that he spilled it on
the ground, lest that he should give seed to his brother.
ch he did displeased the LORD: wherefore he
 to Tamar his daughter in law, Remain a widow at
 son be grown: for he said, Lest
ture he die also, as his brethren did. And Tamar went and
se.
ughter of Shuah Judah's wife died;
dah was comforted, and went up unto his sheepshearers to
 Hirah the Adullamite.
 told Tamar, saying, Behold thy father in law goeth up
p.
ts off from her, and covered her
ail, and wrapped herself, and sat in an open place, which is
 for she saw that Shelah was grown, and she was
5 When Judah saw her, he thought her to be an harlot; because she
ace.
e way, and said, Go to, I pray thee,
me come in unto thee; (for he knew not that she was his daughter
aid, What wilt thou give me, that thou mayest come
I will send thee a kid from the flock.
d she said, Wilt thou give me a pledge, till thou send it?  38:18
 pledge shall I give thee? And she said, Thy signet,
ff that is in thine hand. And he gave it
her, and came in unto her, and she conceived by him.
t away, and laid by her vail from her, and

of his friend the Adullamite,
his pledge from the woman's hand: but he found her not.
en of that place, saying, Where is the
rlot, that was openly by the way side? And they said, There was no
lace.
nd said, I cannot find her; and also
men of the place said, that there was no harlot in this place.
id, Let her take it to her, lest we be shamed:
st not found her.
pass about three months after, that it was told
n law hath played the harlot; and
ehold, she is with child by whoredom. And Judah said, Bring her
be burnt.
rth, she sent to her father in law,
g, By the man, whose these are, am I with child: and she said,
, whose are these, the signet, and bracelets, and
edged them, and said, She hath been more
righteous than I; because that I gave her not to Shelah my son. And he
in no more.
n the time of her travail, that, behold,
twins were in her womb.
me to pass, when she travailed, that the one put out
 and bound upon his hand a scarlet
, saying, This came out first.
d it came to pass, as he drew back his hand, that, behold, his
d she said, How hast thou broken forth? this
e was called Pharez.
d came out his brother, that had the scarlet thread
 called Zarah.
ght down to Egypt; and Potiphar, an officer of
yptian, bought him of the hands of
hmeelites, which had brought him down thither.
 and he was a prosperous man; and he
in the house of his master the Egyptian.

s with him, and that the LORD
at he did to prosper in his hand.
And Joseph found grace in his sight, and he served him: and he
er his house, and all that he had he put into his
 from the time that he had made him overseer
, that the LORD blessed the
use for Joseph's sake; and the blessing of the LORD was
 house, and in the field.
eft all that he had in Joseph's hand; and he knew not
which he did eat. And Joseph was a goodly
 came to pass after these things, that his master's wife
 and she said, Lie with me.
 refused, and said unto his master's wife, Behold, my
th me in the house, and he hath committed
s none greater in this house
her hath he kept back any thing from me but thee, because
en can I do this great wickedness, and sin
 as she spake to Joseph day by
he hearkened not unto her, to lie by her, or to be with her.
 pass about this time, that Joseph went into the
e was none of the men of the house
within.
 garment, saying, Lie with me: and he
t his garment in her hand, and fled, and got him out.
when she saw that he had left his garment
at she called unto the men of
and spake unto them, saying, See, he hath brought in an
he came in unto me to lie with me, and I
cried with a loud voice: 39:15 And it came to pass, when he heard that
my voice and cried, that he left his garment with me, and

 until his lord came home.
e spake unto him according to these words, saying, The
ast brought unto us, came in unto me to
ock me: 39:18 And it came to pass, as I lifted up my voice and cried,
his garment with me, and fled out.
9 And it came to pass, when his master heard the words of his
 unto him, saying, After this manner did thy
led.
, and put him into the prison, a
ere the king's prisoners were bound: and he was there in the
he LORD was with Joseph, and shewed him mercy, and gave him
the keeper of the prison.
 keeper of the prison committed to Joseph's hand all the
 prison; and whatsoever they did there, he
of the prison looked not to any thing that was under
 with him, and that which he did, the
D made it to prosper.
to pass after these things, that the butler of the
offended their lord the king of Egypt.
40:2 And Pharaoh was wroth against two of his officers, against the
tlers, and against the chief of the bakers.
ouse of the captain of the guard,
e prison, the place where Joseph was bound.
rged Joseph with them, and he
: and they continued a season in ward.
40:5 And they dreamed a dream both of them, each man his dream in one
an according to the interpretation of his dream, the
ng of Egypt, which were bound in the
on.
n the morning, and looked upon
 behold, they were sad.
ed Pharaoh's officers that were with him in the ward of
herefore look ye so sadly to day?  40:8 And
ream, and there is no
And Joseph said unto them, Do not interpretations
ay you.
his dream to Joseph, and said to him,
my dream, behold, a vine was before me; 40:10 And in the vine were
and it was as though it budded, and her blossoms shot
of brought forth ripe grapes: 40:11 And
haraoh's cup was in my hand: and I took the grapes, and pressed them
 cup, and I gave the cup into Pharaoh's hand.
s is the interpretation of it: The
branches are three days: 40:13 Yet within three days shall
ad, and restore thee unto thy place: and thou
hand, after the former manner
ast his butler.
hen it shall be well with thee, and shew
kindness, I pray thee, unto me, and make mention of me unto Pharaoh,
ut of this house: 40:15 For indeed I was stolen away out
: and here also have I done nothing that
they should put me into the dungeon.
:16 When the chief baker saw that the interpretation was good, he
 I also was in my dream, and, behold, I had three
nd in the uppermost basket there was
ll manner of bakemeats for Pharaoh; and the birds did eat them out
on my head.
nd said, This is the interpretation
of: The three baskets are three days: 40:19 Yet within three days
t up thy head from off thee, and shall hang thee on a
 thy flesh from off thee.
came to pass the third day, which was Pharaoh's birthday,
 all his servants: and he lifted up the head
aker among his servants.
estored the chief butler unto his butlership again; and
h's hand: 40:22 But he hanged the chief
aker: as Joseph had interpreted to them.

ber Joseph, but forgat him.
 came to pass at the end of two full years, that Pharaoh
tood by the river.
ere came up out of the river seven well favoured
in a meadow.
her kine came up after them out of the
ver, ill favoured and leanfleshed; and stood by the other kine upon
e river.
leanfleshed kine did eat up the seven
l favoured and fat kine. So Pharaoh awoke.
nd time: and, behold, seven ears
came up upon one stalk, rank and good.
41:6 And, behold, seven thin ears and blasted with the east wind
em.
ed the seven rank and full ears.
aoh awoke, and, behold, it was a dream.

hat his spirit was troubled;
and called for all the magicians of Egypt, and all the
h told them his dream; but there was none

araoh, saying, I do remember
is day: 41:10 Pharaoh was wroth with his servants, and put
n of the guard's house, both me and the chief
n one night, I and he; we dreamed
n according to the interpretation of his dream.
 a young man, an Hebrew, servant to
aptain of the guard; and we told him, and he interpreted to us
man according to his dream he did interpret.
erpreted to us, so it was; me he
 unto mine office, and him he hanged.
1:14 Then Pharaoh sent and called Joseph, and they brought him
ungeon: and he shaved himself, and changed his

ve dreamed a dream, and there
t can interpret it: and I have heard say of thee, that thou
m to interpret it.
wered Pharaoh, saying, It is not in me: God shall

my dream, behold, I stood upon
f the river: 41:18 And, behold, there came up out of the
ed and well favoured; and they fed in a
eadow: 41:19 And, behold, seven other kine came up after them, poor
voured and leanfleshed, such as I never saw in all the
1:20 And the lean and the ill favoured
ne did eat up the first seven fat kine: 41:21 And when they had
ould not be known that they had eaten them; but
 the beginning. So I awoke.
 saw in my dream, and, behold, seven ears came up in one
3 And, behold, seven ears, withered, thin,
p after them: 41:24 And the
oured the seven good ears: and I told this unto the
hat could declare it to me.
oseph said unto Pharaoh, The dream of Pharaoh is one: God
he is about to do.
 kine are seven years; and the seven good ears are

d kine that came up after them
years; and the seven empty ears blasted with the east wind
famine.
 have spoken unto Pharaoh: What God is
out to do he sheweth unto Pharaoh.
9 Behold, there come seven years of great plenty throughout all
41:30 And there shall arise after them seven years
all be forgotten in the land of Egypt;
d the famine shall consume the land; 41:31 And the plenty shall not
 land by reason of that famine following; for it shall
nd for that the dream was doubled unto Pharaoh twice; it is
tablished by God, and God will shortly bring it
 Pharaoh look out a man discreet and wise, and
1:34 Let Pharaoh do this, and let him appoint officers over the land,
he fifth part of the land of Egypt in the seven plenteous
hem gather all the food of those good years that come,
nd of Pharaoh, and let them keep food in
the cities.
e for store to the land against the seven
nd of Egypt; that the land
ough the famine.
s good in the eyes of Pharaoh, and in the eyes
araoh said unto his servants, Can we find such a one as
Spirit of God is?  41:39 And Pharaoh said
 thee all this, there is none
 and wise as thou art: 41:40 Thou shalt be over my house,
rd shall all my people be ruled: only in the

I have set thee over all the
t.
from his hand, and put it upon
and, and arrayed him in vestures of fine linen, and put a
; 41:43 And he made him to ride in the second
before him, Bow the knee: and he
 ruler over all the land of Egypt.
4 And Pharaoh said unto Joseph, I am Pharaoh, and without thee
 his hand or foot in all the land of Egypt.
e Zaphnathpaaneah; and he gave
e Asenath the daughter of Potipherah priest of On. And
 land of Egypt.
irty years old when he stood before Pharaoh
 the presence of Pharaoh, and
hout all the land of Egypt.
n the seven plenteous years the earth brought forth by
thered up all the food of the seven years, which were
d up the food in the cities: the food of
the field, which was round about every city, laid he up in the same.
seph gathered corn as the sand of the sea, very much,
it was without number.
oseph were born two sons before the years of famine
r of Potipherah priest of On bare unto
m.
the firstborn Manasseh: For God,
 hath made me forget all my toil, and all my father's house.
f the second called he Ephraim: For God hath
f my affliction.
ars of plenteousness, that was in the land of
even years of dearth began to come, according as Joseph
s in all lands; but in all the land of
ypt there was bread.
 the land of Egypt was famished, the people cried to
 said unto all the Egyptians, Go unto
eph; what he saith to you, do.
d the famine was over all the face of the earth: and Joseph
ses, and sold unto the Egyptians; and the

to Joseph for to buy corn;
he famine was so sore in all lands.
1 Now when Jacob saw that there was corn in Egypt, Jacob said unto
 ye look one upon another?  42:2 And he said, Behold,
rn in Egypt: get you down thither, and
y for us from thence; that we may live, and not die.
en went down to buy corn in Egypt.
 But Benjamin, Joseph's brother, Jacob sent not with his brethren;
t peradventure mischief befall him.
5 And the sons of Israel came to buy corn among those that came:
 in the land of Canaan.
 was the governor over the land, and he it was that
and: and Joseph's brethren came, and
d down themselves before him with their faces to the earth.
is brethren, and he knew them, but made himself
y unto them; and he said unto them,
e come ye? And they said, From the land of Canaan to buy food.
ew his brethren, but they knew not him.

ch he dreamed of them, and
, Ye are spies; to see the nakedness of the land ye are
d unto him, Nay, my lord, but to buy food are thy
l one man's sons; we are true men, thy servants are no
unto them, Nay, but to see the nakedness of the land
 said, Thy servants are twelve brethren, the sons of one
 and, behold, the youngest is this day with
d Joseph said unto them, That is it that I spake unto you,
:15 Hereby ye shall be proved: By the life of
except your youngest brother come

ch your brother, and ye shall be
prison, that your words may be proved, whether there be any
y the life of Pharaoh surely ye are spies.
o ward three days.
d unto them the third day, This do, and live; for
en, let one of your brethren be bound
the house of your prison: go ye, carry corn for the famine of your
t bring your youngest brother unto me; so shall your
l not die. And they did so.
hey said one to another, We are verily guilty concerning
w the anguish of his soul, when he besought
 this distress come upon us.
Reuben answered them, saying, Spake I not unto you, saying,
child; and ye would not hear? therefore,
behold, also his blood is required.
23 And they knew not that Joseph understood them; for he spake unto
rpreter.
out from them, and wept; and returned to
them again, and communed with them, and took from them Simeon, and
 their eyes.
d to fill their sacks with corn, and to
estore every man's money into his sack, and to give them provision
 thus did he unto them.
laded their asses with the corn, and departed thence.
ened his sack to give his ass provender in
d, it was in his sack's mouth.
d he said unto his brethren, My money is restored; and, lo, it
and their heart failed them, and they were afraid,
his that God hath done unto us?  42:29
d they came unto Jacob their father unto the land of Canaan, and
befell unto them; saying, 42:30 The man, who is the
 to us, and took us for spies of the
try.
 true men; we are no spies: 42:32 We
welve brethren, sons of our father; one is not, and the youngest
ur father in the land of Canaan.
And the man, the lord of the country, said unto us, Hereby shall
 true men; leave one of your brethren here with me,
 your households, and be gone: 42:34
bring your youngest brother unto me: then shall I know that ye are
at ye are true men: so will I deliver you your
e land.
ey emptied their sacks, that, behold,
ry man's bundle of money was in his sack: and when both they and
he bundles of money, they were afraid.
42:36 And Jacob their father said unto them, Me have ye bereaved of my
seph is not, and Simeon is not, and ye will take Benjamin
e against me.
to his father, saying, Slay my two sons, if I
to my hand, and I will bring him
again.
not go down with you; for his brother
dead, and he is left alone: if mischief befall him by the way in
hen shall ye bring down my gray hairs with sorrow to
ine was sore in the land.
ame to pass, when they had eaten up the corn which they
heir father said unto them, Go again, buy
 unto him, saying, The man did solemnly protest
y face, except your brother be with

 us, we will go down and buy
3:5 But if thou wilt not send him, we will not go down:
e shall not see my face, except your
her be with you.
Wherefore dealt ye so ill with me, as to tell
  43:7 And they said, The man
raitly of our state, and of our kindred, saying, Is your
another brother? and we told him according
rtainly know that he would
r brother down?  43:8 And Judah said unto Israel his
and we will arise and go; that we may
e, and not die, both we, and thou, and also our little ones.
y for him; of my hand shalt thou require him: if I
 him before thee, then let me bear the
ame for ever: 43:10 For except we had lingered, surely now we had
ond time.
 said unto them, If it must be so now, do
 in your vessels, and carry
a present, a little balm, and a little honey, spices, and
 43:12 And take double money in your hand;
the mouth of your sacks, carry
n your hand; peradventure it was an oversight: 43:13 Take
ise, go again unto the man: 43:14 And God
hat he may send away your
and Benjamin. If I be bereaved of my children, I am
took that present, and they took double money in
up, and went down to Egypt, and
ore Joseph.
enjamin with them, he said to the ruler of
y, and make ready; for these
ne with me at noon.
id as Joseph bade; and the man brought the men into
e men were afraid, because they were brought into Joseph's
cause of the money that was returned in our
in; that he may seek occasion
 and fall upon us, and take us for bondmen, and our asses.
ar to the steward of Joseph's house, and they
house, 43:20 And said, O sir, we
eed down at the first time to buy food: 43:21 And it came to
the inn, that we opened our sacks, and, behold,
of his sack, our money in full
d we have brought it again in our hand.

n in our hands to buy food:
l who put our money in our sacks.
 And he said, Peace be to you, fear not: your God, and the God of
 given you treasure in your sacks: I had your money.
 them.
n into Joseph's house, and gave them
r, and they washed their feet; and he gave their asses provender.
made ready the present against Joseph came at noon: for
 eat bread there.
 came home, they brought him the present which
d bowed themselves to him to the

, and said, Is your father
man of whom ye spake? Is he yet alive?  43:28 And they
ther is in good health, he is yet alive.
And they bowed down their heads, and made obeisance.
yes, and saw his brother Benjamin, his
ther's son, and said, Is this your younger brother, of whom ye spake
e said, God be gracious unto thee, my son.
owels did yearn upon his
sought where to weep; and he entered into his chamber,
 he washed his face, and went out, and refrained himself, and

, and for them by themselves,
 Egyptians, which did eat with him, by themselves: because
eat bread with the Hebrews; for that is an
 And they sat before him, the firstborn according to his
st according to his youth: and the men
rvelled one at another.
ok and sent messes unto them from before him: but
 much as any of their's. And they
and were merry with him.
mmanded the steward of his house, saying, Fill the men's
s they can carry, and put every man's money
 cup, the silver cup, in the sack's mouth of the
he did according to the word that
had spoken.
 was light, the men were sent away, they
and their asses.
e gone out of the city, and not yet far off,
ow after the men; and when thou
take them, say unto them, Wherefore have ye rewarded evil for
is it in which my lord drinketh, and whereby
in so doing.
 and he spake unto them these same words.
saith my lord these words? God
t thy servants should do according to this thing: 44:8
found in our sacks' mouths, we brought
ain unto thee out of the land of Canaan: how then should we steal
 house silver or gold?  44:9 With whomsoever of thy
him die, and we also will be my lord's
ndmen.
it be according unto your words: he
whom it is found shall be my servant; and ye shall be blameless.
speedily took down every man his sack to the ground,

e eldest, and left at the
he cup was found in Benjamin's sack.
:13 Then they rent their clothes, and laded every man his ass, and
city.
came to Joseph's house; for he was
ere: and they fell before him on the ground.
t deed is this that ye have done?
not that such a man as I can certainly divine?  44:16 And Judah
 say unto my lord? what shall we speak?  or how
found out the iniquity of thy
ehold, we are my lord's servants, both we, and he also with

ould do so: but the man in
 cup is found, he shall be my servant; and as for you,
r father.
to him, and said, Oh my lord, let thy
vant, I pray thee, speak a word in my lord's ears, and let not
inst thy servant: for thou art even as Pharaoh.
 saying, Have ye a father, or a
 44:20 And we said unto my lord, We have a father, an old
ld age, a little one; and his brother is
dead, and he alone is left of his mother, and his father loveth him.
ou saidst unto thy servants, Bring him down unto me, that
him.
e lad cannot leave his father: for
should leave his father, his father would die.
vants, Except your youngest brother
down with you, ye shall see my face no more.
me up unto thy servant my father,
 him the words of my lord.
r father said, Go again, and buy us a little food.
o down: if our youngest brother be with
s, then will we go down: for we may not see the man's face, except
ther be with us.
my father said unto us, Ye know that my wife
nt out from me, and I said,
torn in pieces; and I saw him not since: 44:29 And if ye
d mischief befall him, ye shall bring down

servant my father, and the lad
h us; seeing that his life is bound up in the lad's life;
ss, when he seeth that the lad is not with
hall bring down the gray hairs
vant our father with sorrow to the grave.
 the lad unto my father,
ng him not unto thee, then I shall bear the blame to
ow therefore, I pray thee, let thy servant abide instead of the
 lord; and let the lad go up with his brethren.
 father, and the lad be not with me?
 peradventure I see the evil that shall come on my father.
 not refrain himself before all them that stood
an to go out from me. And there
man with him, while Joseph made himself known unto his
t aloud: and the Egyptians and the house of Pharaoh
unto his brethren, I am Joseph; doth my father
 answer him; for they were
s presence.
is brethren, Come near to me, I pray you.
eph your brother, whom ye
.
r angry with yourselves, that ye
hither: for God did send me before you to preserve life.
 hath the famine been in the land: and yet
 shall neither be earing nor
45:7 And God sent me before you to preserve you a posterity in the
ve your lives by a great deliverance.
5:8 So now it was not you that sent me hither, but God: and he hath
r to Pharaoh, and lord of all his house, and a ruler
pt.
er, and say unto him, Thus saith
Joseph, God hath made me lord of all Egypt: come down unto me,
 thou shalt dwell in the land of Goshen, and thou
thy children, and thy children's
, and thy flocks, and thy herds, and all that thou hast: 45:11
rish thee; for yet there are five years of famine;
d all that thou hast, come to poverty.
45:12 And, behold, your eyes see, and the eyes of my brother Benjamin,
y mouth that speaketh unto you.
nd ye shall tell my father of all my glory in Egypt, and of all
and ye shall haste and bring down my father hither.
other Benjamin's neck, and wept; and
amin wept upon his neck.
 he kissed all his brethren, and wept upon them: and
 with him.
as heard in Pharaoh's house, saying,
ph's brethren are come: and it pleased Pharaoh well, and his
 Pharaoh said unto Joseph, Say unto thy brethren, This do ye;
 go, get you unto the land of Canaan; 45:18 And
s, and come unto me: and I will
the good of the land of Egypt, and ye shall eat the fat of
hou art commanded, this do ye; take you wagons out of the
ttle ones, and for your wives, and bring your
d not your stuff; for the good of all the land of
 children of Israel did so: and Joseph gave them wagons,
nt of Pharaoh, and gave them provision for
 each man changes of raiment; but to
amin he gave three hundred pieces of silver, and five changes of
And to his father he sent after this manner; ten asses laden
f Egypt, and ten she asses laden with corn and
 way.
y, and they departed: and he said
em, See that ye fall not out by the way.

 came into the land of Canaan
their father, 45:26 And told him, saying, Joseph is yet
ver all the land of Egypt. And Jacob's
art fainted, for he believed them not.
45:27 And they told him all the words of Joseph, which he had said
hen he saw the wagons which Joseph had sent to carry
 father revived: 45:28 And Israel said,
t is enough; Joseph my son is yet alive: I will go and see him before
1 And Israel took his journey with all that he had, and came to
red sacrifices unto the God of his father Isaac.
n the visions of the night, and said,
ob, Jacob. And he said, Here am I.
 And he said, I am God, the God of thy father: fear not to go down
I will there make of thee a great nation: 46:4 I will
 and I will also surely bring thee up
in: and Joseph shall put his hand upon thine eyes.
ersheba: and the sons of Israel carried
acob their father, and their little ones, and their wives, in the
aoh had sent to carry him.
y took their cattle, and their goods, which they had
and came into Egypt, Jacob, and all his
eed with him: 46:7 His sons, and his sons' sons with him, his
ns' daughters, and all his seed brought he with
re the names of the children of Israel, which came
Reuben, Jacob's firstborn.
 sons of Reuben; Hanoch, and Phallu, and Hezron, and
f Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin,
a Canaanitish woman.
 of Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.
46:12 And the sons of Judah; Er, and Onan, and Shelah, and Pharez, and
r and Onan died in the land of Canaan. And the sons of
.
 and Phuvah, and Job, and
14 And the sons of Zebulun; Sered, and Elon, and Jahleel.
 of Leah, which she bare unto Jacob in
danaram, with his daughter Dinah: all the souls of his sons and his
thirty and three.
 Gad; Ziphion, and Haggi, Shuni, and Ezbon, Eri,
 the sons of Asher; Jimnah, and Ishuah, and Isui, and Beriah,
r: and the sons of Beriah; Heber, and Malchiel.
h, whom Laban gave to Leah his
and these she bare unto Jacob, even sixteen souls.
's wife; Joseph, and Benjamin.
d unto Joseph in the land of Egypt were born Manasseh and
e daughter of Potipherah priest of On bare
min were Belah, and Becher, and Ashbel,
era, and Naaman, Ehi, and Rosh, Muppim, and Huppim, and Ard.
sons of Rachel, which were born to Jacob: all the
 the sons of Dan; Hushim.
 sons of Naphtali; Jahzeel, and Guni, and Jezer, and
e sons of Bilhah, which Laban gave unto Rachel his
o Jacob: all the souls were seven.
6 All the souls that came with Jacob into Egypt, which came out of
es Jacob's sons' wives, all the souls were threescore
f Joseph, which were born him in Egypt,
ere two souls: all the souls of the house of Jacob, which came into
eescore and ten.
h before him unto Joseph, to direct his face
nd of Goshen.
dy his chariot, and went up to meet Israel
self unto him; and he fell on
nd wept on his neck a good while.
 And Israel said unto Joseph, Now let me die, since I have seen
hou art yet alive.
d unto his brethren, and unto his father's house,
nd say unto him, My brethren, and my
er's house, which were in the land of Canaan, are come unto me;
re shepherds, for their trade hath been to feed
 flocks, and their herds, and all
ey have.
s, when Pharaoh shall call you, and
 say, What is your occupation?  46:34 That ye shall say, Thy
een about cattle from our youth even until now,
 ye may dwell in the land of
every shepherd is an abomination unto the Egyptians.
ld Pharaoh, and said, My father and my
ethren, and their flocks, and their herds, and all that they have,
the land of Canaan; and, behold, they are in the land
k some of his brethren, even five men, and presented
 Pharaoh said unto his brethren, What is your occupation? And
h, Thy servants are shepherds, both we, and also
ever unto Pharaoh, For to sojourn in the land are we
 pasture for their flocks; for the
 is sore in the land of Canaan: now therefore, we pray thee, let
 in the land of Goshen.
h spake unto Joseph, saying, Thy father and thy
he land of Egypt is before thee; in
est of the land make thy father and brethren to dwell; in the
em dwell: and if thou knowest any men of activity
 over my cattle.
t in Jacob his father, and set him before
:8 And Pharaoh said unto Jacob, How old art thou?  47:9 And Jacob
, The days of the years of my pilgrimage are an
vil have the days of the years of
 been, and have not attained unto the days of the years of the
n the days of their pilgrimage.
nd Jacob blessed Pharaoh, and went out from before Pharaoh.
ed his father and his brethren, and gave them a
 the best of the land, in the land
eses, as Pharaoh had commanded.
nd Joseph nourished his father, and his brethren, and all his
ith bread, according to their families.

and; for the famine was very
t the land of Egypt and all the land of Canaan fainted by
47:14 And Joseph gathered up all the money that was found in the land
 in the land of Canaan, for the corn which they bought:
y into Pharaoh's house.
money failed in the land of Egypt, and in the land of
e unto Joseph, and said, Give us bread:
or why should we die in thy presence? for the money faileth.
d, Give your cattle; and I will give you for your
nd they brought their cattle unto Joseph: and Joseph gave them
r horses, and for the flocks, and for the cattle
nd he fed them with bread for all
attle for that year.
ar was ended, they came unto him the second year,
de it from my lord, how that our
 spent; my lord also hath our herds of cattle; there is not
 of my lord, but our bodies, and our lands:
ne eyes, both we and our land?
 our land for bread, and we and our land will be servants
 seed, that we may live, and not die, that
oseph bought all the land of Egypt for Pharaoh; for the
s field, because the famine prevailed over
7:21 And as for the people, he removed them to cities from one end of
f Egypt even to the other end thereof.
47:22 Only the land of the priests bought he not; for the priests had
igned them of Pharaoh, and did eat their portion which
 they sold not their lands.
Joseph said unto the people, Behold, I have bought you this
haraoh: lo, here is seed for you, and ye shall
come to pass in the increase, that ye shall give
our parts shall be your own, for
the field, and for your food, and for them of your households,
r little ones.
u hast saved our lives: let us find grace in
haraoh's servants.
e it a law over the land of Egypt unto this day,
 part, except the land of the
y, which became not Pharaoh's.
d Israel dwelt in the land of Egypt, in the country of Goshen;
ions therein, and grew, and multiplied
ceedingly.
 land of Egypt seventeen years: so the
ole age of Jacob was an hundred forty and seven years.
gh that Israel must die: and he called his
have found grace in thy sight,
y thee, thy hand under my thigh, and deal kindly and truly
pray thee, in Egypt: 47:30 But I will lie with
out of Egypt, and bury me in their
gplace. And he said, I will do as thou hast said.
e. And he sware unto him. And Israel
d himself upon the bed's head.
 it came to pass after these things, that one told Joseph,
ck: and he took with him his two sons,
nasseh and Ephraim.
acob, and said, Behold, thy son Joseph cometh unto
mself, and sat upon the bed.
acob said unto Joseph, God Almighty appeared unto me at Luz
and blessed me, 48:4 And said unto me, Behold,
ply thee, and I will make of thee
tude of people; and will give this land to thy seed after thee
ossession.
phraim and Manasseh, which were born unto
nto thee into Egypt, are
and Simeon, they shall be mine.
d thy issue, which thou begettest after them, shall be thine,
fter the name of their brethren in their
inheritance.
 came from Padan, Rachel died by me in the
e was but a little way to come
th: and I buried her there in the way of Ephrath; the same
d Israel beheld Joseph's sons, and said, Who are these?  48:9
his father, They are my sons, whom God hath given
ing them, I pray thee, unto me, and I
l bless them.
ael were dim for age, so that he could not
m; and he kissed them, and embraced

ad not thought to see thy face:
God hath shewed me also thy seed.
 And Joseph brought them out from between his knees, and he bowed
face to the earth.
k them both, Ephraim in his right hand toward
is left hand toward Israel's
and brought them near unto him.
nd Israel stretched out his right hand, and laid it upon
e younger, and his left hand upon Manasseh's
 Manasseh was the firstborn.
he blessed Joseph, and said, God, before whom my fathers
, the God which fed me all my life long unto
ed me from all evil, bless the
let my name be named on them, and the name of my fathers
 them grow into a multitude in the midst of
 that his father laid his right hand upon the
nd he held up his father's hand,
e it from Ephraim's head unto Manasseh's head.
her, Not so, my father: for this is
irstborn; put thy right hand upon his head.
d, I know it, my son, I know it:
shall become a people, and he also shall be great: but truly
all be greater than he, and his seed shall
And he blessed them that day, saying, In thee shall Israel
thee as Ephraim and as Manasseh: and he set
srael said unto Joseph, Behold, I die: but God shall be
in unto the land of your fathers.
 Moreover I have given to thee one portion above thy brethren,
the hand of the Amorite with my sword and with my
o his sons, and said, Gather yourselves
ogether, that I may tell you that which shall befall you in the last
Gather yourselves together, and hear, ye sons of Jacob; and
r father.
tborn, my might, and the beginning of my
strength, the excellency of dignity, and the excellency of power: 49:4
water, thou shalt not excel; because thou wentest up to
ledst thou it: he went up to my couch.
49:5 Simeon and Levi are brethren; instruments of cruelty are in their

ir secret; unto their assembly,
ur, be not thou united: for in their anger they slew a man,
hey digged down a wall.
their anger, for it was fierce; and their wrath, for it
em in Jacob, and scatter them in Israel.

n shall praise: thy hand shall
neck of thine enemies; thy father's children shall bow down
dah is a lion's whelp: from the prey, my son, thou art gone up:
 couched as a lion, and as an old lion; who shall
shall not depart from Judah, nor a
er from between his feet, until Shiloh come; and unto him shall
e people be.
o the vine, and his ass's colt unto the
hoice vine; he washed his garments in wine, and his clothes in the
 49:12 His eyes shall be red with wine, and his teeth
ulun shall dwell at the haven of the sea; and he shall be for
d his border shall be unto Zidon.
 Issachar is a strong ass couching down between two burdens:
rest was good, and the land that it was
leasant; and bowed his shoulder to bear, and became a servant unto
6 Dan shall judge his people, as one of the tribes of Israel.
a serpent by the way, an adder in the path, that
s rider shall fall backward.
ve waited for thy salvation, O LORD.
:19 Gad, a troop shall overcome him: but he shall overcome at the
t of Asher his bread shall be fat, and he shall yield royal
tali is a hind let loose: he giveth goodly words.
h, even a fruitful bough by a well;
 branches run over the wall: 49:23 The archers have sorely
 him, and hated him: 49:24 But his bow abode
 were made strong by the hands
hty God of Jacob; (from thence is the shepherd, the stone of
 the God of thy father, who shall help thee; and
hee with blessings of heaven above,
ings of the deep that lieth under, blessings of the breasts, and
 The blessings of thy father have prevailed above
nto the utmost bound of the
ills: they shall be on the head of Joseph, and on the
 was separate from his brethren.
Benjamin shall ravin as a wolf: in the morning he shall devour
ht he shall divide the spoil.
 these are the twelve tribes of Israel: and this is it that
 them, and blessed them; every one according to
:29 And he charged them, and said unto them, I am to be gathered
ry me with my fathers in the cave that is in the
 In the cave that is in the field of
pelah, which is before Mamre, in the land of Canaan, which Abraham
field of Ephron the Hittite for a possession of a
 buried Abraham and Sarah his wife; there they buried
nd there I buried Leah.
ase of the field and of the cave that is therein was
49:33 And when Jacob had made an end of commanding his sons, he
t into the bed, and yielded up the ghost, and was
 And Joseph fell upon his father's face, and wept upon him, and
 And Joseph commanded his servants the physicians to embalm his
sicians embalmed Israel.
 days were fulfilled for him; for so are fulfilled the
lmed: and the Egyptians mourned for him
hreescore and ten days.
he days of his mourning were past, Joseph spake unto
If now I have found grace in your eyes,
peak, I pray you, in the ears of Pharaoh, saying, 50:5 My father made
ing, Lo, I die: in my grave which I have digged for me in
 shalt thou bury me. Now therefore let me go
nd I will come again.
said, Go up, and bury thy father, according as he
ph went up to bury his father: and with him went up all
e elders of his house, and all the elders
use of Joseph, and his
father's house: only their little ones, and their
t in the land of Goshen.
 went up with him both chariots and horsemen: and it was
0:10 And they came to the threshingfloor of Atad, which is beyond
 they mourned with a great and very sore lamentation:
s father seven days.
 inhabitants of the land, the Canaanites, saw the
ey said, This is a grievous mourning
he Egyptians: wherefore the name of it was called Abelmizraim,
an.
ording as he commanded them: 50:13
s sons carried him into the land of Canaan, and buried him in
 of Machpelah, which Abraham bought with the
ce of Ephron the Hittite, before

, and his brethren, and all
with him to bury his father, after he had buried his
ph's brethren saw that their father was dead, they
ate us, and will certainly requite us
 the evil which we did unto him.
And they sent a messenger unto Joseph, saying, Thy father did
d, saying, 50:17 So shall ye say unto Joseph,
s of thy brethren, and their sin;
y did unto thee evil: and now, we pray thee, forgive the
f the God of thy father. And Joseph wept
when they spake unto him.
 brethren also went and fell down before his face; and
 servants.
hem, Fear not: for am I in the place of
od?  50:20 But as for you, ye thought evil against me; but God meant
to bring to pass, as it is this day, to save much people
ore fear ye not: I will nourish you, and your little
, and spake kindly unto them.
 Joseph dwelt in Egypt, he, and his father's house: and
 ten years.
m's children of the third generation: the
eh were brought up upon

 I die: and God will surely
d bring you out of this land unto the land which he sware
 to Jacob.
h of the children of Israel, saying, God
will surely visit you, and ye shall carry up my bones from hence.
 died, being an hundred and ten years old: and they
 a coffin in Egypt.
ok of Moses:  Called Exodus
hese are the names of the children of Israel, which came
his household came with Jacob.
en, Simeon, Levi, and Judah, 1:3 Issachar, Zebulun, and
tali, Gad, and Asher.
ouls that came out of the loins of Jacob were seventy
t already.
 his brethren, and all that generation.

ful, and increased
lied, and waxed exceeding mighty; and the land
re arose up a new king over Egypt, which knew not Joseph.
s people, Behold, the people of the children of
e: 1:10 Come on, let us deal wisely
them; lest they multiply, and it come to pass, that, when there
, they join also unto our enemies, and fight
the land.
ver them taskmasters to afflict them with
 treasure cities, Pithom and
1:12 But the more they afflicted them, the more they multiplied and
ey were grieved because of the children of Israel.
e children of Israel to serve with
: 1:14 And they made their lives bitter with hard bondage, in
 and in all manner of service in the field: all
em serve, was with rigour.
 king of Egypt spake to the Hebrew midwives, of which the
rah, and the name of the other Puah: 1:16 And
idwife to the Hebrew women, and
upon the stools; if it be a son, then ye shall kill him: but
hen she shall live.
es feared God, and did not as the king of Egypt
hildren alive.
pt called for the midwives, and said unto
ve saved the men children
d the midwives said unto Pharaoh, Because the Hebrew
women; for they are lively, and are
ered ere the midwives come in unto them.

idwives: and the people
axed very mighty.
ass, because the midwives feared God, that he
 charged all his people, saying, Every son that is
r, and every daughter ye shall save
.
 of Levi, and took to wife a
Levi.
bare a son: and when she saw him that
was a goodly child, she hid him three months.
ide him, she took for him an ark of
shes, and daubed it with slime and with pitch, and put the child
aid it in the flags by the river's brink.
it what would be done to him.
he daughter of Pharaoh came down to wash herself at the
ed along by the river's side; and when she
r maid to fetch it.
d opened it, she saw the child: and, behold, the
on him, and said, This is one of the
ews' children.
 to Pharaoh's daughter, Shall I go and call to
at she may nurse the child for
 And Pharaoh's daughter said to her, Go. And the maid went
other.
unto her, Take this child away, and
 it for me, and I will give thee thy wages. And the women took
d it.
brought him unto Pharaoh's daughter,
he became her son. And she called his name Moses: and she said,
out of the water.
ass in those days, when Moses was grown, that he
oked on their burdens: and he spied
yptian smiting an Hebrew, one of his brethren.
at way, and when he saw that there
 man, he slew the Egyptian, and hid him in the sand.
e second day, behold, two men of the
ews strove together: and he said to him that did the wrong,
thy fellow?  2:14 And he said, Who made thee a
t thou to kill me, as thou
gyptian? And Moses feared, and said, Surely this thing
haraoh heard this thing, he sought to slay Moses. But
haraoh, and dwelt in the land of Midian:
and he sat down by a well.
 priest of Midian had seven daughters: and they came and
 troughs to water their father's flock.

m away: but Moses stood up
m, and watered their flock.
en they came to Reuel their father, he said, How is it that
day?  2:19 And they said, An Egyptian delivered
, and also drew water enough for
watered the flock.
o his daughters, And where is he? why is it that
at he may eat bread.
 content to dwell with the man: and he gave Moses
d she bare him a son, and he called his name Gershom: for he
ranger in a strange land.
ame to pass in process of time, that the king of Egypt
rael sighed by reason of the bondage, and
d by reason of the bondage.
d heard their groaning, and God remembered his covenant
nd with Jacob.
 the children of Israel, and God had respect
lock of Jethro his father in law, the priest
 backside of the desert, and
mountain of God, even to Horeb.
 the angel of the LORD appeared unto him in a flame of fire out
ush: and he looked, and, behold, the bush burned
nsumed.
turn aside, and see this great sight,
 the bush is not burnt.
e LORD saw that he turned aside to see, God called unto
 bush, and said, Moses, Moses. And he said,
 nigh hither: put off thy shoes from off thy
est is holy ground.
d, I am the God of thy father, the God of Abraham,
 Jacob. And Moses hid his face; for he
s afraid to look upon God.
LORD said, I have surely seen the affliction of my people
ave heard their cry by reason of their
skmasters; for I know their sorrows; 3:8 And I am come down to
the hand of the Egyptians, and to bring them up
nd a large, unto a land flowing
 and honey; unto the place of the Canaanites, and the
nd the Perizzites, and the Hivites, and
he Jebusites.
, the cry of the children of Israel is come
ssion wherewith the Egyptians
m.
send thee unto Pharaoh, that thou
bring forth my people the children of Israel out of Egypt.
to God, Who am I, that I should go unto Pharaoh,
children of Israel out of Egypt?
 he said, Certainly I will be with thee; and this shall be a
I have sent thee: When thou hast brought forth
rve God upon this mountain.
ses said unto God, Behold, when I come unto the children of
nto them, The God of your fathers hath sent me
What is his name? what shall I say
hem?  3:14 And God said unto Moses, I AM THAT I AM: and he said,
y unto the children of Israel, I AM hath sent me
eover unto Moses, Thus shalt thou say unto the
your fathers, the God of Abraham,
 of Isaac, and the God of Jacob, hath sent me unto you: this is
nd this is my memorial unto all generations.
rael together, and say unto them,
D God of your fathers, the God of Abraham, of Isaac, and of
, saying, I have surely visited you, and seen
:17 And I have said, I will bring
out of the affliction of Egypt unto the land of the Canaanites,
nd the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the
d flowing with milk and honey.
 they shall hearken to thy voice: and thou shalt come, thou
l, unto the king of Egypt, and ye shall say
ath met with us: and now let us
seech thee, three days' journey into the wilderness, that we
ORD our God.
e king of Egypt will not let you go, no, not
tretch out my hand, and smite Egypt with all my
t thereof: and after that he will
 go.
avour in the sight of the Egyptians:
it shall come to pass, that, when ye go, ye shall not go empty.
man shall borrow of her neighbour, and of her that
of silver, and jewels of gold, and
t: and ye shall put them upon your sons, and upon your
l the Egyptians.
 and said, But, behold, they will not believe
ey will say, The LORD hath not
nto thee.
m, What is that in thine hand? And he
d, A rod.
he ground. And he cast it on the ground,
and it became a serpent; and Moses fled from before it.
o Moses, Put forth thine hand, and take it by
and caught it, and it became a
 hand: 4:5 That they may believe that the LORD God of their
aham, the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob,
he LORD said furthermore unto him, Put now thine hand into
s hand into his bosom: and when he took it
w.
 thy bosom again. And he put his
o his bosom again; and plucked it out of his bosom, and,
n as his other flesh.
come to pass, if they will not believe thee, neither
rst sign, that they will believe the
e of the latter sign.
come to pass, if they will not believe also these two
hy voice, that thou shalt take of the
er of the river, and pour it upon the dry land: and the water which
 of the river shall become blood upon the dry land.
LORD, O my LORD, I am not eloquent,
er heretofore, nor since thou hast spoken unto thy servant: but I
, and of a slow tongue.
RD said unto him, Who hath made man's mouth? or who
e seeing, or the blind? have not I the
RD?  4:12 Now therefore go, and I will be with thy mouth, and teach
shalt say.
 send, I pray thee, by the hand of him
om thou wilt send.
f the LORD was kindled against Moses, and he said,
her? I know that he can speak well.
lso, behold, he cometh forth to meet thee: and when he seeth
in his heart.
 unto him, and put words in his mouth: and I
outh, and will teach you what ye
.
to the people: and he shall be,
hall be to thee instead of a mouth, and thou shalt be to him
7 And thou shalt take this rod in thine hand, wherewith thou shalt
8 And Moses went and returned to Jethro his father in law, and said
e go, I pray thee, and return unto my brethren which
they be yet alive. And Jethro said to
es, Go in peace.
 unto Moses in Midian, Go, return into Egypt:
 thy life.
 and his sons, and set them upon an ass,
and he returned to the land of Egypt: and Moses took the rod of God in

hou goest to return into
thou do all those wonders before Pharaoh, which I have
l harden his heart, that he shall not let
 unto Pharaoh, Thus saith the LORD, Israel is
 say unto thee, Let my son go,
y serve me: and if thou refuse to let him go, behold, I will
 firstborn.
 the way in the inn, that the LORD met him,
pporah took a sharp stone, and cut off the foreskin of her
feet, and said, Surely a bloody husband art
hen she said, A bloody husband thou art,
because of the circumcision.
he LORD said to Aaron, Go into the wilderness to meet Moses.
im in the mount of God, and kissed him.

f the LORD who had sent him,
signs which he had commanded him.
And Moses and Aaron went and gathered together all the elders of
rael: 4:30 And Aaron spake all the words which the
did the signs in the sight of the

 they heard that the LORD had
 children of Israel, and that he had looked upon their
their heads and worshipped.
erward Moses and Aaron went in, and told Pharaoh, Thus
, Let my people go, that they may hold a
feast unto me in the wilderness.
d Pharaoh said, Who is the LORD, that I should obey his voice to
now not the LORD, neither will I let Israel go.
 Hebrews hath met with us: let us go,
pray thee, three days' journey into the desert, and sacrifice unto
; lest he fall upon us with pestilence, or with the
gypt said unto them, Wherefore do ye, Moses and
rks? get you unto your burdens.
 Pharaoh said, Behold, the people of the land now are many, and
rom their burdens.
anded the same day the taskmasters of the people,
e shall no more give the people straw
make brick, as heretofore: let them go and gather straw for
the tale of the bricks, which they did make heretofore, ye
shall not diminish ought thereof: for they be
 us go and sacrifice to our God.
t there more work be laid upon the men, that they may labour
not regard vain words.
kmasters of the people went out, and their officers,
saying, Thus saith Pharaoh, I will not
ve you straw.
 where ye can find it: yet not ought of your
he people were scattered abroad throughout all the land of
instead of straw.
ers hasted them, saying, Fulfil your works, your
aw.
en of Israel, which Pharaoh's
 had set over them, were beaten, and demanded, Wherefore
 task in making brick both yesterday and to
cers of the children of Israel
ried unto Pharaoh, saying, Wherefore dealest thou thus with
re is no straw given unto thy servants, and
, thy servants are beaten; but
is in thine own people.
d, Ye are idle, ye are idle: therefore ye say, Let us
RD.
r there shall no straw be given
shall ye deliver the tale of bricks.
19 And the officers of the children of Israel did see that they were
after it was said, Ye shall not minish ought from your

tood in the way, as they came
Pharaoh: 5:21 And they said unto them, The LORD look upon
e have made our savour to be abhorred in the
s servants, to put a sword in
to slay us.
o the LORD, and said, LORD, wherefore hast
is it that thou hast sent me?
nce I came to Pharaoh to speak in thy name, he hath done
er hast thou delivered thy people at all.
shalt thou see what I will do
 for with a strong hand shall he let them go, and with a
 them out of his land.
e unto Moses, and said unto him, I am the LORD: 6:3
to Isaac, and unto Jacob, by the name
God Almighty, but by my name JEHOVAH was I not known to them.
 established my covenant with them, to give them
eir pilgrimage, wherein they were
rs.
ing of the children of Israel, whom
gyptians keep in bondage; and I have remembered my covenant.
to the children of Israel, I am the LORD, and I
urdens of the Egyptians, and I will
ou out of their bondage, and I will redeem you with a stretched
reat judgments: 6:7 And I will take you to me for a
God: and ye shall know that I am the
 your God, which bringeth you out from under the burdens of the
nd I will bring you in unto the land, concerning the which I did
o Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob; and I will give
 LORD.
children of Israel: but they hearkened
t unto Moses for anguish of spirit, and for cruel bondage.
e unto Moses, saying, 6:11 Go in, speak unto
 children of Israel go out of

ying, Behold, the children of
 not hearkened unto me; how then shall Pharaoh hear me, who
s?  6:13 And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto
the children of Israel, and unto
king of Egypt, to bring the children of Israel out of the land
ese be the heads of their fathers' houses: The sons of Reuben
el; Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and Carmi: these
And the sons of Simeon; Jemuel, and Jamin, and Ohad, and Jachin,
ul the son of a Canaanitish woman: these are the
ese are the names of the sons of Levi according to their
Kohath, and Merari: and the years of the
life of Levi were an hundred thirty and seven years.
bni, and Shimi, according to their
es.
 and Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel:
he years of the life of Kohath were an hundred thirty and three
the sons of Merari; Mahali and Mushi: these are the families
heir generations.
im Jochebed his father's sister to wife; and she
years of the life of Amram were an
d and thirty and seven years.
the sons of Izhar; Korah, and Nepheg, and Zichri.
shael, and Elzaphan, and Zithri.
nd Aaron took him Elisheba, daughter of Amminadab, sister of
she bare him Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and
 Assir, and Elkanah, and Abiasaph: these
are the families of the Korhites.
And Eleazar Aaron's son took him one of the daughters of Putiel
re him Phinehas: these are the heads of the fathers
ir families.
and Moses, to whom the LORD said, Bring out
 Egypt according to their
 These are they which spake to Pharaoh king of Egypt, to bring out
Israel from Egypt: these are that Moses and Aaron.
e day when the LORD spake unto Moses in
he land of Egypt, 6:29 That the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, I am
 thou unto Pharaoh king of Egypt all that I say unto
efore the LORD, Behold, I am of uncircumcised
nto me?  7:1 And the LORD said
, See, I have made thee a god to Pharaoh: and Aaron thy
t.
and thee: and Aaron thy brother
ak unto Pharaoh, that he send the children of Israel out of
will harden Pharaoh's heart, and multiply my signs and my
ypt.
unto you, that I may lay my hand
pt, and bring forth mine armies, and my people the children of
and of Egypt by great judgments.
d the Egyptians shall know that I am the LORD, when I stretch
Egypt, and bring out the children of Israel from
aron did as the LORD commanded them, so did they.
rs old, and Aaron fourscore and three
rs old, when they spake unto Pharaoh.
:8 And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 7:9 When
ak unto you, saying, Shew a miracle for you: then
hy rod, and cast it before Pharaoh,
t shall become a serpent.
s and Aaron went in unto Pharaoh, and they did so as the
ron cast down his rod before Pharaoh, and
ent.
wise men and the sorcerers: now the
ians of Egypt, they also did in like manner with their
ey cast down every man his rod, and they became serpents:
 up their rods.
araoh's heart, that he hearkened not unto them;
he LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh's heart is hardened, he
 go.
morning; lo, he goeth out unto the
 and thou shalt stand by the river's brink against he come; and
urned to a serpent shalt thou take in thine hand.
m, The LORD God of the Hebrews hath
me unto thee, saying, Let my people go, that they may serve me in
nd, behold, hitherto thou wouldest not hear.
ou shalt know that I am the LORD:
 I will smite with the rod that is in mine hand upon the waters
ver, and they shall be turned to blood.

all die, and the river shall
he Egyptians shall lothe to drink of the water of the
pake unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Take thy rod, and
waters of Egypt, upon their streams,
 their rivers, and upon their ponds, and upon all their pools of
ay become blood; and that there may be blood
 in vessels of wood, and in
one.
s the LORD commanded; and he lifted
e rod, and smote the waters that were in the river, in the sight
 the sight of his servants; and all the waters that
o blood.
the river died; and the river stank, and
the Egyptians could not drink of the water of the river; and there was
hout all the land of Egypt.
e magicians of Egypt did so with their enchantments: and
ed, neither did he hearken unto them; as the
ned and went into his house, neither did he set
 all the Egyptians digged round about the river for water to
not drink of the water of the river.
25 And seven days were fulfilled, after that the LORD had smitten
 And the LORD spake unto Moses, Go unto Pharaoh, and say unto him,
ORD, Let my people go, that they may serve me.
 go, behold, I will smite all thy
 with frogs: 8:3 And the river shall bring forth frogs
p and come into thine house, and into thy
e house of thy servants, and
ple, and into thine ovens, and into thy kneadingtroughs:
me up both on thee, and upon thy people, and
LORD spake unto Moses, Say unto Aaron, Stretch forth thine
he streams, over the rivers, and over the
e land of Egypt.
d out his hand over the waters of Egypt; and the
d of Egypt.
o with their enchantments, and brought up
 Pharaoh called for Moses and Aaron, and said, Intreat the
way the frogs from me, and from my people; and
may do sacrifice unto the LORD.
 Moses said unto Pharaoh, Glory over me: when shall I intreat
 servants, and for thy people, to destroy the
they may remain in the river
And he said, To morrow. And he said, Be it according to
know that there is none like unto the LORD
art from thee, and from thy houses, and
rom thy servants, and from thy people; they shall remain in the river
 And Moses and Aaron went out from Pharaoh: and Moses cried unto
f the frogs which he had brought against Pharaoh.
 to the word of Moses; and the frogs
 out of the houses, out of the villages, and out of the fields.
hered them together upon heaps: and the land stank.
t there was respite, he hardened his
t, and hearkened not unto them; as the LORD had said.
 Moses, Say unto Aaron, Stretch out thy
od, and smite the dust of the land, that it may become lice
 of Egypt.
ron stretched out his hand with his rod,
and smote the dust of the earth, and it became lice in man, and in
ust of the land became lice throughout all the land of
ians did so with their enchantments to bring forth
re were lice upon man, and upon beast.
8:19 Then the magicians said unto Pharaoh, This is the finger of God:
 heart was hardened, and he hearkened not unto them; as
And the LORD said unto Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and
h; lo, he cometh forth to the water; and say unto
people go, that they may serve me.
 Else, if thou wilt not let my people go, behold, I will send
thee, and upon thy servants, and upon thy people,
es of the Egyptians shall be full of
ms of flies, and also the ground whereon they are.
day the land of Goshen, in which my
e dwell, that no swarms of flies shall be there; to the end thou
 am the LORD in the midst of the earth.

 people and thy people: to
his sign be.
and there came a grievous swarm of flies
into the house of Pharaoh, and into his servants' houses, and into all
Egypt: the land was corrupted by reason of the swarm of
called for Moses and for Aaron, and said, Go ye,

 to do; for we shall sacrifice
ation of the Egyptians to the LORD our God: lo, shall we
of the Egyptians before their eyes, and will
ree days' journey into the
d sacrifice to the LORD our God, as he shall command us.
 will let you go, that ye may sacrifice to the
y ye shall not go very far away:
for me.
go out from thee, and I will intreat
LORD that the swarms of flies may depart from Pharaoh, from his
his people, to morrow: but let not Pharaoh deal
 the people go to sacrifice to the

nd intreated the LORD.
D did according to the word of Moses; and he removed
oh, from his servants, and from his
e; there remained not one.
raoh hardened his heart at this time also, neither would
:1 Then the LORD said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh, and tell him,
LORD God of the Hebrews, Let my people go, that they
ou refuse to let them go, and wilt hold them still, 9:3
D is upon thy cattle which is in the field,
he camels, upon the oxen, and
eep: there shall be a very grievous murrain.
 the cattle of Israel and the
gypt: and there shall nothing die of all that is the
nd the LORD appointed a set time, saying, To morrow the LORD
 the land.
ing on the morrow, and all the cattle of
Egypt died: but of the cattle of the children of Israel died not one.
raoh sent, and, behold, there was not one of the cattle of
 the heart of Pharaoh was hardened, and he did
e LORD said unto Moses and unto Aaron, Take to you handfuls
, and let Moses sprinkle it toward the heaven
t shall become small dust in all the land of Egypt, and shall
rth with blains upon man, and upon beast,
 And they took ashes of the furnace, and stood before Pharaoh; and
it up toward heaven; and it became a boil breaking
upon beast.
d not stand before Moses because of the
oils; for the boil was upon the magicians, and upon all the
the LORD hardened the heart of Pharaoh, and he hearkened not
 had spoken unto Moses.
RD said unto Moses, Rise up early in the morning, and
 unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of the
serve me.
send all my plagues upon thine heart, and
hat thou mayest know that
ike me in all the earth.
 will stretch out my hand, that I may smite thee and thy
d thou shalt be cut off from the earth.

 I raised thee up, for to
 power; and that my name may be declared throughout all
xaltest thou thyself against my people, that thou wilt
d, to morrow about this time I will cause
hath not been in Egypt since
on thereof even until now.
erefore now, and gather thy cattle, and all that thou hast
very man and beast which shall be found in the
, the hail shall come down upon
 they shall die.
e word of the LORD among the servants of Pharaoh
lee into the houses: 9:21 And he
arded not the word of the LORD left his servants and his
22 And the LORD said unto Moses, Stretch forth thine hand toward
 may be hail in all the land of Egypt, upon man, and
b of the field, throughout the land of
ypt.
 rod toward heaven: and the LORD
nder and hail, and the fire ran along upon the ground; and the
n the land of Egypt.
hail, and fire mingled with the hail, very grievous,
 in all the land of Egypt since it
 a nation.
ughout all the land of Egypt all that was
 hail smote every herb of the
brake every tree of the field.
y in the land of Goshen, where the children of Israel were,
:27 And Pharaoh sent, and called for Moses and Aaron, and said unto
nned this time: the LORD is righteous, and I and my
eat the LORD (for it is enough) that there be no more mighty
and I will let you go, and ye shall stay no
, As soon as I am gone out of the city, I
; and the thunder shall
all there be any more hail; that thou mayest know how

 I know that ye will not yet
D God.
 was smitten: for the barley was in
ar, and the flax was bolled.
he wheat and the rie were not smitten: for they were not
s went out of the city from Pharaoh, and spread abroad
 the thunders and hail ceased, and the
in was not poured upon the earth.
And when Pharaoh saw that the rain and the hail and the thunders
nned yet more, and hardened his heart, he and his
f Pharaoh was hardened, neither would he let the
 had spoken by Moses.
 said unto Moses, Go in unto Pharaoh: for I have
of his servants, that I might shew
my signs before him: 10:2 And that thou mayest tell in the ears
thy son's son, what things I have wrought in Egypt,
among them; that ye may know how that I
m the LORD.
me in unto Pharaoh, and said unto him, Thus
long wilt thou refuse to humble
efore me? let my people go, that they may serve me.
let my people go, behold, to morrow will
I bring the locusts into thy coast: 10:5 And they shall cover the face
, that one cannot be able to see the earth: and they shall
which is escaped, which remaineth unto you
which groweth for you out of
0:6 And they shall fill thy houses, and the houses of all
ses of all the Egyptians; which neither thy
seen, since the day that they
he earth unto this day. And he turned himself, and went out
nd Pharaoh's servants said unto him, How long shall this man be
t the men go, that they may serve the LORD their
pt is destroyed?  10:8 And Moses and
n were brought again unto Pharaoh: and he said unto them, Go,
od: but who are they that shall go?  10:9 And
 and with our old, with our sons
 our daughters, with our flocks and with our herds will we go;
east unto the LORD.
nto them, Let the LORD be so with you, as I will
look to it; for evil is before you.
11 Not so: go now ye that are men, and serve the LORD; for that ye
they were driven out from Pharaoh's presence.
 Stretch out thine hand over the
Egypt for the locusts, that they may come up upon the land of
herb of the land, even all that the hail hath
rth his rod over the land of Egypt, and
he LORD brought an east wind upon the land all that day, and all that
en it was morning, the east wind brought the locusts.
p over all the land of Egypt, and rested in
were they; before them there
 locusts as they, neither after them shall be such.
ce of the whole earth, so that the land
as darkened; and they did eat every herb of the land, and all the
s which the hail had left: and there remained not any
in the herbs of the field, through all
e land of Egypt.
led for Moses and Aaron in haste; and he said, I
God, and against you.
re forgive, I pray thee, my sin only this once, and
 he may take away from me this death
.
nd intreated the LORD.
RD turned a mighty strong west wind, which took away
o the Red sea; there remained not one
ust in all the coasts of Egypt.
ut the LORD hardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would not let
el go.
es, Stretch out thine hand toward
 that there may be darkness over the land of Egypt, even
.
and toward heaven; and there was
darkness in all the land of Egypt three days: 10:23 They saw
er rose any from his place for three days: but
 in their dwellings.
called unto Moses, and said, Go ye, serve the LORD;
erds be stayed: let your little ones
 go with you.
u must give us also sacrifices and burnt
offerings, that we may sacrifice unto the LORD our God.
ll go with us; there shall not an hoof be
serve the LORD our God; and
ith what we must serve the LORD, until we come thither.
ed Pharaoh's heart, and he would not let them
m, Get thee from me, take heed to
, see my face no more; for in that day thou seest my face thou
And Moses said, Thou hast spoken well, I will see thy face again
nd the LORD said unto Moses, Yet will I bring one plague more
n Egypt; afterwards he will let you go hence:
rely thrust you out hence
11:2 Speak now in the ears of the people, and let every man borrow of
, and every woman of her neighbour, jewels of silver and
d the LORD gave the people favour in the sight of the
n Moses was very great in the land of Egypt, in the
d in the sight of the people.
Moses said, Thus saith the LORD, About midnight will I go out
pt: 11:5 And all the firstborn in the land of
of Pharaoh that sitteth upon his
even unto the firstborn of the maidservant that is behind the
stborn of beasts.
be a great cry throughout all the land of Egypt,
r shall be like it any more.
gainst any of the children of Israel shall not a dog move
r beast: that ye may know how that the LORD
ians and Israel.
 servants shall come down unto me, and bow down
e out, and all the people that
e: and after that I will go out. And he went out from
11:9 And the LORD said unto Moses, Pharaoh shall not hearken unto you;
ers may be multiplied in the land of Egypt.
se wonders before Pharaoh: and
ardened Pharaoh's heart, so that he would not let the
his land.
Moses and Aaron in the land of Egypt
ng, 12:2 This month shall be unto you the beginning of months: it
t month of the year to you.
ye unto all the congregation of Israel, saying, In the
 shall take to them every man a lamb,
ording to the house of their fathers, a lamb for an house: 12:4 And
d be too little for the lamb, let him and his neighbour
 according to the number of the souls;
ery man according to his eating shall make your count for the lamb.
b shall be without blemish, a male of the first year: ye
 sheep, or from the goats: 12:6 And ye shall
 the same month: and the whole
f the congregation of Israel shall kill it in the evening.
ke of the blood, and strike it on the two side
the houses, wherein they shall eat

 night, roast with fire, and
read; and with bitter herbs they shall eat it.
 at all with water, but roast with
his head with his legs, and with the purtenance thereof.
othing of it remain until the morning; and
ning ye shall burn with fire.
 thus shall ye eat it; with your loins girded, your shoes on
aff in your hand; and ye shall eat it in haste:
 For I will pass through the land of Egypt this night, and will
born in the land of Egypt, both man and beast; and
will execute judgment: I am the LORD.
2:13 And the blood shall be to you for a token upon the houses where
en I see the blood, I will pass over you, and the plague
estroy you, when I smite the land of Egypt.
for a memorial; and ye shall keep
ast to the LORD throughout your generations; ye shall keep it a
ce for ever.
eat unleavened bread; even the first day ye
s: for whosoever eateth
om the first day until the seventh day, that soul
12:16 And in the first day there shall be an holy convocation, and in
ay there shall be an holy convocation to you; no manner
em, save that which every man must eat,
hat only may be done of you.
ye shall observe the feast of unleavened bread; for in this
ught your armies out of the land of Egypt:
our generations by an

eenth day of the month at even,
eat unleavened bread, until the one and twentieth day of the
9 Seven days shall there be no leaven found in your houses: for
at which is leavened, even that soul shall be cut
el, whether he be a stranger, or born
the land.
avened; in all your habitations shall ye
eat unleavened bread.
called for all the elders of Israel, and said unto
mb according to your families, and
he passover.
bunch of hyssop, and dip it in the blood
that is in the bason, and strike the lintel and the two side posts
hat is in the bason; and none of you shall go out at
e morning.
 through to smite the Egyptians; and when
n the two side posts, the
over the door, and will not suffer the destroyer to
te you.
 thing for an ordinance to thee and to
y sons for ever.
e to pass, when ye be come to the land which the
e hath promised, that ye shall keep
service.
s, when your children shall say unto
 What mean ye by this service?  12:27 That ye shall say, It is the
 LORD's passover, who passed over the houses of the
en he smote the Egyptians, and
our houses. And the people bowed the head and worshipped.
of Israel went away, and did as the LORD had
.
dnight the LORD smote all the
n the land of Egypt, from the firstborn of Pharaoh that sat
firstborn of the captive that was in the
dungeon; and all the firstborn of cattle.
 he, and all his servants, and
yptians; and there was a great cry in Egypt; for there was
was not one dead.
or Moses and Aaron by night, and said, Rise up,
ple, both ye and the children of
and go, serve the LORD, as ye have said.

ds, as ye have said, and be
ss me also.
e urgent upon the people, that they might
hey said, We be all dead men.
 the people took their dough before it was leavened, their
und up in their clothes upon their shoulders.
d according to the word of Moses;
y borrowed of the Egyptians jewels of silver, and jewels of
6 And the LORD gave the people favour in the
ent unto them such things as
d. And they spoiled the Egyptians.
7 And the children of Israel journeyed from Rameses to Succoth,
housand on foot that were men, beside children.
up also with them; and flocks, and
 even very much cattle.
baked unleavened cakes of the dough which they brought
as not leavened; because they were thrust
r had they prepared for
ctual.
children of Israel, who dwelt in
as four hundred and thirty years.
 And it came to pass at the end of the four hundred and thirty
same day it came to pass, that all the hosts of
Egypt.
bserved unto the LORD for bringing
ut from the land of Egypt: this is that night of the LORD to be
 children of Israel in their generations.
Aaron, This is the ordinance of
ver: There shall no stranger eat thereof: 12:44 But every
ght for money, when thou hast circumcised
A foreigner and an hired servant shall not eat thereof.
it be eaten; thou shalt not carry forth ought
 neither shall ye break a bone

ll keep it.
hall sojourn with thee, and will keep the
e circumcised, and then let
 and keep it; and he shall be as one that is born in the
 person shall eat thereof.
w shall be to him that is homeborn, and unto the stranger
.
rael; as the LORD commanded Moses
on, so did they.
ass the selfsame day, that the LORD did bring
d of Egypt by their armies.
e LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 13:2 Sanctify unto me all
r openeth the womb among the children of
Israel, both of man and of beast: it is mine.
, Remember this day, in which ye
 from Egypt, out of the house of bondage; for by strength of
you out from this place: there shall no leavened
ame ye out in the month Abib.
it shall be when the LORD shall bring thee into the land of
 Hittites, and the Amorites, and the Hivites,
o thy fathers to give thee, a
g with milk and honey, that thou shalt keep this service in
en days thou shalt eat unleavened bread, and in the seventh
 the LORD.
be eaten seven days; and there shall no
eavened bread be seen with thee, neither shall there be leaven seen
l thy quarters.
w thy son in that day, saying, This is done
 me when I came forth out of
:9 And it shall be for a sign unto thee upon thine hand, and for a
 thine eyes, that the LORD's law may be in thy mouth:
he LORD brought thee out of Egypt.
0 Thou shalt therefore keep this ordinance in his season from year
1 And it shall be when the LORD shall bring thee into the land of
s he sware unto thee and to thy fathers, and shall
alt set apart unto the LORD all that
eth the matrix, and every firstling that cometh of a beast which
es shall be the LORD's.
 firstling of an ass thou shalt redeem with a lamb; and
 then thou shalt break his neck: and all
the firstborn of man among thy children shalt thou redeem.
when thy son asketh thee in time to come,
 unto him, By strength of
rought us out from Egypt, from the house of bondage:
n Pharaoh would hardly let us go, that
e LORD slew all the firstborn in the land of Egypt, both the
the firstborn of beast: therefore I sacrifice to
ix, being males; but all the
 my children I redeem.
ll be for a token upon thine hand, and for frontlets
ength of hand the LORD brought us forth
ut of Egypt.
 when Pharaoh had let the people go, that
and of the Philistines,
 near; for God said, Lest peradventure the people
y return to Egypt: 13:18 But God led
people about, through the way of the wilderness of the Red sea:
 Israel went up harnessed out of the land of Egypt.
s of Joseph with him: for he had straitly
 will surely visit you; and
y up my bones away hence with you.
0 And they took their journey from Succoth, and encamped in Etham,
he wilderness.
before them by day in a pillar of a cloud, to
pillar of fire, to give them
 by day and night: 13:22 He took not away the pillar of
illar of fire by night, from before the
eople.
es, saying, 14:2 Speak unto the
of Israel, that they turn and encamp before Pihahiroth,
 over against Baalzephon: before it shall
 will say of the children of Israel, They are
 hath shut them in.
den Pharaoh's heart, that he shall follow after
haraoh, and upon all his host; that
gyptians may know that I am the LORD. And they did so.
ing of Egypt that the people fled: and the
 turned against the people,
, Why have we done this, that we have let Israel go from
ade ready his chariot, and took his people
hosen chariots, and all the
gypt, and captains over every one of them.
f Pharaoh king of Egypt, and he
fter the children of Israel: and the children of Israel went

hem, all the horses and chariots
oh, and his horsemen, and his army, and overtook them
Pihahiroth, before Baalzephon.
d when Pharaoh drew nigh, the children of Israel lifted up
 the Egyptians marched after them; and they
srael cried out unto the LORD.
d they said unto Moses, Because there were no graves in Egypt,
way to die in the wilderness? wherefore hast thou
orth out of Egypt?  14:12 Is not this
 word that we did tell thee in Egypt, saying, Let us alone, that we
gyptians? For it had been better for us to serve the
 die in the wilderness.
 said unto the people, Fear ye not, stand still, and
 which he will shew to you to day: for
e Egyptians whom ye have seen to day, ye shall see them again no
14:14 The LORD shall fight for you, and ye shall hold your peace.
ORD said unto Moses, Wherefore criest thou unto me?
el, that they go forward: 14:16 But
thou up thy rod, and stretch out thine hand over the sea, and
ildren of Israel shall go on dry ground through
I, behold, I will harden the hearts of the Egyptians, and
nd I will get me honour upon Pharaoh, and
 upon his horsemen.
ians shall know that I am the LORD, when I have
 his chariots, and upon his
14:19 And the angel of God, which went before the camp of Israel,
behind them; and the pillar of the cloud went from
ind them: 14:20 And it came between
amp of the Egyptians and the camp of Israel; and it was a cloud
m, but it gave light by night to these: so that the
 the night.
ut his hand over the sea; and the LORD
used the sea to go back by a strong east wind all that night, and
land, and the waters were divided.
2 And the children of Israel went into the midst of the sea upon
d the waters were a wall unto them on their right
 And the Egyptians pursued, and went in after them to the midst
l Pharaoh's horses, his chariots, and his horsemen.
at in the morning watch the LORD looked
nto the host of the Egyptians through the pillar of fire and of the
bled the host of the Egyptians, 14:25 And took off
drave them heavily: so that the
 said, Let us flee from the face of Israel; for the LORD
the Egyptians.
unto Moses, Stretch out thine hand over the
n the Egyptians, upon their
 upon their horsemen.
tretched forth his hand over the sea, and the sea
 morning appeared; and the Egyptians
 against it; and the LORD overthrew the Egyptians in the midst of
 And the waters returned, and covered the chariots, and the
ost of Pharaoh that came into the sea after
 of them.
ael walked upon dry land in the midst of
the sea; and the waters were a wall unto them on their right hand, and
t.
t day out of the hand of the
nd Israel saw the Egyptians dead upon the sea shore.
eat work which the LORD did upon the
tians: and the people feared the LORD, and believed the LORD, and
.
 of Israel this song unto the
pake, saying, I will sing unto the LORD, for he hath
e and his rider hath he thrown into the
ea.
ng, and he is become my salvation:
my God, and I will prepare him an habitation; my father's God,
.
RD is his name.
 and his host hath he cast into the sea: his
e Red sea.
 them: they sank into the bottom as a
ne.
ome glorious in power: thy right
LORD, hath dashed in pieces the enemy.
15:7 And in the greatness of thine excellency thou hast overthrown
p against thee: thou sentest forth thy wrath, which
:8 And with the blast of thy nostrils the waters were gathered
 stood upright as an heap, and the depths were

ll overtake, I will divide the
lust shall be satisfied upon them; I will draw my sword, my
.
the sea covered them: they sank
n the mighty waters.
unto thee, O LORD, among the gods? who is like thee,
in praises, doing wonders?  15:12 Thou
retchedst out thy right hand, the earth swallowed them.
ast led forth the people which thou hast
redeemed: thou hast guided them in thy strength unto thy holy
The people shall hear, and be afraid: sorrow shall take hold on
Palestina.
 shall be amazed; the mighty men of Moab,
the inhabitants of Canaan
.
them; by the greatness of thine
shall be as still as a stone; till thy people pass over, O
ss over, which thou hast purchased.
17 Thou shalt bring them in, and plant them in the mountain of
n the place, O LORD, which thou hast made for thee
 LORD, which thy hands have

 ever.
ent in with his chariots and with his
semen into the sea, and the LORD brought again the waters of the
 the children of Israel went on dry land in the
am the prophetess, the sister of Aaron, took a timbrel
en went out after her with timbrels and
ith dances.
hem, Sing ye to the LORD, for he hath
umphed gloriously; the horse and his rider hath he thrown into the
 Moses brought Israel from the Red sea, and they went out into
ur; and they went three days in the wilderness,
en they came to Marah, they could not drink of the waters
itter: therefore the name of it was called
against Moses, saying, What shall we
k?  15:25 And he cried unto the LORD; and the LORD shewed him a
 had cast into the waters, the waters were made
tute and an ordinance, and there he
d them, 15:26 And said, If thou wilt diligently hearken to the
y God, and wilt do that which is right in his
ndments, and keep all his
l put none of these diseases upon thee, which I have
r I am the LORD that healeth thee.
7 And they came to Elim, where were twelve wells of water, and
alm trees: and they encamped there by the waters.
y from Elim, and all the congregation
the children of Israel came unto the wilderness of Sin, which is
inai, on the fifteenth day of the second month after
d of Egypt.
tion of the children of Israel murmured
gainst Moses and Aaron in the wilderness: 16:3 And the children of
 them, Would to God we had died by the hand of the
we sat by the flesh pots, and when we
 eat bread to the full; for ye have brought us forth into this
this whole assembly with hunger.
hen said the LORD unto Moses, Behold, I will rain bread from
e people shall go out and gather a certain rate
hether they will walk in my law, or

the sixth day they shall
ch they bring in; and it shall be twice as much as
oses and Aaron said unto all the children of Israel, At
at the LORD hath brought you out from the
hen ye shall see the glory of
or that he heareth your murmurings against the LORD: and
r against us?  16:8 And Moses said, This
shall be, when the LORD shall give you in the evening flesh to eat,
ing bread to the full; for that the LORD heareth your
ainst him: and what are we? your
gs are not against us, but against the LORD.
 unto all the congregation of the
n of Israel, Come near before the LORD: for he hath heard your
 And it came to pass, as Aaron spake unto the whole congregation
 Israel, that they looked toward the wilderness,
 appeared in the cloud.
ORD spake unto Moses, saying, 16:12 I have heard the
Israel: speak unto them, saying, At even
ye shall eat flesh, and in the morning ye shall be filled with bread;
know that I am the LORD your God.
 And it came to pass, that at even the quails came up, and
 the morning the dew lay round about the host.
s gone up, behold, upon the face of
ilderness there lay a small round thing, as small as the hoar

aw it, they said one to
nna: for they wist not what it was. And Moses said
ch the LORD hath given you to eat.
6 This is the thing which the LORD hath commanded, Gather of it
 to his eating, an omer for every man, according to
e ye every man for them which are in
tents.
 did so, and gathered, some more, some
ss.
h an omer, he that gathered much
ing over, and he that gathered little had no lack; they
g to his eating.
Let no man leave of it till the morning.

 unto Moses; but some of them
until the morning, and it bred worms, and stank: and Moses
16:21 And they gathered it every morning, every man according to his
en the sun waxed hot, it melted.
And it came to pass, that on the sixth day they gathered twice
mers for one man: and all the rulers of the
:23 And he said unto them, This is that which the LORD hath said, To
rest of the holy sabbath unto the LORD: bake that which
ethe that ye will seethe; and that which
remaineth over lay up for you to be kept until the morning.
t up till the morning, as Moses bade: and it did
orm therein.
that to day; for to day is a sabbath unto
the field.
er it; but on the seventh day, which is
he sabbath, in it there shall be none.
16:27 And it came to pass, that there went out some of the people on
y for to gather, and they found none.
6:28 And the LORD said unto Moses, How long refuse ye to keep my
y laws?  16:29 See, for that the LORD hath given you
th you on the sixth day the bread of two
days; abide ye every man in his place, let no man go out of his place
h day.
e seventh day.
srael called the name thereof Manna: and it
 taste of it was like wafers
ney.
thing which the LORD commandeth,
omer of it to be kept for your generations; that they may see
 have fed you in the wilderness, when I brought

pot, and put an omer full of
n, and lay it up before the LORD, to be kept for your
LORD commanded Moses, so Aaron laid it up before the
5 And the children of Israel did eat manna forty years, until they
nhabited; they did eat manna, until they came unto the
n.
of an ephah.
ion of the children of Israel journeyed from
rneys, according to the
e LORD, and pitched in Rephidim: and there was no

Moses, and said, Give us
y drink. And Moses said unto them, Why chide ye with
LORD?  17:3 And the people thirsted
 for water; and the people murmured against Moses, and said,
 thou hast brought us up out of Egypt, to kill
ith thirst?  17:4 And Moses cried
e LORD, saying, What shall I do unto this people? they be

on before the people, and take
of the elders of Israel; and thy rod, wherewith thou smotest
ne hand, and go.
and before thee there upon the rock in Horeb;
ere shall come water out of it,
people may drink. And Moses did so in the sight of the elders
d he called the name of the place Massah, and Meribah, because
e children of Israel, and because they tempted the
us, or not?  17:8 Then came Amalek,
ought with Israel in Rephidim.
 Moses said unto Joshua, Choose us out men, and go out, fight
w I will stand on the top of the hill with the
 Joshua did as Moses had said to him, and fought with Amalek:
 Hur went up to the top of the hill.
:11 And it came to pass, when Moses held up his hand, that Israel
en he let down his hand, Amalek prevailed.
they took a stone, and put it
and he sat thereon; and Aaron and Hur stayed up his hands,
 and the other on the other side; and his
 the sun.
Amalek and his people with the edge of
e sword.
oses, Write this for a memorial in a
, and rehearse it in the ears of Joshua: for I will utterly put
 of Amalek from under heaven.
 Moses built an altar, and called the name of it
ecause the LORD hath sworn that the
will have war with Amalek from generation to generation.
iest of Midian, Moses' father in law, heard of
 for Israel his people, and that
 had brought Israel out of Egypt; 18:2 Then Jethro, Moses'
orah, Moses' wife, after he had sent her back,
name of the one was Gershom; for
 I have been an alien in a strange land: 18:4 And the name of
; for the God of my father, said he, was mine
 of Pharaoh: 18:5 And Jethro,
er in law, came with his sons and his wife unto Moses into
 encamped at the mount of God: 18:6 And he
hro am come unto thee, and thy
her two sons with her.
ent out to meet his father in law, and did obeisance,
d each other of their welfare; and they
ame into the tent.
his father in law all that the LORD had done unto
Israel's sake, and all the travail
ad come upon them by the way, and how the LORD delivered them.
joiced for all the goodness which the LORD had done
d out of the hand of the Egyptians.
10 And Jethro said, Blessed be the LORD, who hath delivered you out
the Egyptians, and out of the hand of Pharaoh, who hath
nder the hand of the Egyptians.
ow I know that the LORD is greater than all gods: for in the
lt proudly he was above them.
 Jethro, Moses' father in law, took a burnt offering and
ron came, and all the elders of Israel, to
re God.
e morrow, that Moses sat to judge the
ple: and the people stood by Moses from the morning unto the
when Moses' father in law saw all that he did to the people,
thing that thou doest to the people? why sittest
ople stand by thee from morning unto
?  18:15 And Moses said unto his father in law, Because the people
enquire of God: 18:16 When they have a matter, they
en one and another, and I do make them
ow the statutes of God, and his laws.
8:17 And Moses' father in law said unto him, The thing that thou

 thou, and this people that is
 for this thing is too heavy for thee; thou art not able to
e.
ill give thee counsel, and God
ith thee: Be thou for the people to God-ward, that thou
o God: 18:20 And thou shalt teach them
dinances and laws, and shalt shew them the way wherein they must
 that they must do.
 shalt provide out of all the people able men, such
ng covetousness; and place such over
, to be rulers of thousands, and rulers of hundreds, rulers of
of tens: 18:22 And let them judge the people at
every great matter they shall bring
thee, but every small matter they shall judge: so shall it be
nd they shall bear the burden with thee.

od command thee so, then thou
le to endure, and all this people shall also go to their
o Moses hearkened to the voice of his father in law, and did

ll Israel, and made them heads
eople, rulers of thousands, rulers of hundreds, rulers of
ns.
 all seasons: the hard causes they
t unto Moses, but every small matter they judged themselves.
his father in law depart; and he went his way into
rd month, when the children of Israel were gone forth
 same day came they into the wilderness
f Sinai.
om Rephidim, and were come to the desert
of Sinai, and had pitched in the wilderness; and there Israel camped
nt.
d the LORD called unto him out of
ntain, saying, Thus shalt thou say to the house of Jacob, and
Israel; 19:4 Ye have seen what I did unto the
es' wings, and brought you unto

oice indeed, and keep my
e shall be a peculiar treasure unto me above all
 19:6 And ye shall be unto me a
f priests, and an holy nation.
e the words which thou shalt speak unto the children of
ame and called for the elders of the people, and laid
words which the LORD commanded him.
8 And all the people answered together, and said, All that the LORD
will do. And Moses returned the words of the people
LORD said unto Moses, Lo, I come unto thee in a thick
ar when I speak with thee, and believe
ee for ever.
f the people unto the LORD.
he LORD said unto Moses, Go unto the people, and sanctify
, and let them wash their clothes, 19:11 And
e third day the LORD will come
e sight of all the people upon mount Sinai.
the people round about, saying,
 to yourselves, that ye go not up into the mount, or touch
ver toucheth the mount shall be surely put to
touch it, but he shall surely be
or shot through; whether it be beast or man, it shall not
undeth long, they shall come up to the mount.
mount unto the people, and
 people; and they washed their clothes.

dy against the third day:
r wives.
he third day in the morning, that there
ere thunders and lightnings, and a thick cloud upon the mount, and
 trumpet exceeding loud; so that all the people that
9:17 And Moses brought forth the people out of the camp to meet with
stood at the nether part of the mount.
19:18 And mount Sinai was altogether on a smoke, because the LORD
 in fire: and the smoke thereof ascended as the smoke
ount quaked greatly.
 voice of the trumpet sounded long, and waxed louder
od answered him by a voice.
he LORD came down upon mount Sinai, on the top of the
ses up to the top of the mount; and Moses
Moses, Go down, charge the people, lest
hey break through unto the LORD to gaze, and many of them perish.
he priests also, which come near to the LORD, sanctify
eak forth upon them.
id unto the LORD, The people cannot come up to mount
saying, Set bounds about the mount, and
anctify it.
o him, Away, get thee down, and thou shalt
let not the priests and the
through to come up unto the LORD, lest he break forth
went down unto the people, and spake unto them.
s, saying, 20:2 I am the LORD thy
ich have brought thee out of the land of Egypt, out of the
3 Thou shalt have no other gods before me.
 graven image, or any likeness
ng that is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath,
r under the earth.
bow down thyself to them, nor serve them: for I
visiting the iniquity of the
 the children unto the third and fourth generation of them
hewing mercy unto thousands of them that love
 Thou shalt not take the name of the LORD thy God in vain; for the
ld him guiltless that taketh his name in vain.
keep it holy.
labour, and do all thy work: 20:10 But the
hy God: in it thou shalt not
 thou, nor thy son, nor thy daughter, thy manservant, nor
cattle, nor thy stranger that is within thy
ade heaven and earth, the sea,
at in them is, and rested the seventh day: wherefore the
ay, and hallowed it.
ather and thy mother: that thy days may be long upon
d giveth thee.
l.
.
Thou shalt not bear false witness against thy neighbour.
et thy neighbour's house, thou shalt not covet
vant, nor his maidservant, nor his
r his ass, nor any thing that is thy neighbour's.
e thunderings, and the lightnings, and
e noise of the trumpet, and the mountain smoking: and when the
removed, and stood afar off.
they said unto Moses, Speak thou with us, and we will hear:
ith us, lest we die.
id unto the people, Fear not: for God is come to
e before your faces, that ye sin
20:21 And the people stood afar off, and Moses drew near unto the
ere God was.
to Moses, Thus thou shalt say unto the
ildren of Israel, Ye have seen that I have talked with you from
 shall not make with me gods of silver, neither shall ye make
.
ke unto me, and shalt sacrifice
hy burnt offerings, and thy peace offerings, thy sheep, and
es where I record my name I will come unto
d if thou wilt make me an altar of stone, thou shalt not build
r if thou lift up thy tool upon it, thou hast
hou go up by steps unto mine altar, that thy

hou shalt set before them.
 buy an Hebrew servant, six years he shall serve: and in
t free for nothing.
by himself, he shall go out by himself: if he were
out with him.
iven him a wife, and she have born him sons
 shall be her master's, and he
ut by himself.
shall plainly say, I love my master, my wife,
ee: 21:6 Then his master shall
unto the judges; he shall also bring him to the door, or
s master shall bore his ear through with an

e a maidservant, she shall not
the menservants do.
not her master, who hath betrothed her to himself,
d: to sell her unto a strange nation
hall have no power, seeing he hath dealt deceitfully with her.
e betrothed her unto his son, he shall deal with her

 food, her raiment, and her duty
age, shall he not diminish.
f he do not these three unto her, then shall she go out
2 He that smiteth a man, so that he die, shall be surely put to
 if a man lie not in wait, but God deliver him into his hand;
hee a place whither he shall flee.
4 But if a man come presumptuously upon his neighbour, to slay him
 shalt take him from mine altar, that he may die.
ather, or his mother, shall be surely
 to death.
 man, and selleth him, or if he be found
in his hand, he shall surely be put to death.
r, or his mother, shall surely be
death.
, and one smite another with a stone,
with his fist, and he die not, but keepeth his bed: 21:19 If he
k abroad upon his staff, then shall he that smote
r the loss of his time, and shall
im to be thoroughly healed.
f a man smite his servant, or his maid, with a rod, and he
hall be surely punished.
tanding, if he continue a day or two, he shall not be
.
 with child, so that her fruit
m her, and yet no mischief follow: he shall be surely
man's husband will lay upon him; and he
hall pay as the judges determine.
 And if any mischief follow, then thou shalt give life for life,
 tooth for tooth, hand for hand, foot for foot,
r wound, stripe for stripe.
f a man smite the eye of his servant, or the eye of his
all let him go free for his eye's sake.

s tooth, or his maidservant's
hall let him go free for his tooth's sake.
that they die: then the ox shall
y stoned, and his flesh shall not be eaten; but the owner of

ith his horn in time past, and
en testified to his owner, and he hath not kept him in, but
an or a woman; the ox shall be stoned, and his

ney, then he shall give for
 his life whatsoever is laid upon him.
21:31 Whether he have gored a son, or have gored a daughter, according
ment shall it be done unto him.
f the ox shall push a manservant or a maidservant; he shall
thirty shekels of silver, and the ox shall be
pen a pit, or if a man shall dig a pit, and
therein; 21:34 The owner of the
 make it good, and give money unto the owner of them; and the
is.
her's, that he die; then they shall
the live ox, and divide the money of it; and the dead ox also

used to push in time past,
hath not kept him in; he shall surely pay ox for ox; and

sheep, and kill it, or sell it;
restore five oxen for an ox, and four sheep for a sheep.
 breaking up, and be smitten that he die,
22:3 If the sun be risen upon him, there shall be blood shed for him;
 make full restitution; if he have nothing, then he shall

is hand alive, whether it be
or sheep; he shall restore double.
 If a man shall cause a field or vineyard to be eaten, and shall
and shall feed in another man's field; of the best
t of his own vineyard, shall he make
itution.
tch in thorns, so that the stacks of
, or the standing corn, or the field, be consumed therewith; he
re shall surely make restitution.
If a man shall deliver unto his neighbour money or stuff to keep,
out of the man's house; if the thief be found, let
hief be not found, then the master of the house shall be
o see whether he have put his hand unto his
er of trespass, whether it be for ox, for ass, for
anner of lost thing which another
geth to be his, the cause of both parties shall come before the
e judges shall condemn, he shall pay double unto
eliver unto his neighbour an ass, or an ox, or a
it die, or be hurt, or driven away,
n seeing it: 22:11 Then shall an oath of the LORD be between them
h not put his hand unto his neighbour's goods; and
reof, and he shall not make it good.
:12 And if it be stolen from him, he shall make restitution unto the

t him bring it for witness, and
not make good that which was torn.
4 And if a man borrow ought of his neighbour, and it be hurt, or
reof being not with it, he shall surely make it
reof be with it, he shall not make it good:
s hire.
d that is not betrothed, and lie with
, he shall surely endow her to be his wife.
 give her unto him, he shall pay
cording to the dowry of virgins.
Thou shalt not suffer a witch to live.
22:19 Whosoever lieth with a beast shall surely be put to death.
crificeth unto any god, save unto the LORD only, he
22:21 Thou shalt neither vex a stranger, nor oppress him: for ye were
the land of Egypt.
fflict any widow, or fatherless child.
22:23 If thou afflict them in any wise, and they cry at all unto me, I
hear their cry; 22:24 And my wrath shall wax hot, and I
d; and your wives shall be widows, and your
end money to any of my people that is poor by thee,
usurer, neither shalt thou lay upon him
sury.
ghbour's raiment to pledge, thou
liver it unto him by that the sun goeth down: 22:27 For that
it is his raiment for his skin: wherein shall he
when he crieth unto me, that I will
 for I am gracious.
t revile the gods, nor curse the ruler of thy
 to offer the first of thy ripe fruits, and
ns shalt thou give unto me.
ise shalt thou do with thine oxen, and with thy sheep:
his dam; on the eighth day thou shalt give
 unto me: neither shall ye eat any flesh
that is torn of beasts in the field; ye shall cast it to the dogs.
t not raise a false report: put not thine hand with the
 witness.
multitude to do evil; neither shalt thou
speak in a cause to decline after many to wrest judgment: 23:3 Neither
ountenance a poor man in his cause.
4 If thou meet thine enemy's ox or his ass going astray, thou shalt
 back to him again.
e ass of him that hateth thee lying under his
him, thou shalt surely help with
23:6 Thou shalt not wrest the judgment of thy poor in his cause.
ar from a false matter; and the innocent and righteous
t justify the wicked.
lt take no gift: for the gift blindeth the wise, and
ghteous.
ss a stranger: for ye know the heart of
 stranger, seeing ye were strangers in the land of Egypt.
u shalt sow thy land, and shalt gather in the
 year thou shalt let it rest and
l; that the poor of thy people may eat: and what they leave
 shall eat. In like manner thou shalt deal with
d.
k, and on the seventh day thou
: that thine ox and thine ass may rest, and the son of thy
er, may be refreshed.
things that I have said unto you be circumspect: and
 other gods, neither let it be heard out
of thy mouth.
alt keep a feast unto me in the year.
3:15 Thou shalt keep the feast of unleavened bread: (thou shalt eat
d seven days, as I commanded thee, in the time
it thou camest out from Egypt: and
hall appear before me empty:) 23:16 And the feast of harvest,
y labours, which thou hast sown in the field: and
s in the end of the year, when thou
gathered in thy labours out of the field.
ales shall appear before the

y sacrifice with leavened
shall the fat of my sacrifice remain until the morning.
rstfruits of thy land thou shalt bring into
lt not seethe a kid in his

hee, to keep thee in the way,
g thee into the place which I have prepared.
ice, provoke him not; for he will
don your transgressions: for my name is in him.
ey his voice, and do all that I
en I will be an enemy unto thine enemies, and an adversary

ee, and bring thee in unto the
and the Hittites, and the Perizzites, and the Canaanites,
sites: and I will cut them off.
hou shalt not bow down to their gods, nor serve them, nor do
 thou shalt utterly overthrow them, and quite
 ye shall serve the LORD your God, and he shall bless thy
 I will take sickness away from the midst of
t their young, nor be barren, in thy
: the number of thy days I will fulfil.

d will destroy all the people
u shalt come, and I will make all thine enemies turn their
8 And I will send hornets before thee, which shall drive out the
ite, and the Hittite, from before thee.

re thee in one year; lest the
 desolate, and the beast of the field multiply against
 little I will drive them out from before thee,
t the land.
unds from the Red sea even unto the sea of
o the river: for I will
itants of the land into your hand; and thou shalt
:32 Thou shalt make no covenant with them, nor with their gods.
not dwell in thy land, lest they make thee sin
gods, it will surely be a snare
.
unto the LORD, thou, and Aaron,
d Abihu, and seventy of the elders of Israel; and worship ye
Moses alone shall come near the LORD: but they shall not come
he people go up with him.
s came and told the people all the words of the LORD, and
l the people answered with one voice, and
aid will we do.
l the words of the LORD, and rose up early in
er the hill, and twelve pillars,
g to the twelve tribes of Israel.
And he sent young men of the children of Israel, which offered
 sacrificed peace offerings of oxen unto the LORD.
e blood, and put it in basons; and half
f the blood he sprinkled on the altar.
24:7 And he took the book of the covenant, and read in the audience of
and they said, All that the LORD hath said will we do, and
 Moses took the blood, and sprinkled it on the people, and
f the covenant, which the LORD hath made with
:9 Then went up Moses, and Aaron, Nadab, and Abihu, and seventy of
rael: 24:10 And they saw the God of Israel: and there
 a paved work of a sapphire stone, and as
ss.
ildren of Israel he laid not his
so they saw God, and did eat and drink.

up to me into the mount, and
d I will give thee tables of stone, and a law, and
n; that thou mayest teach them.
nd Moses rose up, and his minister Joshua: and Moses went up

ry ye here for us, until we come
to you: and, behold, Aaron and Hur are with you: if any man
 let him come unto them.
s went up into the mount, and a cloud covered the mount.
he LORD abode upon mount Sinai, and the cloud
day he called unto Moses out of
 of the cloud.
he glory of the LORD was like devouring fire
 the children of Israel.
s went into the midst of the cloud, and gat him up into
 the mount forty days and forty nights.

g, 25:2 Speak unto the
, that they bring me an offering: of every man that
art ye shall take my offering.
 this is the offering which ye shall take of them; gold, and
4 And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine
' skins dyed red, and badgers'
 shittim wood, 25:6 Oil for the light, spices for anointing
nse, 25:7 Onyx stones, and stones to be set in

hat I may dwell among them.
ing to all that I shew thee, after the pattern of the
f all the instruments thereof, even so
all ye make it.
ke an ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a
 cubit and a half the breadth
d a cubit and a half the height thereof.

e gold, within and without
rlay it, and shalt make upon it a crown of gold round
t cast four rings of gold for it, and put them in
 rings shall be in the one side of
d two rings in the other side of it.
:13 And thou shalt make staves of shittim wood, and overlay them
4 And thou shalt put the staves into the rings by the sides of the
k may be borne with them.
ves shall be in the rings of the ark: they shall not be
 thou shalt put into the ark the testimony which I shall give
ou shalt make a mercy seat of pure gold: two cubits and a
thereof, and a cubit and a half the breadth
wo cherubims of gold, of beaten work shalt
ercy seat.
 the one end, and the other cherub on the
e make the cherubims on the
eof.
tch forth their wings on high,
he mercy seat with their wings, and their faces shall look
he mercy seat shall the faces of the cherubims
mercy seat above upon the ark; and in the
hall give thee.
meet with thee, and I will commune with thee
n the two cherubims which are
k of the testimony, of all things which I will give thee in
ildren of Israel.
 make a table of shittim wood: two cubits shall
the breadth thereof, and a cubit
lf the height thereof.
halt overlay it with pure gold, and make thereto a
:25 And thou shalt make unto it a border of an hand breadth round
halt make a golden crown to the border thereof round
 make for it four rings of gold, and put the rings
the four feet thereof.
st the border shall the rings be for places of the
28 And thou shalt make the staves of shittim wood, and overlay them
 the table may be borne with them.
9 And thou shalt make the dishes thereof, and spoons thereof, and
nd bowls thereof, to cover withal: of pure gold shalt
thou shalt set upon the table shewbread before me alway.
e a candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work
ft, and his branches, his bowls,
s, and his flowers, shall be of the same.
f the sides of it; three
candlestick out of the one side, and three branches of
ther side: 25:33 Three bowls made like
to almonds, with a knop and a flower in one branch; and three bowls
ds in the other branch, with a knop and a flower: so in
out of the candlestick.
e candlesticks shall be four bowls made like unto
ir flowers.
knop under two branches of the same, and a
 a knop under two branches of
ccording to the six branches that proceed out of the
ops and their branches shall be of the same: all it
e gold.
even lamps thereof: and they shall
the lamps thereof, that they may give light over against it.
thereof, and the snuffdishes thereof, shall be of
f pure gold shall he make it, with all these
ake them after their pattern, which was
hewed thee in the mount.
thou shalt make the tabernacle with ten curtains of fine
d purple, and scarlet: with cherubims of
cunning work shalt thou make them.
 The length of one curtain shall be eight and twenty cubits, and
 curtain four cubits: and every one of the curtains
 The five curtains shall be coupled together one to another; and
s shall be coupled one to another.
 And thou shalt make loops of blue upon the edge of the one
ge in the coupling; and likewise shalt thou
urtain, in the coupling of the

ne curtain, and fifty loops
ke in the edge of the curtain that is in the coupling of
 may take hold one of another.
 thou shalt make fifty taches of gold, and couple the curtains
ches: and it shall be one tabernacle.
6:7 And thou shalt make curtains of goats' hair to be a covering upon
e: eleven curtains shalt thou make.
8 The length of one curtain shall be thirty cubits, and the breadth
four cubits: and the eleven curtains shall be all of
shalt couple five curtains by themselves, and six
 double the sixth curtain in the
t of the tabernacle.
lt make fifty loops on the edge of the one curtain
 and fifty loops in the edge of the
in which coupleth the second.
 thou shalt make fifty taches of brass, and put the taches
le the tent together, that it may be one.
 the curtains of the tent, the
in that remaineth, shall hang over the backside of the
ubit on the one side, and a cubit on the other side of
length of the curtains of the tent, it
all hang over the sides of the tabernacle on this side and on that
t.
 for the tent of rams' skins dyed
d a covering above of badgers' skins.
6:15 And thou shalt make boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood
26:16 Ten cubits shall be the length of a board, and a cubit and a
e breadth of one board.
s shall there be in one board, set in order one against
ke for all the boards of the tabernacle.

 the tabernacle, twenty boards
th side southward.
 make forty sockets of silver under the twenty
for his two tenons, and two
 another board for his two tenons.
0 And for the second side of the tabernacle on the north side
 boards: 26:21 And their forty sockets of silver;
two sockets under another board.
And for the sides of the tabernacle westward thou shalt make six
nd two boards shalt thou make for the corners of the tabernacle

 beneath, and they shall be
her above the head of it unto one ring: thus shall it be
be for the two corners.
shall be eight boards, and their sockets of silver,
der one board, and two sockets under
her board.
rs of shittim wood; five for the boards of
d five bars for the boards of
ide of the tabernacle, and five bars for the boards of the
for the two sides westward.
he middle bar in the midst of the boards shall reach from
thou shalt overlay the boards with gold, and make their
r the bars: and thou shalt overlay the bars
 up the tabernacle according to the fashion
unt.
f blue, and purple, and scarlet, and
 twined linen of cunning work: with cherubims shall it be made:
t hang it upon four pillars of shittim wood
e of gold, upon the four
r.
l under the taches, that thou
g in thither within the vail the ark of the testimony: and
to you between the holy place and the most
rcy seat upon the ark of the testimony
 the most holy place.
alt set the table without the vail, and the
he side of the tabernacle
h: and thou shalt put the table on the north side.
anging for the door of the tent, of
 and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen, wrought with
And thou shalt make for the hanging five pillars of shittim
with gold, and their hooks shall be of gold:
ass for them.
an altar of shittim wood, five cubits long,
be foursquare: and the height
ll be three cubits.
 make the horns of it upon the four corners
: and thou shalt overlay it

eive his ashes, and his
basons, and his fleshhooks, and his firepans: all the
ke of brass.
or it a grate of network of brass; and upon
gs in the four corners thereof.
d thou shalt put it under the compass of the altar beneath,
n to the midst of the altar.
hou shalt make staves for the altar, staves of shittim wood,
brass.
 into the rings, and the staves shall
upon the two sides of the altar, to bear it.
ake it: as it was shewed thee in
t, so shall they make it.
 shalt make the court of the tabernacle: for the south
e hangings for the court of fine twined
inen of an hundred cubits long for one side: 27:10 And the twenty
nd their twenty sockets shall be of brass; the hooks
ts shall be of silver.
se for the north side in length there shall be
and his twenty pillars and their
ockets of brass; the hooks of the pillars and their fillets of
 for the breadth of the court on the west side shall be
heir pillars ten, and their sockets ten.

e east side eastward shall be
s.
e gate shall be fifteen cubits:
lars three, and their sockets three.
:15 And on the other side shall be hangings fifteen cubits: their
d their sockets three.
e gate of the court shall be an hanging of twenty
scarlet, and fine twined linen,
ith needlework: and their pillars shall be four, and their
ll the pillars round about the court shall be filleted with
ll be of silver, and their sockets of brass.
be an hundred cubits, and the
ty every where, and the height five cubits of fine twined
of brass.
tabernacle in all the service thereof,
d all the pins thereof, and all the pins of the court, shall be of
And thou shalt command the children of Israel, that they bring
beaten for the light, to cause the lamp to burn
of the congregation without the vail, which is
sons shall order it from evening
ng before the LORD: it shall be a statute for ever unto their
half of the children of Israel.
d take thou unto thee Aaron thy brother, and his sons with him,
dren of Israel, that he may minister unto me in the
dab and Abihu, Eleazar and Ithamar,
's sons.
garments for Aaron thy brother for glory
and for beauty.
ak unto all that are wise hearted, whom I have
at they may make Aaron's garments
ecrate him, that he may minister unto me in the priest's
are the garments which they shall make; a breastplate,
d a broidered coat, a mitre, and a girdle:
ron thy brother, and his sons,
y minister unto me in the priest's office.
e, and purple, and scarlet, and
n.
f gold, of blue, and of purple, of
t, and fine twined linen, with cunning work.
ieces thereof joined at the two
reof; and so it shall be joined together.
d, which is upon it, shall be
, according to the work thereof; even of gold, of blue, and
d fine twined linen.
t take two onyx stones, and grave on them the names
0 Six of their names on one stone, and
e other six names of the rest on the other stone, according to their
1 With the work of an engraver in stone, like the engravings of a
u engrave the two stones with the names of the
them to be set in ouches of gold.
 And thou shalt put the two stones upon the shoulders of the
morial unto the children of Israel: and Aaron
D upon his two shoulders for a

d; 28:14 And two chains of pure
he ends; of wreathen work shalt thou make them, and fasten
he ouches.
e breastplate of judgment with cunning
rk; after the work of the ephod thou shalt make it; of gold, of
, and of scarlet, and of fine twined linen, shalt
 it shall be being doubled; a span shall be the length
 the breadth thereof.
alt set in it settings of stones, even four rows of
a sardius, a topaz, and a carbuncle:
 shall be the first row.
second row shall be an emerald, a sapphire, and a
ow a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst.

onyx, and a jasper: they
gold in their inclosings.
 stones shall be with the names of the children of
ir names, like the engravings of a
; every one with his name shall they be according to the twelve
d thou shalt make upon the breastplate chains at the ends of
gold.
e breastplate two rings of gold, and
t put the two rings on the two ends of the breastplate.
the two wreathen chains of gold in the two
tplate.
 the two wreathen chains thou shalt
n in the two ouches, and put them on the shoulderpieces of the
28:26 And thou shalt make two rings of gold, and thou shalt put them
nds of the breastplate in the border thereof, which is
ard.
thou shalt make, and shalt put them
e two sides of the ephod underneath, toward the forepart thereof,
other coupling thereof, above the curious girdle of
all bind the breastplate by the rings thereof unto
ce of blue, that it may be above the
ous girdle of the ephod, and that the breastplate be not loosed
28:29 And Aaron shall bear the names of the children of Israel in the
f judgment upon his heart, when he goeth in unto the holy
ore the LORD continually.
u shalt put in the breastplate of judgment the Urim and
 be upon Aaron's heart, when he goeth in
before the LORD: and Aaron shall bear the judgment of the children of
is heart before the LORD continually.
8:31 And thou shalt make the robe of the ephod all of blue.
 be an hole in the top of it, in the midst
n work round about the hole of
were the hole of an habergeon, that it be not rent.
m of it thou shalt make pomegranates of
lue, and of purple, and of scarlet, round about the hem thereof; and
between them round about: 28:34 A golden bell and a
a pomegranate, upon the hem of the robe
ound about.
Aaron to minister: and his sound shall be
e before the LORD, and when
, that he die not.
 make a plate of pure gold, and grave upon it,
INESS TO THE LORD.
 put it on a blue lace, that it may be upon the
tre it shall be.
upon Aaron's forehead, that Aaron may bear the
he children of Israel shall hallow
 their holy gifts; and it shall be always upon his forehead,
ted before the LORD.
lt embroider the coat of fine linen, and thou shalt
nd thou shalt make the girdle of
rk.
lt make coats, and thou shalt make
em girdles, and bonnets shalt thou make for them, for glory and
1 And thou shalt put them upon Aaron thy brother, and his sons
anoint them, and consecrate them, and sanctify
 in the priest's office.
 shalt make them linen breeches to cover their
the thighs they shall reach: 28:43
ey shall be upon Aaron, and upon his sons, when they come in
 the congregation, or when they come near unto
ace; that they bear not iniquity,
: it shall be a statute for ever unto him and his seed after
is the thing that thou shalt do unto them to hallow
e priest's office: Take one young
, and two rams without blemish, 29:2 And unleavened bread, and
pered with oil, and wafers unleavened anointed
u make them.
em into one basket, and bring them in the
.
t bring unto the door of the
f the congregation, and shalt wash them with water.
garments, and put upon Aaron the coat,
d the robe of the ephod, and the ephod, and the breastplate, and
curious girdle of the ephod: 29:6 And thou shalt put
ut the holy crown upon the mitre.
Then shalt thou take the anointing oil, and pour it upon his

 put coats upon them.
lt gird them with girdles, Aaron and his sons, and
 priest's office shall be theirs for a
rpetual statute: and thou shalt consecrate Aaron and his sons.
lt cause a bullock to be brought before the
on and his sons shall put their
n the head of the bullock.
ou shalt kill the bullock before the LORD, by the door of
gregation.
 the blood of the bullock, and put it upon
and pour all the blood beside
of the altar.
 all the fat that covereth the inwards, and
he two kidneys, and the fat
them, and burn them upon the altar.
14 But the flesh of the bullock, and his skin, and his dung, shalt
ire without the camp: it is a sin offering.
nd Aaron and his sons shall put
ds upon the head of the ram.
thou shalt slay the ram, and thou shalt take his blood, and
 upon the altar.
ut the ram in pieces, and wash the inwards of
his pieces, and unto his head.
d thou shalt burn the whole ram upon the altar: it is a burnt
D: it is a sweet savour, an offering made by fire
shalt take the other ram; and Aaron and his sons shall
d of the ram.
l the ram, and take of his blood, and put it
, and upon the tip of the right
s sons, and upon the thumb of their right hand, and upon the
ht foot, and sprinkle the blood upon the altar
 take of the blood that is upon the altar, and of
t upon Aaron, and upon his garments,
upon his sons, and upon the garments of his sons with him: and he
, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons'
ou shalt take of the ram the fat and the rump, and the
s, and the caul above the liver, and the
two kidneys, and the fat that is upon them, and the right shoulder;
 of consecration: 29:23 And one loaf of bread, and one
 wafer out of the basket of the unleavened
 thou shalt put all in the
, and in the hands of his sons; and shalt wave them for
LORD.
 of their hands, and burn them upon
ltar for a burnt offering, for a sweet savour before the LORD: it
de by fire unto the LORD.
u shalt take the breast of the ram of Aaron's
offering before the LORD: and it
 thy part.
y the breast of the wave offering, and the
 waved, and which is heaved
m of the consecration, even of that which is for Aaron,
s sons: 29:28 And it shall be Aaron's and
children of Israel: for it is
fering: and it shall be an heave offering from the children
ice of their peace offerings, even their heave
 the holy garments of Aaron shall be his sons' after him, to
nd to be consecrated in them.
 that son that is priest in his stead shall put them on seven
into the tabernacle of the congregation to
 thou shalt take the ram of the consecration, and seethe his
e.
at the flesh of the ram, and the
at is in the basket by the door of the tabernacle of the
 they shall eat those things wherewith the atonement was
 sanctify them: but a stranger shall not eat
34 And if ought of the flesh of the consecrations, or of the bread,
 morning, then thou shalt burn the remainder with fire:
use it is holy.
ou do unto Aaron, and to his sons, according to
hee: seven days shalt thou
m.
 a bullock for a sin offering for
nt: and thou shalt cleanse the altar, when thou hast made an
thou shalt anoint it, to sanctify it.
9:37 Seven days thou shalt make an atonement for the altar, and
 shall be an altar most holy: whatsoever toucheth
 Now this is that which thou shalt offer upon the altar; two
r day by day continually.
 lamb thou shalt offer in the morning; and the other lamb
 29:40 And with the one lamb a tenth deal of
an hin of beaten oil; and the
 of an hin of wine for a drink offering.

r at even, and shalt do
 to the meat offering of the morning, and according
for a sweet savour, an offering made by
ire unto the LORD.
a continual burnt offering throughout your
e of the congregation before
ere I will meet you, to speak there unto thee.
he children of Israel, and the
 shall be sanctified by my glory.
 And I will sanctify the tabernacle of the congregation, and the
tify also both Aaron and his sons, to minister to me
45 And I will dwell among the children of Israel, and will be their
nd they shall know that I am the LORD their God, that brought
 land of Egypt, that I may dwell among them: I am
hou shalt make an altar to burn incense upon: of shittim

, and a cubit the breadth
uare shall it be: and two cubits shall be the height
ll be of the same.
overlay it with pure gold, the top thereof, and
the horns thereof; and thou shalt
to it a crown of gold round about.
 And two golden rings shalt thou make to it under the crown of it,
rs thereof, upon the two sides of it shalt thou make
es for the staves to bear it withal.
:5 And thou shalt make the staves of shittim wood, and overlay them
0:6 And thou shalt put it before the vail that is by the ark of the
re the mercy seat that is over the testimony, where I
And Aaron shall burn thereon sweet incense every morning: when he
s, he shall burn incense upon it.
And when Aaron lighteth the lamps at even, he shall burn incense
al incense before the LORD throughout your
trange incense thereon, nor burnt sacrifice,
ur drink offering thereon.
ron shall make an atonement upon the horns of it once in a
he sin offering of atonements: once in the
oughout your generations: it
 unto the LORD.
e unto Moses, saying, 30:12 When thou takest
r their number, then shall they
y man a ransom for his soul unto the LORD, when thou
no plague among them, when thou
 them.
y one that passeth among them that are
mbered, half a shekel after the shekel of the sanctuary: (a shekel
:) an half shekel shall be the offering of the LORD.
 among them that are numbered, from twenty
ing unto the LORD.
 not give more, and the poor shall not give less
 an offering unto the LORD, to make
onement for your souls.
shalt take the atonement money of the children of
the service of the tabernacle of the
regation; that it may be a memorial unto the children of Israel
 make an atonement for your souls.
7 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 30:18 Thou shalt also
s, and his foot also of brass, to wash withal: and
bernacle of the congregation and the
r, and thou shalt put water therein.
:19 For Aaron and his sons shall wash their hands and their feet
n they go into the tabernacle of the congregation,
 they die not; or when they come near
the altar to minister, to burn offering made by fire unto the LORD:
hall wash their hands and their feet, that they die
for ever to them, even to him and to
seed throughout their generations.
2 Moreover the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 30:23 Take thou also
pal spices, of pure myrrh five hundred shekels, and of
 even two hundred and fifty shekels, and
of sweet calamus two hundred and fifty shekels, 30:24 And of cassia
ekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary, and of oil
halt make it an oil of holy ointment, an
ointment compound after the art of the apothecary: it shall be an holy
l.
rnacle of the congregation
 the ark of the testimony, 30:27 And the table and all
tick and his vessels, and the altar of
cense, 30:28 And the altar of burnt offering with all his vessels,
d his foot.
fy them, that they may be most holy:
soever toucheth them shall be holy.
30 And thou shalt anoint Aaron and his sons, and consecrate them,
ister unto me in the priest's office.
0:31 And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying, This
y anointing oil unto me throughout your generations.
 it not be poured, neither shall ye make
any other like it, after the composition of it: it is holy, and it
to you.
 like it, or whosoever putteth any of
upon a stranger, shall even be cut off from his people.
nto Moses, Take unto thee sweet spices,
tacte, and onycha, and galbanum; these sweet spices with pure
 shall there be a like weight: 30:35 And thou
 after the art of the apothecary,
d together, pure and holy: 30:36 And thou shalt beat some of it
 of it before the testimony in the tabernacle of
t with thee: it shall be unto you
ly.
thou shalt make, ye shall not make
rselves according to the composition thereof: it shall be unto
RD.
o that, to smell thereto, shall
ut off from his people.
RD spake unto Moses, saying, 31:2 See, I have called by
i, the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah:
t of God, in wisdom, and in
, and in knowledge, and in all manner of workmanship,
 to work in gold, and in silver, and in
rass, 31:5 And in cutting of stones, to set them, and in carving of
 in all manner of workmanship.
 I, behold, I have given with him Aholiab, the son of
n: and in the hearts of all that are wise
make all that I have
 The tabernacle of the congregation, and the ark
at that is thereupon, and all the
re of the tabernacle, 31:8 And the table and his furniture, and
k with all his furniture, and the altar of incense,
ering with all his furniture, and the
er and his foot, 31:10 And the cloths of service, and the holy
he priest, and the garments of his sons, to
And the anointing oil, and
for the holy place: according to all that I have
1:12 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 31:13 Speak thou also
 of Israel, saying, Verily my sabbaths ye shall keep:
nd you throughout your generations; that
ye may know that I am the LORD that doth sanctify you.
bbath therefore; for it is holy unto you:
e put to death: for whosoever
ork therein, that soul shall be cut off from among his
y work be done; but in the seventh is the sabbath of
ver doeth any work in the sabbath day,
 shall surely be put to death.
erefore the children of Israel shall keep the sabbath, to
ghout their generations, for a perpetual
covenant.
 and the children of Israel for ever: for
h, and on the seventh day he
was refreshed.
oses, when he had made an end of communing
 testimony, tables of stone,
 the finger of God.
eople saw that Moses delayed to come down out of
mselves together unto Aaron, and
o him, Up, make us gods, which shall go before us; for as for
hat brought us up out of the land of Egypt, we
:2 And Aaron said unto them, Break off the golden earrings, which
f your wives, of your sons, and of your daughters,
And all the people brake off the golden earrings which were in
ght them unto Aaron.
ed them at their hand, and fashioned it with a
 molten calf: and they said, These
 gods, O Israel, which brought thee up out of the land of Egypt.
ron saw it, he built an altar before it; and Aaron
morrow is a feast to the LORD.
 they rose up early on the morrow, and offered burnt
fferings; and the people sat down to eat
and to drink, and rose up to play.
 And the LORD said unto Moses, Go, get thee down; for thy people,
test out of the land of Egypt, have corrupted
de quickly out of the way which I
ed them: they have made them a molten calf, and have worshipped
iced thereunto, and said, These be thy gods, O
ut of the land of Egypt.
ORD said unto Moses, I have seen this people, and,
le: 32:10 Now therefore let me alone,
t my wrath may wax hot against them, and that I may consume them:
f thee a great nation.
besought the LORD his God, and said, LORD, why doth
eople, which thou hast brought forth
of the land of Egypt with great power, and with a mighty hand?
ld the Egyptians speak, and say, For mischief did
n the mountains, and to consume them
 the face of the earth? Turn from thy fierce wrath, and repent of
 thy people.
aac, and Israel, thy servants, to whom thou
nto them, I will multiply your
e stars of heaven, and all this land that I have spoken of
ed, and they shall inherit it for ever.

hich he thought to do unto

m the mount, and the two
stimony were in his hand: the tables were written on
ide and on the other were they written.

, and the writing was the
 graven upon the tables.
 Joshua heard the noise of the people as they shouted,
 a noise of war in the camp.
he said, It is not the voice of them that shout for mastery,
e of them that cry for being overcome: but the

 came nigh unto the camp, that
 calf, and the dancing: and Moses' anger waxed hot, and he
is hands, and brake them beneath the mount.
 had made, and burnt it in the
ground it to powder, and strawed it upon the water, and made
 drink of it.
 Aaron, What did this people unto thee, that
them?  32:22 And Aaron said, Let
anger of my lord wax hot: thou knowest the people, that they

s, which shall go before us:
his Moses, the man that brought us up out of the land of
become of him.
em, Whosoever hath any gold, let them break it
 it into the fire, and there came
s calf.
he people were naked; (for Aaron had
 them naked unto their shame among their enemies:) 32:26 Then
te of the camp, and said, Who is on the LORD's
the sons of Levi gathered
ther unto him.
hem, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Put
 in and out from gate to gate
the camp, and slay every man his brother, and every man his
n his neighbour.
 of Levi did according to the word of Moses: and
about three thousand men.
es had said, Consecrate yourselves today to the LORD,
and upon his brother; that he may bestow
upon you a blessing this day.
 it came to pass on the morrow, that Moses said unto the
reat sin: and now I will go up unto the
ORD; peradventure I shall make an atonement for your sin.
d unto the LORD, and said, Oh, this people have
hem gods of gold.
u wilt forgive their sin--; and if not, blot me,
 thou hast written.
said unto Moses, Whosoever hath sinned against me,

 unto the place of which I have
to thee: behold, mine Angel shall go before thee:
sit I will visit their sin upon them.
2:35 And the LORD plagued the people, because they made the calf,

art, and go up hence, thou and
 which thou hast brought up out of the land of Egypt, unto
nto Abraham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, saying,
 I will send an angel before
will drive out the Canaanite, the Amorite, and the
Hivite, and the Jebusite: 33:3 Unto a
d flowing with milk and honey: for I will not go up in the midst of
art a stiffnecked people: lest I consume thee in the
le heard these evil tidings, they mourned: and

 Say unto the children of
a stiffnecked people: I will come up into the midst of
e thee: therefore now put off thy
ts from thee, that I may know what to do unto thee.
el stripped themselves of their ornaments
k the tabernacle, and pitched it without the camp,
ed it the Tabernacle of the
 And it came to pass, that every one which sought the
acle of the congregation, which was
ut the camp.
when Moses went out unto the tabernacle,
that all the people rose up, and stood every man at his tent door, and
 Moses, until he was gone into the tabernacle.
 entered into the tabernacle, the
pillar descended, and stood at the door of the tabernacle, and
 Moses.
e cloudy pillar stand at the tabernacle
oor: and all the people rose up and worshipped, every man in his tent
1 And the LORD spake unto Moses face to face, as a man speaketh
d he turned again into the camp: but his servant
n, departed not out of the

thou sayest unto me, Bring up
: and thou hast not let me know whom thou wilt send with
know thee by name, and thou hast also found
re, I pray thee, if I have found grace in thy sight,
y know thee, that I may find grace in
 sight: and consider that this nation is thy people.
ce shall go with thee, and I will give
ee rest.
 thy presence go not with me, carry us
t up hence.
be known here that I and thy people have
found grace in thy sight? is it not in that thou goest with us? so
rated, I and thy people, from all the people that are

ll do this thing also that
en: for thou hast found grace in my sight, and I know
 said, I beseech thee, shew me thy glory.
oodness pass before thee, and I
laim the name of the LORD before thee; and will be gracious
ous, and will shew mercy on whom I will shew
t not see my face: for there shall no man
aid, Behold, there is a place by me, and thou
 shall come to pass, while my
th by, that I will put thee in a clift of the rock, and
d while I pass by: 33:23 And I will take
away mine hand, and thou shalt see my back parts: but my face shall

ee two tables of stone like
t: and I will write upon these tables the words that were
h thou brakest.
e morning, and come up in the morning unto
o me in the top of the mount.
no man shall come up with thee, neither let any man be seen
t; neither let the flocks nor herds feed before
o tables of stone like unto the first; and Moses
went up unto mount Sinai, as the
 commanded him, and took in his hand the two tables of stone.
escended in the cloud, and stood with him there,
D.
im, and proclaimed, The LORD, The
d, merciful and gracious, longsuffering, and abundant in
eeping mercy for thousands, forgiving
quity and transgression and sin, and that will by no means clear
ng the iniquity of the fathers upon the children,
 unto the third and to the fourth
ion.
ed his head toward the earth, and
ped.
und grace in thy sight, O LORD, let
RD, I pray thee, go among us; for it is a stiffnecked people; and
ty and our sin, and take us for thine inheritance.
ake a covenant: before all thy people I
ill do marvels, such as have not been done in all the earth, nor in
 all the people among which thou art shall see the work
rrible thing that I will do with thee.
34:11 Observe thou that which I command thee this day: behold, I drive
hee the Amorite, and the Canaanite, and the Hittite, and
ite, and the Jebusite.
to thyself, lest thou make a covenant with the
 goest, lest it be for a snare in
st of thee: 34:13 But ye shall destroy their altars, break
wn their groves: 34:14 For thou shalt worship
e is Jealous, is a jealous God:
t thou make a covenant with the inhabitants of the land, and
r their gods, and do sacrifice unto their gods,
his sacrifice; 34:16 And thou take
ir daughters unto thy sons, and their daughters go a whoring
make thy sons go a whoring after their gods.
 gods.
ead shalt thou keep. Seven days thou
t eat unleavened bread, as I commanded thee, in the time of the
the month Abib thou camest out from Egypt.
ine; and every firstling among
, whether ox or sheep, that is male.
:20 But the firstling of an ass thou shalt redeem with a lamb: and
im not, then shalt thou break his neck. All the
deem. And none shall appear before
ty.
 on the seventh day thou shalt
aring time and in harvest thou shalt rest.
 of weeks, of the firstfruits of
rvest, and the feast of ingathering at the year's end.
hall all your menchildren appear before the
or I will cast out the nations before thee, and enlarge thy
any man desire thy land, when thou shalt go up
rice in the year.
offer the blood of my sacrifice with leaven;
st of the passover be left unto
ng.
of thy land thou shalt bring unto
se of the LORD thy God. Thou shalt not seethe a kid in his
And the LORD said unto Moses, Write thou these words: for after
words I have made a covenant with thee and with
ith the LORD forty days and forty nights; he
. And he wrote upon the tables
of the covenant, the ten commandments.
34:29 And it came to pass, when Moses came down from mount Sinai with
s of testimony in Moses' hand, when he came down from the
t that the skin of his face shone while he
 and all the children of Israel saw Moses, behold,
they were afraid to come nigh him.
1 And Moses called unto them; and Aaron and all the rulers of the
rned unto him: and Moses talked with them.
f Israel came nigh: and he gave
ommandment all that the LORD had spoken with him in mount
Moses had done speaking with them, he put a vail on his
es went in before the LORD to speak with him, he
ut. And he came out, and spake unto
hildren of Israel that which he was commanded.
aw the face of Moses, that the skin
ses' face shone: and Moses put the vail upon his face again,
eak with him.
ll the congregation of the children of Israel
re the words which the LORD hath
d, that ye should do them.
s shall work be done, but on the seventh day there shall
abbath of rest to the LORD: whosoever doeth
35:3 Ye shall kindle no fire throughout your habitations upon the
5:4 And Moses spake unto all the congregation of the children of
is is the thing which the LORD commanded, saying,
fering unto the LORD: whosoever is of
illing heart, let him bring it, an offering of the LORD; gold, and
s, 35:6 And blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine
d rams' skins dyed red, and badgers'
s, and shittim wood, 35:8 And oil for the light, and spices for
for the sweet incense, 35:9 And onyx stones, and
d for the breastplate.
wise hearted among you shall come, and make all that
 The tabernacle, his tent, and his
ng, his taches, and his boards, his bars, his pillars, and his
rk, and the staves thereof, with the mercy seat,
3 The table, and his staves, and all
vessels, and the shewbread, 35:14 The candlestick also for the
ture, and his lamps, with the oil for the light,
is staves, and the anointing oil,
 sweet incense, and the hanging for the door at the entering in
35:16 The altar of burnt offering, with his brasen
essels, the laver and his foot, 35:17
 hangings of the court, his pillars, and their sockets, and the
r of the court, 35:18 The pins of the tabernacle,
eir cords, 35:19 The cloths of
o do service in the holy place, the holy garments for Aaron
ments of his sons, to minister in the priest's
ation of the children of Israel departed from
hey came, every one whose heart stirred him up, and every
willing, and they brought the LORD's offering
congregation, and for all his
d for the holy garments.
 came, both men and women, as many as were willing
and earrings, and rings, and tablets,
 jewels of gold: and every man that offered offered an offering of
RD.
found blue, and purple, and
fine linen, and goats' hair, and red skins of rams, and
m.
fering of silver and brass brought
RD's offering: and every man, with whom was found shittim wood
service, brought it.
women that were wise hearted did spin with their
 had spun, both of blue, and of
nd of scarlet, and of fine linen.
 And all the women whose heart stirred them up in wisdom spun
 And the rulers brought onyx stones, and stones to be set, for
he breastplate; 35:28 And spice, and oil for the
and for the sweet incense.
ildren of Israel brought a willing offering unto the LORD,
se heart made them willing to bring for all
anded to be made by the hand of

 Israel, See, the LORD hath
e Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son of Hur, of the tribe
 filled him with the spirit of God, in
sdom, in understanding, and in knowledge, and in all manner of
nd to devise curious works, to work in gold, and
 in the cutting of stones, to set
nd in carving of wood, to make any manner of cunning work.
in his heart that he may teach, both he, and
tribe of Dan.
 with wisdom of heart, to work all manner of
ing workman, and of the
lue, and in purple, in scarlet, and in fine linen,
that do any work, and of those that
e cunning work.
eel and Aholiab, and every wise hearted man, in
tanding to know how to work all
 work for the service of the sanctuary, according to all that
d.
holiab, and every wise hearted
ose heart the LORD had put wisdom, even every one whose
e unto the work to do it: 36:3 And they
eceived of Moses all the offering, which the children of Israel had
 work of the service of the sanctuary, to make it
 him free offerings every morning.
 And all the wise men, that wrought all the work of the sanctuary,
rom his work which they made; 36:5 And they spake unto
ing much more than enough for the service
make.
and they caused it to be proclaimed
ghout the camp, saying, Let neither man nor woman make any more
ng of the sanctuary. So the people were restrained
tuff they had was sufficient for all the work to make
 every wise hearted man among them that wrought the work of
 curtains of fine twined linen, and blue, and
f cunning work made he them.
ength of one curtain was twenty and eight cubits, and the
ur cubits: the curtains were all of one size.
ins one unto another: and the other
curtains he coupled one unto another.
6:11 And he made loops of blue on the edge of one curtain from the
coupling: likewise he made in the uttermost side of
g of the second.
 he in one curtain, and fifty loops made he in
 the coupling of the second: the
ld one curtain to another.
 made fifty taches of gold, and coupled the curtains one
es: so it became one tabernacle.
And he made curtains of goats' hair for the tent over the
ns he made them.
e curtain was thirty cubits, and four cubits was
even curtains were of one size.
nd he coupled five curtains by themselves, and six curtains by
 And he made fifty loops upon the uttermost edge of the curtain
d fifty loops made he upon the edge of the curtain
:18 And he made fifty taches of brass to couple the tent together,
 one.
the tent of rams' skins dyed red, and
overing of badgers' skins above that.
6:20 And he made boards for the tabernacle of shittim wood, standing
he length of a board was ten cubits, and the breadth of a board
f.
lly distant one from another: thus
 make for all the boards of the tabernacle.
rnacle; twenty boards for the
southward: 36:24 And forty sockets of silver he made under
ockets under one board for his two tenons, and
his two tenons.
 side of the tabernacle, which is toward the
6:26 And their forty sockets of
wo sockets under one board, and two sockets under another
he sides of the tabernacle westward he made six boards.
 he for the corners of the tabernacle in the
led beneath, and coupled together at the head
both of them in both the corners.
 And there were eight boards; and their sockets were sixteen
er every board two sockets.
e made bars of shittim wood; five for the boards of the one
 36:32 And five bars for the boards of the
ars for the boards of the
the sides westward.
he middle bar to shoot through the boards from the
nd he overlaid the boards with gold, and made their rings of
the bars, and overlaid the bars with gold.
purple, and scarlet, and fine
n: with cherubims made he it of cunning work.
llars of shittim wood, and overlaid
with gold: their hooks were of gold; and he cast for them four

ernacle door of blue, and
rlet, and fine twined linen, of needlework; 36:38 And
heir hooks: and he overlaid their
rs and their fillets with gold: but their five sockets were of
ezaleel made the ark of shittim wood: two cubits and a half
nd a cubit and a half the breadth of it, and a
7:2 And he overlaid it with pure
hin and without, and made a crown of gold to it round about.
 it four rings of gold, to be set by the four
e one side of it, and two rings
other side of it.
es of shittim wood, and overlaid them with gold.
the rings by the sides of the ark, to
r the ark.
eat of pure gold: two cubits and a half
as the length thereof, and one cubit and a half the breadth thereof.
made two cherubims of gold, beaten out of one piece made
f the mercy seat; 37:8 One cherub on the end
e other end on that side: out of
y seat made he the cherubims on the two ends thereof.
ad out their wings on high, and covered
ith their wings over the mercy seat, with their faces one to another;
ercy seatward were the faces of the cherubims.
ttim wood: two cubits was the length
eof, and a cubit the breadth thereof, and a cubit and a half the
:11 And he overlaid it with pure gold, and made
ut.
er of an handbreadth round about;
e a crown of gold for the border thereof round about.
ur rings of gold, and put the rings upon
the four corners that were in the four feet thereof.
r were the rings, the places for the
es to bear the table.
 the staves of shittim wood, and overlaid them with
16 And he made the vessels which were upon the table, his dishes,
nd his bowls, and his covers to cover withal, of pure
e candlestick of pure gold: of beaten work made he
his branch, his bowls, his knops, and
 flowers, were of the same: 37:18 And six branches going out of the
three branches of the candlestick out of the one side
f the candlestick out of the other side
hereof: 37:19 Three bowls made after the fashion of almonds in one
nd a flower; and three bowls made like almonds in
er: so throughout the six branches
out of the candlestick.
e candlestick were four bowls made like almonds, his
And a knop under two branches of the
, and a knop under two branches of the same, and a knop under two
ame, according to the six branches going out of it.
ranches were of the same: all of it was
ne beaten work of pure gold.
he made his seven lamps, and his snuffers, and his
:24 Of a talent of pure gold made he it, and all the vessels
he made the incense altar of shittim wood: the length of it
eadth of it a cubit; it was foursquare; and two
rns thereof were of the same.
 he overlaid it with pure gold, both the top of it, and the
ut, and the horns of it: also he made unto it a
 And he made two rings of gold for it under the crown thereof, by
f it, upon the two sides thereof, to be places for

ood, and overlaid them with
9 And he made the holy anointing oil, and the pure incense of
ng to the work of the apothecary.
And he made the altar of burnt offering of shittim wood: five
 thereof, and five cubits the breadth thereof; it
the height thereof.
e horns thereof on the four corners of it; the
he overlaid it with brass.
made all the vessels of the altar, the pots, and the
he fleshhooks, and the firepans: all the
vessels thereof made he of brass.
And he made for the altar a brasen grate of network under the
th unto the midst of it.
st four rings for the four ends of the grate of brass,

 wood, and overlaid them with
8:7 And he put the staves into the rings on the sides of the altar,
al; he made the altar hollow with boards.
d the foot of it of brass, of
glasses of the women assembling, which assembled at the
he congregation.
ourt: on the south side southward the hangings
en, an hundred cubits: 38:10 Their
s were twenty, and their brasen sockets twenty; the hooks of the
fillets were of silver.
he north side the hangings were an hundred cubits,
heir sockets of brass twenty; the
f the pillars and their fillets of silver.
ngs of fifty cubits, their
nd their sockets ten; the hooks of the pillars and their
3 And for the east side eastward fifty cubits.
 of the gate were fifteen cubits;
illars three, and their sockets three.
38:15 And for the other side of the court gate, on this hand and that
ngings of fifteen cubits; their pillars three, and their
l the hangings of the court round about were of fine twined
 sockets for the pillars were of brass; the hooks of the
of silver; and the overlaying of their
apiters of silver; and all the pillars of the court were filleted
8:18 And the hanging for the gate of the court was needlework, of
 and scarlet, and fine twined linen: and twenty
ht in the breadth was five cubits,
able to the hangings of the court.
9 And their pillars were four, and their sockets of brass four;
er, and the overlaying of their chapiters and their
 all the pins of the tabernacle, and of the court round
:21 This is the sum of the tabernacle, even of the tabernacle of
as counted, according to the commandment of Moses,
by the hand of Ithamar, son to Aaron
priest.
 the son of Hur, of the tribe of Judah,
ade all that the LORD commanded Moses.
38:23 And with him was Aholiab, son of Ahisamach, of the tribe of Dan,
 and a cunning workman, and an embroiderer in blue, and in
and fine linen.
 was occupied for the work in all the work of
offering, was twenty and nine
d seven hundred and thirty shekels, after the shekel of the
 the silver of them that were numbered of the congregation
and a thousand seven hundred and threescore
f the sanctuary: 38:26 A bekah
man, that is, half a shekel, after the shekel of the
went to be numbered, from twenty years
d and upward, for six hundred thousand and three thousand and five
y men.
 of silver were cast the sockets of
anctuary, and the sockets of the vail; an hundred sockets of the
 talent for a socket.
thousand seven hundred seventy and five shekels he
overlaid their chapiters, and filleted
em.
 was seventy talents, and two
d four hundred shekels.
with he made the sockets to the door of the tabernacle
 brasen altar, and the brasen grate for
t, and all the vessels of the altar, 38:31 And the sockets of the
, and the sockets of the court gate, and all the pins
e pins of the court round about.
nd of the blue, and purple, and scarlet, they made cloths of
 in the holy place, and made the holy garments
es.
 blue, and purple, and scarlet, and
twined linen.
e gold into thin plates, and cut it into
wires, to work it in the blue, and in the purple, and in the scarlet,
ne linen, with cunning work.
made shoulderpieces for it, to couple it together: by the
together.
f his ephod, that was upon it, was of the
old, blue, and purple, and
ine twined linen; as the LORD commanded Moses.
inclosed in ouches of gold, graven,
gnets are graven, with the names of the children of Israel.
on the shoulders of the ephod, that they should
ldren of Israel; as the LORD
ses.
f cunning work, like the work of the
d; of gold, blue, and purple, and scarlet, and fine twined linen.
rsquare; they made the breastplate double: a span was
n the breadth thereof, being doubled.
9:10 And they set in it four rows of stones: the first row was a
and a carbuncle: this was the first row.

sapphire, and a diamond.
third row, a ligure, an agate, and an amethyst.
, an onyx, and a jasper: they were
ed in ouches of gold in their inclosings.
the names of the children of
ve, according to their names, like the engravings of a
ame, according to the twelve tribes.
:15 And they made upon the breastplate chains at the ends, of
 gold.
f gold, and two gold rings; and put
wo rings in the two ends of the breastplate.
chains of gold in the two rings on
ds of the breastplate.
o ends of the two wreathen chains they fastened in the
the shoulderpieces of the ephod, before
t.
d, and put them on the two ends of
eastplate, upon the border of it, which was on the side of the
20 And they made two other golden rings, and put them on the two
 underneath, toward the forepart of it, over against
ove the curious girdle of the ephod.
:21 And they did bind the breastplate by his rings unto the rings of
 a lace of blue, that it might be above the curious
he breastplate might not be loosed from
he ephod; as the LORD commanded Moses.
39:22 And he made the robe of the ephod of woven work, all of blue.
re was an hole in the midst of the robe, as the hole of
ound about the hole, that it should not
end.
of the robe pomegranates of blue,
ple, and scarlet, and twined linen.
25 And they made bells of pure gold, and put the bells between the
n the hem of the robe, round about between the
egranate, a bell and a
 about the hem of the robe to minister in; as the
d they made coats of fine linen of woven work for Aaron, and
d a mitre of fine linen, and goodly bonnets of
ne twined linen, 39:29 And a
ne twined linen, and blue, and purple, and scarlet, of
anded Moses.
ate of the holy crown of pure gold, and
rote upon it a writing, like to the engravings of a signet, HOLINESS

ue, to fasten it on high upon
as the LORD commanded Moses.
 was all the work of the tabernacle of the tent of the
he children of Israel did according to all
ey.
le unto Moses, the tent, and all
iture, his taches, his boards, his bars, and his pillars, and
d the covering of rams' skins dyed red, and the
 vail of the covering, 39:35 The
he testimony, and the staves thereof, and the mercy seat,
the vessels thereof, and the shewbread, 39:37
thereof, even with the lamps to
 order, and all the vessels thereof, and the oil for light,
tar, and the anointing oil, and the sweet
le door, 39:39 The brasen
grate of brass, his staves, and all his vessels, the
hangings of the court, his pillars, and
is sockets, and the hanging for the court gate, his cords, and his
e vessels of the service of the tabernacle, for the
 The cloths of service to do service in
he holy place, and the holy garments for Aaron the priest, and his
to minister in the priest's office.
42 According to all that the LORD commanded Moses, so the children
ll the work.
pon all the work, and, behold, they had done
had they done it: and Moses

ying, 40:2 On the first day of
month shalt thou set up the tabernacle of the tent of the
 thou shalt put therein the ark of the testimony, and cover

 and set in order the things
be set in order upon it; and thou shalt bring in the
ps thereof.
 altar of gold for the incense before the
 of the door to the
nd thou shalt set the altar of the burnt offering before the
 of the tent of the congregation.
And thou shalt set the laver between the tent of the congregation
d shalt put water therein.
u shalt set up the court round about, and hang up the

l, and anoint the tabernacle,
t is therein, and shalt hallow it, and all the vessels
y.
r of the burnt offering, and all
els, and sanctify the altar: and it shall be an altar most
shalt anoint the laver and his foot, and sanctify it.
Aaron and his sons unto the door of the
abernacle of the congregation, and wash them with water.
 upon Aaron the holy garments, and anoint him,
er unto me in the priest's office.
4 And thou shalt bring his sons, and clothe them with coats: 40:15
noint them, as thou didst anoint their father, that
e priest's office: for their anointing
all surely be an everlasting priesthood throughout their
 did Moses: according to all that the LORD commanded him, so
t came to pass in the first month in the second year, on
, that the tabernacle was reared up.
:18 And Moses reared up the tabernacle, and fastened his sockets,
ards thereof, and put in the bars thereof, and reared
he spread abroad the tent over the tabernacle, and put the
ve upon it; as the LORD commanded Moses.

into the ark, and set the
rk, and put the mercy seat above upon the ark: 40:21
e tabernacle, and set up the vail of the
covering, and covered the ark of the testimony; as the LORD commanded
22 And he put the table in the tent of the congregation, upon the
nacle northward, without the vail.
3 And he set the bread in order upon it before the LORD; as the
Moses.
 in the tent of the congregation, over
ainst the table, on the side of the tabernacle southward.
e lamps before the LORD; as the LORD commanded
n altar in the tent of the congregation
efore the vail: 40:27 And he burnt sweet incense thereon; as the LORD
es.
the door of the tabernacle.
e put the altar of burnt offering by the door of the
congregation, and offered upon it the
nt offering and the meat offering; as the LORD commanded Moses.
the laver between the tent of the congregation and
to wash withal.
on and his sons washed their hands and their
o the tent of the congregation,
they came near unto the altar, they washed; as the LORD
nd he reared up the court round about the tabernacle and the
hanging of the court gate. So Moses finished the
d the tent of the congregation, and the glory

o the tent of the
he cloud abode thereon, and the glory of the
nd when the cloud was taken up from over the tabernacle, the
t onward in all their journeys: 40:37 But if the
 journeyed not till the day that it
aken up.
D was upon the tabernacle by day, and
e was on it by night, in the sight of all the house of Israel,
 journeys.
s:  Called Leviticus
 called unto Moses, and spake unto him out of the
aying, 1:2 Speak unto the children of
ael, and say unto them, If any man of you bring an offering unto
 bring your offering of the cattle, even of the
is offering be a burnt sacrifice of the herd, let him offer a
 he shall offer it of his own voluntary will at
ongregation before the LORD.
 shall put his hand upon the head of the burnt offering; and
or him to make atonement for him.
nd he shall kill the bullock before the LORD: and the priests,
bring the blood, and sprinkle the blood round
oor of the tabernacle of the
.
ing, and cut it into his pieces.
d the sons of Aaron the priest shall put fire upon the altar,
rder upon the fire: 1:8 And the priests, Aaron's
d, and the fat, in order upon the
at is on the fire which is upon the altar: 1:9 But his inwards
e wash in water: and the priest shall burn all on
e, an offering made by fire, of a
avour unto the LORD.
fering be of the flocks, namely, of the sheep, or of
ce; he shall bring it a male without
ish.
ide of the altar northward before
D: and the priests, Aaron's sons, shall sprinkle his blood
ar.
ieces, with his head and his fat:
 priest shall lay them in order on the wood that is on the fire
ltar: 1:13 But he shall wash the inwards and the
all bring it all, and burn it upon
tar: it is a burnt sacrifice, an offering made by fire, of a
LORD.
or his offering to the LORD be of
then he shall bring his offering of turtledoves, or of young
he priest shall bring it unto the altar, and wring off his
 altar; and the blood thereof shall be wrung
 he shall pluck away his crop
athers, and cast it beside the altar on the east part, by
:17 And he shall cleave it with the wings
 and the priest shall burn it
tar, upon the wood that is upon the fire: it is a burnt
 by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD.
ering unto the LORD, his
e of fine flour; and he shall pour oil upon it, and
nd he shall bring it to Aaron's sons
priests: and he shall take thereout his handful of the flour
l thereof, with all the frankincense thereof;
l of it upon the altar, to be an
 made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD: 2:3 And the
ering shall be Aaron's and his sons': it is a
he LORD made by fire.
ring an oblation of a meat offering baken in the
 of fine flour mingled with oil, or
vened wafers anointed with oil.
 if thy oblation be a meat offering baken in a pan, it shall be
vened, mingled with oil.
 part it in pieces, and pour oil thereon: it is a meat
oblation be a meat offering baken in the fryingpan, it
with oil.
meat offering that is made of these
s unto the LORD: and when it is presented unto the priest, he
he altar.
 from the meat offering a memorial
f, and shall burn it upon the altar: it is an offering made by
our unto the LORD.
is left of the meat offering shall be Aaron's and
y of the offerings of the LORD made
re.
ll bring unto the LORD, shall be
h leaven: for ye shall burn no leaven, nor any honey, in any
ade by fire.
f the firstfruits, ye shall offer them unto
n the altar for a sweet savour.
d every oblation of thy meat offering shalt thou season with
ou suffer the salt of the covenant of thy God to
 with all thine offerings thou shalt
r salt.
ffering of thy firstfruits unto the
 thou shalt offer for the meat offering of thy firstfruits green
 by the fire, even corn beaten out of full ears.
 it, and lay frankincense thereon: it
a meat offering.
all burn the memorial of it, part of the beaten
hereof, with all the frankincense
: it is an offering made by fire unto the LORD.
ifice of peace offering, if he offer
f the herd; whether it be a male or female, he shall offer it
e the LORD.
nd upon the head of his offering, and kill
congregation: and Aaron's sons
s shall sprinkle the blood upon the altar round about.
the sacrifice of the peace offering an
fering made by fire unto the LORD; the fat that covereth the
at that is upon the inwards, 3:4 And the two
which is by the flanks, and the
e the liver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away.
burn it on the altar upon the burnt
fice, which is upon the wood that is on the fire: it is an
f a sweet savour unto the LORD.
 if his offering for a sacrifice of peace offering unto the
ale or female, he shall offer it without
blemish.
 offering, then shall he offer it before
the LORD.
 upon the head of his offering, and kill
it before the tabernacle of the congregation: and Aaron's sons shall
lood thereof round about upon the altar.

of the peace offering an
 fire unto the LORD; the fat thereof, and the whole
 by the backbone; and the fat that
th the inwards, and all the fat that is upon the inwards, 3:10
 and the fat that is upon them, which is by the
r, with the kidneys, it shall he
y.
on the altar: it is the food of
ing made by fire unto the LORD.
d if his offering be a goat, then he shall offer it before the
 shall lay his hand upon the head of it, and kill it before
ongregation: and the sons of Aaron shall
sprinkle the blood thereof upon the altar round about.
ereof his offering, even an offering made by
eth the inwards, and all the fat
upon the inwards, 3:15 And the two kidneys, and the fat that
 by the flanks, and the caul above the liver,
ay.
 upon the altar: it is the food of
fering made by fire for a sweet savour: all the fat is the
 be a perpetual statute for your generations throughout
 eat neither fat nor blood.
 LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 4:2 Speak unto the children
 soul shall sin through ignorance against any
rning things which ought not to
and shall do against any of them: 4:3 If the priest that is
ng to the sin of the people; then let him bring
a young bullock without blemish
LORD for a sin offering.
ll bring the bullock unto the door of the tabernacle of
 LORD; and shall lay his hand upon the
llock's head, and kill the bullock before the LORD.
ointed shall take of the bullock's blood,
gregation: 4:6 And the priest
is finger in the blood, and sprinkle of the blood seven
re the vail of the sanctuary.
he priest shall put some of the blood upon the horns of the
before the LORD, which is in the tabernacle of
 the blood of the bullock at the
f the altar of the burnt offering, which is at the door of the
ngregation.
rom it all the fat of the bullock for the
nwards, and all the fat that
inwards, 4:9 And the two kidneys, and the fat that is upon
anks, and the caul above the liver, with the
s it was taken off from the
e sacrifice of peace offerings: and the priest shall burn
e burnt offering.
the bullock, and all his flesh, with his head,
and his dung, 4:12 Even the whole
 shall he carry forth without the camp unto a clean place,
ed out, and burn him on the wood with fire:
 be burnt.
gation of Israel sin through ignorance,
nd the thing be hid from the eyes of the assembly, and they have done
nst any of the commandments of the LORD concerning things
 and are guilty; 4:14 When the sin, which
en the congregation shall
ullock for the sin, and bring him before the tabernacle
5 And the elders of the congregation shall lay their hands upon the
lock before the LORD: and the bullock shall be killed
the priest that is anointed shall bring of the bullock's
 the congregation: 4:17 And the priest shall
nd sprinkle it seven times
D, even before the vail.
all put some of the blood upon the horns of the altar
t is in the tabernacle of the
n, and shall pour out all the blood at the bottom of the
g, which is at the door of the tabernacle of
 take all his fat from him, and burn it upon the
h the bullock as he did with the bullock for a
is: and the priest shall make an
t for them, and it shall be forgiven them.
ock without the camp, and burn
burned the first bullock: it is a sin offering for the
 ruler hath sinned, and done somewhat through ignorance
ents of the LORD his God concerning things
 4:23 Or if his sin, wherein
ed, come to his knowledge; he shall bring his offering, a
without blemish: 4:24 And he shall lay his
 it in the place where they
t offering before the LORD: it is a sin offering.
of the blood of the sin offering with
 finger, and put it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering,
ut his blood at the bottom of the altar of burnt
n all his fat upon the altar, as the fat of the
he priest shall make an atonement
 as concerning his sin, and it shall be forgiven him.
common people sin through ignorance, while
mandments of the LORD
hich ought not to be done, and be guilty; 4:28 Or
 come to his knowledge: then he shall
ng his offering, a kid of the goats, a female without blemish, for
 hath sinned.
 hand upon the head of the sin offering, and
the burnt offering.
 shall take of the blood thereof with his finger,
altar of burnt offering, and shall
ut all the blood thereof at the bottom of the altar.
all the fat thereof, as the fat is taken
away from off the sacrifice of peace offerings; and the priest shall
he altar for a sweet savour unto the LORD; and the
or him, and it shall be forgiven him.
:32 And if he bring a lamb for a sin offering, he shall bring it a
lemish.
upon the head of the sin offering, and
ay it for a sin offering in the place where they kill the burnt
nd the priest shall take of the blood of the sin offering with
it upon the horns of the altar of burnt offering,
thereof at the bottom of the altar:
And he shall take away all the fat thereof, as the fat of the
om the sacrifice of the peace offerings; and the
tar, according to the offerings made
ire unto the LORD: and the priest shall make an atonement for his
committed, and it shall be forgiven him.

e of swearing, and is a
he hath seen or known of it; if he do not utter it,
.
ing, whether it be a carcase of
n beast, or a carcase of unclean cattle, or the carcase of
 and if it be hidden from him; he also shall
e touch the uncleanness of man, whatsoever uncleanness it
filed withal, and it be hid from him; when he
y.
with his lips to do evil, or to do
whatsoever it be that a man shall pronounce with an oath, and it
hen he knoweth of it, then he shall be guilty in one
be, when he shall be guilty in one of these things,
ath sinned in that thing: 5:6 And he
l bring his trespass offering unto the LORD for his sin which he
ale from the flock, a lamb or a kid of the goats,
t shall make an atonement for him
ing his sin.
to bring a lamb, then he shall bring for his
 turtledoves, or two young
the LORD; one for a sin offering, and the other for a
 shall bring them unto the priest, who shall offer that
ng first, and wring off his head from his
9 And he shall sprinkle of
he sin offering upon the side of the altar; and the rest
g out at the bottom of the altar: it is a
the second for a burnt offering, according to
 an atonement for him for his sin
e hath sinned, and it shall be forgiven him.
two turtledoves, or two young
en he that sinned shall bring for his offering the tenth
lour for a sin offering; he shall put no oil
kincense thereon: for it is a
g.
riest, and the priest shall take
ful of it, even a memorial thereof, and burn it on the altar,
rings made by fire unto the LORD: it is a sin
l make an atonement for him as touching his
, and it shall be forgiven him:
emnant shall be the priest's, as a meat offering.
ses, saying, 5:15 If a soul commit a
pass, and sin through ignorance, in the holy things of the LORD;
g for his trespass unto the LORD a ram without
estimation by shekels of silver,
e shekel of the sanctuary, for a trespass offering.
 for the harm that he hath done in the
ly thing, and shall add the fifth part thereto, and give it unto the
e priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of
 it shall be forgiven him.
a soul sin, and commit any of these things which are
mmandments of the LORD; though he wist
 not, yet is he guilty, and shall bear his iniquity.
m without blemish out of the flock, with
thy estimation, for a trespass offering, unto the priest: and the
 an atonement for him concerning his ignorance
d it shall be forgiven him.
a trespass offering: he hath certainly trespassed against
LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 6:2 If a soul sin, and
 LORD, and lie unto his neighbour in that
llowship, or in a thing taken
lence, or hath deceived his neighbour; 6:3 Or have found
ieth concerning it, and sweareth falsely; in
ning therein: 6:4 Then it shall
se he hath sinned, and is guilty, that he shall restore that
y away, or the thing which he hath deceitfully
him to keep, or the lost thing
ound, 6:5 Or all that about which he hath sworn falsely; he
n the principal, and shall add the fifth part
 whom it appertaineth, in the day
trespass offering.
ng his trespass offering unto the LORD, a ram
h thy estimation, for a trespass
, unto the priest: 6:7 And the priest shall make an atonement
RD: and it shall be forgiven him for any thing of
ing therein.
o Moses, saying, 6:9 Command Aaron and his
nt offering: It is the burnt
cause of the burning upon the altar all night unto the
 altar shall be burning in it.
 the priest shall put on his linen garment, and his linen
n his flesh, and take up the ashes which the
ring on the altar, and he shall
beside the altar.
 off his garments, and put on other garments, and
 camp unto a clean place.
fire upon the altar shall be burning in it; it shall not
 shall burn wood on it every morning, and
and he shall burn thereon the
peace offerings.
er be burning upon the altar; it shall never go
 the meat offering: the sons of Aaron shall
tar.
andful, of the flour of the meat
, and of the oil thereof, and all the frankincense which is
 and shall burn it upon the altar for a sweet
 the LORD.
of shall Aaron and his sons eat: with
eavened bread shall it be eaten in the holy place; in the court of
f the congregation they shall eat it.
:17 It shall not be baken with leaven. I have given it unto them for
of my offerings made by fire; it is most holy, as is the
respass offering.
ong the children of Aaron shall eat of it. It
enerations concerning the
e LORD made by fire: every one that toucheth them shall
RD spake unto Moses, saying, 6:20 This is the offering
ich they shall offer unto the LORD in the
f an ephah of fine flour for
ing perpetual, half of it in the morning, and half thereof
an it shall be made with oil; and when it is baken, thou
 baken pieces of the meat offering shalt
thou offer for a sweet savour unto the LORD.
 is anointed in his stead shall
 it is a statute for ever unto the LORD; it shall be wholly
y meat offering for the priest shall be wholly burnt: it
4 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 6:25 Speak unto Aaron and
ing, This is the law of the sin offering: In the place
killed shall the sin offering be killed
efore the LORD: it is most holy.
he priest that offereth it for sin shall eat it: in the holy
n, in the court of the tabernacle of the
congregation.
ch the flesh thereof shall be holy: and when
f upon any garment, thou shalt
whereon it was sprinkled in the holy place.
t is sodden shall be broken: and
 sodden in a brasen pot, it shall be both scoured, and rinsed
 the males among the priests shall eat thereof: it is most
 offering, whereof any of the blood is brought into the
ion to reconcile withal in the holy place,
 fire.
the trespass offering: it is most

nt offering shall they kill
offering: and the blood thereof shall he sprinkle round
3 And he shall offer of it all the fat thereof; the rump, and the
 the inwards, 7:4 And the two kidneys, and the fat
 flanks, and the caul that is above
iver, with the kidneys, it shall he take away: 7:5 And the priest
pon the altar for an offering made by fire unto the
.
l eat thereof: it shall be eaten
oly place: it is most holy.
sin offering is, so is the trespass offering: there is one
 that maketh atonement therewith shall have
 any man's burnt offering, even the
t shall have to himself the skin of the burnt offering which he
9 And all the meat offering that is baken in the oven, and all that
he fryingpan, and in the pan, shall be the priest's
very meat offering, mingled with oil, and dry, shall all the
e as much as another.
the law of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which he

hen he shall offer with the
thanksgiving unleavened cakes mingled with oil, and
 oil, and cakes mingled with oil, of
 flour, fried.
he shall offer for his offering leavened bread
f his peace offerings.
e shall offer one out of the whole oblation for an
d it shall be the priest's that
h the blood of the peace offerings.
5 And the flesh of the sacrifice of his peace offerings for
aten the same day that it is offered; he shall
g.
ering be a vow, or a voluntary
it shall be eaten the same day that he offereth his
so the remainder of it shall be eaten:
17 But the remainder of the flesh of the sacrifice on the third day
with fire.
 of the sacrifice of his peace offerings
be eaten at all on the third day, it shall not be accepted, neither
uted unto him that offereth it: it shall be an
h of it shall bear his iniquity.
nd the flesh that toucheth any unclean thing shall not be eaten;
with fire: and as for the flesh, all that be clean
he soul that eateth of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace
unto the LORD, having his uncleanness upon
m his people.
at shall touch any unclean thing, as the
uncleanness of man, or any unclean beast, or any abominable unclean
of the flesh of the sacrifice of peace offerings, which
 that soul shall be cut off from his
le.
 saying, 7:23 Speak unto the
Israel, saying, Ye shall eat no manner of fat, of ox, or
:24 And the fat of the beast that dieth of itself, and the fat of
n with beasts, may be used in any other use: but ye
7:25 For whosoever eateth the fat of the beast, of which men offer an
 by fire unto the LORD, even the soul that eateth it
le.
r of blood, whether it be of fowl
east, in any of your dwellings.
atsoever soul it be that eateth any manner of blood, even that
f from his people.
ake unto Moses, saying, 7:29 Speak unto the
ereth the sacrifice of his
s unto the LORD shall bring his oblation unto the LORD
e offerings.
ring the offerings of the LORD made by fire,
ring, that the breast may be
wave offering before the LORD.
 the priest shall burn the fat upon the altar: but the breast
his sons'.
shall ye give unto the priest for an heave
 offerings.
aron, that offereth the blood of the peace
ight shoulder for his part.
e wave breast and the heave shoulder have I taken of the
f the sacrifices of their peace offerings,
t and unto his sons by a
 from among the children of Israel.
5 This is the portion of the anointing of Aaron, and of the
out of the offerings of the LORD made by fire,
 minister unto the LORD in the
ffice; 7:36 Which the LORD commanded to be given them of the
 the day that he anointed them, by a statute for

ring, of the meat offering, and
n offering, and of the trespass offering, and of the
ifice of the peace offerings; 7:38 Which
the LORD commanded Moses in mount Sinai, in the day that he commanded
of Israel to offer their oblations unto the LORD, in the
1 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 8:2 Take Aaron and his sons
the garments, and the anointing oil, and a bullock for
ms, and a basket of unleavened bread; 8:3
ther unto the door of the
he congregation.
he LORD commanded him; and the assembly was
tabernacle of the congregation.
 Moses said unto the congregation, This is the thing which the
 done.
his sons, and washed them with water.
:7 And he put upon him the coat, and girded him with the girdle, and
th the robe, and put the ephod upon him, and he girded
of the ephod, and bound it unto him
with.
on him: also he put in the
e Urim and the Thummim.
the mitre upon his head; also upon the mitre, even upon
he golden plate, the holy crown; as the
ORD commanded Moses.
k the anointing oil, and anointed the tabernacle and
tified them.
eof upon the altar seven times, and anointed
e laver and his foot, to

upon Aaron's head, and
anctify him.
on's sons, and put coats upon them, and
irded them with girdles, and put bonnets upon them; as the LORD

in offering: and Aaron and
their hands upon the head of the bullock for the sin
it; and Moses took the blood, and put it upon the
th his finger, and purified the
d poured the blood at the bottom of the altar, and sanctified
ation upon it.
 fat that was upon the inwards, and the caul
and their fat, and Moses burned
he altar.
 hide, his flesh, and his dung, he burnt
with fire without the camp; as the LORD commanded Moses.
ram for the burnt offering: and Aaron and his
f the ram.
oses sprinkled the blood upon the altar
ound about.
o pieces; and Moses burnt the head, and the
hed the inwards and the legs in water; and Moses burnt
: it was a burnt sacrifice for a sweet
vour, and an offering made by fire unto the LORD; as the LORD
:22 And he brought the other ram, the ram of consecration: and Aaron
aid their hands upon the head of the ram.
the blood of it, and put it
of Aaron's right ear, and upon the thumb of his right
of his right foot.
Aaron's sons, and Moses put of the blood upon the
the thumbs of their right hands, and
 the great toes of their right feet: and Moses sprinkled the blood
ound about.
nd the rump, and all the fat that was upon
r, and the two kidneys, and
d the right shoulder: 8:26 And out of the basket of
re the LORD, he took one unleavened
 and a cake of oiled bread, and one wafer, and put them on the
ght shoulder: 8:27 And he put all upon Aaron's
 waved them for a wave offering
e LORD.
ff their hands, and burnt them on the
ar upon the burnt offering: they were consecrations for a sweet
fering made by fire unto the LORD.
 And Moses took the breast, and waved it for a wave offering
f the ram of consecration it was Moses' part; as
And Moses took of the anointing oil, and of the blood which was
 sprinkled it upon Aaron, and upon his garments,
ns' garments with him; and
on, and his garments, and his sons, and his sons'
ses said unto Aaron and to his sons, Boil the flesh at the
f the congregation: and there eat it with the
rations, as I commanded, saying,
d his sons shall eat it.
which remaineth of the flesh and of the bread shall ye
ye shall not go out of the door of the tabernacle of the
, until the days of your consecration be at
ate you.
 so the LORD hath commanded to do, to
e an atonement for you.
shall ye abide at the door of the tabernacle of the
n days, and keep the charge of the
that ye die not: for so I am commanded.

 which the LORD commanded by
Moses.
ighth day, that Moses called Aaron and
s sons, and the elders of Israel; 9:2 And he said unto Aaron, Take
f for a sin offering, and a ram for a burnt offering,
em before the LORD.
ildren of Israel thou shalt speak, saying, Take ye
ering; and a calf and a lamb, both of
 first year, without blemish, for a burnt offering; 9:4 Also a
r peace offerings, to sacrifice before the LORD;
il: for to day the LORD will appear
you.
ses commanded before the tabernacle
e congregation: and all the congregation drew near and stood
6 And Moses said, This is the thing which the LORD commanded that ye
 the glory of the LORD shall appear unto you.
nto the altar, and offer thy sin
, and thy burnt offering, and make an atonement for thyself,
d offer the offering of the people, and make an
manded.
he altar, and slew the calf of the sin
fering, which was for himself.
the sons of Aaron brought the blood unto him: and he dipped
, and put it upon the horns of the altar, and
 the altar: 9:10 But the fat, and
neys, and the caul above the liver of the sin offering, he
 the LORD commanded Moses.
 flesh and the hide he burnt with fire without the camp.
nt offering; and Aaron's sons presented unto
d about upon the altar.
resented the burnt offering unto him, with the pieces
 burnt them upon the altar.
 did wash the inwards and the legs, and burnt them upon the
ltar.
offering, and took the goat, which
e sin offering for the people, and slew it, and offered it for

and offered it according to

nd took an handful thereof,
upon the altar, beside the burnt sacrifice of the
 bullock and the ram for a sacrifice of peace
and Aaron's sons presented unto
lood, which he sprinkled upon the altar round about, 9:19 And
k and of the ram, the rump, and that which
nd the caul above the liver:
y put the fat upon the breasts, and he burnt the fat upon
reasts and the right shoulder Aaron waved for
oses commanded.
p his hand toward the people, and blessed them,
sin offering, and the burnt
 peace offerings.
ron went into the tabernacle of the congregation,
ple: and the glory of the LORD
nto all the people.
 a fire out from before the LORD, and consumed upon
d the fat: which when all the people
 they shouted, and fell on their faces.

on, took either of them his
ut fire therein, and put incense thereon, and offered
 which he commanded them not.
there went out fire from the LORD, and devoured them, and
.
 is it that the LORD spake,
l be sanctified in them that come nigh me, and before all
ified. And Aaron held his peace.
nd Moses called Mishael and Elzaphan, the sons of Uzziel the
id unto them, Come near, carry your brethren
amp.
d them in their coats out of the
 Moses had said.
to Aaron, and unto Eleazar and unto Ithamar, his
her rend your clothes; lest ye die,
est wrath come upon all the people: but let your brethren, the
l, bewail the burning which the LORD hath kindled.
rom the door of the tabernacle of the
gregation, lest ye die: for the anointing oil of the LORD is upon
 according to the word of Moses.
nd the LORD spake unto Aaron, saying, 10:9 Do not drink wine nor
, nor thy sons with thee, when ye go into the
ye die: it shall be a statute for
roughout your generations: 10:10 And that ye may put difference
holy, and between unclean and clean; 10:11 And that
rael all the statutes which the LORD
 spoken unto them by the hand of Moses.

o Eleazar and unto Ithamar,
 were left, Take the meat offering that remaineth of the
 by fire, and eat it without leaven beside
d ye shall eat it in the holy
use it is thy due, and thy sons' due, of the sacrifices of
or so I am commanded.
e breast and heave shoulder shall ye eat in a clean
thy daughters with thee: for they be
due, and thy sons' due, which are given out of the sacrifices of
 the children of Israel.
e shoulder and the wave breast shall they bring with the
the fat, to wave it for a wave offering
efore the LORD; and it shall be thine, and thy sons' with thee, by a
er; as the LORD hath commanded.
nd Moses diligently sought the goat of the sin offering, and,
 and he was angry with Eleazar and Ithamar, the
, saying, 10:17 Wherefore have ye
en the sin offering in the holy place, seeing it is most holy,
t you to bear the iniquity of the congregation, to
he LORD?  10:18 Behold, the blood of
as not brought in within the holy place: ye should indeed have
 place, as I commanded.
 said unto Moses, Behold, this day have they offered
urnt offering before the LORD; and such
hings have befallen me: and if I had eaten the sin offering to day,
been accepted in the sight of the LORD?  10:20 And when
ntent.
es and to Aaron, saying unto them,
peak unto the children of Israel, saying, These are the beasts
mong all the beasts that are on the earth.
is clovenfooted, and cheweth the
ng the beasts, that shall ye eat.
Nevertheless these shall ye not eat of them that chew the cud, or
de the hoof: as the camel, because he cheweth the
e is unclean unto you.
ey, because he cheweth the cud, but divideth not the

he cud, but divideth not the
unclean unto you.
hough he divide the hoof, and be clovenfooted,
clean to you.
 ye not eat, and their carcase shall ye not
 These shall ye eat of all that are in the waters: whatsoever hath
in the waters, in the seas, and in the rivers, them
that have not fins and scales in the seas, and in the
he waters, and of any living thing which
is in the waters, they shall be an abomination unto you: 11:11 They
n abomination unto you; ye shall not eat of their
rcases in abomination.
 hath no fins nor scales in the waters, that shall be
1:13 And these are they which ye shall have in abomination among the
all not be eaten, they are an abomination: the eagle,
pray, 11:14 And the vulture, and the kite
is kind; 11:16 And the owl,
 hawk, and the cuckow, and the hawk after his kind, 11:17
he cormorant, and the great owl, 11:18 And
eagle, 11:19 And the stork,
er her kind, and the lapwing, and the bat.
 all four, shall be an
ou.
 flying creeping thing that goeth
l four, which have legs above their feet, to leap withal upon
 these of them ye may eat; the locust after his
 kind, and the beetle after his
 the grasshopper after his kind.
But all other flying creeping things, which have four feet,
 unto you.
 be unclean: whosoever toucheth the
se of them shall be unclean until the even.
the carcase of them shall wash
s, and be unclean until the even.
 The carcases of every beast which divideth the hoof, and is not
cheweth the cud, are unclean unto you: every one
n.
paws, among all manner of beasts
on all four, those are unclean unto you: whoso toucheth their
ean until the even.
eareth the carcase of them shall wash his clothes,
hey are unclean unto you.
lso shall be unclean unto you among the creeping things
the weasel, and the mouse, and the tortoise
nd the chameleon, and the
 snail, and the mole.
nclean to you among all that creep: whosoever doth
hall be unclean until the even.
nd upon whatsoever any of them, when they are dead, doth fall,
 whether it be any vessel of wood, or raiment, or
it be, wherein any work is done, it
be put into water, and it shall be unclean until the even; so it

nto any of them falleth,
 it shall be unclean; and ye shall break it.
, that on which such water cometh
e unclean: and all drink that may be drunk in every such vessel

 of their carcase falleth
n; whether it be oven, or ranges for pots, they shall
unclean and shall be unclean unto you.
11:36 Nevertheless a fountain or pit, wherein there is plenty of
ean: but that which toucheth their carcase shall be
rt of their carcase fall upon any sowing seed which
n.
he seed, and any part of their
ll thereon, it shall be unclean unto you.
 eat, die; he that toucheth the
hereof shall be unclean until the even.

f it shall wash his clothes,
an until the even: he also that beareth the carcase of it
nd be unclean until the even.
 every creeping thing that creepeth upon the earth shall be
l not be eaten.
upon the belly, and whatsoever goeth upon all
ong all creeping things that
he earth, them ye shall not eat; for they are an
 make yourselves abominable with any creeping thing
 make yourselves unclean with them,
ye should be defiled thereby.
 I am the LORD your God: ye shall therefore sanctify
ly; for I am holy: neither shall ye
e yourselves with any manner of creeping thing that creepeth upon
45 For I am the LORD that bringeth you up out of the land of Egypt,
 ye shall therefore be holy, for I am holy.
and of the fowl, and of every
ture that moveth in the waters, and of every creature that
 11:47 To make a difference between the
nclean and the clean, and between the beast that may be eaten and the
y not be eaten.
 unto Moses, saying, 12:2 Speak unto the
children of Israel, saying, If a woman have conceived seed, and born a
hen she shall be unclean seven days; according to the days
r infirmity shall she be unclean.
And in the eighth day the flesh of his foreskin shall be
he shall then continue in the blood of her purifying three
ll touch no hallowed thing, nor come into the
fying be fulfilled.
r a maid child, then she shall be unclean two
shall continue in the blood of
ing threescore and six days.
hen the days of her purifying are fulfilled, for a son, or
l bring a lamb of the first year for a burnt
tledove, for a sin offering,
r of the tabernacle of the congregation, unto the priest:
efore the LORD, and make an atonement for
ssue of her blood. This is
r that hath born a male or a female.
:8 And if she be not able to bring a lamb, then she shall bring two
 young pigeons; the one for the burnt offering, and the
nd the priest shall make an atonement for
the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron, saying, 13:2 When a man
 of his flesh a rising, a scab, or bright spot,
like the plague of leprosy; then he
 be brought unto Aaron the priest, or unto one of his sons the
e priest shall look on the plague in the skin of
e plague is turned white, and the
in sight be deeper than the skin of his flesh, it is a plague
riest shall look on him, and pronounce him
hite in the skin of his flesh, and in
ht be not deeper than the skin, and the hair thereof be not turned
priest shall shut up him that hath the plague seven
 look on him the seventh day: and,
, if the plague in his sight be at a stay, and the plague spread
hen the priest shall shut him up seven days more:
 him again the seventh day: and,
if the plague be somewhat dark, and the plague spread not in
hall pronounce him clean: it is but a scab: and
lean.
abroad in the skin, after that he
en seen of the priest for his cleansing, he shall be seen of
3:8 And if the priest see that, behold, the scab spreadeth in the
iest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a leprosy.
y is in a man, then he shall be brought
nto the priest; 13:10 And the priest shall see him: and, behold, if
hite in the skin, and it have turned the hair white,
n the rising; 13:11 It is an old leprosy
in the skin of his flesh, and the priest shall pronounce him unclean,
 shut him up: for he is unclean.
And if a leprosy break out abroad in the skin, and the leprosy
f him that hath the plague from his head even to
ooketh; 13:13 Then the priest shall
der: and, behold, if the leprosy have covered all his flesh, he
 clean that hath the plague: it is all turned
 raw flesh appeareth in him, he shall be unclean.
the raw flesh, and pronounce him to be
clean: for the raw flesh is unclean: it is a leprosy.
urn again, and be changed unto white, he
shall come unto the priest; 13:17 And the priest shall see him: and,
 plague be turned into white; then the priest shall
he plague: he is clean.
 also, in which, even in the skin thereof, was a boil,
the place of the boil there be a white
sing, or a bright spot, white, and somewhat reddish, and it be
; 13:20 And if, when the priest seeth it, behold,
n, and the hair thereof be turned
the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is a plague of
 boil.
it, and, behold, there be no white
therein, and if it be not lower than the skin, but be somewhat
t shall shut him up seven days: 13:22 And if it
n the priest shall pronounce him
 it is a plague.
t spot stay in his place, and spread not, it is
l pronounce him clean.
e be any flesh, in the skin whereof there is a hot
t burneth have a white bright spot,
hat reddish, or white; 13:25 Then the priest shall look upon it:
e hair in the bright spot be turned white, and it be
 it is a leprosy broken out of the
g: wherefore the priest shall pronounce him unclean: it is the

 behold, there be no white
ight spot, and it be no lower than the other skin, but
riest shall shut him up seven days: 13:27
venth day: and if it be
d in the skin, then the priest shall pronounce him
rosy.
 in his place, and spread not in the
, but it be somewhat dark; it is a rising of the burning, and the
ounce him clean: for it is an inflammation of the
an have a plague upon the head or the beard;
ague: and, behold, if it be in
er than the skin; and there be in it a yellow thin hair;
ounce him unclean: it is a dry scall, even a
31 And if the priest look on the plague of the scall, and, behold,
ht deeper than the skin, and that there is no black
ll shut up him that hath the plague of
e scall seven days: 13:32 And in the seventh day the priest shall
e: and, behold, if the scall spread not, and there be
 scall be not in sight deeper than the
in; 13:33 He shall be shaven, but the scall shall he not shave; and
l shut up him that hath the scall seven days more:
 priest shall look on the scall: and,
old, if the scall be not spread in the skin, nor be in sight deeper
then the priest shall pronounce him clean: and he shall
ean.
 in the skin after his cleansing;
hen the priest shall look on him: and, behold, if the scall be
the priest shall not seek for yellow hair; he is
 be in his sight at a stay, and that there is
l is healed, he is clean: and the
shall pronounce him clean.
an also or a woman have in the skin of their flesh bright
spots; 13:39 Then the priest shall look: and,
in of their flesh be darkish
 a freckled spot that groweth in the skin; he is clean.
air is fallen off his head, he is bald; yet
his hair fallen off from the part of his head
 yet is he clean.
 in the bald head, or bald forehead, a white
p in his bald head, or his bald

it: and, behold, if the rising
e be white reddish in his bald head, or in his bald
eth in the skin of the flesh; 13:44 He
 a leprous man, he is unclean: the priest shall pronounce him
plague is in his head.
per in whom the plague is, his clothes shall be rent,
ll put a covering upon his upper lip, and
 the days wherein the plague shall be in him he shall be
 shall dwell alone; without the camp shall
also that the plague of leprosy is in, whether it be
garment; 13:48 Whether it be in the
 or woof; of linen, or of woollen; whether in a skin, or in any
 13:49 And if the plague be greenish or reddish in
her in the warp, or in the woof, or in
y thing of skin; it is a plague of leprosy, and shall be shewed unto
:50 And the priest shall look upon the plague, and shut
seven days: 13:51 And he shall look on the
 be spread in the garment,
warp, or in the woof, or in a skin, or in any work that
 is a fretting leprosy; it is unclean.
13:52 He shall therefore burn that garment, whether warp or woof, in
linen, or any thing of skin, wherein the plague is: for
t shall be burnt in the fire.
 if the priest shall look, and, behold, the plague be not
ther in the warp, or in the woof, or in any
all command that they wash the
ein the plague is, and he shall shut it up seven days more:
all look on the plague, after that it is
washed: and, behold, if the plague have not changed his colour, and
ot spread; it is unclean; thou shalt burn it in the
r it be bare within or without.
nd if the priest look, and, behold, the plague be somewhat dark
f it; then he shall rend it out of the garment, or
arp, or out of the woof: 13:57 And if
appear still in the garment, either in the warp, or in the woof, or
 skin; it is a spreading plague: thou shalt burn that
re.
 or woof, or whatsoever thing of
be, which thou shalt wash, if the plague be departed from
shed the second time, and shall be clean.
leprosy in a garment of woollen
 either in the warp, or woof, or any thing of skins, to
ronounce it unclean.
spake unto Moses, saying, 14:2 This shall be the law
 cleansing: He shall be brought unto the
priest: 14:3 And the priest shall go forth out of the camp; and the
ok, and, behold, if the plague of leprosy be healed in
he priest command to take for him that is
 and cedar wood, and scarlet,
 14:5 And the priest shall command that one of the birds be
ssel over running water: 14:6 As for the living
ar wood, and the scarlet, and the
 and shall dip them and the living bird in the blood of the
er the running water: 14:7 And he shall
prinkle upon him that is to be cleansed from the leprosy seven times,
nounce him clean, and shall let the living bird loose
And he that is to be cleansed shall wash his clothes, and shave
nd wash himself in water, that he may be clean: and
he camp, and shall tarry abroad out of
s tent seven days.
 on the seventh day, that he shall shave all his
d his eyebrows, even all his hair he
l shave off: and he shall wash his clothes, also he shall wash his
and he shall be clean.
 eighth day he shall take two he lambs without
st year without blemish, and three
deals of fine flour for a meat offering, mingled with oil, and
4:11 And the priest that maketh him clean shall present the man that
clean, and those things, before the LORD, at the door of
regation: 14:12 And the priest shall take
 offering, and the log of
hem for a wave offering before the LORD: 14:13 And he
ace where he shall kill the sin offering
and the burnt offering, in the holy place: for as the sin offering is
 so is the trespass offering: it is most holy: 14:14 And
 of the blood of the trespass offering, and
 the right ear of him that is
sed, and upon the thumb of his right hand, and upon the
: 14:15 And the priest shall take some of
 of his own left hand: 14:16
st shall dip his right finger in the oil that is in his
le of the oil with his finger seven times
 the oil that is in his hand
iest put upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to
thumb of his right hand, and upon the great
f the trespass offering: 14:18
mnant of the oil that is in the priest's hand he shall pour
at is to be cleansed: and the priest shall make
D.
 sin offering, and make an
him that is to be cleansed from his uncleanness; and
rnt offering: 14:20 And the priest shall
offer the burnt offering and the meat offering upon the altar: and the
 make an atonement for him, and he shall be clean.
annot get so much; then he shall take
 lamb for a trespass offering to be waved, to make an atonement for
nth deal of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat
2 And two turtledoves, or two young
ns, such as he is able to get; and the one shall be a sin
 burnt offering.
ng them on the eighth day for his cleansing unto
abernacle of the congregation,
 LORD.
the lamb of the trespass offering, and
e log of oil, and the priest shall wave them for a wave offering
4:25 And he shall kill the lamb of the trespass
 some of the blood of the trespass
ng, and put it upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to
n the thumb of his right hand, and upon the great
the priest shall pour of the oil into
 palm of his own left hand: 14:27 And the priest shall sprinkle
er some of the oil that is in his left hand seven
the priest shall put of the oil that
n his hand upon the tip of the right ear of him that is to be
e thumb of his right hand, and upon the great toe
 of the blood of the trespass
4:29 And the rest of the oil that is in the priest's hand
d of him that is to be cleansed, to make an
4:30 And he shall offer the one of the turtledoves, or of the young
s he can get; 14:31 Even such as he is able to get, the
 the other for a burnt offering, with the
an atonement for him that is
ed before the LORD.
aw of him in whom is the plague of leprosy, whose
h pertaineth to his cleansing.
d the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 14:34 When
land of Canaan, which I give to you for a
sy in a house of the land of
ion; 14:35 And he that owneth the house shall come and
seemeth to me there is as it were a plague
l command that they empty the
re the priest go into it to see the plague, that all that
de unclean: and afterward the priest shall go
ll look on the plague, and,
e plague be in the walls of the house with hollow
ch in sight are lower than the wall;
8 Then the priest shall go out of the house to the door of the
he house seven days: 14:39 And the priest shall
ll look: and, behold, if the plague
read in the walls of the house; 14:40 Then the priest shall
away the stones in which the plague is, and
ace without the city: 14:41 And
cause the house to be scraped within round about, and they
that they scrape off without the city into an
ake other stones, and put them in
ce of those stones; and he shall take other morter, and shall

break out in the house, after
h taken away the stones, and after he hath scraped the
tered; 14:44 Then the priest shall come
nd look, and, behold, if the plague be spread in the house, it is a
y in the house; it is unclean.
d he shall break down the house, the stones of it, and the
the morter of the house; and he shall carry
ean place.
 into the house all the while that it is
shut up shall be unclean until the even.

ll wash his clothes; and he
n the house shall wash his clothes.
48 And if the priest shall come in, and look upon it, and, behold,
not spread in the house, after the house was
ounce the house clean, because
 is healed.
cleanse the house two birds, and cedar
od, and scarlet, and hyssop: 14:50 And he shall kill the one of the
then vessel over running water: 14:51 And he shall take
sop, and the scarlet, and the living bird,
ird, and in the running water,
le the house seven times: 14:52 And he shall cleanse the
e bird, and with the running water, and with
od, and with the hyssop, and
rlet: 14:53 But he shall let go the living bird out of the
s, and make an atonement for the house: and it
 law for all manner of plague of leprosy, and scall,
 garment, and of a house, 14:56 And for
 rising, and for a scab, and for a bright spot: 14:57 To teach when
and when it is clean: this is the law of leprosy.
ses and to Aaron, saying, 15:2 Speak
 the children of Israel, and say unto them, When any man hath a
f his flesh, because of his issue he is unclean.
anness in his issue: whether his flesh
n with his issue, or his flesh be stopped from his issue, it is his

h the issue, is unclean: and
 whereon he sitteth, shall be unclean.
15:5 And whosoever toucheth his bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe
ter, and be unclean until the even.
6 And he that sitteth on any thing whereon he sat that hath the
s clothes, and bathe himself in water, and be
e that toucheth the flesh of him that hath the issue shall
the himself in water, and be unclean until the
e issue spit upon him that is clean; then
elf in water, and be unclean
en.
th upon that hath the issue shall
ean.
hing that was under him shall be
until the even: and he that beareth any of those things shall
 bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the
toucheth that hath the issue, and hath not
 his clothes, and bathe
 and be unclean until the even.
nd the vessel of earth, that he toucheth which hath the issue,
 every vessel of wood shall be rinsed in water.
sue is cleansed of his issue; then he
ll number to himself seven days for his cleansing, and wash his
his flesh in running water, and shall be clean.
all take to him two turtledoves, or
oung pigeons, and come before the LORD unto the door of the
egation, and give them unto the priest: 15:15
one for a sin offering, and the
 a burnt offering; and the priest shall make an atonement for
or his issue.
ed of copulation go out from him, then he
 unclean until the even.
y garment, and every skin, whereon is the seed of
water, and be unclean until the even.
5:18 The woman also with whom man shall lie with seed of copulation,
h bathe themselves in water, and be unclean until the
 have an issue, and her issue in her flesh be
ays: and whosoever toucheth her
unclean until the even.
 thing that she lieth upon in her separation shall be
t she sitteth upon shall be unclean.
:21 And whosoever toucheth her bed shall wash his clothes, and bathe
er, and be unclean until the even.
2 And whosoever toucheth any thing that she sat upon shall wash
the himself in water, and be unclean until the
ed, or on any thing whereon she sitteth,
when he toucheth it, he shall be unclean until the even.
 with her at all, and her flowers be upon him,
all the bed whereon he lieth shall
lean.
e of her blood many days out of the
of her separation, or if it run beyond the time of her
the issue of her uncleanness shall be as
the days of her separation: she shall be unclean.
th all the days of her issue shall be
o her as the bed of her separation: and whatsoever she sitteth upon
n, as the uncleanness of her separation.

s shall be unclean, and shall
othes, and bathe himself in water, and be unclean until the
he be cleansed of her issue, then she shall number to
 that she shall be clean.
the eighth day she shall take unto her two turtles, or
 them unto the priest, to the door of the
And the priest shall offer the one for a sin offering, and the
fering; and the priest shall make an atonement for
e of her uncleanness.
ye separate the children of Israel from their
ir uncleanness, when they defile
nacle that is among them.
 the law of him that hath an issue, and of him whose seed
filed therewith; 15:33 And of her that is
 an issue, of the man, and of
and of him that lieth with her that is unclean.
s after the death of the two sons of
n, when they offered before the LORD, and died; 16:2 And the LORD
Speak unto Aaron thy brother, that he come not at all
hin the vail before the mercy seat, which
ill appear in the cloud upon
at.
 holy place: with a young bullock
in offering, and a ram for a burnt offering.
coat, and he shall have the linen
s upon his flesh, and shall be girded with a linen girdle, and
 shall he be attired: these are holy garments;
 water, and so put them on.
 shall take of the congregation of the children of Israel
 a sin offering, and one ram for a burnt
offering.
s bullock of the sin offering, which is
or himself, and make an atonement for himself, and for his house.
ll take the two goats, and present them before the LORD
le of the congregation.
shall cast lots upon the two goats; one lot for the
 scapegoat.
the goat upon which the LORD's lot fell,
and offer him for a sin offering.
 But the goat, on which the lot fell to be the scapegoat, shall
before the LORD, to make an atonement with him, and
nto the wilderness.
ll bring the bullock of the sin offering, which is
tonement for himself, and for his
and shall kill the bullock of the sin offering which is for
hall take a censer full of burning coals of
, and his hands full of sweet
ten small, and bring it within the vail: 16:13 And he shall
e fire before the LORD, that the cloud of the
 is upon the testimony, that he
16:14 And he shall take of the blood of the bullock, and
r upon the mercy seat eastward; and before
blood with his finger seven
15 Then shall he kill the goat of the sin offering, that is for the
ng his blood within the vail, and do with that blood as
e bullock, and sprinkle it upon the mercy
d he shall make an atonement
 place, because of the uncleanness of the children of
transgressions in all their sins: and so
shall he do for the tabernacle of the congregation, that remaineth
e midst of their uncleanness.
 there shall be no man in the tabernacle of the congregation
ke an atonement in the holy place, until he come
r himself, and for his household,
 all the congregation of Israel.
And he shall go out unto the altar that is before the LORD, and
or it; and shall take of the blood of the bullock,
d put it upon the horns of the altar
d about.
 the blood upon it with his finger seven
times, and cleanse it, and hallow it from the uncleanness of the
.
 reconciling the holy place, and
rnacle of the congregation, and the altar, he shall bring the
Aaron shall lay both his hands upon the head of
 all the iniquities of the children
rael, and all their transgressions in all their sins, putting
 the goat, and shall send him away by the hand of
:22 And the goat shall bear upon him
their iniquities unto a land not inhabited: and he shall let go
derness.
o the tabernacle of the congregation,
 shall put off the linen garments, which he put on when he went
, and shall leave them there: 16:24 And he shall
oly place, and put on his garments,
ome forth, and offer his burnt offering, and the burnt offering
make an atonement for himself, and for the people.
ffering shall he burn upon the altar.
6:26 And he that let go the goat for the scapegoat shall wash his
e his flesh in water, and afterward come into the
r the sin offering, and the goat for the sin
o make atonement in the holy
 one carry forth without the camp; and they shall burn in
 their flesh, and their dung.
 he that burneth them shall wash his clothes, and bathe his
erward he shall come into the camp.
29 And this shall be a statute for ever unto you: that in the
 tenth day of the month, ye shall afflict your
r it be one of your own country,
anger that sojourneth among you: 16:30 For on that day shall
nement for you, to cleanse you, that ye may be
LORD.
st unto you, and ye shall afflict
uls, by a statute for ever.
he priest, whom he shall anoint, and whom he shall
iest's office in his father's stead,
l make the atonement, and shall put on the linen clothes, even the
6:33 And he shall make an atonement for the holy
onement for the tabernacle of the
ation, and for the altar, and he shall make an atonement for
ll the people of the congregation.
4 And this shall be an everlasting statute unto you, to make an
hildren of Israel for all their sins once a year.
Moses.
es, saying, 17:2 Speak unto Aaron, and
to his sons, and unto all the children of Israel, and say unto them;
ing which the LORD hath commanded, saying, 17:3 What man
se of Israel, that killeth an ox, or lamb,
 out of the camp, 17:4 And
t unto the door of the tabernacle of the congregation,
e LORD before the tabernacle of the LORD;
hath shed blood; and that man
t off from among his people: 17:5 To the end that the
their sacrifices, which they offer in the
 unto the LORD, unto the door
rnacle of the congregation, unto the priest, and offer them
o the LORD.
prinkle the blood upon the altar of the
ORD at the door of the tabernacle of the congregation, and burn the
 savour unto the LORD.
all no more offer their sacrifices unto devils, after
. This shall be a statute for ever unto
hem throughout their generations.
And thou shalt say unto them, Whatsoever man there be of the
 the strangers which sojourn among you, that
, 17:9 And bringeth it not unto
of the tabernacle of the congregation, to offer it unto the
ll be cut off from among his people.
:10 And whatsoever man there be of the house of Israel, or of the
journ among you, that eateth any manner of blood; I
hat soul that eateth blood, and will
him off from among his people.
r the life of the flesh is in the blood: and I have given it
to make an atonement for your souls: for it is
or the soul.
o the children of Israel, No soul of you
shall eat blood, neither shall any stranger that sojourneth among you

children of Israel, or of the
hat sojourn among you, which hunteth and catcheth any beast
en; he shall even pour out the blood thereof,
it is the life of all flesh; the blood of it is for the life
aid unto the children of Israel, Ye shall eat
the life of all flesh is the
f: whosoever eateth it shall be cut off.

ich died of itself, or that
n with beasts, whether it be one of your own country, or
wash his clothes, and bathe himself in
ter, and be unclean until the even: then shall he be clean.
them not, nor bathe his flesh; then he shall bear
D spake unto Moses, saying, 18:2 Speak unto the
em, I am the LORD your God.
the doings of the land of Egypt, wherein ye dwelt, shall ye
oings of the land of Canaan, whither I bring
 walk in their ordinances.
l do my judgments, and keep mine ordinances, to walk
d.
utes, and my judgments: which if a
, he shall live in them: I am the LORD.

at is near of kin to him, to
r nakedness: I am the LORD.
kedness of thy father, or the nakedness of thy mother,
is thy mother; thou shalt not uncover her
ather's wife shalt thou not uncover: it is
dness of thy sister, the daughter of thy father, or
 she be born at home, or born abroad,
n their nakedness thou shalt not uncover.
er, or of thy daughter's
heir nakedness thou shalt not uncover: for theirs is
The nakedness of thy father's wife's daughter, begotten of thy
ister, thou shalt not uncover her nakedness.
edness of thy father's sister: she
 father's near kinswoman.
alt not uncover the nakedness of thy mother's sister: for
kinswoman.
 the nakedness of thy father's brother,
hou shalt not approach to his wife: she is thine aunt.
er the nakedness of thy daughter in law: she
ver her nakedness.
 uncover the nakedness of thy brother's wife: it
17 Thou shalt not uncover the nakedness of a woman and her
thou take her son's daughter, or her
hter's daughter, to uncover her nakedness; for they are her near
ickedness.
e a wife to her sister, to vex her, to
cover her nakedness, beside the other in her life time.
 approach unto a woman to uncover her
edness, as long as she is put apart for her uncleanness.
t not lie carnally with thy neighbour's wife,
And thou shalt not let any of thy seed pass through the fire to
lt thou profane the name of thy God: I am the LORD.
 mankind, as with womankind: it is
ation.
h any beast to defile thyself
neither shall any woman stand before a beast to lie down

f these things: for in all
ons are defiled which I cast out before you: 18:25 And
re I do visit the iniquity thereof upon
t, and the land itself vomiteth out her inhabitants.
p my statutes and my judgments, and shall
ther any of your own nation,
nger that sojourneth among you: 18:27 (For all these
he land done, which were before you, and
the land is defiled;) 18:28 That the land spue not you out also, when
 as it spued out the nations that were before you.
it any of these abominations, even the
uls that commit them shall be cut off from among their people.
all ye keep mine ordinance, that ye commit not any
 which were committed before you, and
t ye defile not yourselves therein: I am the LORD your God.
ke unto Moses, saying, 19:2 Speak unto all the
el, and say unto them, Ye shall be
for I the LORD your God am holy.
e shall fear every man his mother, and his father, and keep my
ORD your God.
ls, nor make to yourselves molten gods: I am
ffer a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the LORD, ye
ll.
 ye offer it, and on the morrow:
ught remain until the third day, it shall be burnt in the
e eaten at all on the third day, it is abominable; it
8 Therefore every one that eateth it shall bear his iniquity,
ned the hallowed thing of the LORD: and that soul
eople.
t of your land, thou shalt not wholly
p the corners of thy field, neither shalt thou gather the gleanings

eyard, neither shalt thou gather
ape of thy vineyard; thou shalt leave them for the poor and
 your God.
ither deal falsely, neither lie one to
other.
my name falsely, neither shalt thou
ne the name of thy God: I am the LORD.
19:13 Thou shalt not defraud thy neighbour, neither rob him: the wages
is hired shall not abide with thee all night until the
 not curse the deaf, nor put a stumblingblock before
God: I am the LORD.
o unrighteousness in judgment: thou shalt not
onor the person of the mighty:
hteousness shalt thou judge thy neighbour.
 a talebearer among thy people:
halt thou stand against the blood of thy neighbour; I am the
alt not hate thy brother in thine heart: thou shalt in
r, and not suffer sin upon him.
hou shalt not avenge, nor bear any grudge against the children
hou shalt love thy neighbour as thyself: I am the
tatutes. Thou shalt not let thy cattle gender
ow thy field with mingled seed:
hall a garment mingled of linen and woollen come upon thee.
ieth carnally with a woman, that is a bondmaid,
 all redeemed, nor freedom given
 shall be scourged; they shall not be put to death, because
:21 And he shall bring his trespass offering unto the LORD, unto the
bernacle of the congregation, even a ram for a trespass
priest shall make an atonement for him with the ram of
 the LORD for his sin which he hath done:
orgiven him.
me into the land, and shall have planted all
l count the fruit thereof as
d: three years shall it be as uncircumcised unto you: it
19:24 But in the fourth year all the fruit thereof shall be holy to
 withal.
all ye eat of the fruit thereof, that it
may yield unto you the increase thereof: I am the LORD your God.
ot eat any thing with the blood: neither shall ye use
s.
 of your heads, neither shalt thou
e corners of thy beard.
not make any cuttings in your flesh for the dead, nor
m the LORD.
 daughter, to cause her to be a whore; lest
 become full of wickedness.
all keep my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the
t them that have familiar spirits, neither seek after
m: I am the LORD your God.
halt rise up before the hoary head, and honour the face of
y God: I am the LORD.
ranger sojourn with thee in your land, ye shall not
ger that dwelleth with you shall be unto you as one
love him as thyself; for ye were
s in the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God.
ess in judgment, in meteyard, in
or in measure.
t weights, a just ephah, and a just hin, shall
ch brought you out of the land of

 statutes, and all my
hem: I am the LORD.
pake unto Moses, saying, 20:2 Again, thou shalt say
oever he be of the children of Israel,
 of the strangers that sojourn in Israel, that giveth any of his
he shall surely be put to death: the people of the
.
hat man, and will cut him off
his people; because he hath given of his seed unto Molech,
and to profane my holy name.
f the people of the land do any ways hide their eyes from
f his seed unto Molech, and kill him not:
 man, and against his family,
t him off, and all that go a whoring after him, to commit
m among their people.
 that turneth after such as have familiar spirits,
ng after them, I will even set my face
ainst that soul, and will cut him off from among his people.
lves therefore, and be ye holy: for I am the LORD
ep my statutes, and do them: I am the LORD which
e that curseth his father or his mother shall be
d his father or his mother; his
ll be upon him.
committeth adultery with another man's wife,
his neighbour's wife, the
he adulteress shall surely be put to death.
 father's wife hath uncovered his
s nakedness: both of them shall surely be put to death; their
hem.
ughter in law, both of them shall
be put to death: they have wrought confusion; their blood shall
:13 If a man also lie with mankind, as he lieth with a woman, both
mitted an abomination: they shall surely be put to
 them.
nd her mother, it is wickedness: they
ll be burnt with fire, both he and they; that there be no
20:15 And if a man lie with a beast, he shall surely be put to death:
slay the beast.
proach unto any beast, and lie down thereto,
st: they shall surely be put to
eir blood shall be upon them.
 if a man shall take his sister, his father's daughter, or
nd see her nakedness, and she see his
edness; it is a wicked thing; and they shall be cut off in the
e: he hath uncovered his sister's nakedness; he
nd if a man shall lie with a woman having her sickness, and
ness; he hath discovered her fountain, and she
lood: and both of them shall be
rom among their people.
shalt not uncover the nakedness of thy mother's sister,
 for he uncovereth his near kin: they shall
man shall lie with his uncle's wife, he hath uncovered
shall bear their sin; they shall die
dless.
s brother's wife, it is an unclean
 he hath uncovered his brother's nakedness; they shall be
all therefore keep all my statutes, and all my judgments,
d, whither I bring you to dwell therein, spue
t walk in the manners of the nation, which I cast
d all these things, and therefore I
red them.
u, Ye shall inherit their land, and I
l give it unto you to possess it, a land that floweth with milk and
 LORD your God, which have separated you from other
fore put difference between clean beasts and
 clean: and ye shall not make
abominable by beast, or by fowl, or by any manner of living
the ground, which I have separated from you as
ly unto me: for I the LORD am holy, and have
 should be mine.
man that hath a familiar spirit, or that is a
 they shall stone them with
 blood shall be upon them.
 LORD said unto Moses, Speak unto the priests the sons of
 There shall none be defiled for the dead
hat is near unto him, that
ther, and for his father, and for his son, and for his
r.
at is nigh unto him, which hath
sband; for her may he be defiled.
But he shall not defile himself, being a chief man among his
self.
 upon their head, neither shall they
e off the corner of their beard, nor make any cuttings in their
 shall be holy unto their God, and not profane the name of
ings of the LORD made by fire, and the bread
 they shall be holy.
t take a wife that is a whore, or profane; neither
 from her husband: for he is holy unto
s God.
refore; for he offereth the bread of
God: he shall be holy unto thee: for I the LORD, which sanctify
:9 And the daughter of any priest, if she profane herself by playing
 profaneth her father: she shall be burnt with fire.
h priest among his brethren, upon whose
ead the anointing oil was poured, and that is consecrated to put on
hall not uncover his head, nor rend his clothes; 21:11
y dead body, nor defile himself for his
ather, or for his mother; 21:12 Neither shall he go out of the
ne the sanctuary of his God; for the crown of the
him: I am the LORD.
take a wife in her virginity.
idow, or a divorced woman, or profane, or an harlot, these
e shall take a virgin of his own people to
his seed among his people: for I the
 do sanctify him.
ake unto Moses, saying, 21:17 Speak unto Aaron,
 in their generations that hath any
sh, let him not approach to offer the bread of his God.
he be that hath a blemish, he shall not
pproach: a blind man, or a lame, or he that hath a flat nose, or any
ous, 21:19 Or a man that is brokenfooted, or
a dwarf, or that hath a blemish
e, or be scurvy, or scabbed, or hath his stones broken; 21:21
emish of the seed of Aaron the priest shall come
 LORD made by fire: he hath a
 shall not come nigh to offer the bread of his God.
of his God, both of the most holy, and of
n unto the vail, nor come nigh unto the
ltar, because he hath a blemish; that he profane not my sanctuaries:
 do sanctify them.
 it unto Aaron, and to his sons, and unto all the
he LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 22:2 Speak unto Aaron and
separate themselves from the holy things of the
rofane not my holy name in those
hich they hallow unto me: I am the LORD.

ll your seed among your
 goeth unto the holy things, which the children of
ing his uncleanness upon him, that
hall be cut off from my presence: I am the LORD.
 of Aaron is a leper, or hath a
ssue; he shall not eat of the holy things, until he be clean.
y thing that is unclean by the dead, or a man
osoever toucheth any creeping
eby he may be made unclean, or a man of whom he may take
cleanness he hath; 22:6 The soul which hath
 even, and shall not eat of the
gs, unless he wash his flesh with water.

be clean, and shall afterward
holy things; because it is his food.
:8 That which dieth of itself, or is torn with beasts, he shall not
imself therewith; I am the LORD.
hey shall therefore keep mine ordinance, lest they bear sin for
re, if they profane it: I the LORD do sanctify
er eat of the holy thing: a sojourner of
the priest, or an hired servant, shall not eat of the holy thing.
e priest buy any soul with his money, he shall eat of
s house: they shall eat of his meat.
:12 If the priest's daughter also be married unto a stranger, she
 offering of the holy things.
 if the priest's daughter be a widow, or divorced, and have
ed unto her father's house, as in her youth,
t there shall be no stranger eat

ng unwittingly, then he shall
th part thereof unto it, and shall give it unto the priest
22:15 And they shall not profane the holy things of the children of
hey offer unto the LORD; 22:16 Or suffer them to bear
n they eat their holy things: for I the
ORD do sanctify them.
D spake unto Moses, saying, 22:18 Speak unto Aaron,
he children of Israel, and say unto
 Whatsoever he be of the house of Israel, or of the strangers in
offer his oblation for all his vows, and for all his
 will offer unto the LORD for a burnt
ering; 22:19 Ye shall offer at your own will a male without
 of the sheep, or of the goats.
ut whatsoever hath a blemish, that shall ye not offer: for it
le for you.
h a sacrifice of peace offerings unto the
 offering in beeves or sheep,
 perfect to be accepted; there shall be no blemish therein.
n, or maimed, or having a wen, or scurvy, or
 the LORD, nor make an offering
f them upon the altar unto the LORD.
:23 Either a bullock or a lamb that hath any thing superfluous or
rts, that mayest thou offer for a freewill offering;
accepted.
 the LORD that which is bruised, or
ed, or broken, or cut; neither shall ye make any offering thereof
22:25 Neither from a stranger's hand shall ye offer the bread of your
 these; because their corruption is in them, and
ot be accepted for you.
ORD spake unto Moses, saying, 22:27 When a bullock, or
ht forth, then it shall be seven days
er the dam; and from the eighth day and thenceforth it shall be
ering made by fire unto the LORD.
 And whether it be cow, or ewe, ye shall not kill it and her

ce of thanksgiving unto the
t at your own will.
ay it shall be eaten up; ye shall leave none of it

ndments, and do them: I am the
2:32 Neither shall ye profane my holy name; but I will be hallowed
en of Israel: I am the LORD which hallow you, 22:33
d of Egypt, to be your God: I am the
.
aying, 23:2 Speak unto the
rael, and say unto them, Concerning the feasts of the
 to be holy convocations, even these are
my feasts.
done: but the seventh day is the sabbath
of rest, an holy convocation; ye shall do no work therein: it is the
 LORD in all your dwellings.
 are the feasts of the LORD, even holy convocations, which
ir seasons.
of the first month at even is the LORD's
passover.
 of the same month is the feast of
ened bread unto the LORD: seven days ye must eat unleavened
irst day ye shall have an holy convocation: ye shall do

by fire unto the LORD seven
seventh day is an holy convocation: ye shall do no
d the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 23:10 Speak unto the
ay unto them, When ye be come into the land
he harvest thereof, then ye
 sheaf of the firstfruits of your harvest unto the
the sheaf before the LORD, to be
 for you: on the morrow after the sabbath the priest shall
 shall offer that day when ye wave the sheaf an he lamb
t year for a burnt offering unto the LORD.
all be two tenth deals of fine
led with oil, an offering made by fire unto the LORD for a
ink offering thereof shall be of wine, the
hall eat neither bread, nor parched corn, nor green
at ye have brought an offering unto
God: it shall be a statute for ever throughout your generations
gs.
rom the morrow after the sabbath,
e day that ye brought the sheaf of the wave offering; seven
ete: 23:16 Even unto the morrow after the
s; and ye shall offer a new
 unto the LORD.
t of your habitations two wave loaves of two
ur; they shall be baken with
 are the firstfruits unto the LORD.
18 And ye shall offer with the bread seven lambs without blemish of
 and one young bullock, and two rams: they shall be for
ORD, with their meat offering, and their
drink offerings, even an offering made by fire, of sweet savour unto
3:19 Then ye shall sacrifice one kid of the goats for a sin offering,
 of the first year for a sacrifice of peace offerings.
 wave them with the bread of the firstfruits
ith the two lambs: they shall be
the LORD for the priest.
hall proclaim on the selfsame day, that it may be an
shall do no servile work therein: it
l be a statute for ever in all your dwellings throughout your
 And when ye reap the harvest of your land, thou shalt not make
he corners of thy field when thou reapest, neither
f thy harvest: thou shalt leave them
 the poor, and to the stranger: I am the LORD your God.
unto Moses, saying, 23:24 Speak unto the
children of Israel, saying, In the seventh month, in the first day of
all ye have a sabbath, a memorial of blowing of trumpets,
3:25 Ye shall do no servile work therein: but ye shall offer an
re unto the LORD.
ake unto Moses, saying, 23:27 Also on the tenth
ll be a day of atonement: it shall
holy convocation unto you; and ye shall afflict your souls, and
ade by fire unto the LORD.
 shall do no work in that same day: for it is a day of
ent for you before the LORD your God.
3:29 For whatsoever soul it be that shall not be afflicted in that
ll be cut off from among his people.
:30 And whatsoever soul it be that doeth any work in that same day,
ill I destroy from among his people.
:31 Ye shall do no manner of work: it shall be a statute for ever
enerations in all your dwellings.
 It shall be unto you a sabbath of rest, and ye shall afflict
nth day of the month at even, from even unto

aying, 23:34 Speak unto the
srael, saying, The fifteenth day of this seventh month
acles for seven days unto the LORD.
35 On the first day shall be an holy convocation: ye shall do no
in.
offering made by fire unto the
he eighth day shall be an holy convocation unto you; and ye
 made by fire unto the LORD: it is a solemn
rk therein.
of the LORD, which ye shall proclaim to be
made by fire unto the LORD, a
ing, and a meat offering, a sacrifice, and drink offerings,
y: 23:38 Beside the sabbaths of the LORD, and
r vows, and beside all your
rings, which ye give unto the LORD.
39 Also in the fifteenth day of the seventh month, when ye have
it of the land, ye shall keep a feast unto the LORD
all be a sabbath, and on the eighth day
hall be a sabbath.
ake you on the first day the boughs of goodly
e boughs of thick trees, and
he brook; and ye shall rejoice before the LORD your God
 shall keep it a feast unto the LORD seven days in the
te for ever in your generations: ye shall celebrate
42 Ye shall dwell in booths seven days; all that are Israelites
 booths: 23:43 That your generations may know that
 dwell in booths, when I brought them
 of the land of Egypt: I am the LORD your God.
children of Israel the feasts of the
.
aying, 24:2 Command the children
l, that they bring unto thee pure oil olive beaten for the
s to burn continually.
 vail of the testimony, in the tabernacle of the
 from the evening unto the morning
 the LORD continually: it shall be a statute for ever in your
He shall order the lamps upon the pure candlestick before the
24:5 And thou shalt take fine flour, and bake twelve cakes thereof:
 shall be in one cake.
alt set them in two rows, six on a row, upon the pure
7 And thou shalt put pure frankincense upon each row, that it may
or a memorial, even an offering made by fire unto the
e shall set it in order before the LORD
ontinually, being taken from the children of Israel by an everlasting
24:9 And it shall be Aaron's and his sons'; and they shall eat it in
: for it is most holy unto him of the offerings of the
tual statute.
sraelitish woman, whose father was an
ptian, went out among the children of Israel: and this son of the
 and a man of Israel strove together in the camp;
 son blasphemed the name of the Lord,
 cursed. And they brought him unto Moses: (and his mother's name
 daughter of Dibri, of the tribe of Dan:) 24:12 And
mind of the LORD might be shewed them.
24:13 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 24:14 Bring forth him
 without the camp; and let all that heard him lay
t all the congregation stone him.
 And thou shalt speak unto the children of Israel, saying,
d shall bear his sin.
 blasphemeth the name of the LORD, he shall surely be
gregation shall certainly stone him: as
ell the stranger, as he that is born in the land, when he blasphemeth
he Lord, shall be put to death.
nd he that killeth any man shall surely be put to death.
h a beast shall make it good; beast for beast.
 in his neighbour; as he hath done,
all it be done to him; 24:20 Breach for breach, eye for eye,
 hath caused a blemish in a man, so shall it be
that killeth a beast, he shall restore it: and he that
ut to death.
nner of law, as well for the stranger, as
 LORD your God.
o the children of Israel, that they should
he camp, and stone him with
he children of Israel did as the LORD commanded Moses.
to Moses in mount Sinai, saying, 25:2 Speak
to them, When ye come into the
 I give you, then shall the land keep a sabbath unto the
ou shalt sow thy field, and six years thou shalt
the fruit thereof; 25:4 But in the
h year shall be a sabbath of rest unto the land, a sabbath for
 neither sow thy field, nor prune thy vineyard.
n accord of thy harvest thou shalt
ap, neither gather the grapes of thy vine undressed: for it is a
the land.
and shall be meat for you; for thee, and
for thy servant, and for thy maid, and for thy hired servant, and for
that sojourneth with thee.
 thy cattle, and for the beast that are in thy land, shall
 be meat.
ven sabbaths of years unto thee, seven
mes seven years; and the space of the seven sabbaths of years shall
rty and nine years.
u cause the trumpet of the jubile to sound on the
n the day of atonement shall ye make
trumpet sound throughout all your land.

ar, and proclaim liberty
he land unto all the inhabitants thereof: it shall be
ll return every man unto his possession,
and ye shall return every man unto his family.
 year be unto you: ye shall not sow,
her reap that which groweth of itself in it, nor gather the grapes
e undressed.
; it shall be holy unto you: ye shall eat

 return every man unto his

ghbour, or buyest ought of
s hand, ye shall not oppress one another: 25:15
ter the jubile thou shalt buy of
hbour, and according unto the number of years of the fruits he
: 25:16 According to the multitude of years thou
and according to the fewness of
u shalt diminish the price of it: for according to the number
ruits doth he sell unto thee.
shall not therefore oppress one another; but thou shalt fear
ORD your God.
do my statutes, and keep my judgments, and do
in safety.
ld her fruit, and ye shall eat your fill,
 if ye shall say, What shall we eat the seventh year? behold,
 gather in our increase: 25:21 Then I will
h year, and it shall bring
r three years.
he eighth year, and eat yet of old fruit until
e in ye shall eat of the old
:23 The land shall not be sold for ever: for the land is mine, for
 and sojourners with me.
ll the land of your possession ye shall grant a
f thy brother be waxen poor, and hath sold away some of his
of his kin come to redeem it, then shall he
25:26 And if the man have none to redeem it, and himself be able to
7 Then let him count the years of the sale thereof, and
he man to whom he sold it; that he may
turn unto his possession.
he be not able to restore it to him, then that which is
nd of him that hath bought it until the
ear of jubile: and in the jubile it shall go out, and he shall return
ession.
ing house in a walled city, then he may
edeem it within a whole year after it is sold; within a full year may

 the space of a full year, then
 that is in the walled city shall be established for ever to
oughout his generations: it shall not go out in
 of the villages which have no wall round about
 of the country: they may be
d they shall go out in the jubile.
2 Notwithstanding the cities of the Levites, and the houses of the
possession, may the Levites redeem at any time.
e Levites, then the house that was
and the city of his possession, shall go out in the year of
of the cities of the Levites are their
ssession among the children of Israel.
25:34 But the field of the suburbs of their cities may not be sold;
 perpetual possession.
 brother be waxen poor, and fallen in decay with thee;
 yea, though he be a stranger, or a
rner; that he may live with thee.
 Take thou no usury of him, or increase: but fear thy God; that
e with thee.
him thy money upon usury, nor lend him thy
 LORD your God, which brought you forth out of the land
and of Canaan, and to be your God.
9 And if thy brother that dwelleth by thee be waxen poor, and be
ou shalt not compel him to serve as a bondservant:
nd as a sojourner, he shall be with
 and shall serve thee unto the year of jubile.
m thee, both he and his children
, and shall return unto his own family, and unto the
l he return.
ants, which I brought forth out of the land
dmen.
m with rigour; but shalt fear thy

, which thou shalt have,
heathen that are round about you; of them shall ye buy
:45 Moreover of the children of the strangers that do sojourn among
all ye buy, and of their families that are with you,
 and they shall be your possession.
46 And ye shall take them as an inheritance for your children after
 them for a possession; they shall be your bondmen for
 the children of Israel, ye shall not rule
nd if a sojourner or stranger wax rich by thee, and thy brother
m wax poor, and sell himself unto the stranger or
k of the stranger's family: 25:48
hat he is sold he may be redeemed again; one of his brethren
Either his uncle, or his uncle's son, may redeem
to him of his family may redeem him;
f he be able, he may redeem himself.
:50 And he shall reckon with him that bought him from the year that
him unto the year of jubile: and the price of his sale
number of years, according to the time of

according unto them he shall
he price of his redemption out of the money that he was
 there remain but few years unto the year of jubile, then
and according unto his years shall he give

l he be with him: and the
 rule with rigour over him in thy sight.

 years, then he shall go out
of jubile, both he, and his children with him.
Israel are servants; they are my
 whom I brought forth out of the land of Egypt: I am the LORD
shall make you no idols nor graven image, neither rear you up
ther shall ye set up any image of stone in your
 the LORD your God.
my sabbaths, and reverence my sanctuary: I am the
atutes, and keep my commandments, and do them;
e season, and the land shall yield
crease, and the trees of the field shall yield their fruit.
ng shall reach unto the vintage, and the vintage
and ye shall eat your bread to the
and dwell in your land safely.
 I will give peace in the land, and ye shall lie down, and
id: and I will rid evil beasts out of the
your land.
 enemies, and they shall fall before you
by the sword.
l chase an hundred, and an hundred of you
r enemies shall fall before
ord.
you, and make you fruitful, and
you, and establish my covenant with you.

ing forth the old because of
26:11 And I set my tabernacle among you: and my soul shall not abhor
And I will walk among you, and will be your God, and ye shall be
3 I am the LORD your God, which brought you forth out of the land
 should not be their bondmen; and I have broken the
u go upright.
hearken unto me, and will not do all these
ise my statutes, or if your
 judgments, so that ye will not do all my commandments,
nt: 26:16 I also will do this unto you; I
ption, and the burning ague,
onsume the eyes, and cause sorrow of heart: and ye shall
 your enemies shall eat it.
 will set my face against you, and ye shall be slain before
 hate you shall reign over you; and ye shall
And if ye will not yet for all this hearken unto me, then I will
imes more for your sins.
ll break the pride of your power; and I will make your
th as brass: 26:20 And your strength shall
t yield her increase, neither
rees of the land yield their fruits.
:21 And if ye walk contrary unto me, and will not hearken unto me; I
en times more plagues upon you according to your sins.
d beasts among you, which shall rob you of
and make you few in number;
 ways shall be desolate.
e will not be reformed by me by these things, but will
 Then will I also walk contrary unto you,
our sins.
d upon you, that shall avenge the quarrel
together within your cities,
the pestilence among you; and ye shall be delivered into
26:26 And when I have broken the staff of your bread, ten women shall
ad in one oven, and they shall deliver you your bread
 eat, and not be satisfied.
f ye will not for all this hearken unto me, but walk
 will walk contrary unto you also in
; and I, even I, will chastise you seven times for your sins.
eat the flesh of your sons, and the flesh of your
And I will destroy your high places, and cut down your images,
es upon the carcases of your idols, and my soul
l make your cities waste, and bring your sanctuaries
t smell the savour of your sweet odours.

olation: and your enemies
rein shall be astonished at it.
nd I will scatter you among the heathen, and will draw out a
our land shall be desolate, and your cities
oy her sabbaths, as long as it lieth
late, and ye be in your enemies' land; even then shall the land
 sabbaths.
solate it shall rest; because it did not
rest in your sabbaths, when ye dwelt upon it.
live of you I will send a faintness
their hearts in the lands of their enemies; and the sound of a
ase them; and they shall flee, as fleeing from a
ne pursueth.
one upon another, as it were before a sword,
no power to stand before your

en, and the land of your
t you up.
of you shall pine away in their iniquity
in your enemies' lands; and also in the iniquities of their fathers
 away with them.
nfess their iniquity, and the iniquity of their
they trespassed against me, and
 they have walked contrary unto me; 26:41 And that I also
 them, and have brought them into the land of
cised hearts be humbled, and they
cept of the punishment of their iniquity: 26:42 Then will I
th Jacob, and also my covenant with Isaac, and
 remember; and I will remember the

em, and shall enjoy her
he lieth desolate without them: and they shall accept
iquity: because, even because they
ed my judgments, and because their soul abhorred my statutes.
ll that, when they be in the land of their enemies,
her will I abhor them, to destroy them
terly, and to break my covenant with them: for I am the LORD their
t I will for their sakes remember the covenant of their
orth out of the land of Egypt in the sight
d: I am the LORD.
tatutes and judgments and laws, which the LORD
 Israel in mount Sinai by the hand
es.
 saying, 27:2 Speak unto the
Israel, and say unto them, When a man shall make a
be for the LORD by thy estimation.
 And thy estimation shall be of the male from twenty years old
s old, even thy estimation shall be fifty shekels
e sanctuary.
, then thy estimation shall be thirty
kels.
 old even unto twenty years old, then
 estimation shall be of the male twenty shekels, and for the female

nto five years old, then thy
hall be of the male five shekels of silver, and for the
 be three shekels of silver.
f it be from sixty years old and above; if it be a male,
be fifteen shekels, and for the female ten
n thy estimation, then he shall present
imself before the priest, and the priest shall value him; according
that vowed shall the priest value him.
27:9 And if it be a beast, whereof men bring an offering unto the
y man giveth of such unto the LORD shall be holy.
r change it, a good for a bad, or a bad
or a good: and if he shall at all change beast for beast, then it and
thereof shall be holy.
be any unclean beast, of which they do not offer a
 shall present the beast before the
t: 27:12 And the priest shall value it, whether it be good or
it, who art the priest, so shall it be.

en he shall add a fifth part
 thy estimation.
hall sanctify his house to be holy unto the
, whether it be good or bad: as
t shall estimate it, so shall it stand.

edeem his house, then he
fth part of the money of thy estimation unto it, and
if a man shall sanctify unto the LORD some part of a field
thy estimation shall be according to the seed
l be valued at fifty shekels of

year of jubile, according to
on it shall stand.
tify his field after the jubile, then the priest
cording to the years that remain,
to the year of the jubile, and it shall be abated from thy
 if he that sanctified the field will in any wise redeem it,
fifth part of the money of thy estimation unto

ld, or if he have sold the
er man, it shall not be redeemed any more.
 in the jubile, shall be holy
RD, as a field devoted; the possession thereof shall be the
if a man sanctify unto the LORD a field which he hath
ields of his possession; 27:23 Then the
riest shall reckon unto him the worth of thy estimation, even unto
jubile: and he shall give thine estimation in that
RD.
 field shall return unto him of
as bought, even to him to whom the possession of the land did
all thy estimations shall be according to the shekel of the
s shall be the shekel.
irstling of the beasts, which should be the LORD's
 it; whether it be ox, or sheep: it is
e LORD's.
ean beast, then he shall redeem it
ing to thine estimation, and shall add a fifth part of it
redeemed, then it shall be sold according to
ng no devoted thing, that a man shall devote unto
h of man and beast, and of the field
is possession, shall be sold or redeemed: every devoted thing is
 LORD.
be devoted of men, shall be redeemed;
 shall surely be put to death.
d all the tithe of the land, whether of the seed of the land,
e tree, is the LORD's: it is holy unto the LORD.
edeem ought of his tithes, he shall
hereto the fifth part thereof.
d concerning the tithe of the herd, or of the flock, even of
er the rod, the tenth shall be holy unto the
ther it be good or bad, neither shall he
change it: and if he change it at all, then both it and the change
 holy; it shall not be redeemed.
These are the commandments, which the LORD commanded Moses for
el in mount Sinai.
k of Moses:  Called Numbers
he LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the
egation, on the first day of the second month,
ome out of the land of Egypt,
 Take ye the sum of all the congregation of the children of
ilies, by the house of their fathers, with the
 their polls; 1:3 From twenty
nd upward, all that are able to go forth to war in Israel:
ber them by their armies.
you there shall be a man of every tribe; every one head
.
n that shall stand with you: of
 of Reuben; Elizur the son of Shedeur.
1:6 Of Simeon; Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai.
 Amminadab.
the son of Zuar.
the son of Helon.
of Joseph: of Ephraim; Elishama the son of
f Pedahzur.
e son of Gideoni.
the son of Ammishaddai.
Pagiel the son of Ocran.
liasaph the son of Deuel.
ali; Ahira the son of Enan.
were the renowned of the congregation, princes of the
s of thousands in Israel.
s and Aaron took these men which are expressed by their
led all the congregation together on the
first day of the second month, and they declared their pedigrees after
es, by the house of their fathers, according to the number
y years old and upward, by their polls.

umbered them in the

's eldest son, by their
r their families, by the house of their fathers,
es, by their polls, every male from
y years old and upward, all that were able to go forth to war;
 numbered of them, even of the tribe of Reuben,
e hundred.
on, by their generations, after their
ilies, by the house of their fathers, those that were numbered of
o the number of the names, by their polls, every male
ard, all that were able to go forth to
r; 1:23 Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe of
nd nine thousand and three hundred.
4 Of the children of Gad, by their generations, after their
of their fathers, according to the number of
pward, all that were able to go
war; 1:25 Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe
d five thousand six hundred and fifty.
1:26 Of the children of Judah, by their generations, after their
ouse of their fathers, according to the number of
and upward, all that were able to go
h to war; 1:27 Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe
hreescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred.
, by their generations, after their
ies, by the house of their fathers, according to the number of
ty years old and upward, all that were able to go
e numbered of them, even of the tribe
Issachar, were fifty and four thousand and four hundred.
Zebulun, by their generations, after their
 according to the number of
om twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go
hat were numbered of them, even of the tribe
and and four hundred.
ren of Joseph, namely, of the children of Ephraim, by
r families, by the house of their
, according to the number of the names, from twenty years old
were able to go forth to war; 1:33 Those that
ibe of Ephraim, were forty
ive hundred.
nasseh, by their generations, after their
according to the number of
m twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go
at were numbered of them, even of the tribe
nd and two hundred.
n of Benjamin, by their generations, after their
thers, according to the number of
es, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go
hose that were numbered of them, even of the tribe
e thousand and four hundred.
e children of Dan, by their generations, after their
r fathers, according to the number of
 names, from twenty years old and upward, all that were able to go
39 Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe
two thousand and seven hundred.
 the children of Asher, by their generations, after their
 their fathers, according to the number of
ard, all that were able to go
r; 1:41 Those that were numbered of them, even of the tribe
d one thousand and five hundred.
f the children of Naphtali, throughout their generations, after
the house of their fathers, according to the number
 old and upward, all that were able to
 forth to war; 1:43 Those that were numbered of them, even of the
, were fifty and three thousand and four hundred.
numbered, which Moses and Aaron
 and the princes of Israel, being twelve men: each one was
hers.
numbered of the children of Israel,
e house of their fathers, from twenty years old and upward, all
o forth to war in Israel; 1:46 Even all they that
ousand and three thousand and five
d and fifty.
 the tribe of their fathers were not
ered among them.
spoken unto Moses, saying, 1:49 Only thou shalt
er take the sum of them among the
n of Israel: 1:50 But thou shalt appoint the Levites over the
ny, and over all the vessels thereof, and over
hall bear the tabernacle, and all
sels thereof; and they shall minister unto it, and shall encamp
ernacle.
etteth forward, the Levites shall take
 down: and when the tabernacle is to be pitched, the Levites shall
he stranger that cometh nigh shall be put to death.
el shall pitch their tents, every man by
his own camp, and every man by his own standard, throughout their
t the Levites shall pitch round about the tabernacle of
 wrath upon the congregation of the
ren of Israel: and the Levites shall keep the charge of the
.
ccording to all that the LORD
oses, so did they.
ke unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 2:2 Every
 pitch by his own standard, with
gn of their father's house: far off about the tabernacle of
they pitch.
ward the rising of the sun shall they of
the standard of the camp of Judah pitch throughout their armies: and
n of Amminadab shall be captain of the children of
those that were numbered of them, were
reescore and fourteen thousand and six hundred.
unto him shall be the tribe of
and Nethaneel the son of Zuar shall be captain of the
And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and
d four hundred.
ebulun: and Eliab the son of Helon shall be
2:8 And his host, and those that were numbered thereof, were fifty and
nd and four hundred.
numbered in the camp of Judah were an hundred
ix thousand and four hundred,
their armies. These shall first set forth.
andard of the camp of Reuben
 their armies: and the captain of the children of Reuben
 Shedeur.
that were numbered thereof, were forty
d six thousand and five hundred.
nd those which pitch by him shall be the tribe of Simeon: and
ildren of Simeon shall be Shelumiel the son of
nd those that were numbered of them, were fifty
.
aptain of the sons of Gad shall
ph the son of Reuel.
 and those that were numbered of them, were forty
 and fifty.
 in the camp of Reuben were an hundred
ousand and fifty and one thousand and four hundred and fifty,
es. And they shall set forth in the second rank.
congregation shall set forward with
amp of the Levites in the midst of the camp: as they encamp, so
ard, every man in his place by their standards.
e standard of the camp of Ephraim
ng to their armies: and the captain of the sons of Ephraim
n of Ammihud.
ose that were numbered of them, were forty
y him shall be the tribe of Manasseh: and the captain of the
hall be Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.
:21 And his host, and those that were numbered of them, were thirty
d and two hundred.
of Benjamin: and the captain of the sons of
eoni.
 were numbered of them, were thirty
ive thousand and four hundred.
 that were numbered of the camp of Ephraim were an hundred
and and an hundred, throughout their armies.
 rank.
 Dan shall be on the north side by
armies: and the captain of the children of Dan shall be Ahiezer
dai.
were numbered of them, were
d two thousand and seven hundred.
And those that encamp by him shall be the tribe of Asher: and the
ildren of Asher shall be Pagiel the son of Ocran.
at were numbered of them, were forty
one thousand and five hundred.
n the tribe of Naphtali: and the captain of the children of
 the son of Enan.
d those that were numbered of them, were fifty

e camp of Dan were an hundred
d fifty and seven thousand and six hundred. They shall go
ards.
umbered of the children of Israel by
house of their fathers: all those that were numbered of the camps
hosts were six hundred thousand and three thousand
:33 But the Levites were not numbered among the children of Israel;
manded Moses.
Israel did according to all that the LORD
 standards, and so they set
y one after their families, according to the house of
lso are the generations of Aaron and Moses in the day that
s in mount Sinai.
 names of the sons of Aaron; Nadab the firstborn,

Aaron, the priests which were
hom he consecrated to minister in the priest's office.
ed before the LORD, when they offered
ange fire before the LORD, in the wilderness of Sinai, and they had
d Eleazar and Ithamar ministered in the priest's office
 father.
ses, saying, 3:6 Bring the tribe of Levi
near, and present them before Aaron the priest, that they may minister

he charge of the whole
e the tabernacle of the congregation, to do the
nd they shall keep all the instruments of the tabernacle of the
he charge of the children of Israel, to do the
d thou shalt give the Levites unto Aaron and to his sons: they
o him out of the children of Israel.
10 And thou shalt appoint Aaron and his sons, and they shall wait on
 office: and the stranger that cometh nigh shall be put
ORD spake unto Moses, saying, 3:12 And I, behold, I have
ng the children of Israel instead of all the
g the children of Israel:
evites shall be mine; 3:13 Because all the firstborn
I smote all the firstborn in the land of
Egypt I hallowed unto me all the firstborn in Israel, both man and
l they be: I am the LORD.
LORD spake unto Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, saying,
of Levi after the house of their fathers, by
h old and upward shalt thou

to the word of the LORD, as he
ded.
vi by their names; Gershon, and
nd Merari.
 of the sons of Gershon by their families;
of Kohath by their families; Amram, and Izehar,
 sons of Merari by their families; Mahli, and Mushi. These
Levites according to the house of their
athers.
of the Libnites, and the family of the
imites: these are the families of the Gershonites.
of them, according to the number of all
he males, from a month old and upward, even those that were numbered
even thousand and five hundred.
e families of the Gershonites shall pitch behind the tabernacle
nd the chief of the house of the father of the Gershonites shall
n of Lael.
ons of Gershon in the tabernacle of the
ongregation shall be the tabernacle, and the tent, the covering
nging for the door of the tabernacle of the
the court, and the curtain for
f the court, which is by the tabernacle, and by the altar
s of it for all the service thereof.
27 And of Kohath was the family of the Amramites, and the family of
 and the family of the Hebronites, and the family of
families of the Kohathites.
 number of all the males, from a month old and upward, were
hundred, keeping the charge of the sanctuary.
hath shall pitch on the side of the
nacle southward.
the house of the father of the families of the
n of Uzziel.
l be the ark, and the table, and the
lestick, and the altars, and the vessels of the sanctuary
and the hanging, and all the service thereof.
he priest shall be chief over the
f the Levites, and have the oversight of them that keep the
.
Mahlites, and the family of the
 these are the families of Merari.
 And those that were numbered of them, according to the number of
om a month old and upward, were six thousand and two
 of the house of the father of the families of
: these shall pitch on the side of
bernacle northward.
custody and charge of the sons of Merari shall be
 the bars thereof, and the pillars
f, and the sockets thereof, and all the vessels thereof, and all
to, 3:37 And the pillars of the court round about,
s, and their cords.
 encamp before the tabernacle toward the east, even
ngregation eastward, shall be Moses,
Aaron and his sons, keeping the charge of the sanctuary for the
ren of Israel; and the stranger that cometh nigh
 that were numbered of the Levites, which Moses and Aaron
nt of the LORD, throughout their families,
d, were twenty and two
And the LORD said unto Moses, Number all the firstborn of the
 of Israel from a month old and upward, and take
 And thou shalt take the Levites for me (I am the LORD) instead of
n among the children of Israel; and the cattle of the
rstlings among the cattle of the children
 the LORD commanded him, all the firstborn
d all the firstborn males by the number of names, from a month
hose that were numbered of them, were twenty and
score and thirteen.
pake unto Moses, saying, 3:45 Take the Levites
he children of Israel, and the
the Levites instead of their cattle; and the Levites shall

med of the two hundred and
 thirteen of the firstborn of the children of Israel,
es; 3:47 Thou shalt even take five
s apiece by the poll, after the shekel of the sanctuary shalt
shekel is twenty gerahs:) 3:48 And thou shalt
ber of them is to be redeemed,
 and to his sons.
he redemption money of them that were over and
 Levites: 3:50 Of the firstborn of
ildren of Israel took he the money; a thousand three hundred and
e shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary: 3:51
 that were redeemed unto Aaron and to
 sons, according to the word of the LORD, as the LORD commanded
he LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 4:2 Take the
hath from among the sons of Levi, after their
rs, 4:3 From thirty years old and
even until fifty years old, all that enter into the host, to do
ernacle of the congregation.
hall be the service of the sons of Kohath in the tabernacle
out the most holy things: 4:5 And when the camp
and his sons, and they shall take
e covering vail, and cover the ark of testimony with it: 4:6
the covering of badgers' skins, and shall spread
d shall put in the staves thereof.
And upon the table of shewbread they shall spread a cloth of blue,
the dishes, and the spoons, and the bowls, and covers
inual bread shall be thereon: 4:8 And
y shall spread upon them a cloth of scarlet, and cover the same
badgers' skins, and shall put in the staves
loth of blue, and cover the candlestick of
 and his snuffdishes, and all
sels thereof, wherewith they minister unto it: 4:10 And
he vessels thereof within a covering of
adgers' skins, and shall put it upon a bar.
hall spread a cloth of blue, and
 with a covering of badgers' skins, and shall put to the
hey shall take all the instruments of
istry, wherewith they minister in the sanctuary, and put them in a
nd cover them with a covering of badgers' skins, and
And they shall take away the ashes from
he altar, and spread a purple cloth thereon: 4:14 And they shall put
e vessels thereof, wherewith they minister about it,
ks, and the shovels, and the basons, all
the vessels of the altar; and they shall spread upon it a covering of
s, and put to the staves of it.
d when Aaron and his sons have made an end of covering the
essels of the sanctuary, as the camp is to set
ath shall come to bear it: but
 not touch any holy thing, lest they die. These things are
f Kohath in the tabernacle of the
ation.
r the son of Aaron the priest
the oil for the light, and the sweet incense, and the daily
anointing oil, and the oversight of all the
 in the sanctuary, and in the
reof.
s and unto Aaron saying, 4:18 Cut ye
off the tribe of the families of the Kohathites from among the
us do unto them, that they may live, and not die,
holy things: Aaron and his sons shall
in, and appoint them every one to his service and to his burden:
l not go in to see when the holy things are covered,
 LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 4:22 Take also the sum of
ughout the houses of their fathers, by their
nd upward until fifty years old
u number them; all that enter in to perform the service, to
rnacle of the congregation.
s the service of the families of the Gershonites, to serve,
nd they shall bear the curtains of the
bernacle, and the tabernacle of the congregation, his covering, and
 the badgers' skins that is above upon it, and the
rnacle of the congregation, 4:26 And
hangings of the court, and the hanging for the door of the gate of
 is by the tabernacle and by the altar round about,
struments of their service, and all
is made for them: so shall they serve.
4:27 At the appointment of Aaron and his sons shall be all the service
of the Gershonites, in all their burdens, and in all their
point unto them in charge all their burdens.
lies of the sons of Gershon in the
acle of the congregation: and their charge shall be under the
on of Aaron the priest.
 sons of Merari, thou shalt number them after their
 fathers; 4:30 From thirty years old
upward even unto fifty years old shalt thou number them, every one
to the service, to do the work of the tabernacle of
his is the charge of their burden, according to all their
 of the congregation; the boards of the
abernacle, and the bars thereof, and the pillars thereof, and sockets
 And the pillars of the court round about, and their
heir cords, with all their instruments,
nd with all their service: and by name ye shall reckon the
e of their burden.
vice of the families of the sons of Merari,
tabernacle of the congregation,
 hand of Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest.
ief of the congregation numbered
 of the Kohathites after their families, and after the house
 From thirty years old and upward even unto
h into the service, for the
abernacle of the congregation: 4:36 And those that were
amilies were two thousand seven hundred and
e numbered of the families of the
tes, all that might do service in the tabernacle of the
nd Aaron did number according to the
andment of the LORD by the hand of Moses.
e sons of Gershon, throughout
ies, and by the house of their fathers, 4:39 From thirty
unto fifty years old, every one that
reth into the service, for the work in the tabernacle of the
n those that were numbered of them, throughout
r fathers, were two thousand and
red and thirty.
t were numbered of the families of the sons of
e in the tabernacle of the
whom Moses and Aaron did number according to the
nd those that were numbered of the families of the sons of
 families, by the house of their fathers, 4:43
n unto fifty years old, every one
tereth into the service, for the work in the tabernacle of the
ven those that were numbered of them after their
two hundred.
ere numbered of the families of the sons of
ccording to the word of the
and of Moses.
numbered of the Levites, whom Moses and Aaron
er their families, and after the
 their fathers, 4:47 From thirty years old and upward even
ery one that came to do the service of the
in the tabernacle of the

m, were eight thousand and
nd fourscore, 4:49 According to the commandment of the
he hand of Moses, every one according to
his service, and according to his burden: thus were they numbered of
RD commanded Moses.
ake unto Moses, saying, 5:2 Command the children of
e camp every leper, and every one that
th an issue, and whosoever is defiled by the dead: 5:3 Both male and
e put out, without the camp shall ye put them; that they
 the midst whereof I dwell.
 children of Israel did so, and put them out without the
to Moses, so did the children of Israel.

g, 5:6 Speak unto the children
 When a man or woman shall commit any sin that men commit,
 the LORD, and that person be guilty; 5:7 Then
hey have done: and he shall
s trespass with the principal thereof, and add unto it
give it unto him against whom he hath
spassed.
sman to recompense the trespass unto,
 the trespass be recompensed unto the LORD, even to the priest;
he atonement, whereby an atonement shall be made
 of all the holy things of the children of
, shall be his.
llowed things shall be his: whatsoever any man

ing, 5:12 Speak unto the
el, and say unto them, If any man's wife go aside, and
m, 5:13 And a man lie with her carnally,
and it be hid from the eyes of her husband, and be kept close, and she
and there be no witness against her, neither she be taken
 the spirit of jealousy come upon him, and he
filed: or if the spirit of
upon him, and he be jealous of his wife, and she be not
e man bring his wife unto the priest, and
tenth part of an ephah of
 shall pour no oil upon it, nor put frankincense
jealousy, an offering of memorial,
ng iniquity to remembrance.
e priest shall bring her near, and set her before the LORD:
ll take holy water in an earthen vessel; and of
e tabernacle the priest shall take,
ut it into the water: 5:18 And the priest shall set the woman
uncover the woman's head, and put the offering of
he jealousy offering: and the priest
l have in his hand the bitter water that causeth the curse: 5:19
ll charge her by an oath, and say unto the woman, If
d if thou hast not gone aside to
ess with another instead of thy husband, be thou free from
auseth the curse: 5:20 But if thou hast gone
d, and if thou be defiled, and
ave lain with thee beside thine husband: 5:21 Then the
n with an oath of cursing, and the priest
hee a curse and an oath among
 when the LORD doth make thy thigh to rot, and thy belly to
ter that causeth the curse shall go into thy
d thy thigh to rot: And the
ay, Amen, amen.
ll write these curses in a book, and he shall
5:24 And he shall cause the woman
k the bitter water that causeth the curse: and the water that
ll enter into her, and become bitter.
:25 Then the priest shall take the jealousy offering out of the
hall wave the offering before the LORD, and offer
riest shall take an handful of the
ng, even the memorial thereof, and burn it upon the altar, and
e the woman to drink the water.
d when he hath made her to drink the water, then it shall come
e be defiled, and have done trespass against her
th the curse shall enter into her,
come bitter, and her belly shall swell, and her thigh shall rot:
l be a curse among her people.
 if the woman be not defiled, but be clean; then she shall be
ive seed.
usies, when a wife goeth aside to another
:30 Or when the spirit of
 upon him, and he be jealous over his wife, and shall
, and the priest shall execute upon her
ll this law.
 guiltless from iniquity, and this woman
shall bear her iniquity.
RD spake unto Moses, saying, 6:2 Speak unto the children
em, When either man or woman shall separate
to separate themselves unto the
 He shall separate himself from wine and strong drink, and
f wine, or vinegar of strong drink, neither
r eat moist grapes, or dried.
he days of his separation shall he eat nothing that is made
the kernels even to the husk.
he days of the vow of his separation there shall no razor
 the days be fulfilled, in the which he
eparateth himself unto the LORD, he shall be holy, and shall let the
air of his head grow.
that he separateth himself unto the LORD he shall
hall not make himself unclean for his father, or for his
r for his sister, when they die: because the
ad.
he is holy unto the LORD.
y man die very suddenly by him, and he hath defiled the
hen he shall shave his head in the day of
e shave it.
he shall bring two turtles, or two young
pigeons, to the priest, to the door of the tabernacle of the
 the priest shall offer the one for a sin
ing, and make an atonement
hat he sinned by the dead, and shall hallow his head
shall consecrate unto the LORD the days of his separation,
f the first year for a trespass offering: but
st, because his separation was

, when the days of his
filled: he shall be brought unto the door of the
14 And he shall offer his offering
he LORD, one he lamb of the first year without blemish for a
e ewe lamb of the first year without blemish for
t blemish for peace offerings, 6:15
 basket of unleavened bread, cakes of fine flour mingled with
leavened bread anointed with oil, and their meat
s.
 before the LORD, and shall offer
 offering, and his burnt offering: 6:17 And he shall offer the
of peace offerings unto the LORD, with the basket
hall offer also his meat offering,
s drink offering.
 shall shave the head of his separation at the
gation, and shall take the hair of
ad of his separation, and put it in the fire which is under the
ace offerings.
l take the sodden shoulder of the ram, and one
nd one unleavened wafer, and shall
em upon the hands of the Nazarite, after the hair of his
 And the priest shall wave them for a wave
or the priest, with the wave
eave shoulder: and after that the Nazarite may drink wine.
f the Nazarite who hath vowed, and of his
, beside that that his hand
cording to the vow which he vowed, so he must do after

ng, 6:23 Speak unto Aaron and
ns, saying, On this wise ye shall bless the children of
:24 The LORD bless thee, and keep thee:
:25 The LORD make his face shine upon thee, and be gracious unto
D lift up his countenance upon thee, and give thee
t my name upon the children of Israel, and I
 pass on the day that Moses had fully set up the
nd sanctified it, and all the
 thereof, both the altar and all the vessels thereof, and
nctified them; 7:2 That the princes of
rael, heads of the house of their fathers, who were the princes of
were over them that were numbered, offered: 7:3 And
ore the LORD, six covered wagons, and
lve oxen; a wagon for two of the princes, and for each one an ox:
them before the tabernacle.
 LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 7:5 Take it of them, that
vice of the tabernacle of the congregation;
es, to every man according to
.
 oxen, and gave them unto the

 the sons of Gershon,
service: 7:8 And four wagons and eight oxen he gave
ing unto their service, under the hand
 Ithamar the son of Aaron the priest.
:9 But unto the sons of Kohath he gave none: because the service of
elonging unto them was that they should bear upon their
princes offered for dedicating of the altar in the day
he princes offered their offering before
the altar.
Moses, They shall offer their offering,
ach prince on his day, for the dedicating of the altar.
his offering the first day was Nahshon the
 7:13 And his offering was one
rger, the weight thereof was an hundred and thirty shekels,
nty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary;
r mingled with oil for a meat
:14 One spoon of ten shekels of gold, full of incense: 7:15
ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt
r a sin offering: 7:17 And for a
e of peace offerings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five
ear: this was the offering of Nahshon the son of
ay Nethaneel the son of Zuar, prince of Issachar,
s offering one silver charger, the
 whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of
er the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full
r a meat offering: 7:20 One spoon of
 of ten shekels, full of incense: 7:21 One young bullock, one ram,
first year, for a burnt offering: 7:22 One kid of the
3 And for a sacrifice of peace offerings,
lambs of the first year: this
ering of Nethaneel the son of Zuar.
4 On the third day Eliab the son of Helon, prince of the children
ffer: 7:25 His offering was one silver charger, the
nd thirty shekels, one silver bowl of
enty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full
ngled with oil for a meat offering: 7:26 One golden
ncense: 7:27 One young bullock, one
one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 7:28 One kid of
in offering: 7:29 And for a sacrifice of peace
 he goats, five lambs of the first
this was the offering of Eliab the son of Helon.
e son of Shedeur, prince of the
of Reuben, did offer: 7:31 His offering was one silver
hundred and thirty shekels, one silver
wl of seventy shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of
 flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 7:32 One
full of incense: 7:33 One young bullock,
one ram, one lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 7:34 One
s for a sin offering: 7:35 And for a sacrifice of peace
ams, five he goats, five lambs of the first
he son of Shedeur.
y Shelumiel the son of Zurishaddai, prince of the
37 His offering was one silver
he weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one
kels, after the shekel of the sanctuary;
both of them full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering:
en spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 7:39 One young
 of the first year, for a burnt offering:
ing: 7:41 And for a sacrifice
ferings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of
 the offering of Shelumiel the son of
ishaddai.
h the son of Deuel, prince of the
n of Gad, offered: 7:43 His offering was one silver charger of
dred and thirty shekels, a silver bowl of seventy
sanctuary; both of them full of fine
r mingled with oil for a meat offering: 7:44 One golden spoon of
of incense: 7:45 One young bullock, one ram, one
t offering: 7:46 One kid of the
 a sin offering: 7:47 And for a sacrifice of peace offerings,
five he goats, five lambs of the first year: this
son of Deuel.
lishama the son of Ammihud, prince of the
fering was one silver
 whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one
er the shekel of the sanctuary;
hem full of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering:
of ten shekels, full of incense: 7:51 One young
irst year, for a burnt offering:
 kid of the goats for a sin offering: 7:53 And for a sacrifice
two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of
ring of Elishama the son of Ammihud.
54 On the eighth day offered Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur, prince of
f Manasseh: 7:55 His offering was one silver charger of
d thirty shekels, one silver bowl of
nty shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full
gled with oil for a meat offering: 7:56 One golden
cense: 7:57 One young bullock, one
ne lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 7:58 One kid of
n offering: 7:59 And for a sacrifice of peace
he goats, five lambs of the first
his was the offering of Gamaliel the son of Pedahzur.
n the son of Gideoni, prince of the
ren of Benjamin, offered: 7:61 His offering was one silver
eof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one
e shekel of the sanctuary;
ull of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering:
n shekels, full of incense: 7:63 One young
year, for a burnt offering:
of the goats for a sin offering: 7:65 And for a sacrifice
xen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of
of Abidan the son of Gideoni.
he tenth day Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai, prince of the
: 7:67 His offering was one silver charger,
hirty shekels, one silver bowl
 shekels, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them
d with oil for a meat offering: 7:68 One
golden spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 7:69 One young bullock,
lamb of the first year, for a burnt offering: 7:70 One
ffering: 7:71 And for a sacrifice of peace
goats, five lambs of the first
 was the offering of Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.
iel the son of Ocran, prince of the
ren of Asher, offered: 7:73 His offering was one silver charger,
 was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl
hekel of the sanctuary; both of them
 of fine flour mingled with oil for a meat offering: 7:74 One
hekels, full of incense: 7:75 One young bullock,
r, for a burnt offering: 7:76 One
the goats for a sin offering: 7:77 And for a sacrifice of peace
, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first
Pagiel the son of Ocran.
elfth day Ahira the son of Enan, prince of the children
His offering was one silver charger, the
weight whereof was an hundred and thirty shekels, one silver bowl of
s, after the shekel of the sanctuary; both of them full
oil for a meat offering: 7:80 One golden
spoon of ten shekels, full of incense: 7:81 One young bullock, one
 the first year, for a burnt offering: 7:82 One kid of
: 7:83 And for a sacrifice of peace
ings, two oxen, five rams, five he goats, five lambs of the first
e offering of Ahira the son of Enan.
84 This was the dedication of the altar, in the day when it was
inces of Israel: twelve chargers of silver, twelve
old: 7:85 Each charger of silver
 an hundred and thirty shekels, each bowl seventy: all the
wo thousand and four hundred shekels, after
olden spoons were twelve, full
, weighing ten shekels apiece, after the shekel of the
he spoons was an hundred and twenty
ls.
ering were twelve bullocks, the
ve, the lambs of the first year twelve, with their meat
he goats for sin offering twelve.
And all the oxen for the sacrifice of the peace offerings were
ocks, the rams sixty, the he goats sixty, the
as the dedication of the altar,
t it was anointed.
was gone into the tabernacle of the congregation
he voice of one speaking unto him
f the mercy seat that was upon the ark of testimony, from
: and he spake unto him.
RD spake unto Moses, saying, 8:2 Speak unto Aaron and
est the lamps, the seven lamps shall give
3 And Aaron did so; he lighted the lamps thereof over against the
he LORD commanded Moses.
ork of the candlestick was of beaten gold, unto the
 thereof, was beaten work: according
 the pattern which the LORD had shewed Moses, so he made the
d the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 8:6 Take the Levites from
f Israel, and cleanse them.
s shalt thou do unto them, to cleanse them: Sprinkle water
and let them shave all their flesh, and let
emselves clean.
a young bullock with his meat offering, even
er young bullock shalt thou take
n offering.
e Levites before the tabernacle of the
ngregation: and thou shalt gather the whole assembly of the children
ther: 8:10 And thou shalt bring the Levites before the
rael shall put their hands upon the
es: 8:11 And Aaron shall offer the Levites before the LORD for an
hildren of Israel, that they may execute the service
evites shall lay their hands upon the heads of the
he one for a sin offering, and the
for a burnt offering, unto the LORD, to make an atonement for
And thou shalt set the Levites before Aaron, and before his sons,
r an offering unto the LORD.
shalt thou separate the Levites from among the children of
shall be mine.
l the Levites go in to do the service of the
ou shalt cleanse them, and offer
 an offering.
given unto me from among the children of
Israel; instead of such as open every womb, even instead of the
e children of Israel, have I taken them unto me.
e children of Israel are mine, both
nd beast: on the day that I smote every firstborn in the land of
 them for myself.
 the Levites for all the firstborn of the
ven the Levites as a gift to Aaron and to his sons
l, to do the service of the children
srael in the tabernacle of the congregation, and to make an
ren of Israel: that there be no plague among
ren of Israel come nigh unto the
y.
he congregation of the children of
, did to the Levites according unto all that the LORD commanded
e Levites, so did the children of Israel unto them.
ified, and they washed their clothes; and
the LORD; and Aaron made an
 them to cleanse them.
hat went the Levites in to do their service in the
efore Aaron, and before his sons: as
LORD had commanded Moses concerning the Levites, so did they unto
 the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 8:24 This is it that
: from twenty and five years old and upward
ce of the tabernacle of the
 8:25 And from the age of fifty years they shall cease
reof, and shall serve no more: 8:26 But
hall minister with their brethren in the tabernacle of the
e charge, and shall do no service. Thus shalt
ir charge.
Moses in the wilderness of Sinai, in the
first month of the second year after they were come out of the land of
g, 9:2 Let the children of Israel also keep the passover

 at even, ye shall keep it in
ed season: according to all the rites of it, and according
ereof, shall ye keep it.
spake unto the children of Israel, that they should keep
hey kept the passover on the fourteenth day of the first
rness of Sinai: according to all that the
 of Israel.
men, who were defiled by the dead body of a
ver on that day: and they came
es and before Aaron on that day: 9:7 And those men said unto
 the dead body of a man: wherefore are we kept
ing of the LORD in his appointed
mong the children of Israel?  9:8 And Moses said unto them,
 hear what the LORD will command concerning
es, saying, 9:10 Speak unto the
of Israel, saying, If any man of you or of your posterity
n of a dead body, or be in a journey afar
the LORD.
e second month at even they shall keep
, and eat it with unleavened bread and bitter herbs.
f it unto the morning, nor break any bone
 the passover they shall keep
 But the man that is clean, and is not in a journey, and
sover, even the same soul shall be cut off
t not the offering of the LORD
ointed season, that man shall bear his sin.
among you, and will keep the
o the LORD; according to the ordinance of the passover,
 thereof, so shall he do: ye shall have one
or him that was born in the
 And on the day that the tabernacle was reared up the cloud
 namely, the tent of the testimony: and at even
 were the appearance of fire, until
orning.
 covered it by day, and the appearance
 fire by night.
 was taken up from the tabernacle, then after
: and in the place where the
 there the children of Israel pitched their tents.
 LORD the children of Israel journeyed,
nd at the commandment of the LORD they pitched: as long as the cloud
 tabernacle they rested in their tents.

 the tabernacle many days,
ren of Israel kept the charge of the LORD, and journeyed
, when the cloud was a few days upon the tabernacle;
f the LORD they abode in their tents,
 according to the commandment of the LORD they journeyed.
n the cloud abode from even unto the morning,
e morning, then they journeyed:
t was by day or by night that the cloud was taken up, they
ether it were two days, or a month, or a year, that the
rnacle, remaining thereon, the children of
ed not: but when it was taken
urneyed.
 LORD they rested in the tents, and at
e commandment of the LORD they journeyed: they kept the charge of
commandment of the LORD by the hand of Moses.
 saying, 10:2 Make thee two
ilver; of a whole piece shalt thou make them: that thou
ling of the assembly, and for the
ing of the camps.
all blow with them, all the assembly shall
of the tabernacle of the

t, then the princes, which
he thousands of Israel, shall gather themselves unto
alarm, then the camps that lie on the east parts
blow an alarm the second time, then the camps that lie on
 their journey: they shall blow an alarm for
ongregation is to be gathered together, ye shall
arm.
iests, shall blow with the trumpets;
they shall be to you for an ordinance for ever throughout your
 And if ye go to war in your land against the enemy that
all blow an alarm with the trumpets; and ye
r God, and ye shall be saved
emies.
adness, and in your solemn days, and
he beginnings of your months, ye shall blow with the trumpets over
ings, and over the sacrifices of your peace offerings;
a memorial before your God: I am the LORD
 the twentieth day of the second month, in
n up from off the tabernacle
mony.
took their journeys out of the
 of Sinai; and the cloud rested in the wilderness of Paran.
took their journey according to the commandment

rd of the camp of the children
ccording to their armies: and over his host was Nahshon the
:15 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Issachar was
n of Zuar.
he tribe of the children of Zebulun was
liab the son of Helon.
bernacle was taken down; and the sons of Gershon and
, bearing the tabernacle.
 standard of the camp of Reuben set forward according to
 host was Elizur the son of Shedeur.
:19 And over the host of the tribe of the children of Simeon was
of Zurishaddai.
 of the tribe of the children of Gad was
Eliasaph the son of Deuel.
e Kohathites set forward, bearing the sanctuary: and the
nacle against they came.
standard of the camp of the children of Ephraim set
es: and over his host was Elishama the
n of Ammihud.
f the tribe of the children of Manasseh was
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Benjamin was
deoni.
mp of the children of Dan set forward,
ich was the rereward of all the camps throughout their hosts: and
 Ahiezer the son of Ammishaddai.
And over the host of the tribe of the children of Asher was
.
of the children of Naphtali was
 son of Enan.
eyings of the children of Israel according to

n of Raguel the Midianite,
in law, We are journeying unto the place of which the
: come thou with us, and we will do thee
good: for the LORD hath spoken good concerning Israel.
, I will not go; but I will depart to mine
d he said, Leave us not, I pray thee; forasmuch as thou
p in the wilderness, and thou mayest be to
l be, if thou go with us, yea, it shall be, that what
to us, the same will we do unto thee.
0:33 And they departed from the mount of the LORD three days'
of the covenant of the LORD went before them in
out a resting place for them.
 the cloud of the LORD was upon them by day, when they went
35 And it came to pass, when the ark set forward, that Moses said,
nd let thine enemies be scattered; and let them that

, O LORD, unto the many
el.
, it displeased the LORD: and the
ard it; and his anger was kindled; and the fire of the LORD
onsumed them that were in the uttermost parts
ried unto Moses; and when Moses prayed unto the
3 And he called the name of the place Taberah: because the fire of
mong them.
that was among them fell a lusting: and
he children of Israel also wept again, and said, Who shall give us
1:5 We remember the fish, which we did eat in Egypt
melons, and the leeks, and the onions,
d the garlick: 11:6 But now our soul is dried away: there is nothing
 this manna, before our eyes.
the manna was as coriander seed, and the colour thereof as

hered it, and ground it in
 it in a mortar, and baked it in pans, and made cakes of
s as the taste of fresh oil.
hen the dew fell upon the camp in the night, the manna fell
Moses heard the people weep throughout their families,
 tent: and the anger of the LORD was
led greatly; Moses also was displeased.

fore hast thou afflicted thy
 wherefore have I not found favour in thy sight, that thou
 this people upon me?  11:12 Have I conceived
, that thou shouldest say unto
them in thy bosom, as a nursing father beareth the sucking
ch thou swarest unto their fathers?  11:13
all this people? for they weep
aying, Give us flesh, that we may eat.
11:14 I am not able to bear all this people alone, because it is too

ll me, I pray thee, out of
e found favour in thy sight; and let me not see my
ORD said unto Moses, Gather unto me seventy men of the
knowest to be the elders of the people,
nd officers over them; and bring them unto the tabernacle of the
 they may stand there with thee.
And I will come down and talk with thee there: and I will take
is upon thee, and will put it upon them; and they
le with thee, that thou bear it not
lf alone.
eople, Sanctify yourselves against to
row, and ye shall eat flesh: for ye have wept in the ears of the
shall give us flesh to eat? for it was well with us
ll give you flesh, and ye shall eat.
:19 Ye shall not eat one day, nor two days, nor five days, neither
enty days; 11:20 But even a whole month, until it come
 be loathsome unto you: because that ye
ave despised the LORD which is among you, and have wept before him,
e we forth out of Egypt?  11:21 And Moses said, The
x hundred thousand footmen; and thou
 said, I will give them flesh, that they may eat a whole month.
locks and the herds be slain for them, to suffice
he sea be gathered together for them,
suffice them?  11:23 And the LORD said unto Moses, Is the LORD's
thou shalt see now whether my word shall come to
d Moses went out, and told the people the words of the LORD,
ty men of the elders of the people, and set them
25 And the LORD came down in a cloud, and spake unto him, and took
at was upon him, and gave it unto the seventy elders:
en the spirit rested upon them, they
hesied, and did not cease.
ere remained two of the men in the camp, the name of the
e of the other Medad: and the spirit rested
ere written, but went not out
bernacle: and they prophesied in the camp.
old Moses, and said, Eldad and
rophesy in the camp.
he son of Nun, the servant of Moses, one of his
rd Moses, forbid them.
said unto him, Enviest thou for my sake? would God
prophets, and that the LORD would put
 spirit upon them!  11:30 And Moses gat him into the camp, he and
ael.
from the LORD, and brought quails
e sea, and let them fall by the camp, as it were a day's
as it were a day's journey on the other
ide, round about the camp, and as it were two cubits high upon the
h.
at day, and all that night, and
ext day, and they gathered the quails: he that gathered least
and they spread them all abroad for themselves
hile the flesh was yet between their teeth, ere it was
D was kindled against the people, and the
lague.
that place Kibrothhattaavah: because
e they buried the people that lusted.
1:35 And the people journeyed from Kibrothhattaavah unto Hazeroth;
eroth.
against Moses because of the Ethiopian
man whom he had married: for he had married an Ethiopian woman.
d, Hath the LORD indeed spoken only by Moses? hath he
e LORD heard it.
s was very meek, above all the men which were
d the LORD spake suddenly unto
 unto Aaron, and unto Miriam, Come out ye three unto the
tion. And they three came out.
 the LORD came down in the pillar of the cloud, and stood in
acle, and called Aaron and Miriam: and they both
ear now my words: If there be a prophet among you,
n unto him in a vision, and will speak
to him in a dream.
s is not so, who is faithful in all mine house.
to mouth, even apparently, and not in
k speeches; and the similitude of the LORD shall he behold:
not afraid to speak against my servant Moses?
ndled against them; and he
2:10 And the cloud departed from off the tabernacle; and, behold,
rous, white as snow: and Aaron looked upon Miriam,

 lord, I beseech thee, lay
on us, wherein we have done foolishly, and wherein we
 not be as one dead, of whom the flesh is half consumed
other's womb.
o the LORD, saying, Heal her now, O God, I
 unto Moses, If her father had but spit in her
n days? let her be shut out from
 seven days, and after that let her be received in again.
ut out from the camp seven days: and the people
ht in again.
ople removed from Hazeroth, and pitched in
 LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 13:2 Send thou men, that
f Canaan, which I give unto the children of
 shall ye send a man, every one
mong them.
dment of the LORD sent them from the
erness of Paran: all those men were heads of the children of
ese were their names: of the tribe of Reuben, Shammua the
 the tribe of Simeon, Shaphat the son of Hori.
the son of Jephunneh.
 of Issachar, Igal the son of Joseph.
3:8 Of the tribe of Ephraim, Oshea the son of Nun.
 Palti the son of Raphu.
ribe of Zebulun, Gaddiel the son of Sodi.
f the tribe of Manasseh, Gaddi
 Susi.
l the son of Gemalli.
e of Asher, Sethur the son of Michael.
13:14 Of the tribe of Naphtali, Nahbi the son of Vophsi.
d, Geuel the son of Machi.
are the names of the men which Moses sent to spy out the
Oshea the son of Nun Jehoshua.
d Moses sent them to spy out the land of Canaan, and said unto
s way southward, and go up into the mountain:
nd the people that dwelleth
her they be strong or weak, few or many; 13:19 And what
 in, whether it be good or bad; and what
cities they be that they dwell in, whether in tents, or in strong
what the land is, whether it be fat or lean, whether
 And be ye of good courage, and bring of
the fruit of the land. Now the time was the time of the firstripe
So they went up, and searched the land from the wilderness of
n come to Hamath.
ed by the south, and came unto Hebron; where
ren of Anak, were. (Now Hebron
seven years before Zoan in Egypt.)  13:23 And they came unto
nd cut down from thence a branch with one
en two upon a staff; and they
the pomegranates, and of the figs.
4 The place was called the brook Eshcol, because of the cluster of
 children of Israel cut down from thence.
of the land after forty days.
 they went and came to Moses, and to Aaron, and to all the
dren of Israel, unto the wilderness of Paran,
 them, and unto all the
 shewed them the fruit of the land.
27 And they told him, and said, We came unto the land whither thou
surely it floweth with milk and honey; and this is the
heless the people be strong that dwell in the land, and
very great: and moreover we saw the
ren of Anak there.
 dwell in the land of the south: and the Hittites,
tes, dwell in the mountains: and the
anites dwell by the sea, and by the coast of Jordan.
people before Moses, and said, Let us go
up at once, and possess it; for we are well able to overcome it.
n that went up with him said, We be not able to go up
are stronger than we.
ought up an evil report of the land which they had
rael, saying, The land, through which
have gone to search it, is a land that eateth up the inhabitants
he people that we saw in it are men of a great
he giants, the sons of Anak, which come of the
 as grasshoppers, and so we were
 sight.
ifted up their voice, and cried; and
people wept that night.
e children of Israel murmured against Moses and against
gation said unto them, Would God that we
had died in the land of Egypt! or would God we had died in this
nd wherefore hath the LORD brought us unto this
r wives and our children should be
? were it not better for us to return into Egypt?  14:4 And they
r, Let us make a captain, and let us return into
n fell on their faces before all the assembly
f Israel.
n, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which
were of them that searched the land, rent their clothes: 14:7 And they
ll the company of the children of Israel, saying, The
 to search it, is an exceeding good land.
 will bring us into this land,
t us; a land which floweth with milk and honey.
e LORD, neither fear ye the people of
 land; for they are bread for us: their defence is departed from
 is with us: fear them not.
ll the congregation bade stone them with stones. And the
 in the tabernacle of the congregation
fore all the children of Israel.
And the LORD said unto Moses, How long will this people provoke
ill it be ere they believe me, for all the signs
4:12 I will smite them with the
e, and disinherit them, and will make of thee a greater
ey.
 Then the Egyptians shall hear it,
hou broughtest up this people in thy might from among them;)
ll it to the inhabitants of this land: for they
 this people, that thou LORD art
e to face, and that thy cloud standeth over them, and that
by day time in a pillar of a cloud, and in a
if thou shalt kill all this people as one man, then the
e fame of thee will speak, saying, 14:16
Because the LORD was not able to bring this people into the land which
o them, therefore he hath slain them in the wilderness.
thee, let the power of my LORD be great,
according as thou hast spoken, saying, 14:18 The LORD is
t mercy, forgiving iniquity and
sion, and by no means clearing the guilty, visiting the
n the children unto the third and fourth
generation.
e, the iniquity of this people according
unto the greatness of thy mercy, and as thou hast forgiven this
even until now.
, I have pardoned according to thy word: 14:21
h shall be filled with the glory
ORD.
have seen my glory, and my miracles,
h I did in Egypt and in the wilderness, and have tempted me now
d have not hearkened to my voice; 14:23 Surely they
sware unto their fathers, neither shall
ny of them that provoked me see it: 14:24 But my servant Caleb,
her spirit with him, and hath followed me fully,
reinto he went; and his seed shall
s it.
 Canaanites dwelt in the valley.)
w turn you, and get you into the wilderness by the way of the
 the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 14:27 How
 this evil congregation, which murmur against
e children of Israel, which they
gainst me.
y as I live, saith the LORD, as ye have
poken in mine ears, so will I do to you: 14:29 Your carcases shall
derness; and all that were numbered of you, according
enty years old and upward which have
ured against me.
ll not come into the land, concerning which I
 Caleb the son of Jephunneh, and
he son of Nun.
es, which ye said should be a prey, them will
and which ye have despised.
s for you, your carcases, they shall fall in this
ldren shall wander in the wilderness forty years,
ur carcases be wasted in the

hich ye searched the land, even
s, each day for a year, shall ye bear your iniquities, even
ll know my breach of promise.
he LORD have said, I will surely do it unto all this evil
thered together against me: in this
rness they shall be consumed, and there they shall die.
Moses sent to search the land, who returned,
r against him, by bringing up a
pon the land, 14:37 Even those men that did bring up the evil
 died by the plague before the LORD.
:38 But Joshua the son of Nun, and Caleb the son of Jephunneh, which
n that went to search the land, lived still.
nto all the children of Israel:
eople mourned greatly.
ose up early in the morning, and gat them up into the
Lo, we be here, and will go up unto the
lace which the LORD hath promised: for we have sinned.
efore now do ye transgress the commandment

ng you; that ye be not smitten
r enemies.
 the Canaanites are there before you, and
e turned away from the LORD,
e LORD will not be with you.
they presumed to go up unto the hill top: nevertheless the
he LORD, and Moses, departed not out of the
 down, and the Canaanites which dwelt in
that hill, and smote them, and discomfited them, even unto Hormah.
ORD spake unto Moses, saying, 15:2 Speak unto the
them, When ye be come into the land
ur habitations, which I give unto you, 15:3 And will make an
the LORD, a burnt offering, or a sacrifice in
fering, or in your solemn feasts,
 a sweet savour unto the LORD, of the herd or of the flock:
 offereth his offering unto the LORD bring a
 mingled with the fourth part of
f oil.
in of wine for a drink offering shalt
u prepare with the burnt offering or sacrifice, for one lamb.
thou shalt prepare for a meat offering two tenth
ird part of an hin of oil.
 a drink offering thou shalt offer the third part of an
vour unto the LORD.
preparest a bullock for a burnt offering, or for a
r peace offerings unto the LORD: 15:9
n shall he bring with a bullock a meat offering of three tenth
ed with half an hin of oil.
hou shalt bring for a drink offering half an hin of wine,
ire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD.
5:11 Thus shall it be done for one bullock, or for one ram, or for a
.
 shall prepare, so shall ye do to
ne according to their number.
 that are born of the country shall do these things after
an offering made by fire, of a sweet savour
er sojourn with you, or whosoever be among you in
an offering made by fire, of a sweet
ur unto the LORD; as ye do, so he shall do.
 you of the congregation, and
e stranger that sojourneth with you, an ordinance for ever
ye are, so shall the stranger be before the
hall be for you, and for the stranger
t sojourneth with you.
RD spake unto Moses, saying, 15:18 Speak unto the
them, When ye come into the land
I bring you, 15:19 Then it shall be, that, when ye eat of the
 shall offer up an heave offering unto the LORD.
f the first of your dough for an heave
fering: as ye do the heave offering of the threshingfloor, so shall

 give unto the LORD an heave
your generations.
erred, and not observed all these commandments,
es, 15:23 Even all that the LORD
manded you by the hand of Moses, from the day that the LORD
nceforward among your generations; 15:24 Then
 ignorance without the knowledge
ongregation, that all the congregation shall offer one young
fering, for a sweet savour unto the LORD, with
ering, according to the manner,
id of the goats for a sin offering.
25 And the priest shall make an atonement for all the congregation
of Israel, and it shall be forgiven them; for it is
 their offering, a sacrifice made by
 unto the LORD, and their sin offering before the LORD, for their
And it shall be forgiven all the congregation of the
ranger that sojourneth among them;
 all the people were in ignorance.
7 And if any soul sin through ignorance, then he shall bring a she
t year for a sin offering.
e priest shall make an atonement for the soul that sinneth
eth by ignorance before the LORD, to make an
given him.
for him that sinneth through ignorance,
oth for him that is born among the children of Israel, and for the
journeth among them.
 that doeth ought presumptuously, whether he be born
e same reproacheth the LORD; and that
l shall be cut off from among his people.
 of the LORD, and hath broken
ment, that soul shall utterly be cut off; his iniquity
And while the children of Israel were in the wilderness, they
ered sticks upon the sabbath day.
 And they that found him gathering sticks brought him unto Moses
o all the congregation.
put him in ward, because it was not declared what
nd the LORD said unto Moses, The man shall be surely put to
tion shall stone him with stones without the
n brought him without the camp, and
d him with stones, and he died; as the LORD commanded Moses.
pake unto Moses, saying, 15:38 Speak unto the
 they make them fringes in the
 their garments throughout their generations, and that they
the borders a ribband of blue: 15:39 And it
 may look upon it, and remember
ommandments of the LORD, and do them; and that ye seek not
 your own eyes, after which ye use to go a
 do all my commandments, and
 your God.
, which brought you out of the land of
ypt, to be your God: I am the LORD your God.
e son of Kohath, the son of Levi,
han and Abiram, the sons of Eliab, and On, the son of Peleth,
men: 16:2 And they rose up before Moses, with
o hundred and fifty princes of
ly, famous in the congregation, men of renown: 16:3 And they
gether against Moses and against Aaron, and said
ou, seeing all the congregation are
 every one of them, and the LORD is among them: wherefore then
s above the congregation of the LORD?  16:4 And
is face: 16:5 And he spake unto
 unto all his company, saying, Even to morrow the LORD will
ho is holy; and will cause him to come near
will he cause to come near unto
6:6 This do; Take you censers, Korah, and all his company; 16:7 And
n, and put incense in them before the LORD to morrow:
whom the LORD doth choose, he shall be
ly: ye take too much upon you, ye sons of Levi.
ear, I pray you, ye sons of Levi:
emeth it but a small thing unto you, that the God of Israel
 the congregation of Israel, to bring you near
tabernacle of the LORD, and to
re the congregation to minister unto them?  16:10 And he
him, and all thy brethren the sons of Levi
so?  16:11 For which cause
all thy company are gathered together against the LORD:
murmur against him?  16:12 And Moses sent
iab: which said, We will not
13 Is it a small thing that thou hast brought us up out of
 milk and honey, to kill us in the wilderness,
a prince over us?  16:14 Moreover
st not brought us into a land that floweth with milk and honey,
ance of fields and vineyards: wilt thou put out the
come up.
, and said unto the LORD, Respect not
u their offering: I have not taken one ass from them, neither have
em.
 thou and all thy company before
, thou, and they, and Aaron, to morrow: 16:17 And take every
t incense in them, and bring ye before the LORD
nd fifty censers; thou also, and
ach of you his censer.
ook every man his censer, and put fire in them, and
 in the door of the tabernacle of the
gregation with Moses and Aaron.
nd Korah gathered all the congregation against them unto the
 of the congregation: and the glory of the LORD

d unto Aaron, saying, 16:21
selves from among this congregation, that I may consume
And they fell upon their faces, and said, O God, the God of the
h, shall one man sin, and wilt thou be wroth with
the LORD spake unto Moses, saying,
Speak unto the congregation, saying, Get you up from about the
 Dathan, and Abiram.
se up and went unto Dathan and Abiram; and the
:26 And he spake unto the congregation, saying, Depart, I pray you,
of these wicked men, and touch nothing of their's, lest
 sins.
bernacle of Korah, Dathan, and Abiram,
 every side: and Dathan and Abiram came out, and stood in the door
and their wives, and their sons, and their little
, Hereby ye shall know that the LORD hath sent me
 not done them of mine own mind.
If these men die the common death of all men, or if they be
ation of all men; then the LORD hath not sent
ew thing, and the earth open her mouth,
nd swallow them up, with all that appertain unto them, and they go
the pit; then ye shall understand that these men have
nd it came to pass, as he had made an end of speaking all these
und clave asunder that was under them: 16:32 And
allowed them up, and their houses,
l the men that appertained unto Korah, and all their goods.
hat appertained to them, went down alive into the
em: and they perished from among the
regation.
e round about them fled at the cry of
m: for they said, Lest the earth swallow us up also.
ire from the LORD, and consumed the two
undred and fifty men that offered incense.
aying, 16:37 Speak unto Eleazar
f Aaron the priest, that he take up the censers out of the
u the fire yonder; for they are hallowed.
nst their own souls, let them
road plates for a covering of the altar: for they offered
refore they are hallowed: and they shall be a
16:39 And Eleazar the priest took the brasen censers, wherewith they
t had offered; and they were made broad plates for a
o be a memorial unto the children of
el, that no stranger, which is not of the seed of Aaron, come near
 before the LORD; that he be not as Korah, and as his
him by the hand of Moses.
the morrow all the congregation of the children of Israel
d against Aaron, saying, Ye have killed the
e to pass, when the congregation was gathered against
 they looked toward the tabernacle of the
red it, and the glory of the
d.
e the tabernacle of the
16:44 And the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 16:45 Get you up from
egation, that I may consume them as in a moment. And

enser, and put fire therein
altar, and put on incense, and go quickly unto the
ent for them: for there is wrath gone
 from the LORD; the plague is begun.
:47 And Aaron took as Moses commanded, and ran into the midst of the
and, behold, the plague was begun among the people: and
 an atonement for the people.
 he stood between the dead and the living; and the plague was
they that died in the plague were fourteen thousand and
that died about the matter of Korah.
:50 And Aaron returned unto Moses unto the door of the tabernacle of
on: and the plague was stayed.
 the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 17:2 Speak unto the
e of every one of them a rod according to
princes according to the
athers twelve rods: write thou every man's name upon
t write Aaron's name upon the rod of Levi: for one
 house of their fathers.
shalt lay them up in the tabernacle of the congregation
 I will meet with you.
l come to pass, that the man's rod, whom I shall
make to cease from me the murmurings
he children of Israel, whereby they murmur against you.
 the children of Israel, and every one of
each prince one, according to
rs' houses, even twelve rods: and the rod of Aaron was
d Moses laid up the rods before the LORD in the tabernacle of
it came to pass, that on the morrow Moses went into the
 behold, the rod of Aaron for the house of
 and bloomed blossoms, and
s.
ods from before the LORD unto all
ldren of Israel: and they looked, and took every man his rod.
said unto Moses, Bring Aaron's rod again before the
en against the rebels; and thou shalt
te take away their murmurings from me, that they die not.
 as the LORD commanded him, so did he.
17:12 And the children of Israel spake unto Moses, saying, Behold, we
h, we all perish.
h any thing near unto the tabernacle of the LORD
th dying?  18:1 And the LORD said
ron, Thou and thy sons and thy father's house with thee shall
the sanctuary: and thou and thy sons with thee
sthood.
he tribe of Levi, the tribe of thy
, bring thou with thee, that they may be joined unto thee, and
but thou and thy sons with thee shall minister

the charge of all the
ey shall not come nigh the vessels of the sanctuary
y, nor ye also, die.
l be joined unto thee, and keep the charge of the
or all the service of the tabernacle:
 a stranger shall not come nigh unto you.
e sanctuary, and the charge of
 that there be no wrath any more upon the children of
, I have taken your brethren the Levites from among
they are given as a gift for the LORD,
 do the service of the tabernacle of the congregation.
y sons with thee shall keep your priest's
ithin the vail; and ye shall
e given your priest's office unto you as a service of
ometh nigh shall be put to death.
And the LORD spake unto Aaron, Behold, I also have given thee the
ave offerings of all the hallowed things of the
I given them by reason of the
and to thy sons, by an ordinance for ever.
oly things, reserved from the
 oblation of theirs, every meat offering of theirs, and
s, and every trespass offering of theirs
which they shall render unto me, shall be most holy for thee and for
8:10 In the most holy place shalt thou eat it; every male shall eat
 holy unto thee.
e; the heave offering of their gift, with all
 Israel: I have given them unto
 to thy sons and to thy daughters with thee, by a statute for
is clean in thy house shall eat of it.
18:12 All the best of the oil, and all the best of the wine, and of
firstfruits of them which they shall offer unto the

e land, which they shall bring
ORD, shall be thine; every one that is clean in thine house
14 Every thing devoted in Israel shall be thine.
he matrix in all flesh, which they
unto the LORD, whether it be of men or beasts, shall be thine:
stborn of man shalt thou surely redeem, and the
hou redeem.
 be redeemed from a month old shalt thou
redeem, according to thine estimation, for the money of five shekels,
kel of the sanctuary, which is twenty gerahs.
r the firstling of a sheep, or the
ing of a goat, thou shalt not redeem; they are holy: thou shalt
d upon the altar, and shalt burn their fat for an
t savour unto the LORD.
lesh of them shall be thine, as the wave breast and as
.
holy things, which the children
 offer unto the LORD, have I given thee, and thy sons and thy
by a statute for ever: it is a covenant of salt
and to thy seed with thee.
e LORD spake unto Aaron, Thou shalt have no inheritance in
t thou have any part among them: I am thy part
dren of Israel.
ve given the children of Levi all the tenth in
 service which they serve, even
ce of the tabernacle of the congregation.
el henceforth come nigh the
 the congregation, lest they bear sin, and die.
e service of the tabernacle of the
gation, and they shall bear their iniquity: it shall be a
ut your generations, that among the children

srael, which they offer as an
ing unto the LORD, I have given to the Levites to inherit:
to them, Among the children of Israel they
the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 18:26 Thus speak unto the
them, When ye take of the children of Israel the
 them for your inheritance, then ye
 offer up an heave offering of it for the LORD, even a tenth part
18:27 And this your heave offering shall be reckoned unto you, as
e corn of the threshingfloor, and as the fulness of
 also shall offer an heave offering unto the LORD of all
ive of the children of Israel; and ye shall
to Aaron the priest.
our gifts ye shall offer every heave offering of the
 even the hallowed part thereof out of
.
hem, When ye have heaved the best
 from it, then it shall be counted unto the Levites as the
gfloor, and as the increase of the winepress.
place, ye and your households: for
your reward for your service in the tabernacle of the
 shall bear no sin by reason of it, when ye have heaved
ther shall ye pollute the holy things of
the children of Israel, lest ye die.
:1 And the LORD spake unto Moses and unto Aaron, saying, 19:2 This
 of the law which the LORD hath commanded, saying,
l, that they bring thee a red heifer
out spot, wherein is no blemish, and upon which never came yoke:
give her unto Eleazar the priest, that he may bring
 one shall slay her before his face:
 And Eleazar the priest shall take of her blood with his finger,
r blood directly before the tabernacle of the
e shall burn the heifer in his
 skin, and her flesh, and her blood, with her dung, shall he
est shall take cedar wood, and hyssop, and
he burning of the heifer.
 priest shall wash his clothes, and he shall bathe his
d he shall come into the camp, and the
iest shall be unclean until the even.
9:8 And he that burneth her shall wash his clothes in water, and
 water, and shall be unclean until the even.
ather up the ashes of the heifer,
 them up without the camp in a clean place, and it shall be
on of the children of Israel for a water of
n.
s of the heifer shall wash his
nd be unclean until the even: and it shall be unto the
 the stranger that sojourneth among them,
toucheth the dead body of any man shall be unclean seven
rify himself with it on the third day, and on the
t if he purify not himself the third
 then the seventh day he shall not be clean.
dy of any man that is dead, and
 not himself, defileth the tabernacle of the LORD; and that
rom Israel: because the water of separation was
 unclean; his uncleanness is yet
.
th in a tent: all that come into
, and all that is in the tent, shall be unclean seven days.
vessel, which hath no covering bound upon it, is
ucheth one that is slain with a sword in the
 of a man, or a grave, shall be
even days.
son they shall take of the ashes of the
urnt heifer of purification for sin, and running water shall be put
ssel: 19:18 And a clean person shall take hyssop, and
nkle it upon the tent, and upon all the
essels, and upon the persons that were there, and upon him that
one slain, or one dead, or a grave: 19:19 And the
the unclean on the third day, and on
seventh day: and on the seventh day he shall purify himself, and
and bathe himself in water, and shall be clean at
hall be unclean, and shall not purify himself,
g the congregation, because he
ed the sanctuary of the LORD: the water of separation hath
him; he is unclean.
be a perpetual statute unto them, that he that
hall wash his clothes; and he that
th the water of separation shall be unclean until even.
unclean person toucheth shall be unclean; and
clean until even.
ildren of Israel, even the whole congregation,
month: and the people abode in
d Miriam died there, and was buried there.
ngregation: and they gathered
together against Moses and against Aaron.
nd spake, saying, Would God
ied when our brethren died before the LORD!  20:4 And why
ngregation of the LORD into this wilderness,
e?  20:5 And wherefore have ye
 come up out of Egypt, to bring us in unto this evil place?
 or of figs, or of vines, or of pomegranates;

presence of the assembly unto
 the tabernacle of the congregation, and they fell upon
of the LORD appeared unto them.
d the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 20:8 Take the rod, and
y together, thou, and Aaron thy brother, and
es; and it shall give forth his
d thou shalt bring forth to them water out of the rock: so
regation and their beasts drink.
nd Moses took the rod from before the LORD, as he commanded him.
and Aaron gathered the congregation together before
, Hear now, ye rebels; must we fetch
water out of this rock?  20:11 And Moses lifted up his hand, and
ote the rock twice: and the water came out
and their beasts also.
RD spake unto Moses and Aaron, Because ye believed me
es of the children of Israel, therefore
e shall not bring this congregation into the land which I have given
 This is the water of Meribah; because the children of Israel
 and he was sanctified in them.
nd Moses sent messengers from Kadesh unto the king of Edom,
Israel, Thou knowest all the travail that hath
ent down into Egypt, and we have
 Egypt a long time; and the Egyptians vexed us, and our
cried unto the LORD, he heard our voice,
and sent an angel, and hath brought us forth out of Egypt: and,
adesh, a city in the uttermost of thy border: 20:17
gh thy country: we will not pass
the fields, or through the vineyards, neither will we drink of
ls: we will go by the king's high way, we will not
e left, until we have passed thy

lt not pass by me, lest I come
t thee with the sword.
ildren of Israel said unto him, We will go by the high
drink of thy water, then I will pay for
t: I will only, without doing anything else, go through on my feet.
said, Thou shalt not go through. And Edom came out
d with a strong hand.
efused to give Israel passage through his border:
 him.
 even the whole congregation,
rom Kadesh, and came unto mount Hor.
:23 And the LORD spake unto Moses and Aaron in mount Hor, by the
of Edom, saying, 20:24 Aaron shall be gathered unto
ter into the land which I have given
 the children of Israel, because ye rebelled against my word at
h.
, and bring them up unto mount
 And strip Aaron of his garments, and put them upon Eleazar
l be gathered unto his people, and shall die
ORD commanded: and they went up into mount
.
 garments, and put them upon
son; and Aaron died there in the top of the mount: and
from the mount.
congregation saw that Aaron was dead, they
the house of Israel.
 Arad the Canaanite, which dwelt in the south, heard
ay of the spies; then he fought against
srael, and took some of them prisoners.

, and said, If thou wilt
his people into my hand, then I will utterly destroy
LORD hearkened to the voice of Israel, and delivered up
terly destroyed them and their cities: and

by the way of the Red sea, to
 land of Edom: and the soul of the people was much

and against Moses, Wherefore
ght us up out of Egypt to die in the wilderness? for there
there any water; and our soul loatheth this
fiery serpents among the people, and they bit
 died.
o Moses, and said, We have sinned, for
 have spoken against the LORD, and against thee; pray unto the LORD,
way the serpents from us. And Moses prayed for the
d unto Moses, Make thee a fiery serpent, and set
to pass, that every one that is
hen he looketh upon it, shall live.
9 And Moses made a serpent of brass, and put it upon a pole, and it
hat if a serpent had bitten any man, when he beheld the

orward, and pitched in Oboth.
 they journeyed from Oboth, and pitched at Ijeabarim, in the
fore Moab, toward the sunrising.
From thence they removed, and pitched in the valley of Zared.
hey removed, and pitched on the other side of
t cometh out of the coasts of the
s: for Arnon is the border of Moab, between Moab and the
re it is said in the book of the wars of the LORD, What
in the brooks of Arnon, 21:15 And at the
stream of the brooks that goeth down to the dwelling of Ar, and lieth
er of Moab.
went to Beer: that is the well whereof the
 together, and I will give

up, O well; sing ye unto it:
inces digged the well, the nobles of the people digged it,
lawgiver, with their staves. And from the
nd from Mattanah to Nahaliel:
haliel to Bamoth: 21:20 And from Bamoth in the valley, that
ab, to the top of Pisgah, which looketh toward
essengers unto Sihon king of the Amorites,
nd: we will not turn into the
into the vineyards; we will not drink of the waters of the
ng by the king's high way, until we be past
ot suffer Israel to pass through his border:
ther, and went out against
e wilderness: and he came to Jahaz, and fought against
smote him with the edge of the sword, and possessed
, even unto the children of Ammon: for
e border of the children of Ammon was strong.
ies: and Israel dwelt in all the
f the Amorites, in Heshbon, and in all the villages thereof.
s the city of Sihon the king of the Amorites, who
g of Moab, and taken all his land out
his hand, even unto Arnon.
ore they that speak in proverbs say, Come into Heshbon,
ilt and prepared: 21:28 For there is a fire
ity of Sihon: it hath consumed
, and the lords of the high places of Arnon.
done, O people of Chemosh: he hath
his sons that escaped, and his daughters, into captivity unto
rites.
bon is perished even unto Dibon, and
ave laid them waste even unto Nophah, which reacheth unto Medeba.
el dwelt in the land of the Amorites.
1:32 And Moses sent to spy out Jaazer, and they took the villages
e out the Amorites that were there.
33 And they turned and went up by the way of Bashan: and Og the
 out against them, he, and all his people, to the
 LORD said unto Moses, Fear him not: for I have delivered
l his people, and his land; and thou shalt do
of the Amorites, which dwelt at

and all his people, until there
left him alive: and they possessed his land.
forward, and pitched in the plains
b on this side Jordan by Jericho.
And Balak the son of Zippor saw all that Israel had done to the
nd Moab was sore afraid of the people, because they were many:
sed because of the children of Israel.
22:4 And Moab said unto the elders of Midian, Now shall this company
at are round about us, as the ox licketh up the grass of
e son of Zippor was king of the Moabites at that time.
erefore unto Balaam the son of Beor to
thor, which is by the river of the land of the children of his
 saying, Behold, there is a people come out from
 of the earth, and they abide over
t me: 22:6 Come now therefore, I pray thee, curse me this
mighty for me: peradventure I shall prevail,
 drive them out of the land: for
at he whom thou blessest is blessed, and he whom thou cursest
d the elders of Moab and the elders of Midian departed with the
on in their hand; and they came unto Balaam, and

 this night, and I will bring
ain, as the LORD shall speak unto me: and the princes of

What men are these with thee?
alaam said unto God, Balak the son of Zippor, king of Moab,
ng, 22:11 Behold, there is a people come out of
he earth: come now, curse me them;
enture I shall be able to overcome them, and drive them out.
nto Balaam, Thou shalt not go with them; thou
are blessed.
n the morning, and said unto the princes of
LORD refuseth to give me leave
 you.
e up, and they went unto Balak, and
 Balaam refuseth to come with us.
 And Balak sent yet again princes, more, and more honourable than
d they came to Balaam, and said to him, Thus saith Balak the
hing, I pray thee, hinder thee from coming unto
nto very great honour, and I will
soever thou sayest unto me: come therefore, I pray thee, curse
2:18 And Balaam answered and said unto the servants of Balak, If
e his house full of silver and gold, I cannot go
, to do less or more.
re, I pray you, tarry ye also here this night, that I
ay unto me more.
o Balaam at night, and said unto him, If the men
 with them; but yet the word which I
l say unto thee, that shalt thou do.
:21 And Balaam rose up in the morning, and saddled his ass, and went
es of Moab.
indled because he went: and the angel of
the LORD stood in the way for an adversary against him. Now he was
ass, and his two servants were with him.

ORD standing in the way, and
awn in his hand: and the ass turned aside out of the way,
and Balaam smote the ass, to turn her into
ORD stood in a path of the vineyards, a
all being on this side, and a wall on that side.
ngel of the LORD, she thrust herself
 the wall, and crushed Balaam's foot against the wall: and he
2:26 And the angel of the LORD went further, and stood in a narrow
 no way to turn either to the right hand or to the
saw the angel of the LORD, she fell down under
ed, and he smote the ass with a

e ass, and she said unto
e I done unto thee, that thou hast smitten me these
said unto the ass, Because thou hast
ed me: I would there were a sword in mine hand, for now would I
 And the ass said unto Balaam, Am not I thine ass, upon which
 since I was thine unto this day? was I ever wont
Nay.
s of Balaam, and he saw the angel of
LORD standing in the way, and his sword drawn in his hand: and he
ad, and fell flat on his face.
d the angel of the LORD said unto him, Wherefore hast thou
three times? behold, I went out to withstand
re me: 22:33 And the ass saw me,
ed from me these three times: unless she had turned from me,
slain thee, and saved her alive.
And Balaam said unto the angel of the LORD, I have sinned; for I
 stoodest in the way against me: now therefore, if
 back again.
 LORD said unto Balaam, Go with the men: but
thee, that thou shalt speak. So
nt with the princes of Balak.
 when Balak heard that Balaam was come, he went out to meet
, which is in the border of Arnon, which is in
 said unto Balaam, Did I not earnestly send unto thee
t thou not unto me? am I not able indeed
to promote thee to honour?  22:38 And Balaam said unto Balak, Lo, I am
ee: have I now any power at all to say any thing? the word
outh, that shall I speak.
aam went with Balak, and they came unto Kirjathhuzoth.
en and sheep, and sent to Balaam, and to the
nd it came to pass on the morrow, that Balak took Balaam, and
he high places of Baal, that thence he might see
23:1 And Balaam said unto Balak, Build me here seven altars, and
ven oxen and seven rams.
 did as Balaam had spoken; and Balak and Balaam offered
d a ram.
k, Stand by thy burnt offering, and I
l go: peradventure the LORD will come to meet me: and whatsoever he
ll tell thee. And he went to an high place.
unto him, I have prepared seven
nd I have offered upon every altar a bullock and a ram.
ord in Balaam's mouth, and said, Return unto
3:6 And he returned unto him, and, lo, he stood by his burnt
 the princes of Moab.
up his parable, and said, Balak the king of Moab hath
the mountains of the east, saying, Come,
curse me Jacob, and come, defy Israel.
23:8 How shall I curse, whom God hath not cursed? or how shall I defy,
D hath not defied?  23:9 For from the top of the rocks I
s I behold him: lo, the people shall dwell
he nations.
t of Jacob, and the number of the fourth
part of Israel? Let me die the death of the righteous, and let my last
his!  23:11 And Balak said unto Balaam, What hast thou
 curse mine enemies, and, behold, thou
st blessed them altogether.
e answered and said, Must I not take heed to speak that
my mouth?  23:13 And Balak said unto him,
lace, from whence thou mayest
hou shalt see but the utmost part of them, and shalt not
 them from thence.
 him into the field of Zophim, to the top of
fered a bullock and a ram on

re by thy burnt offering, while
e LORD yonder.
alaam, and put a word in his mouth, and said,

 stood by his burnt offering,
nces of Moab with him. And Balak said unto him, What hath
nd he took up his parable, and said, Rise up,
u son of Zippor: 23:19 God is not
that he should lie; neither the son of man, that he should
d shall he not do it? or hath he spoken, and
ld, I have received commandment
 and he hath blessed; and I cannot reverse it.
in Jacob, neither hath he seen
ss in Israel: the LORD his God is with him, and the shout of

 hath as it were the strength
rn.
t against Jacob, neither is there
ination against Israel: according to this time it shall be said
ael, What hath God wrought!  23:24 Behold, the
, and lift up himself as a young
 shall not lie down until he eat of the prey, and drink the
23:25 And Balak said unto Balaam, Neither curse them at all, nor bless

o Balak, Told not I thee,
t the LORD speaketh, that I must do?  23:27 And Balak
y thee, I will bring thee unto another
ace; peradventure it will please God that thou mayest curse me them

op of Peor, that looketh

d me here seven altars, and
re seven bullocks and seven rams.
 And Balak did as Balaam had said, and offered a bullock and a

d the LORD to bless Israel, he
as at other times, to seek for enchantments, but he set his
ess.
, and he saw Israel abiding in his
according to their tribes; and the spirit of God came upon him.
up his parable, and said, Balaam the son of Beor hath
are open hath said: 24:4 He hath said,
ich heard the words of God, which saw the vision of the Almighty,
ance, but having his eyes open: 24:5 How goodly are
ernacles, O Israel!  24:6 As the
are they spread forth, as gardens by the river's side, as the
hich the LORD hath planted, and as cedar trees
pour the water out of his buckets, and his seed shall be
ng shall be higher than Agag, and his
gdom shall be exalted.
 him forth out of Egypt; he hath as it were the
t up the nations his enemies, and
reak their bones, and pierce them through with his arrows.
y down as a lion, and as a great lion: who shall
esseth thee, and cursed is he that
h thee.
dled against Balaam, and he smote his
ds together: and Balak said unto Balaam, I called thee to curse
behold, thou hast altogether blessed them these
 flee thou to thy place: I thought to promote thee
LORD hath kept thee back from honour.
4:12 And Balaam said unto Balak, Spake I not also to thy messengers
est unto me, saying, 24:13 If Balak would give me his
, I cannot go beyond the commandment of
he LORD, to do either good or bad of mine own mind; but what the LORD
ill I speak?  24:14 And now, behold, I go unto my people:
l advertise thee what this people shall do to
15 And he took up his parable, and said, Balaam the son of Beor
man whose eyes are open hath said: 24:16 He hath
, and knew the knowledge of the most
, which saw the vision of the Almighty, falling into a trance, but
open: 24:17 I shall see him, but not now: I shall
hall come a Star out of Jacob, and a
tre shall rise out of Israel, and shall smite the corners of Moab,
the children of Sheth.
hall be a possession, Seir also shall be a possession
hall do valiantly.
hall come he that shall have dominion, and shall
city.
k, he took up his parable, and said,
ek was the first of the nations; but his latter end shall be that
r.
and took up his parable, and said,
 is thy dwellingplace, and thou puttest thy nest in a rock.
e Kenite shall be wasted, until Asshur shall
he took up his parable, and said, Alas, who shall live when
And ships shall come from the coast of Chittim,
 afflict Eber, and he also shall
or ever.
went and returned to his place: and
 also went his way.
de in Shittim, and the people began to commit

e sacrifices of their gods: and
e did eat, and bowed down to their gods.

peor: and the anger of the
ed against Israel.
id unto Moses, Take all the heads of the people,
gainst the sun, that the fierce
the LORD may be turned away from Israel.

srael, Slay ye every one his
e joined unto Baalpeor.
d, one of the children of Israel came and brought unto
oman in the sight of Moses, and in the
ght of all the congregation of the children of Israel, who were
door of the tabernacle of the congregation.
eazar, the son of Aaron the
t, he rose up from among the congregation, and took a
 he went after the man of Israel into the
e man of Israel, and the
r belly. So the plague was stayed from the children of
at died in the plague were twenty and four thousand.
o Moses, saying, 25:11 Phinehas, the son
of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the priest, hath turned my wrath away
n of Israel, while he was zealous for my sake among
hildren of Israel in my jealousy.
 Wherefore say, Behold, I give unto him my covenant of peace:
ve it, and his seed after him, even the covenant
use he was zealous for his God, and
an atonement for the children of Israel.

 was slain, even that was
Midianitish woman, was Zimri, the son of Salu, a prince
Simeonites.
idianitish woman that was slain was Cozbi,
people, and of a chief house

ing, 25:17 Vex the Midianites,
them: 25:18 For they vex you with their wiles, wherewith
the matter of Peor, and in the matter of
Cozbi, the daughter of a prince of Midian, their sister, which was
 of the plague for Peor's sake.
d it came to pass after the plague, that the LORD spake unto
 the son of Aaron the priest, saying, 26:2 Take
the children of Israel, from twenty
 old and upward, throughout their fathers' house, all that are
 Israel.
 priest spake with them in the plains of
Moab by Jordan near Jericho, saying, 26:4 Take the sum of the people,
ears old and upward; as the LORD commanded Moses and the
went forth out of the land of Egypt.
:5 Reuben, the eldest son of Israel: the children of Reuben; Hanoch,
 the family of the Hanochites: of Pallu, the family of
n, the family of the Hezronites: of Carmi,
e are the families of the Reubenites: and they that were
y and three thousand and seven hundred and
liab.
l, and Dathan, and Abiram. This is
athan and Abiram, which were famous in the congregation, who
nd against Aaron in the company of Korah, when
And the earth opened her mouth,
owed them up together with Korah, when that company died,
ed two hundred and fifty men: and they became
children of Korah died not.
ons of Simeon after their families: of Nemuel, the family
in, the family of the Jaminites: of Jachin,
Zerah, the family of the
ul, the family of the Shaulites.
These are the families of the Simeonites, twenty and two

amilies: of Zephon, the family
honites: of Haggi, the family of the Haggites: of Shuni, the
: 26:16 Of Ozni, the family of the Oznites: of
 Of Arod, the family of the
Areli, the family of the Arelites.
8 These are the families of the children of Gad according to those
ed of them, forty thousand and five hundred.
Onan: and Er and Onan died in the
 Canaan.
ter their families were; of Shelah, the
amily of the Shelanites: of Pharez, the family of the Pharzites: of
ly of the Zarhites.
of Pharez were; of Hezron, the family of the
e Hamulites.
es of Judah according to those that were
numbered of them, threescore and sixteen thousand and five hundred.
sons of Issachar after their families: of Tola, the
 the family of the Punites: 26:24 Of
ub, the family of the Jashubites: of Shimron, the family of the
25 These are the families of Issachar according to those that were
, threescore and four thousand and three hundred.
ter their families: of Sered, the
of the Sardites: of Elon, the family of the Elonites: of
 Jahleelites.
ies of the Zebulunites according to those
ousand and five hundred.
 of Joseph after their families were Manasseh and
Manasseh: of Machir, the family of the
chirites: and Machir begat Gilead: of Gilead come the family of the
26:30 These are the sons of Gilead: of Jeezer, the family of the
ek, the family of the Helekites: 26:31 And of
 and of Shechem, the family of
mites: 26:32 And of Shemida, the family of the Shemidaites:
ly of the Hepherites.
had the son of Hepher had no sons, but daughters: and
 Zelophehad were Mahlah, and Noah,
, Milcah, and Tirzah.
he families of Manasseh, and those that were numbered
nd and seven hundred.
he sons of Ephraim after their families: of
es: of Becher, the family of
s: of Tahan, the family of the Tahanites.
ah: of Eran, the family of the

s of Ephraim according to those
 numbered of them, thirty and two thousand and five hundred.
Joseph after their families.
sons of Benjamin after their families: of Bela, the family
el, the family of the Ashbelites: of Ahiram,
 Shupham, the family of the
of Hupham, the family of the Huphamites.

Naaman: of Ard, the family of
: and of Naaman, the family of the Naamites.
 after their families: and they
 numbered of them were forty and five thousand and six
the sons of Dan after their families: of Shuham, the
e are the families of Dan after their
ilies.
uhamites, according to those that were
mbered of them, were threescore and four thousand and four hundred.
children of Asher after their families: of Jimna, the
sui, the family of the Jesuites: of
h, the family of the Beriites.
 the sons of Beriah: of Heber, the family of the Heberites: of
 of the Malchielites.
e of the daughter of Asher was Sarah.
6:47 These are the families of the sons of Asher according to those
red of them; who were fifty and three thousand and four
ns of Naphtali after their families: of Jahzeel, the
Guni, the family of the Gunites: 26:49
 Jezer, the family of the Jezerites: of Shillem, the family of the
26:50 These are the families of Naphtali according to their families:
 were numbered of them were forty and five thousand and
e were the numbered of the children of Israel, six hundred
seven hundred and thirty.
 LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 26:53 Unto these the land
nheritance according to the number of names.
re inheritance, and to few thou
e the less inheritance: to every one shall his inheritance be
ose that were numbered of him.
twithstanding the land shall be divided by lot: according to
s of their fathers they shall inherit.
26:56 According to the lot shall the possession thereof be divided
 few.
e numbered of the Levites after their
ilies: of Gershon, the family of the Gershonites: of Kohath, the
thites: of Merari, the family of the Merarites.
he Levites: the family of the
he family of the Hebronites, the family of the Mahlites,
, the family of the Korathites. And Kohath
ram's wife was Jochebed, the daughter of Levi,
t: and she bare unto Amram Aaron
s, and Miriam their sister.
nto Aaron was born Nadab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.
ihu died, when they offered strange fire before
ere numbered of them were twenty and three
 upward: for they were not
 the children of Israel, because there was no
dren of Israel.
at were numbered by Moses and Eleazar the
el in the plains of Moab by
ericho.
 not a man of them whom Moses and Aaron
he priest numbered, when they numbered the children of Israel in the
Sinai.
hem, They shall surely die in the
ess. And there was not left a man of them, save Caleb the son
hua the son of Nun.
daughters of Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son
he son of Manasseh, of the families of
nasseh the son of Joseph: and these are the names of his daughters;
nd Hoglah, and Milcah, and Tirzah.
 And they stood before Moses, and before Eleazar the priest, and
 and all the congregation, by the door of the
g, 27:3 Our father died in the
, and he was not in the company of them that gathered
he LORD in the company of Korah; but died
Why should the name of our father be done away from among his
th no son? Give unto us therefore a possession

 the LORD.
 Moses, saying, 27:7 The daughters of
ophehad speak right: thou shalt surely give them a possession of an
ng their father's brethren; and thou shalt cause the
 pass unto them.
eak unto the children of Israel, saying, If a
ll cause his inheritance to pass
 daughter.
ter, then ye shall give his inheritance
nto his brethren.
no brethren, then ye shall give his inheritance
1 And if his father have no brethren, then ye shall give his
insman that is next to him of his family, and he
unto the children of Israel a
judgment, as the LORD commanded Moses.
27:12 And the LORD said unto Moses, Get thee up into this mount
 land which I have given unto the children of
een it, thou also shalt be gathered unto thy
red.
ommandment in the desert of Zin, in
trife of the congregation, to sanctify me at the water before
he water of Meribah in Kadesh in the wilderness
to the LORD, saying, 27:16 Let the LORD, the
 man over the congregation,
ay go out before them, and which may go in before them,
, and which may bring them in; that the
ongregation of the LORD be not as sheep which have no shepherd.
D said unto Moses, Take thee Joshua the son of Nun, a
d lay thine hand upon him; 27:19 And set
him before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congregation; and
ge in their sight.
 put some of thine honour upon him, that all the
rael may be obedient.
l stand before Eleazar the priest, who shall ask
 of Urim before the LORD: at his
ll they go out, and at his word they shall come in, both he,
f Israel with him, even all the congregation.
manded him: and he took Joshua, and
im before Eleazar the priest, and before all the congregation:
s hands upon him, and gave him a charge, as the
.
aying, 28:2 Command the children
l, and say unto them, My offering, and my bread for my
 a sweet savour unto me, shall ye observe
28:3 And thou shalt say unto them, This is the offering made by fire
 offer unto the LORD; two lambs of the first year
ntinual burnt offering.
mb shalt thou offer in the morning, and the other lamb
:5 And a tenth part of an ephah of flour
for a meat offering, mingled with the fourth part of an hin of beaten
It is a continual burnt offering, which was ordained in mount
our, a sacrifice made by fire unto the LORD.
shall be the fourth part of an hin
e one lamb: in the holy place shalt thou cause the strong wine
e LORD for a drink offering.
he other lamb shalt thou offer at even: as the meat offering
 the drink offering thereof, thou shalt offer
eet savour unto the LORD.
he sabbath day two lambs of the first year without spot,
ur for a meat offering, mingled with oil,
s is the burnt offering of
 beside the continual burnt offering, and his drink
eginnings of your months ye shall offer a burnt
ullocks, and one ram, seven lambs
first year without spot; 28:12 And three tenth deals of flour
mingled with oil, for one bullock; and two tenth
, mingled with oil, for one ram;
d a several tenth deal of flour mingled with oil for a meat
 for a burnt offering of a sweet savour, a

half an hin of wine unto a
he third part of an hin unto a ram, and a fourth part of
s the burnt offering of every month
ghout the months of the year.
 one kid of the goats for a sin offering unto the LORD shall
 continual burnt offering, and his drink
offering.
ay of the first month is the passover of
the LORD.
y of this month is the feast: seven days
shall unleavened bread be eaten.
In the first day shall be an holy convocation; ye shall do no
k therein: 28:19 But ye shall offer a sacrifice
nto the LORD; two young bullocks,
 ram, and seven lambs of the first year: they shall be unto you
:20 And their meat offering shall be of flour
hall ye offer for a bullock, and
h deals for a ram; 28:21 A several tenth deal shalt thou offer
ughout the seven lambs: 28:22 And one goat for a
 for you.
side the burnt offering in the morning,
hich is for a continual burnt offering.

ily, throughout the seven
of the sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto
 beside the continual burnt offering, and
eventh day ye shall have an holy convocation; ye
 Also in the day of the firstfruits, when ye bring a new meat
D, after your weeks be out, ye shall have an holy
le work: 28:27 But ye shall offer the
nt offering for a sweet savour unto the LORD; two young bullocks,
mbs of the first year; 28:28 And their meat offering
ee tenth deals unto one bullock, two
h deals unto one ram, 28:29 A several tenth deal unto one lamb,
n lambs; 28:30 And one kid of the goats, to make an
shall offer them beside the continual burnt offering, and his
shall be unto you without blemish) and their
venth month, on the first day of the month, ye shall
hall do no servile work: it is a day of
lowing the trumpets unto you.
ye shall offer a burnt offering for a sweet savour unto the
, one ram, and seven lambs of the first year
ffering shall be of flour
l, three tenth deals for a bullock, and two tenth deals
th deal for one lamb, throughout the seven
 a sin offering, to make an
 you: 29:6 Beside the burnt offering of the month, and
aily burnt offering, and his meat
g, and their drink offerings, according unto their manner, for
crifice made by fire unto the LORD.
7 And ye shall have on the tenth day of this seventh month an holy
 ye shall afflict your souls: ye shall not do any work
ffer a burnt offering unto the LORD for a
 and seven lambs of the first
shall be unto you without blemish: 29:9 And their meat
ingled with oil, three tenth deals to a
ullock, and two tenth deals to one ram, 29:10 A several tenth deal
roughout the seven lambs: 29:11 One kid of the goats
 sin offering of atonement, and the
nual burnt offering, and the meat offering of it, and their drink
12 And on the fifteenth day of the seventh month ye shall have an
 ye shall do no servile work, and ye shall keep a
9:13 And ye shall offer a burnt
 a sacrifice made by fire, of a sweet savour unto the LORD;
, two rams, and fourteen lambs of the first
:14 And their meat offering
lour mingled with oil, three tenth deals unto every
s, two tenth deals to each ram of the
 rams, 29:15 And a several tenth deal to each lamb of the fourteen
 one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the
meat offering, and his drink offering.
29:17 And on the second day ye shall offer twelve young bullocks, two
n lambs of the first year without spot: 29:18 And their
nk offerings for the bullocks, for the
ms, and for the lambs, shall be according to their number, after the
And one kid of the goats for a sin offering; beside the
nd the meat offering thereof, and their
rink offerings.
day eleven bullocks, two rams, fourteen lambs
:21 And their meat offering and
nk offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the
to their number, after the manner: 29:22 And
e continual burnt offering, and
offering, and his drink offering.
 And on the fourth day ten bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs
 without blemish: 29:24 Their meat offering and their
cks, for the rams, and for the lambs,
ll be according to their number, after the manner: 29:25 And one
or a sin offering; beside the continual burnt
drink offering.
day nine bullocks, two rams, and fourteen lambs
27 And their meat offering and
k offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the
o their number, after the manner: 29:28 And
 continual burnt offering, and
ffering, and his drink offering.
And on the sixth day eight bullocks, two rams, and fourteen
 without blemish: 29:30 And their meat offering
ullocks, for the rams, and for the
 shall be according to their number, after the manner: 29:31 And
 offering; beside the continual burnt offering, his
fering.
ven bullocks, two rams, and fourteen
s of the first year without blemish: 29:33 And their meat offering
offerings for the bullocks, for the rams, and for the
their number, after the manner: 29:34 And
ontinual burnt offering, his
g, and his drink offering.
 eighth day ye shall have a solemn assembly: ye shall do
9:36 But ye shall offer a burnt offering, a
ur unto the LORD: one bullock,
even lambs of the first year without blemish: 29:37 Their
rink offerings for the bullock, for the ram,
to their number, after the
And one goat for a sin offering; beside the continual
offering, and his drink offering.
 These things ye shall do unto the LORD in your set feasts,
our freewill offerings, for your burnt
ferings, and for your meat offerings, and for your drink offerings,
ace offerings.
 children of Israel according to all that the
es spake unto the heads of the tribes concerning the
is is the thing which the LORD hath
nded.
LORD, or swear an oath to bind his
ith a bond; he shall not break his word, he shall do according
th out of his mouth.
so vow a vow unto the LORD, and bind herself by a
 in her youth; 30:4 And her father
er vow, and her bond wherewith she hath bound her soul, and her
is peace at her; then all her vows shall stand, and
ound her soul shall stand.
her father disallow her in the day that he heareth; not
bonds wherewith she hath bound her soul,
shall stand: and the LORD shall forgive her, because her father
30:6 And if she had at all an husband, when she vowed, or uttered
lips, wherewith she bound her soul; 30:7 And her
ce at her in the day that he heard
en her vows shall stand, and her bonds wherewith she bound her

 the day that he heard it;
make her vow which she vowed, and that which she uttered
he bound her soul, of none effect: and the
y vow of a widow, and of her that is divorced, wherewith
s, shall stand against her.
f she vowed in her husband's house, or bound her soul by a
 And her husband heard it, and held his peace
all her vows shall stand, and
wherewith she bound her soul shall stand.
ade them void on the day he
hen whatsoever proceeded out of her lips concerning her
d of her soul, shall not stand: her husband
 forgive her.
y binding oath to afflict the soul, her
usband may establish it, or her husband may make it void.
d altogether hold his peace at her from day to
ws, or all her bonds, which are
 he confirmeth them, because he held his peace at her in the
.
hem void after that he hath heard
hen he shall bear her iniquity.
hese are the statutes, which the LORD commanded Moses, between
between the father and his daughter, being yet in

ing, 31:2 Avenge the children
f the Midianites: afterward shalt thou be gathered unto thy
es spake unto the people, saying, Arm some of yourselves
 go against the Midianites, and avenge the
 thousand, throughout all the tribes of Israel,
o there were delivered out of the thousands of Israel, a
welve thousand armed for war.
Moses sent them to the war, a thousand of every tribe, them
 Eleazar the priest, to the war, with the holy
w in his hand.
inst the Midianites, as the LORD commanded
1:8 And they slew the kings of Midian, beside the rest of them that
ely, Evi, and Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, five
the son of Beor they slew with the sword.
l the women of Midian captives,
 little ones, and took the spoil of all their cattle, and all
 their goods.
their cities wherein they dwelt, and all
their goodly castles, with fire.
And they took all the spoil, and all the prey, both of men and
And they brought the captives, and the prey, and the spoil, unto
 the priest, and unto the congregation of the
the plains of Moab, which are by
ear Jericho.
ar the priest, and all the princes of the
hout the camp.
h with the officers of the host, with the
r hundreds, which came from

saved all the women alive?
these caused the children of Israel, through the counsel
ass against the LORD in the matter of Peor,
gation of the LORD.
 kill every male among the little ones, and kill
 lying with him.
n children, that have not known a man by lying

 seven days: whosoever hath
rson, and whosoever hath touched any slain, purify both
s on the third day, and on the seventh day.
d all that is made of skins, and
 of goats' hair, and all things made of wood.
nto the men of war which went to
le, This is the ordinance of the law which the LORD commanded
 gold, and the silver, the brass, the iron, the
g that may abide the fire, ye shall
it go through the fire, and it shall be clean: nevertheless it
th the water of separation: and all that abideth
ugh the water.
your clothes on the seventh day, and ye shall
 into the camp.
e unto Moses, saying, 31:26 Take the sum of the
d of beast, thou, and Eleazar the
 and the chief fathers of the congregation: 31:27 And divide
s; between them that took the war upon them, who
l the congregation: 31:28 And levy a
ute unto the Lord of the men of war which went out to battle: one
red, both of the persons, and of the beeves, and of
:29 Take it of their half, and give it
to Eleazar the priest, for an heave offering of the LORD.
en of Israel's half, thou shalt take one
portion of fifty, of the persons, of the beeves, of the asses, and of
f all manner of beasts, and give them unto the Levites,
e tabernacle of the LORD.
es and Eleazar the priest did as the LORD commanded
being the rest of the prey which the men of war
d and seventy thousand and five
sheep, 31:33 And threescore and twelve thousand beeves, 31:34
e thousand asses, 31:35 And thirty and two
ad not known man by lying with
:36 And the half, which was the portion of them that went out to
 three hundred thousand and seven and thirty
 And the LORD's tribute of the
six hundred and threescore and fifteen.

thousand; of which the LORD's
 threescore and twelve.
sses were thirty thousand and five hundred; of which
ore and one.
 sixteen thousand; of which the LORD's
ibute was thirty and two persons.
 And Moses gave the tribute, which was the LORD's heave offering,
priest, as the LORD commanded Moses.
:42 And of the children of Israel's half, which Moses divided from
red, 31:43 (Now the half that pertained unto the
usand and thirty thousand and seven
and and five hundred sheep, 31:44 And thirty and six thousand
rty thousand asses and five hundred, 31:46 And
n of the children of Israel's
 took one portion of fifty, both of man and of beast, and
s, which kept the charge of the tabernacle of
.
r thousands of the host, the
thousands, and captains of hundreds, came near unto Moses:
 Moses, Thy servants have taken the sum of the
e, and there lacketh not one man

ion for the LORD, what every
ten, of jewels of gold, chains, and bracelets, rings,
e an atonement for our souls before the
ORD.
iest took the gold of them, even all
ght jewels.
he offering that they offered up to the
ORD, of the captains of thousands, and of the captains of hundreds,
usand seven hundred and fifty shekels.
31:53 (For the men of war had taken spoil, every man for himself.)
and Eleazar the priest took the gold of the captains
and brought it into the tabernacle of
 congregation, for a memorial for the children of Israel before the
ow the children of Reuben and the children of Gad had a very
tle: and when they saw the land of Jazer, and
 place was a place for cattle;
hildren of Gad and the children of Reuben came and spake
 the priest, and unto the princes of the
congregation, saying, 32:3 Ataroth, and Dibon, and Jazer, and Nimrah,
and Elealeh, and Shebam, and Nebo, and Beon, 32:4 Even
mote before the congregation of Israel, is
 cattle: 32:5 Wherefore, said
 have found grace in thy sight, let this land be given unto
ession, and bring us not over Jordan.
2:6 And Moses said unto the children of Gad and to the children of
ur brethren go to war, and shall ye sit here?  32:7
 heart of the children of Israel from
ng over into the land which the LORD hath given them?  32:8 Thus
when I sent them from Kadeshbarnea to see the land.
to the valley of Eshcol, and saw the
, they discouraged the heart of the children of Israel, that they
o the land which the LORD had given them.
the same time, and he sware,
1 Surely none of the men that came up out of Egypt, from
d, shall see the land which I sware unto
Abraham, unto Isaac, and unto Jacob; because they have not wholly
2 Save Caleb the son of Jephunneh the Kenezite, and
 have wholly followed the LORD.
nd the LORD's anger was kindled against Israel, and he made
erness forty years, until all the generation,
e LORD, was consumed.
, ye are risen up in your fathers' stead, an increase
 the fierce anger of the LORD toward
el.
r him, he will yet again leave them
e wilderness; and ye shall destroy all this people.
 him, and said, We will build sheepfolds
here for our cattle, and cities for our little ones: 32:17 But we
 ready armed before the children of Israel, until we
lace: and our little ones shall dwell in
the fenced cities because of the inhabitants of the land.
n unto our houses, until the children of Israel
tance.
th them on yonder side Jordan, or
; because our inheritance is fallen to us on this side Jordan
d Moses said unto them, If ye will do this thing, if ye will
RD to war, 32:21 And will go all of you armed
 hath driven out his enemies from
him, 32:22 And the land be subdued before the LORD: then
 and be guiltless before the LORD, and
fore Israel; and this land shall be your possession before the LORD.
 ye will not do so, behold, ye have sinned against the
ill find you out.
s for your little ones, and folds for your sheep;
out of your mouth.
en of Gad and the children of Reuben spake unto
 as my lord commandeth.
e ones, our wives, our flocks, and all our cattle,
Gilead: 32:27 But thy servants will
over, every man armed for war, before the LORD to battle, as my
8 So concerning them Moses commanded Eleazar the priest, and
 and the chief fathers of the tribes of the
d unto them, If the children of
he children of Reuben will pass with you over Jordan, every
fore the LORD, and the land shall be subdued
e land of Gilead for a
But if they will not pass over with you armed, they
u in the land of Canaan.
children of Gad and the children of Reuben answered,
unto thy servants, so will we do.
 We will pass over armed before the LORD into the land of Canaan,
on of our inheritance on this side Jordan may be
 them, even to the children of Gad, and to
e tribe of Manasseh the son of
e kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, and the kingdom of
land, with the cities thereof in the coasts,
bout.
lt Dibon, and Ataroth, and Aroer,
nd Atroth, Shophan, and Jaazer, and Jogbehah, 32:36 And
fenced cities: and folds for sheep.
37 And the children of Reuben built Heshbon, and Elealeh, and
 Nebo, and Baalmeon, (their names being changed,)
 unto the cities which they builded.
:39 And the children of Machir the son of Manasseh went to Gilead,
 dispossessed the Amorite which was in it.
r the son of Manasseh; and he
in.
went and took the small towns
d called them Havothjair.
ah went and took Kenath, and the villages thereof, and
wn name.
 the children of Israel, which went
 out of the land of Egypt with their armies under the hand of
3:2 And Moses wrote their goings out according to their journeys by
 of the LORD: and these are their journeys according to
nd they departed from Rameses in the first month, on the
 month; on the morrow after the passover the
gh hand in the sight of all the
.
ir firstborn, which the LORD had
among them: upon their gods also the LORD executed judgments.
en of Israel removed from Rameses, and pitched in
d from Succoth, and pitched in Etham, which is in
:7 And they removed from Etham, and turned again unto Pihahiroth,
aalzephon: and they pitched before Migdol.
ahiroth, and passed through the
the sea into the wilderness, and went three days' journey in
m, and pitched in Marah.
removed from Marah, and came unto Elim: and in Elim were
 and threescore and ten palm trees; and they
ed from Elim, and encamped by the Red sea.
a, and encamped in the

of the wilderness of Sin, and
 Dophkah.
Dophkah, and encamped in Alush.
nd they removed from Alush, and encamped at Rephidim, where was
ople to drink.
from Rephidim, and pitched in the wilderness
om the desert of Sinai, and pitched at
brothhattaavah.
 from Kibrothhattaavah, and encamped at
azeroth.
azeroth, and pitched in Rithmah.
And they departed from Rithmah, and pitched at Rimmonparez.
ed from Rimmonparez, and pitched in Libnah.
nd pitched at Rissah.
urneyed from Rissah, and pitched in Kehelathah.
ah, and pitched in mount Shapher.
 And they removed from mount Shapher, and encamped in Haradah.
oved from Haradah, and pitched in Makheloth.
h, and encamped at Tahath.
ey departed from Tahath, and pitched at Tarah.
 and pitched in Mithcah.
 went from Mithcah, and pitched in Hashmonah.
nah, and encamped at Moseroth.
d they departed from Moseroth, and pitched in Benejaakan.
from Benejaakan, and encamped at Horhagidgad.
d, and pitched in Jotbathah.
they removed from Jotbathah, and encamped at Ebronah.
m Ebronah, and encamped at Eziongaber.
33:36 And they removed from Eziongaber, and pitched in the wilderness
 is Kadesh.
 Kadesh, and pitched in mount Hor, in the
ron the priest went up into mount Hor at the commandment
e, in the fortieth year after the children
gypt, in the first day of the
.
enty and three years old when he
mount Hor.
anite, which dwelt in the south in the
nd of Canaan, heard of the coming of the children of Israel.
ted from mount Hor, and pitched in Zalmonah.
h, and pitched in Punon.
 departed from Punon, and pitched in Oboth.
nd pitched in Ijeabarim, in the
 Moab.
, and pitched in Dibongad.
ey removed from Dibongad, and encamped in Almondiblathaim.
 from Almondiblathaim, and pitched in the
8 And they departed from the mountains of Abarim, and pitched in
 by Jordan near Jericho.
 pitched by Jordan, from Bethjesimoth even unto

the plains of Moab by Jordan
, saying, 33:51 Speak unto the children of Israel, and say
assed over Jordan into the land of Canaan;
habitants of the land from
d destroy all their pictures, and destroy all their
down all their high places: 33:53 And
shall dispossess the inhabitants of the land, and dwell therein:
ou the land to possess it.
 shall divide the land by lot for an inheritance among
re ye shall give the more inheritance, and
ritance: every man's
 in the place where his lot falleth; according to
ll inherit.
ive out the inhabitants of the land from
before you; then it shall come to pass, that those which ye let remain
l be pricks in your eyes, and thorns in your sides, and
herein ye dwell.
l come to pass, that I shall do unto you, as I
 the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 34:2 Command the children
to them, When ye come into the land of Canaan;
to you for an inheritance, even
of Canaan with the coasts thereof:) 34:3 Then your south
wilderness of Zin along by the coast of
dom, and your south border shall be the outmost coast of the salt sea
4 And your border shall turn from the south to the ascent
to Zin: and the going forth thereof shall be
all go on to Hazaraddar, and
zmon: 34:5 And the border shall fetch a compass from Azmon
 and the goings out of it shall be at the sea.
, ye shall even have the great sea
border: this shall be your west border.

 from the great sea ye shall
r you mount Hor: 34:8 From mount Hor ye shall point out
ce of Hamath; and the goings forth of the
rder shall go on to Ziphron,
gs out of it shall be at Hazarenan: this shall be your
e shall point out your east border from Hazarenan to
hall go down from Shepham to Riblah, on
he east side of Ain; and the border shall descend, and shall reach
 the sea of Chinnereth eastward: 34:12 And the border
the goings out of it shall be at the salt
sts thereof round about.
s commanded the children of Israel, saying, This is the
 by lot, which the LORD commanded to give
be: 34:14 For the tribe of
f Reuben according to the house of their fathers, and
Gad according to the house of their
rs, have received their inheritance; and half the tribe of
heir inheritance: 34:15 The two tribes and the
itance on this side Jordan near
astward, toward the sunrising.
d the LORD spake unto Moses, saying, 34:17 These are the names
ll divide the land unto you: Eleazar the priest,
8 And ye shall take one prince of every tribe, to divide the land

: Of the tribe of Judah, Caleb
 Jephunneh.
he children of Simeon, Shemuel the son of
n, Elidad the son of Chislon.
 the prince of the tribe of the children of Dan, Bukki the
he prince of the children of Joseph, for the tribe of the
niel the son of Ephod.
ince of the tribe of the children of Ephraim, Kemuel
And the prince of the tribe of the children of Zebulun,
h.
 the children of Issachar, Paltiel
n of Azzan.
 tribe of the children of Asher, Ahihud the
 of the tribe of the children of Naphtali, Pedahel
se are they whom the LORD commanded to divide the inheritance
Israel in the land of Canaan.
the LORD spake unto Moses in the plains of Moab by Jordan
2 Command the children of Israel, that they
e of their possession cities to
 and ye shall give also unto the Levites suburbs for the

well in; and the suburbs of
 for their cattle, and for their goods, and for all their
uburbs of the cities, which ye shall give unto the
ll of the city and outward a thousand
its round about.
ure from without the city on the east side two
de two thousand cubits, and on the
ide two thousand cubits, and on the north side two thousand
all be in the midst: this shall be to them the
mong the cities which ye shall give unto the Levites there
refuge, which ye shall appoint for the
nslayer, that he may flee thither: and to them ye shall add forty

ve to the Levites shall be
t cities: them shall ye give with their suburbs.
ll give shall be of the possession of
 children of Israel: from them that have many ye shall give many;
t have few ye shall give few: every one shall give of
ccording to his inheritance which he
riteth.
ses, saying, 35:10 Speak unto the
n of Israel, and say unto them, When ye be come over Jordan
; 35:11 Then ye shall appoint you cities to be
layer may flee thither, which
 person at unawares.
ll be unto you cities for refuge from the avenger;
l he stand before the congregation in
gment.
ye shall give six cities shall ye have
r refuge.
ies on this side Jordan, and three cities
h shall be cities of refuge.
e six cities shall be a refuge, both for the children of
er, and for the sojourner among them: that
es may flee thither.
ite him with an instrument of iron, so that he die,
shall surely be put to death.
 if he smite him with throwing a stone, wherewith he may die,
urderer: the murderer shall surely be put to
h an hand weapon of wood, wherewith he may
urderer shall surely be put to
35:19 The revenger of blood himself shall slay the murderer: when he
e shall slay him.
t him of hatred, or hurl at him by laying of
smite him with his hand, that he
that smote him shall surely be put to death; for he is a
blood shall slay the murderer, when he
eteth him.
uddenly without enmity, or have cast upon
23 Or with any stone,
 die, seeing him not, and cast it upon him, that he
ther sought his harm: 35:24 Then the
regation shall judge between the slayer and the revenger of blood
e judgments: 35:25 And the congregation shall deliver
 the revenger of blood, and the
ion shall restore him to the city of his refuge, whither he
abide in it unto the death of the high priest,
.
time come without the border of
of his refuge, whither he was fled; 35:27 And the revenger of
t the borders of the city of his refuge, and the
 he shall not be guilty of blood:
ecause he should have remained in the city of his refuge until
h priest: but after the death of the high priest
and of his possession.
hings shall be for a statute of judgment unto you
l your dwellings.
ny person, the murderer shall be put to death by
tness shall not testify against any
n to cause him to die.
e shall take no satisfaction for the life of a
but he shall be surely put to
5:32 And ye shall take no satisfaction for him that is fled to the
ge, that he should come again to dwell in the land,

wherein ye are: for blood it
 land: and the land cannot be cleansed of the blood that
e blood of him that shed it.
le not therefore the land which ye shall inhabit, wherein I
well among the children of Israel.
 And the chief fathers of the families of the children of Gilead,
, the son of Manasseh, of the families of the sons of
before Moses, and before the princes, the
36:2 And they said, The LORD
 lord to give the land for an inheritance by lot to the
lord was commanded by the LORD to give the
to his daughters.
arried to any of the sons of the other tribes of
 their inheritance be taken from the
ritance of our fathers, and shall be put to the inheritance of the
they are received: so shall it be taken from the lot
d when the jubile of the children of Israel shall be, then
be put unto the inheritance of the tribe
whereunto they are received: so shall their inheritance be taken away
ritance of the tribe of our fathers.
:5 And Moses commanded the children of Israel according to the word
ying, The tribe of the sons of Joseph hath said well.
h the LORD doth command concerning the
ughters of Zelophehad, saying, Let them marry to whom they think
family of the tribe of their father shall they
ritance of the children of Israel remove
from tribe to tribe: for every one of the children of Israel shall
the inheritance of the tribe of his fathers.
seth an inheritance in any tribe
hildren of Israel, shall be wife unto one of the family of the
 that the children of Israel may enjoy every man

 from one tribe to another
ry one of the tribes of the children of Israel shall
tance.
 Moses, so did the daughters of
d: 36:11 For Mahlah, Tirzah, and Hoglah, and Milcah, and
ophehad, were married unto their father's
ed into the families of the
seh the son of Joseph, and their inheritance remained in
 their father.
andments and the judgments, which the LORD
children of Israel in the
by Jordan near Jericho.
 Book of Moses:  Called Deuteronomy
:1 These be the words which Moses spake unto all Israel on this side
wilderness, in the plain over against the Red sea,
aban, and Hazeroth, and Dizahab.
here are eleven days' journey from Horeb by the way of mount
.)  1:3 And it came to pass in the fortieth
st day of the month, that Moses
o the children of Israel, according unto all that the LORD
ment unto them; 1:4 After he had slain Sihon
in Heshbon, and Og the king of
ich dwelt at Astaroth in Edrei: 1:5 On this side Jordan, in
 Moses to declare this law, saying, 1:6 The
ying, Ye have dwelt long enough
ount: 1:7 Turn you, and take your journey, and go to the
 unto all the places nigh thereunto, in the
nd in the south, and by the sea
the land of the Canaanites, and unto Lebanon, unto the great
ates.
efore you: go in and possess the land
ch the LORD sware unto your fathers, Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob, to
nd to their seed after them.
spake unto you at that time, saying, I am not able to bear
he LORD your God hath multiplied you, and,
heaven for multitude.
d of your fathers make you a thousand times so many
as he hath promised you!)  1:12 How can
 myself alone bear your cumbrance, and your burden, and your strife?
wise men, and understanding, and known among your
rs over you.
nd said, The thing which thou hast spoken is
he chief of your tribes, wise men, and known, and made
s over thousands, and captains over
eds, and captains over fifties, and captains over tens, and
bes.
that time, saying, Hear the causes
n your brethren, and judge righteously between every man and his
tranger that is with him.
 not respect persons in judgment; but ye shall hear the
 ye shall not be afraid of the face of man;
e that is too hard for you,
 me, and I will hear it.
manded you at that time all the things which ye should
rted from Horeb, we went through all that great
aw by the way of the mountain of
ites, as the LORD our God commanded us; and we came to
said unto you, Ye are come unto the mountain of the
d doth give unto us.
ORD thy God hath set the land before thee: go up and
 thy fathers hath said unto thee; fear
t, neither be discouraged.
came near unto me every one of you, and said, We will send
shall search us out the land, and bring us
d into what cities we shall
 And the saying pleased me well: and I took twelve men of you, one
 And they turned and went up into the mountain, and
 and searched it out.
k of the fruit of the land in their hands, and
 us word again, and said, It is a
nd which the LORD our God doth give us.

but rebelled against the
he LORD your God: 1:27 And ye murmured in your tents,
ted us, he hath brought us forth out of
he land of Egypt, to deliver us into the hand of the Amorites, to
28 Whither shall we go up? our brethren have discouraged our heart,
ple is greater and taller than we; the cities are great
d moreover we have seen the sons of the
nakims there.
, Dread not, neither be afraid of them.

 you, he shall fight for you,
o all that he did for you in Egypt before your eyes; 1:31
ere thou hast seen how that the LORD thy God
 in all the way that ye went,
me into this place.
ing ye did not believe the LORD your God, 1:33 Who
earch you out a place to pitch your
 in, in fire by night, to shew you by what way ye should go, and

our words, and was wroth, and
ng, 1:35 Surely there shall not one of these men of this
ood land, which I sware to give unto your
phunneh; he shall see it, and to him will
, and to his children,
olly followed the LORD.
ORD was angry with me for your sakes, saying, Thou also

ndeth before thee, he shall
: encourage him: for he shall cause Israel to inherit it.
le ones, which ye said should be a prey, and
o knowledge between good and
hall go in thither, and unto them will I give it, and they
0 But as for you, turn you, and take your journey into the
 the Red sea.
 said unto me, We have sinned against the
to all that the LORD our God
.
is weapons of war, ye were ready
 into the hill.
unto me, Say unto them. Go not up, neither
e smitten before your enemies.
I spake unto you; and ye would not hear, but rebelled against
e LORD, and went presumptuously up into the hill.
elt in that mountain, came out against
u, and chased you, as bees do, and destroyed you in Seir, even unto
 And ye returned and wept before the LORD; but the LORD would not
oice, nor give ear unto you.
 abode in Kadesh many days, according unto the days that ye
n we turned, and took our journey into the wilderness by the
 the LORD spake unto me: and we compassed mount
 spake unto me, saying, 2:3 Ye have compassed this
orthward.
le, saying, Ye are to pass through the
ast of your brethren the children of Esau, which dwell in Seir; and
fraid of you: take ye good heed unto yourselves
; for I will not give you of their
no, not so much as a foot breadth; because I have given mount
possession.
em for money, that ye may eat; and ye shall
ye may drink.
hath blessed thee in all the works of thy
 great wilderness: these
LORD thy God hath been with thee; thou hast lacked
ed by from our brethren the children of Esau,
of the plain from Elath, and from
ber, we turned and passed by the way of the wilderness of Moab.
said unto me, Distress not the Moabites, neither
 will not give thee of their land
ossession; because I have given Ar unto the children of Lot for
10 The Emims dwelt therein in times past, a people great, and many,
e Anakims; 2:11 Which also were accounted giants, as
called them Emims.
 dwelt in Seir beforetime; but the children of
estroyed them from before them,
 in their stead; as Israel did unto the land of his
 unto them.
nd get you over the brook Zered. And we
ent over the brook Zered.
space in which we came from Kadeshbarnea, until we were
was thirty and eight years; until all the
out from among the host, as
e unto them.
f the LORD was against them, to destroy them
onsumed.
all the men of war were consumed and
 from among the people, 2:17 That the LORD spake unto me, saying,
pass over through Ar, the coast of Moab, this day:
ver against the children of Ammon,
ss them not, nor meddle with them: for I will not give thee of
dren of Ammon any possession; because I have given
a possession.
nted a land of giants: giants dwelt therein
m Zamzummims; 2:21 A people
ny, and tall, as the Anakims; but the LORD destroyed them
ceeded them, and dwelt in their stead: 2:22
h dwelt in Seir, when he
rims from before them; and they succeeded them, and
this day: 2:23 And the Avims which
in Hazerim, even unto Azzah, the Caphtorims, which came forth
oyed them, and dwelt in their stead.)  2:24 Rise
 over the river Arnon: behold, I
en into thine hand Sihon the Amorite, king of Heshbon, and his
ss it, and contend with him in battle.
2:25 This day will I begin to put the dread of thee and the fear of
ations that are under the whole heaven, who shall hear
emble, and be in anguish because of thee.
ilderness of Kedemoth unto
Heshbon with words of peace, saying, 2:27 Let me pass
long by the high way, I will neither turn
:28 Thou shalt sell me meat for money, that I may eat; and give me
 that I may drink: only I will pass through on my
au which dwell in Seir, and the
which dwell in Ar, did unto me;) until I shall pass over
 the LORD our God giveth us.
ihon king of Heshbon would not let us pass by him: for the
s spirit, and made his heart obstinate, that
 appeareth this day.
said unto me, Behold, I have begun to give Sihon and
 possess, that thou mayest inherit his
nd.
, he and all his people, to fight
z.
him before us; and we smote him,
sons, and all his people.
ook all his cities at that time, and utterly destroyed
the little ones, of every city, we left
one to remain: 2:35 Only the cattle we took for a prey unto
l of the cities which we took.
m Aroer, which is by the brink of the river of Arnon, and from
the river, even unto Gilead, there was not one
 God delivered all unto us: 2:37
o the land of the children of Ammon thou camest not, nor unto
r Jabbok, nor unto the cities in the mountains,
d forbad us.
nt up the way to Bashan: and Og the king of
his people, to battle at Edrei.
 the LORD said unto me, Fear him not: for I will deliver him,
nd his land, into thy hand; and thou shalt do
g of the Amorites, which dwelt at
.
o our hands Og also, the king of
and all his people: and we smote him until none was left to
nd we took all his cities at that time, there was not a city
 them, threescore cities, all the region of
3:5 All these cities were fenced with high walls, gates, and bars;
towns a great many.
destroyed them, as we did unto Sihon king of
omen, and children, of every
 But all the cattle, and the spoil of the cities, we took for a

 hand of the two kings of the
e land that was on this side Jordan, from the river of
 (Which Hermon the Sidonians call Sirion;
l the cities of the plain,
, and all Bashan, unto Salchah and Edrei, cities of the

of the remnant of giants;
tead was a bedstead of iron; is it not in Rabbath of
bits was the length thereof, and four
its the breadth of it, after the cubit of a man.
sessed at that time, from Aroer, which
 by the river Arnon, and half mount Gilead, and the cities thereof,
 Reubenites and to the Gadites.
d the rest of Gilead, and all Bashan, being the kingdom of Og,
 tribe of Manasseh; all the region of Argob, with
land of giants.
nasseh took all the country of Argob unto the
called them after his own name,
othjair, unto this day.
 Gilead unto Machir.
Reubenites and unto the Gadites I gave from Gilead
he valley, and the border even unto
iver Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon; 3:17
 Jordan, and the coast thereof, from Chinnereth
n the salt sea, under Ashdothpisgah
ard.
ime, saying, The LORD your God hath
 you this land to possess it: ye shall pass over armed before
ldren of Israel, all that are meet for the war.
tle ones, and your cattle, (for I
at ye have much cattle,) shall abide in your cities which I
til the LORD have given rest unto your
ethren, as well as unto you, and until they also possess the land
ur God hath given them beyond Jordan: and then shall
ossession, which I have given you.
 And I commanded Joshua at that time, saying, Thine eyes have seen
D your God hath done unto these two kings: so shall
ms whither thou passest.
not fear them: for the LORD your God he shall fight for
 the LORD at that time, saying, 3:24 O Lord GOD,
t thy greatness, and thy mighty
 what God is there in heaven or in earth, that can do
ccording to thy might?  3:25 I pray thee,
t is beyond Jordan, that
 and Lebanon.
th with me for your sakes, and would not hear
 suffice thee; speak no more unto
his matter.
op of Pisgah, and lift up thine eyes
ward, and northward, and southward, and eastward, and behold it
r thou shalt not go over this Jordan.
:28 But charge Joshua, and encourage him, and strengthen him: for he
before this people, and he shall cause them to inherit
e.
against Bethpeor.
rken, O Israel, unto the statutes and unto the
 do them, that ye may live, and go
 possess the land which the LORD God of your fathers giveth you.
 add unto the word which I command you, neither shall
at ye may keep the commandments of the
RD your God which I command you.
ur eyes have seen what the LORD did because of Baalpeor: for all
wed Baalpeor, the LORD thy God hath destroyed them
at did cleave unto the LORD your God are alive every one
hold, I have taught you statutes and judgments, even as the LORD
e, that ye should do so in the land whither ye go to
ore and do them; for this is your wisdom and your
 nations, which shall hear all these
utes, and say, Surely this great nation is a wise and
For what nation is there so great, who hath God so nigh unto them,
God is in all things that we call upon him for?  4:8
eat, that hath statutes and judgments so
righteous as all this law, which I set before you this day?  4:9 Only
thyself, and keep thy soul diligently, lest thou forget
 have seen, and lest they depart from thy
 them thy sons, and thy sons'
Specially the day that thou stoodest before the LORD thy
D said unto me, Gather me the people
ther, and I will make them hear my words, that they may learn to
ys that they shall live upon the earth, and that
4:11 And ye came near and stood under the mountain; and the mountain
re unto the midst of heaven, with darkness, clouds, and
 the LORD spake unto you out of the midst of the fire: ye
rds, but saw no similitude; only ye heard a
 his covenant, which he commanded you to
perform, even ten commandments; and he wrote them upon two tables of
 And the LORD commanded me at that time to teach you statutes and
e might do them in the land whither ye go over to
fore good heed unto yourselves; for ye saw no manner
the LORD spake unto you in Horeb out of
he midst of the fire: 4:16 Lest ye corrupt yourselves, and make you a
 the similitude of any figure, the likeness of male or
 any beast that is on the earth, the
ness of any winged fowl that flieth in the air, 4:18 The likeness
 creepeth on the ground, the likeness of any fish
 earth: 4:19 And lest thou lift up
eyes unto heaven, and when thou seest the sun, and the moon, and
l the host of heaven, shouldest be driven to worship
e LORD thy God hath divided unto all
ons under the whole heaven.
e LORD hath taken you, and brought you forth out of the
gypt, to be unto him a people of
nce, as ye are this day.
re the LORD was angry with me for your sakes, and sware
ordan, and that I should not go in unto
hat good land, which the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance:
st die in this land, I must not go over Jordan: but ye
hat good land.
selves, lest ye forget the covenant of the
nd make you a graven image, or
ss of any thing, which the LORD thy God hath forbidden thee.
y God is a consuming fire, even a jealous God.
n, and children's children, and ye
have remained long in the land, and shall corrupt yourselves,
ge, or the likeness of any thing, and shall do
d, to provoke him to anger: 4:26 I
eaven and earth to witness against you this day, that ye shall
from off the land whereunto ye go over Jordan to
our days upon it, but shall utterly
stroyed.
r you among the nations, and ye shall be
left few in number among the heathen, whither the LORD shall lead you.
here ye shall serve gods, the work of men's hands, wood and
e, nor hear, nor eat, nor smell.
ut if from thence thou shalt seek the LORD thy God, thou shalt
ek him with all thy heart and with all thy soul.
n, and all these things are come upon
e, even in the latter days, if thou turn to the LORD thy God, and
 unto his voice; 4:31 (For the LORD thy God is a
 thee, neither destroy thee, nor
he covenant of thy fathers which he sware unto them.
 that are past, which were before thee,
ince the day that God created man upon the earth, and ask from the
en unto the other, whether there hath been any such
r hath been heard like it?  4:33 Did
 people hear the voice of God speaking out of the midst of the
eard, and live?  4:34 Or hath God assayed to go
t of another nation, by
igns, and by wonders, and by war, and by a mighty
 and by great terrors, according to
hat the LORD your God did for you in Egypt before your eyes?
shewed, that thou mightest know that the LORD he
him.
 hear his voice, that he might
hee: and upon earth he shewed thee his great fire; and thou
of the midst of the fire.
use he loved thy fathers, therefore he chose their seed
e out in his sight with his mighty power
out of Egypt; 4:38 To drive out nations from before thee greater and
thou art, to bring thee in, to give thee their land for
is day.
nd consider it in thine heart, that the
ORD he is God in heaven above, and upon the earth beneath: there is
:40 Thou shalt keep therefore his statutes, and his commandments,
hee this day, that it may go well with thee, and with
that thou mayest prolong thy days upon
e earth, which the LORD thy God giveth thee, for ever.
ree cities on this side Jordan toward the
e thither, which should kill
r unawares, and hated him not in times past; and that
ies he might live: 4:43 Namely, Bezer in
the wilderness, in the plain country, of the Reubenites; and Ramoth in
he Gadites; and Golan in Bashan, of the Manassites.
h Moses set before the children of
: 4:45 These are the testimonies, and the statutes, and the
spake unto the children of Israel, after they
his side Jordan, in the valley over against Bethpeor, in the
the Amorites, who dwelt at Heshbon, whom Moses
ter they were come forth out of
47 And they possessed his land, and the land of Og king of
 Amorites, which were on this side Jordan
ich is by the bank of the
en unto mount Sion, which is Hermon, 4:49 And all the
tward, even unto the sea of the plain,
der the springs of Pisgah.
s called all Israel, and said unto them, Hear, O Israel,
 which I speak in your ears this day, that
.
with us in Horeb.
 this covenant with our fathers, but with us,
 this day.
 face to face in the mount out of the
st of the fire, 5:5 (I stood between the LORD and you at that time,
 word of the LORD: for ye were afraid by reason of the
he mount;) saying, 5:6 I am the LORD thy
God, which brought thee out of the land of Egypt, from the house of
 Thou shalt have none other gods before me.
en image, or any likeness of any
at is in heaven above, or that is in the earth beneath, or
neath the earth: 5:9 Thou shalt not bow down
 I the LORD thy God am a jealous
iting the iniquity of the fathers upon the children unto the
ation of them that hate me, 5:10 And shewing
 me and keep my commandments.
 shalt not take the name of the LORD thy God in vain: for the
m guiltless that taketh his name in vain.
t, as the LORD thy God hath
e.
 do all thy work: 5:14 But the
y is the sabbath of the LORD thy God: in it thou shalt not
hy son, nor thy daughter, nor thy manservant,
r thine ass, nor any of thy
hy stranger that is within thy gates; that thy manservant
est as well as thou.
that thou wast a servant in the land of Egypt, and
ee out thence through a mighty hand
y a stretched out arm: therefore the LORD thy God commanded thee
h day.
other, as the LORD thy God hath
 thee; that thy days may be prolonged, and that it may go
nd which the LORD thy God giveth thee.
5:17 Thou shalt not kill.
shalt thou commit adultery.
r shalt thou steal.
thou bear false witness against thy neighbour.
 neighbour's wife, neither shalt
et thy neighbour's house, his field, or his manservant, or his
 or his ass, or any thing that is thy neighbour's.
e unto all your assembly in the mount
 of the midst of the fire, of the cloud, and of the thick darkness,
ice: and he added no more. And he wrote them in two
them unto me.
 when ye heard the voice out of the midst of
rn with fire,) that ye came near
 even all the heads of your tribes, and your elders; 5:24 And
LORD our God hath shewed us his glory and his
e out of the midst of the fire:
een this day that God doth talk with man, and he liveth.
hould we die? for this great fire will consume
 our God any more, then we shall
5:26 For who is there of all flesh, that hath heard the voice of the
aking out of the midst of the fire, as we have, and
hear all that the LORD our God shall
 and speak thou unto us all that the LORD our God shall speak unto
l hear it, and do it.
 heard the voice of your words, when ye spake unto
 have heard the voice of the words of
s people, which they have spoken unto thee: they have well said all
spoken.
heart in them, that they would fear me,
nd keep all my commandments always, that it might be well with them,
 children for ever!  5:30 Go say to them, Get you into
t as for thee, stand thou here by me, and I will speak unto
ts, and the statutes, and the judgments, which
 do them in the land which I give
 possess it.
o therefore as the LORD your God hath
manded you: ye shall not turn aside to the right hand or to the
all walk in all the ways which the LORD your God hath
ve, and that it may be well with you, and
 which ye shall possess.
are the commandments, the statutes, and the judgments,
anded to teach you, that ye might do them
6:2 That thou mightest fear
God, to keep all his statutes and his commandments, which
 thy son, and thy son's son, all the days of
longed.
nd observe to do it; that it may be
with thee, and that ye may increase mightily, as the LORD God of
romised thee, in the land that floweth with milk and
The LORD our God is one LORD: 6:5 And thou shalt
ne heart, and with all thy soul, and
 all thy might.
ich I command thee this day, shall be in thine
 diligently unto thy children, and
talk of them when thou sittest in thine house, and when thou
d when thou liest down, and when thou risest up.
 a sign upon thine hand, and they
e as frontlets between thine eyes.
And thou shalt write them upon the posts of thy house, and on thy
d it shall be, when the LORD thy God shall have brought thee
 sware unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac,
 goodly cities, which thou
 6:11 And houses full of all good things, which thou
, which thou diggedst not, vineyards and
olive trees, which thou plantedst not; when thou shalt have eaten and
 Then beware lest thou forget the LORD, which brought
 Egypt, from the house of bondage.
 Thou shalt fear the LORD thy God, and serve him, and shalt swear
:14 Ye shall not go after other gods, of the gods of the people which
ut you; 6:15 (For the LORD thy God is a jealous God among
e LORD thy God be kindled against thee, and
arth.
your God, as ye tempted him in

ments of the LORD your God,
monies, and his statutes, which he hath commanded thee.
at which is right and good in the sight of
 and that thou mayest go in
he good land which the LORD sware unto thy fathers.
emies from before thee, as the LORD hath
spoken.
ee in time to come, saying, What mean
 testimonies, and the statutes, and the judgments, which the LORD
anded you?  6:21 Then thou shalt say unto thy son, We
pt; and the LORD brought us out of Egypt
with a mighty hand: 6:22 And the LORD shewed signs and wonders, great
n Egypt, upon Pharaoh, and upon all his household, before
ught us out from thence, that he might bring
are unto our fathers.
 commanded us to do all these statutes, to fear the
ys, that he might preserve us alive, as
t is at this day.
our righteousness, if we observe to do all these
od, as he hath commanded us.
he LORD thy God shall bring thee into the land whither thou
d hath cast out many nations before thee, the
e Amorites, and the Canaanites,
erizzites, and the Hivites, and the Jebusites, seven nations
han thou; 7:2 And when the LORD thy God shall
smite them, and utterly destroy
u shalt make no covenant with them, nor shew mercy unto them:
u make marriages with them; thy daughter thou
daughter shalt thou take unto thy

following me, that they may
ods: so will the anger of the LORD be kindled against
y.
; ye shall destroy their altars,
k down their images, and cut down their groves, and burn their
ire.
to the LORD thy God: the LORD thy
h chosen thee to be a special people unto himself, above all
he face of the earth.
not set his love upon you, nor choose you, because ye
people; for ye were the fewest of all
ple: 7:8 But because the LORD loved you, and because he would keep
e had sworn unto your fathers, hath the LORD brought
d redeemed you out of the house of
n, from the hand of Pharaoh king of Egypt.
od, he is God, the faithful God,
epeth covenant and mercy with them that love him and keep his
usand generations; 7:10 And repayeth them that
hem: he will not be slack to him
eth him, he will repay him to his face.

dments, and the statutes, and
ts, which I command thee this day, to do them.
ss, if ye hearken to these
 keep, and do them, that the LORD thy God shall keep
 mercy which he sware unto thy fathers:
:13 And he will love thee, and bless thee, and multiply thee: he will
e fruit of thy womb, and the fruit of thy land, thy corn,
il, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks
re unto thy fathers to give
 Thou shalt be blessed above all people: there shall not be male
mong you, or among your cattle.
d the LORD will take away from thee all sickness, and will put
eases of Egypt, which thou knowest, upon thee; but
 hate thee.
 all the people which the LORD thy God
all deliver thee; thine eye shall have no pity upon them: neither
their gods; for that will be a snare unto thee.
eart, These nations are more than I;
can I dispossess them?  7:18 Thou shalt not be afraid of them: but
ber what the LORD thy God did unto Pharaoh, and unto
tations which thine eyes saw, and the
ns, and the wonders, and the mighty hand, and the stretched out
RD thy God brought thee out: so shall the LORD thy
om thou art afraid.
ORD thy God will send the hornet among them, until
mselves from thee, be destroyed.
hou shalt not be affrighted at them: for the LORD thy God is
d and terrible.
od will put out those nations before thee by
sume them at once, lest the
 field increase upon thee.
 LORD thy God shall deliver them unto thee, and shall
struction, until they be destroyed.
4 And he shall deliver their kings into thine hand, and thou shalt
me from under heaven: there shall no man be able to
ave destroyed them.
ges of their gods shall ye burn with fire: thou
 that is on them, nor take it unto
lest thou be snared therin: for it is an abomination to the LORD
either shalt thou bring an abomination into thine house, lest
g like it: but thou shalt utterly detest it, and
t is a cursed thing.
dments which I command thee this day shall ye
multiply, and go in and possess
which the LORD sware unto your fathers.

hich the LORD thy God led
y years in the wilderness, to humble thee, and to prove
hine heart, whether thou wouldest keep his
ed thee, and suffered thee to hunger, and fed thee
ot, neither did thy fathers know; that
 might make thee know that man doth not live by bread only, but by
proceedeth out of the mouth of the LORD doth man live.
old upon thee, neither did thy foot swell,
o consider in thine heart, that, as a man chasteneth
hasteneth thee.
t keep the commandments of the LORD thy God, to

into a good land, a land of
er, of fountains and depths that spring out of valleys
at, and barley, and vines, and fig trees,
d honey; 8:9 A land wherein
t bread without scarceness, thou shalt not lack any thing
s are iron, and out of whose hills thou
ayest dig brass.
ten and art full, then thou shalt bless the LORD
 hath given thee.
 forget not the LORD thy God, in not keeping his
nd his statutes, which I command
s day: 8:12 Lest when thou hast eaten and art full, and hast
nd dwelt therein; 8:13 And when thy herds and
nd thy gold is multiplied, and
hou hast is multiplied; 8:14 Then thine heart be lifted up,
D thy God, which brought thee forth out of the
dage; 8:15 Who led thee through
t and terrible wilderness, wherein were fiery serpents, and
 where there was no water; who brought thee
:16 Who fed thee in the
anna, which thy fathers knew not, that he might
e thee, to do thee good at thy
; 8:17 And thou say in thine heart, My power and the might
 me this wealth.
member the LORD thy God: for it is he that
 may establish his covenant
e unto thy fathers, as it is this day.
8:19 And it shall be, if thou do at all forget the LORD thy God, and
er gods, and serve them, and worship them, I testify
hall surely perish.
 which the LORD destroyeth before your face, so
ot be obedient unto the voice of
 your God.
 to pass over Jordan this day, to go in to
n thyself, cities great and
heaven, 9:2 A people great and tall, the children of the
, and of whom thou hast heard say, Who can
Understand therefore this day,
ORD thy God is he which goeth over before thee; as a
y them, and he shall bring them down
re thy face: so shalt thou drive them out, and destroy them
th said unto thee.
n thine heart, after that the LORD thy God hath
ing, For my righteousness the LORD
rought me in to possess this land: but for the wickedness of
 doth drive them out from before thee.
9:5 Not for thy righteousness, or for the uprightness of thine heart,
to possess their land: but for the wickedness of these
h drive them out from before thee, and
at he may perform the word which the LORD sware unto thy fathers,
nd Jacob.
t the LORD thy God giveth thee not this
ood land to possess it for thy righteousness; for thou art a

ovokedst the LORD thy God to
 wilderness: from the day that thou didst depart out of
 came unto this place, ye have been
lious against the LORD.
eb ye provoked the LORD to wrath, so that the LORD was
oyed you.
he mount to receive the tables of stone,
even the tables of the covenant which the LORD made with you, then I
ount forty days and forty nights, I neither did eat
 the LORD delivered unto me two tables
 stone written with the finger of God; and on them was written
 words, which the LORD spake with you in the mount
the day of the assembly.
me to pass at the end of forty days and forty nights,
 tables of stone, even the tables of the
covenant.
e, Arise, get thee down quickly from
e; for thy people which thou hast brought forth out of Egypt have
ves; they are quickly turned aside out of the way
 made them a molten image.
more the LORD spake unto me, saying, I have seen this
stiffnecked people: 9:14 Let me alone,
at I may destroy them, and blot out their name from under heaven:
f thee a nation mightier and greater than they.
om the mount, and the mount burned
ire: and the two tables of the covenant were in my two hands.
and, behold, ye had sinned against the LORD your
f: ye had turned aside quickly out
 way which the LORD had commanded you.
9:17 And I took the two tables, and cast them out of my two hands, and
efore your eyes.
efore the LORD, as at the first, forty days and
ad, nor drink water, because of all
sins which ye sinned, in doing wickedly in the sight of the LORD,
 anger.
ger and hot displeasure, wherewith the
RD was wroth against you to destroy you. But the LORD hearkened unto
e also.
y with Aaron to have destroyed him: and
 prayed for Aaron also the same time.
:21 And I took your sin, the calf which ye had made, and burnt it
amped it, and ground it very small, even until it was
the dust thereof into the brook that
ended out of the mount.
erah, and at Massah, and at Kibrothhattaavah, ye
3 Likewise when the LORD sent you from Kadeshbarnea, saying, Go up
land which I have given you; then ye rebelled against
our God, and ye believed him not, nor
rkened to his voice.
rebellious against the LORD from the day that I knew
before the LORD forty days and forty nights, as
he LORD had said he would destroy

d said, O Lord GOD, destroy
e and thine inheritance, which thou hast redeemed through
 hast brought forth out of Egypt with a
ighty hand.
 Abraham, Isaac, and Jacob; look not unto
heir wickedness, nor to their
est the land whence thou broughtest us out say, Because the
ing them into the land which he promised them,
rought them out to slay them in
rness.
 thine inheritance, which thou
 out by thy mighty power and by thy stretched out arm.
 said unto me, Hew thee two tables of stone
e into the mount, and make thee
 wood.
les the words that were in the first
es which thou brakest, and thou shalt put them in the ark.
 of shittim wood, and hewed two tables of stone
to the mount, having the two tables
ne hand.
s, according to the first writing, the
n commandments, which the LORD spake unto you in the mount out of
fire in the day of the assembly: and the LORD gave
ed myself and came down from the mount, and put the
ade; and there they be, as the LORD
nded me.
l took their journey from Beeroth of the
children of Jaakan to Mosera: there Aaron died, and there he was
r his son ministered in the priest's office in his
journeyed unto Gudgodah; and from Gudgodah to

e tribe of Levi, to bear the
ovenant of the LORD, to stand before the LORD to minister
 his name, unto this day.
e Levi hath no part nor inheritance with his brethren;
 according as the LORD thy God promised
im.
cording to the first time, forty
 forty nights; and the LORD hearkened unto me at that time
 not destroy thee.
aid unto me, Arise, take thy journey before the
sess the land, which I sware unto
athers to give unto them.
, Israel, what doth the LORD thy God require of thee, but
 to walk in all his ways, and to love him,
hy heart and with all thy
keep the commandments of the LORD, and his statutes,
for thy good?  10:14 Behold, the heaven
nd the heaven of heavens is the LORD's thy God, the earth also, with
in is.
t in thy fathers to love them, and he
se their seed after them, even you above all people, as it is this
rcumcise therefore the foreskin of your heart, and be no more
 For the LORD your God is God of gods, and Lord of lords, a great
d a terrible, which regardeth not persons, nor taketh
 the judgment of the fatherless and
, and loveth the stranger, in giving him food and raiment.
e the stranger: for ye were strangers in the
r the LORD thy God; him shalt thou serve, and to
y his name.
 he is thy God, that hath done for thee
hese great and terrible things, which thine eyes have seen.
t down into Egypt with threescore and ten
de thee as the stars of
ude.
 LORD thy God, and keep his charge,
is statutes, and his judgments, and his commandments, alway.
s day: for I speak not with your children which
seen the chastisement of the LORD
d, his greatness, his mighty hand, and his stretched out arm,
, and his acts, which he did in the midst of
and unto all his land; 11:4 And
id unto the army of Egypt, unto their horses, and to their
e water of the Red sea to overflow them as
 hath destroyed them unto this
And what he did unto you in the wilderness, until ye came
 what he did unto Dathan and Abiram, the sons
earth opened her mouth, and
m up, and their households, and their tents, and all the
r possession, in the midst of all Israel:
t acts of the LORD which he
Therefore shall ye keep all the commandments which I command you
may be strong, and go in and possess the land,
d that ye may prolong your days in
nd, which the LORD sware unto your fathers to give unto them and
and that floweth with milk and honey.
1:10 For the land, whither thou goest in to possess it, is not as the
, from whence ye came out, where thou sowedst thy seed,
oot, as a garden of herbs: 11:11 But the
land, whither ye go to possess it, is a land of hills and valleys, and
er of the rain of heaven: 11:12 A land which the LORD thy
of the LORD thy God are always upon it, from
e end of the year.
ome to pass, if ye shall hearken diligently unto
u this day, to love the LORD your
d to serve him with all your heart and with all your soul,
ou the rain of your land in his due season,
t thou mayest gather in thy
 wine, and thine oil.
send grass in thy fields for thy cattle, that thou
 Take heed to yourselves, that your heart be not deceived, and ye
erve other gods, and worship them; 11:17 And then the
st you, and he shut up the heaven, that
here be no rain, and that the land yield not her fruit; and lest ye
from off the good land which the LORD giveth you.
 these my words in your heart and in
 soul, and bind them for a sign upon your hand, that they may be
en your eyes.
them your children, speaking of them when
u walkest by the way, when
n, and when thou risest up.
hou shalt write them upon the door posts of thine house,
That your days may be multiplied, and the
the LORD sware unto your
them, as the days of heaven upon the earth.
 all these commandments which I
ou, to do them, to love the LORD your God, to walk in all his
nto him; 11:23 Then will the LORD drive out all
ye shall possess greater nations
tier than yourselves.
 whereon the soles of your feet shall tread shall be
 Lebanon, from the river, the river
ates, even unto the uttermost sea shall your coast be.
e able to stand before you: for the LORD
your God shall lay the fear of you and the dread of you upon all the
hall tread upon, as he hath said unto you.
y a blessing and a curse; 11:27
g, if ye obey the commandments of the LORD your God, which I
11:28 And a curse, if ye will not obey the
urn aside out of the way which
you this day, to go after other gods, which ye have not
l come to pass, when the LORD thy God hath brought
ou goest to possess it, that thou
ut the blessing upon mount Gerizim, and the curse upon mount
y not on the other side Jordan, by the way where the sun
 the Canaanites, which dwell in the
aign over against Gilgal, beside the plains of Moreh?  11:31 For
 Jordan to go in to possess the land which the LORD
ll possess it, and dwell therein.
 And ye shall observe to do all the statutes and judgments which
his day.
d judgments, which ye shall observe to
 in the land, which the LORD God of thy fathers giveth thee to
days that ye live upon the earth.
Ye shall utterly destroy all the places, wherein the nations
 served their gods, upon the high mountains, and
een tree: 12:3 And ye shall
ir altars, and break their pillars, and burn their groves
ew down the graven images of their gods, and
place.
 LORD your God.
 which the LORD your God shall choose out of
 even unto his habitation shall
and thither thou shalt come: 12:6 And thither ye shall bring
and your sacrifices, and your tithes, and heave
ws, and your freewill offerings,
firstlings of your herds and of your flocks: 12:7 And there ye
 LORD your God, and ye shall rejoice in all that
 households, wherein the LORD thy
h blessed thee.
ter all the things that we do here this day,
wn eyes.
e to the rest and to the inheritance,
ch the LORD your God giveth you.
But when ye go over Jordan, and dwell in the land which the LORD
u to inherit, and when he giveth you rest from all
t ye dwell in safety; 12:11 Then there
all be a place which the LORD your God shall choose to cause his
e; thither shall ye bring all that I command you;
crifices, your tithes, and the heave
ring of your hand, and all your choice vows which ye vow unto the
e shall rejoice before the LORD your God, ye, and
d your menservants, and your
, and the Levite that is within your gates; forasmuch as
tance with you.
elf that thou offer not thy burnt offerings in
ut in the place which the LORD
se in one of thy tribes, there thou shalt offer thy burnt
 shalt do all that I command thee.
5 Notwithstanding thou mayest kill and eat flesh in all thy gates,
oul lusteth after, according to the blessing of the
n thee: the unclean and the clean may
 thereof, as of the roebuck, and as of the hart.
blood; ye shall pour it upon the earth
 water.
n thy gates the tithe of thy corn, or
thy wine, or of thy oil, or the firstlings of thy herds or of thy
 thy vows which thou vowest, nor thy freewill
 hand: 12:18 But thou must eat
e the LORD thy God in the place which the LORD thy God shall
son, and thy daughter, and thy manservant, and
 is within thy gates: and thou
ice before the LORD thy God in all that thou puttest thine
e heed to thyself that thou forsake not the Levite as long as
earth.
l enlarge thy border, as he hath
 thee, and thou shalt say, I will eat flesh, because thy soul
 thou mayest eat flesh, whatsoever thy soul
ich the LORD thy God hath chosen to put his name
hou shalt kill of thy herd and of
ck, which the LORD hath given thee, as I have commanded thee,
 thy gates whatsoever thy soul lusteth after.
art is eaten, so thou shalt eat
 unclean and the clean shall eat of them alike.
not the blood: for the blood is the
 and thou mayest not eat the life with the flesh.
ou shalt pour it upon the earth as

ay go well with thee, and with
en after thee, when thou shalt do that which is right in the
12:26 Only thy holy things which thou hast, and thy vows, thou shalt
nto the place which the LORD shall choose: 12:27 And
erings, the flesh and the blood, upon
 altar of the LORD thy God: and the blood of thy sacrifices shall
n the altar of the LORD thy God, and thou shalt eat
 hear all these words which I command thee, that it
 thy children after thee for ever, when
hou doest that which is good and right in the sight of the LORD thy
hen the LORD thy God shall cut off the nations from before
 to possess them, and thou succeedest them,
heed to thyself that thou be
y following them, after that they be destroyed from before
ire not after their gods, saying, How did
ill I do likewise.
 do so unto the LORD thy God: for every
bomination to the LORD, which he hateth, have they done unto their
heir sons and their daughters they have burnt in the
hat thing soever I command you, observe to do it: thou shalt
iminish from it.
ong you a prophet, or a dreamer of dreams, and
 And the sign or the wonder come
 whereof he spake unto thee, saying, Let us go after other
t known, and let us serve them; 13:3 Thou
prophet, or that dreamer of
he LORD your God proveth you, to know whether ye love the
ur heart and with all your soul.
e shall walk after the LORD your God, and fear him, and keep his
obey his voice, and ye shall serve him, and cleave
et, or that dreamer of dreams, shall be put to
n you away from the LORD your God,
brought you out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed you out of
 to thrust thee out of the way which the LORD thy
 shalt thou put the evil away from
dst of thee.
on of thy mother, or thy son, or thy
hter, or the wife of thy bosom, or thy friend, which is as thine
hee secretly, saying, Let us go and serve other
ou, nor thy fathers; 13:7 Namely,
gods of the people which are round about you, nigh unto thee,
 from the one end of the earth even unto the
t not consent unto him, nor
him; neither shall thine eye pity him, neither shalt thou
 conceal him: 13:9 But thou shalt surely kill
im to put him to death, and
e hand of all the people.
u shalt stone him with stones, that he die; because he
way from the LORD thy God, which brought
thee out of the land of Egypt, from the house of bondage.
all hear, and fear, and shall do no more any

thy cities, which the LORD thy
iven thee to dwell there, saying, 13:13 Certain men, the
ne out from among you, and have withdrawn
t us go and serve other gods,
ve not known; 13:14 Then shalt thou enquire, and make
nd, behold, if it be truth, and the thing
 among you; 13:15 Thou shalt
 the inhabitants of that city with the edge of the sword,
d all that is therein, and the cattle
reof, with the edge of the sword.
 And thou shalt gather all the spoil of it into the midst of the
d shalt burn with fire the city, and all the spoil
 thy God: and it shall be an heap for
r; it shall not be built again.
nd there shall cleave nought of the cursed thing to thine hand:
urn from the fierceness of his anger, and shew thee
 thee, and multiply thee, as he hath
n unto thy fathers; 13:18 When thou shalt hearken to the voice of
 to keep all his commandments which I command thee
ght in the eyes of the LORD thy God.
:1 Ye are the children of the LORD your God: ye shall not cut
any baldness between your eyes for the dead.
o the LORD thy God, and the LORD
sen thee to be a peculiar people unto himself, above all the
the earth.
abominable thing.
asts which ye shall eat: the ox, the sheep, and
ebuck, and the fallow deer, and the
goat, and the pygarg, and the wild ox, and the chamois.
 parteth the hoof, and cleaveth the cleft
 the beasts, that ye shall
evertheless these ye shall not eat of them that chew the cud, or
e the cloven hoof; as the camel, and the hare, and
, but divide not the hoof; therefore
 are unclean unto you.
ne, because it divideth the hoof, yet cheweth not the
ye shall not eat of their flesh, nor
h their dead carcase.
ll eat of all that are in the waters: all that have
4:10 And whatsoever hath not fins and
les ye may not eat; it is unclean unto you.
.
shall not eat: the eagle, and the
ge, and the ospray, 14:13 And the glede, and the kite, and the
nd, 14:14 And every raven after his kind, 14:15
d the cuckow, and the hawk after
, 14:16 The little owl, and the great owl, and the swan, 14:17
 the gier eagle, and the cormorant, 14:18 And the
nd, and the lapwing, and the bat.
 And every creeping thing that flieth is unclean unto you: they

t.
hat dieth of itself: thou shalt
nto the stranger that is in thy gates, that he may eat it; or
nto an alien: for thou art an holy people unto
seethe a kid in his mother's milk.
2 Thou shalt truly tithe all the increase of thy seed, that the
h year by year.
t before the LORD thy God, in the place which
re, the tithe of thy corn, of thy
nd of thine oil, and the firstlings of thy herds and of thy
t learn to fear the LORD thy God always.

e, so that thou art not able
 or if the place be too far from thee, which the LORD thy
is name there, when the LORD thy God hath
it into money, and bind up
hine hand, and shalt go unto the place which the LORD
nd thou shalt bestow that money for
oever thy soul lusteth after, for oxen, or for sheep, or for
ink, or for whatsoever thy soul desireth: and
thy God, and thou shalt rejoice,
d thine household, 14:27 And the Levite that is within thy
rsake him; for he hath no part nor inheritance
ree years thou shalt bring forth all the tithe
 shalt lay it up within thy gates:
And the Levite, (because he hath no part nor inheritance with
er, and the fatherless, and the widow, which are
shall eat and be satisfied; that the
 thy God may bless thee in all the work of thine hand which thou
the end of every seven years thou shalt make a release.
er of the release: Every creditor that
ndeth ought unto his neighbour shall release it; he shall not exact
bour, or of his brother; because it is called the
igner thou mayest exact it again: but that which is
nd shall release; 15:4 Save when there
all be no poor among you; for the LORD shall greatly bless thee in
he LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance to
efully hearken unto the voice of the
 thy God, to observe to do all these commandments which I command

as he promised thee: and thou
unto many nations, but thou shalt not borrow; and thou
s, but they shall not reign over thee.
15:7 If there be among you a poor man of one of thy brethren within
s in thy land which the LORD thy God giveth thee, thou
, nor shut thine hand from thy poor
er: 15:8 But thou shalt open thine hand wide unto him, and shalt
fficient for his need, in that which he wanteth.
thought in thy wicked heart, saying,
seventh year, the year of release, is at hand; and thine eye be
or brother, and thou givest him nought; and he cry
it be sin unto thee.
urely give him, and thine heart shall not be grieved
ause that for this thing the LORD thy
 shall bless thee in all thy works, and in all that thou puttest

 of the land: therefore I
aying, Thou shalt open thine hand wide unto thy
edy, in thy land.
her, an Hebrew man, or an Hebrew woman, be sold
; then in the seventh year thou
 him go free from thee.
thou sendest him out free from thee, thou shalt not let
ou shalt furnish him liberally out of thy
hy winepress: of that
thy God hath blessed thee thou shalt give unto him.
 that thou wast a bondman in the land of
Egypt, and the LORD thy God redeemed thee: therefore I command thee
ay.
to thee, I will not go away from
cause he loveth thee and thine house, because he is well with
 shalt take an aul, and thrust it through his ear
y servant for ever. And also unto thy
dservant thou shalt do likewise.
It shall not seem hard unto thee, when thou sendest him away
 hath been worth a double hired servant to thee,
 LORD thy God shall bless thee in
t thou doest.
ales that come of thy herd and of thy flock
od: thou shalt do no work with
ing of thy bullock, nor shear the firstling of thy sheep.
 before the LORD thy God year by year in the
u and thy household.
 be any blemish therein, as if it be lame, or blind,
shalt not sacrifice it unto the LORD thy
God.
 gates: the unclean and the clean
shall eat it alike, as the roebuck, and as the hart.
t the blood thereof; thou shalt pour it
pon the ground as water.
he month of Abib, and keep the passover unto the LORD
Abib the LORD thy God brought thee forth
out of Egypt by night.
therefore sacrifice the passover unto the LORD thy
in the place which the LORD shall
to place his name there.
t eat no leavened bread with it; seven days shalt thou
th, even the bread of affliction; for thou
 haste: that thou mayest
 when thou camest forth out of the land of Egypt all
And there shall be no leavened bread seen with thee in all thy
ither shall there any thing of the flesh, which
even, remain all night until the

sover within any of thy gates,
LORD thy God giveth thee: 16:6 But at the place which the
 to place his name in, there thou shalt
acrifice the passover at even, at the going down of the sun, at the
u camest forth out of Egypt.
hou shalt roast and eat it in the place which the LORD thy
ou shalt turn in the morning, and go unto thy
t unleavened bread: and on the seventh day
hy God: thou shalt do no work

hee: begin to number the
 such time as thou beginnest to put the sickle to the
 keep the feast of weeks unto the LORD thy God
g of thine hand, which thou shalt
to the LORD thy God, according as the LORD thy God hath blessed
u shalt rejoice before the LORD thy God, thou, and
hy manservant, and thy maidservant,
he Levite that is within thy gates, and the stranger, and the
idow, that are among you, in the place which the
his name there.
member that thou wast a bondman in Egypt: and
tes.
 of tabernacles seven days, after
ou hast gathered in thy corn and thy wine: 16:14 And thou shalt
t, thou, and thy son, and thy daughter, and thy
d the Levite, the stranger, and the
rless, and the widow, that are within thy gates.
 a solemn feast unto the LORD thy God
the place which the LORD shall choose: because the LORD thy God
 all thine increase, and in all the works of thine
ly rejoice.
 shall all thy males appear before the LORD
ose; in the feast of unleavened
d in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles: and
 before the LORD empty: 16:17 Every man shall
blessing of the LORD thy God
h given thee.
 shalt thou make thee in all thy gates, which
out thy tribes: and they shall
people with just judgment.
halt not wrest judgment; thou shalt not respect persons,
 gift doth blind the eyes of the wise, and
6:20 That which is altogether just shalt thou follow, that thou
herit the land which the LORD thy God giveth thee.
e a grove of any trees near unto the
r of the LORD thy God, which thou shalt make thee.
hee up any image; which the LORD thy God
hateth.
nto the LORD thy God any bullock, or
p, wherein is blemish, or any evilfavouredness: for that is an
 LORD thy God.
mong you, within any of thy gates which the
 that hath wrought wickedness
t of the LORD thy God, in transgressing his covenant, 17:3
 other gods, and worshipped them, either the
aven, which I have not
d it be told thee, and thou hast heard of it, and
 it be true, and the thing certain,
such abomination is wrought in Israel: 17:5 Then shalt thou bring
 that woman, which have committed that wicked thing,
or that woman, and shalt stone them with
stones, till they die.
h of two witnesses, or three witnesses, shall he that
death; but at the mouth of one witness he
nds of the witnesses shall be first upon him to put him to
 hands of all the people. So thou shalt put
f there arise a matter too hard for thee in judgment, between
een plea and plea, and between stroke and stroke,
in thy gates: then shalt thou arise,
get thee up into the place which the LORD thy God shall choose;
 come unto the priests the Levites, and unto the
 and enquire; and they shall shew
e sentence of judgment: 17:10 And thou shalt do according to
ey of that place which the LORD shall choose
e to do according to all that
 thee: 17:11 According to the sentence of the law which
according to the judgment which they shall
 decline from the sentence
ll shew thee, to the right hand, nor to the left.
presumptuously, and will not hearken
 the priest that standeth to minister there before the LORD thy
dge, even that man shall die: and thou shalt put
3 And all the people shall hear, and fear, and do no more
When thou art come unto the land which the LORD thy God giveth
ess it, and shalt dwell therein, and shalt say, I
all the nations that are about me;
Thou shalt in any wise set him king over thee, whom the LORD thy
one from among thy brethren shalt thou set king over
ranger over thee, which is not thy
r.
es to himself, nor cause the
turn to Egypt, to the end that he should multiply horses:
h said unto you, Ye shall henceforth return
l he multiply wives to himself, that his heart turn
tly multiply to himself silver and

upon the throne of his kingdom,
hall write him a copy of this law in a book out of that which
 the Levites: 17:19 And it shall be with him, and
s of his life: that he may learn to
the LORD his God, to keep all the words of this law and these
 17:20 That his heart be not lifted up above his
de from the commandment, to the
d, or to the left: to the end that he may prolong his days in
his children, in the midst of Israel.
8:1 The priests the Levites, and all the tribe of Levi, shall have no
ritance with Israel: they shall eat the offerings of the
 inheritance.
 have no inheritance among their brethren:
h said unto them.
e the priest's due from the people, from them
 ox or sheep; and they shall give
e priest the shoulder, and the two cheeks, and the maw.
of thy corn, of thy wine, and of thine oil,
p, shalt thou give him.
RD thy God hath chosen him out of all thy tribes, to
of the LORD, him and his sons for ever.

 gates out of all Israel,
ned, and come with all the desire of his mind unto the
hoose; 18:7 Then he shall minister in the
hren the Levites do, which
fore the LORD.
e portions to eat, beside that which cometh of
hen thou art come into the land which the LORD thy God giveth
learn to do after the abominations of those
und among you any one that maketh his son
 or that useth divination, or
 of times, or an enchanter, or a witch.

amiliar spirits, or a wizard,
ancer.
gs are an abomination unto the LORD:
because of these abominations the LORD thy God doth drive them out
.
LORD thy God.
which thou shalt possess, hearkened unto
observers of times, and unto diviners: but as for thee, the LORD thy
uffered thee so to do.
hy God will raise up unto thee a Prophet from the
ike unto me; unto him ye shall
8:16 According to all that thou desiredst of the LORD thy
f the assembly, saying, Let me not hear again
 let me see this great fire any
t I die not.
to me, They have well spoken that which they
m up a Prophet from among their brethren, like
his mouth; and he shall speak unto
ll that I shall command him.
it shall come to pass, that whosoever will not hearken unto
 speak in my name, I will require it of him.
resume to speak a word in my name,
I have not commanded him to speak, or that shall speak in the
ven that prophet shall die.
f thou say in thine heart, How shall we know the word which
n?  18:22 When a prophet speaketh in the name
 nor come to pass, that is the
h the LORD hath not spoken, but the prophet hath spoken it
lt not be afraid of him.
LORD thy God hath cut off the nations, whose land the
 thou succeedest them, and dwellest in
eir cities, and in their houses; 19:2 Thou shalt separate three
the midst of thy land, which the LORD thy God
ou shalt prepare thee a way, and divide the coasts of thy land,
God giveth thee to inherit, into three parts, that

 which shall flee thither,
ve: Whoso killeth his neighbour ignorantly, whom he
 when a man goeth into the wood with
neighbour to hew wood, and his hand fetcheth a stroke with the axe
tree, and the head slippeth from the helve, and
e die; he shall flee unto one of
ties, and live: 19:6 Lest the avenger of the blood pursue the
rt is hot, and overtake him, because the way is
not worthy of death, inasmuch as he
 him not in time past.
 command thee, saying, Thou shalt separate three
e LORD thy God enlarge thy coast, as he hath sworn unto
all the land which he promised to give unto
l these commandments to do
command thee this day, to love the LORD thy God, and to
 shalt thou add three cities more for thee,
 blood be not shed in thy land,
 LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance, and so blood be
ut if any man hate his neighbour, and lie in wait for him, and
 and smite him mortally that he die, and fleeth
n the elders of his city shall send
etch him thence, and deliver him into the hand of the avenger of
 die.
m, but thou shalt put away the guilt
nnocent blood from Israel, that it may go well with thee.
move thy neighbour's landmark, which they of
, which thou shalt inherit in
at the LORD thy God giveth thee to possess it.
p against a man for any iniquity, or
any sin, in any sin that he sinneth: at the mouth of two
 of three witnesses, shall the matter be
established.
ise up against any man to testify against
the men, between whom the
 shall stand before the LORD, before the priests and
those days; 19:18 And the judges shall
ke diligent inquisition: and, behold, if the witness be a false
estified falsely against his brother; 19:19 Then
ought to have done unto his brother:
halt thou put the evil away from among you.
ar, and fear, and shall
 no more any such evil among you.
 And thine eye shall not pity; but life shall go for life, eye
ooth, hand for hand, foot for foot.
1 When thou goest out to battle against thine enemies, and seest
ts, and a people more than thou, be not afraid of
h thee, which brought thee up out of
land of Egypt.
en ye are come nigh unto the battle, that the
the people, 20:3 And shall say
 Hear, O Israel, ye approach this day unto battle against
r hearts faint, fear not, and do not tremble,
em; 20:4 For the LORD your God is
 goeth with you, to fight for you against your enemies, to save
e officers shall speak unto the people, saying, What man is
 new house, and hath not dedicated it? let him
die in the battle, and another man
te it.
h planted a vineyard, and hath not yet
ten of it? let him also go and return unto his house, lest he die in
d another man eat of it.
man is there that hath betrothed a wife, and hath not
urn unto his house, lest he die in the
ttle, and another man take her.
d the officers shall speak further unto the people, and they
 there that is fearful and fainthearted? let him
 his brethren's heart faint as well
s heart.
 officers have made an end of speaking
to the people that they shall make captains of the armies to lead
:10 When thou comest nigh unto a city to fight against it, then
 it.
thee answer of peace, and open unto
 then it shall be, that all the people that is found therein
nto thee, and they shall serve thee.
:12 And if it will make no peace with thee, but will make war
ou shalt besiege it: 20:13 And when the LORD thy
ands, thou shalt smite every male
 with the edge of the sword: 20:14 But the women, and the
le, and all that is in the city, even all the
hyself; and thou shalt eat the
hine enemies, which the LORD thy God hath given thee.
to all the cities which are very far off
from thee, which are not of the cities of these nations.
of these people, which the LORD thy God doth
lt save alive nothing that
17 But thou shalt utterly destroy them; namely, the
 Canaanites, and the Perizzites, the
tes, and the Jebusites; as the LORD thy God hath commanded thee:
ach you not to do after all their abominations,
s; so should ye sin against the
 God.
ity a long time, in making war
 to take it, thou shalt not destroy the trees thereof by
m: for thou mayest eat of them, and thou
shalt not cut them down (for the tree of the field is man's life) to
 the siege: 20:20 Only the trees which thou knowest that
, thou shalt destroy and cut them down; and
ity that maketh war with thee,
e subdued.
n the land which the LORD thy God giveth
thee to possess it, lying in the field, and it be not known who hath
2 Then thy elders and thy judges shall come forth, and
cities which are round about him that is
slain: 21:3 And it shall be, that the city which is next unto the
he elders of that city shall take an heifer, which
which hath not drawn in the yoke; 21:4
d the elders of that city shall bring down the heifer unto a rough
 neither eared nor sown, and shall strike off the
: 21:5 And the priests the sons of
hall come near; for them the LORD thy God hath chosen to
bless in the name of the LORD; and by their
stroke be tried: 21:6 And all
of that city, that are next unto the slain man, shall wash
fer that is beheaded in the valley: 21:7 And
ave not shed this blood, neither
 eyes seen it.
, unto thy people Israel, whom thou hast
redeemed, and lay not innocent blood unto thy people of Israel's
ood shall be forgiven them.
lt thou put away the guilt of innocent blood from among
t which is right in the sight of the LORD.
inst thine enemies, and the LORD
hath delivered them into thine hands, and thou hast taken them
eest among the captives a beautiful woman, and
uldest have her to thy wife; 21:12
hou shalt bring her home to thine house, and she shall shave her
 nails; 21:13 And she shall put the raiment of her
l remain in thine house, and bewail
ather and her mother a full month: and after that thou shalt go
 her husband, and she shall be thy wife.

elight in her, then thou shalt
 whither she will; but thou shalt not sell her at all for
e merchandise of her, because thou hast
umbled her.
es, one beloved, and another hated, and
hey have born him children, both the beloved and the hated; and if
n be hers that was hated: 21:16 Then it shall be, when
t that which he hath, that he may not make
the son of the hated, which is
 firstborn: 21:17 But he shall acknowledge the son of the
by giving him a double portion of all that he
strength; the right of the
is.
rebellious son, which will not obey
oice of his father, or the voice of his mother, and that, when
him, will not hearken unto them: 21:19 Then shall
d on him, and bring him out unto the
rs of his city, and unto the gate of his place; 21:20 And they
lders of his city, This our son is stubborn and
ice; he is a glutton, and a
21:21 And all the men of his city shall stone him with stones, that he
t thou put evil away from among you; and all Israel shall
And if a man have committed a sin worthy of death, and he be to
d thou hang him on a tree: 21:23 His body shall not
 but thou shalt in any wise bury him
 day; (for he that is hanged is accursed of God;) that thy land be
ch the LORD thy God giveth thee for an inheritance.
rother's ox or his sheep go astray, and
ide thyself from them: thou shalt in any case bring them again unto

thee, or if thou know him
shalt bring it unto thine own house, and it shall be
ek after it, and thou shalt restore it
 him again.
hou do with his ass; and so shalt thou do
 of thy brother's, which he
d thou hast found, shalt thou do likewise: thou mayest
ou shalt not see thy brother's ass or his ox fall down by the
 from them: thou shalt surely help him to lift
ll not wear that which pertaineth unto a man,
garment: for all that do so are
on unto the LORD thy God.
d's nest chance to be before thee in the way in any tree,
 they be young ones, or eggs, and the dam
 thou shalt not take the dam
ng: 22:7 But thou shalt in any wise let the dam go, and
t it may be well with thee, and that thou
u buildest a new house, then thou shalt make a battlement
ring not blood upon thine house, if any man
t sow thy vineyard with divers seeds: lest the fruit
wn, and the fruit of thy vineyard, be
iled.
 ox and an ass together.
lt not wear a garment of divers sorts, as of woollen and
hou shalt make thee fringes upon the four quarters of thy
overest thyself.
a wife, and go in unto her, and hate her, 22:14
t her, and bring up an evil name
, and say, I took this woman, and when I came to her, I found
 Then shall the father of the damsel, and her
ns of the damsel's virginity unto
ers of the city in the gate: 22:16 And the damsel's father
s, I gave my daughter unto this man to wife,
ath given occasions of speech
, saying, I found not thy daughter a maid; and yet these
ter's virginity. And they shall spread the
22:18 And the elders of that city shall take that man and chastise
hey shall amerce him in an hundred shekels of silver,
 of the damsel, because he hath brought
p an evil name upon a virgin of Israel: and she shall be his wife; he
er away all his days.
 thing be true, and the tokens of virginity be not
 they shall bring out the damsel to
oor of her father's house, and the men of her city shall stone
 she die: because she hath wrought folly in
's house: so shalt thou put
m among you.
ing with a woman married to an husband, then
man that lay with the woman, and
n: so shalt thou put away evil from Israel.
 betrothed unto an husband, and a
d her in the city, and lie with her; 22:24 Then ye shall bring
he gate of that city, and ye shall stone them with
, because she cried not, being in the
y; and the man, because he hath humbled his neighbour's wife: so
y evil from among you.
an find a betrothed damsel in the field, and the man
hen the man only that lay with her shall
die.
lt do nothing; there is in the
sin worthy of death: for as when a man riseth against his
m, even so is this matter: 22:27 For he found
amsel cried, and there was none
er.
s a virgin, which is not betrothed,
ay hold on her, and lie with her, and they be found; 22:29 Then
th her shall give unto the damsel's father fifty
e his wife; because he hath humbled
he may not put her away all his days.
2:30 A man shall not take his father's wife, nor discover his
:1 He that is wounded in the stones, or hath his privy member cut
ter into the congregation of the LORD.
23:2 A bastard shall not enter into the congregation of the LORD; even
 generation shall he not enter into the congregation of
te or Moabite shall not enter into the congregation of
h generation shall they not enter into the
Because they met you not with
ith water in the way, when ye came forth out of Egypt; and
st thee Balaam the son of Beor of Pethor of
ertheless the LORD thy God would not hearken unto Balaam; but
ed the curse into a blessing unto thee, because
6 Thou shalt not seek their peace nor their prosperity all thy days
:7 Thou shalt not abhor an Edomite; for he is thy brother: thou
Egyptian; because thou wast a stranger in his land.
gotten of them shall enter into the
egation of the LORD in their third generation.
inst thine enemies, then keep thee
very wicked thing.
ong you any man, that is not clean by reason of
ght, then shall he go abroad out of
amp, he shall not come within the camp: 23:11 But it shall be,
on, he shall wash himself with water: and when the
the camp again.
 place also without the camp, whither thou
alt have a paddle upon thy
 shall be, when thou wilt ease thyself abroad, thou
turn back and cover that which cometh
m thee: 23:14 For the LORD thy God walketh in the midst of thy
e, and to give up thine enemies before thee;
 he see no unclean thing in
n away from thee.
deliver unto his master the servant which is
16 He shall dwell with thee,
ou, in that place which he shall choose in one of thy
st: thou shalt not oppress him.
here shall be no whore of the daughters of Israel, nor a
rael.
re of a whore, or the price of a dog,
o the house of the LORD thy God for any vow: for even both these
to the LORD thy God.
ot lend upon usury to thy brother; usury of money,
thing that is lent upon usury: 23:20
 a stranger thou mayest lend upon usury; but unto thy brother thou
pon usury: that the LORD thy God may bless thee in all
 to in the land whither thou goest to
sess it.
w unto the LORD thy God, thou shalt not
lack to pay it: for the LORD thy God will surely require it of thee;
e sin in thee.
forbear to vow, it shall be no sin in thee.
ips thou shalt keep and perform;
reewill offering, according as thou hast vowed unto the LORD
st promised with thy mouth.
thou comest into thy neighbour's vineyard, then thou mayest
thine own pleasure; but thou shalt not put any
mest into the standing corn of thy neighbour, then
thine hand; but thou shalt not move a
kle unto thy neighbour's standing corn.

rried her, and it come to
ind no favour in his eyes, because he hath found some
him write her a bill of divorcement, and
give it in her hand, and send her out of his house.
 out of his house, she may go and be
her man's wife.
husband hate her, and write her a bill of
nd sendeth her out of his
e latter husband die, which took her to be his wife;
 sent her away, may not take her again
 be his wife, after that she is defiled; for that is abomination
nd thou shalt not cause the land to sin, which the
inheritance.
 a new wife, he shall not go out to war,
neither shall he be charged with any business: but he shall be free at
r, and shall cheer up his wife which he hath taken.
ther or the upper millstone to pledge:
r he taketh a man's life to pledge.
7 If a man be found stealing any of his brethren of the children of
eth merchandise of him, or selleth him; then that thief
ut evil away from among you.
heed in the plague of leprosy, that thou observe diligently,
l that the priests the Levites shall teach you:
serve to do.
D thy God did unto Miriam by the way, after

y thing, thou shalt not go
 to fetch his pledge.
stand abroad, and the man to whom thou dost lend
unto thee.
, thou shalt not sleep with his pledge:
4:13 In any case thou shalt deliver him the pledge again when the sun
hat he may sleep in his own raiment, and bless thee: and
unto thee before the LORD thy God.
4 Thou shalt not oppress an hired servant that is poor and needy,
thy brethren, or of thy strangers that are in thy
is day thou shalt give him his hire,
her shall the sun go down upon it; for he is poor, and setteth his
est he cry against thee unto the LORD, and it be sin
s shall not be put to death for the children, neither
death for the fathers: every man shall be
ou shalt not pervert the judgment of the stranger, nor of the
a widow's raiment to pledge: 24:18 But thou shalt
 in Egypt, and the LORD thy God
thee thence: therefore I command thee to do this thing.
own thine harvest in thy field, and hast
forgot a sheaf in the field, thou shalt not go again to fetch it: it
he stranger, for the fatherless, and for the widow: that
 thee in all the work of thine hands.
4:20 When thou beatest thine olive tree, thou shalt not go over the
t shall be for the stranger, for the fatherless, and
hou gatherest the grapes of thy vineyard, thou shalt not
ll be for the stranger, for the fatherless,
alt remember that thou wast a bondman in the land of
e to do this thing.
controversy between men, and they come unto
m; then they shall justify the
 and condemn the wicked.
all be, if the wicked man be worthy to be beaten, that
 lie down, and to be beaten before his
ce, according to his fault, by a certain number.
im, and not exceed: lest, if he should
ceed, and beat him above these with many stripes, then thy brother
 unto thee.
the ox when he treadeth out the corn.
5:5 If brethren dwell together, and one of them die, and have no
 the dead shall not marry without unto a stranger:
n unto her, and take her to him to
and perform the duty of an husband's brother unto her.
 the firstborn which she beareth shall
cceed in the name of his brother which is dead, that his name be not
ael.
ke his brother's wife, then let his
er's wife go up to the gate unto the elders, and say, My
 to raise up unto his brother a name in
srael, he will not perform the duty of my husband's brother.
 of his city shall call him, and speak unto him:
like not to take her; 25:9 Then
 brother's wife come unto him in the presence of the elders,
m off his foot, and spit in his face, and shall
 unto that man that will not build
 brother's house.
all be called in Israel, The house of him that
men strive together one with another, and the wife of the
eliver her husband out of the hand of him
and, and taketh him by the
 Then thou shalt cut off her hand, thine eye shall not
t not have in thy bag divers weights, a great and a
have in thine house divers measures, a great and
ave a perfect and just weight, a perfect and
 days may be lengthened in the
 the LORD thy God giveth thee.
r all that do such things, and all that do unrighteously, are
he LORD thy God.
alek did unto thee by the way, when ye were come
et thee by the way, and smote the
t of thee, even all that were feeble behind thee, when thou
nd he feared not God.
t shall be, when the LORD thy God hath given thee
 about, in the land which the LORD
d giveth thee for an inheritance to possess it, that thou shalt
rance of Amalek from under heaven; thou shalt not
e, when thou art come in unto the land which the
heritance, and possessest it, and
t therein; 26:2 That thou shalt take of the first of all the
ich thou shalt bring of thy land that the LORD
t in a basket, and shalt go unto
e which the LORD thy God shall choose to place his name there.
t go unto the priest that shall be in those days,
day unto the LORD thy God, that I am
 unto the country which the LORD sware unto our fathers for to
 the priest shall take the basket out of thine hand, and set
ar of the LORD thy God.
halt speak and say before the LORD thy God, A Syrian
 and he went down into Egypt, and
ed there with a few, and became there a nation, great, mighty,
nd the Egyptians evil entreated us, and afflicted
: 26:7 And when we cried unto the
d of our fathers, the LORD heard our voice, and looked on our
abour, and our oppression: 26:8 And the LORD
ighty hand, and with an
 and with great terribleness, and with signs, and
ought us into this place, and hath
us this land, even a land that floweth with milk and honey.
, I have brought the firstfruits of the land,
d thou shalt set it before the
od, and worship before the LORD thy God: 26:11 And thou
 thing which the LORD thy God hath given
unto thee, and unto thine house, thou, and the Levite, and the
ng you.
d of tithing all the tithes of thine
ease the third year, which is the year of tithing, and hast given
e, the stranger, the fatherless, and the widow, that
 and be filled; 26:13 Then thou shalt
 before the LORD thy God, I have brought away the hallowed things
, and also have given them unto the Levite, and unto
s, and to the widow, according to all
 commandments which thou hast commanded me: I have not transgressed
s, neither have I forgotten them.
 I have not eaten thereof in my mourning, neither have I taken
or any unclean use, nor given ought thereof for
he voice of the LORD my God, and
e according to all that thou hast commanded me.
itation, from heaven, and bless thy
e Israel, and the land which thou hast given us, as thou swarest
a land that floweth with milk and honey.

manded thee to do these
ments: thou shalt therefore keep and do them with all
 soul.
D this day to be thy God, and to walk
his ways, and to keep his statutes, and his commandments, and his
 hearken unto his voice: 26:18 And the LORD hath
eculiar people, as he hath promised
 and that thou shouldest keep all his commandments; 26:19 And to
ve all nations which he hath made, in praise, and in
thou mayest be an holy people unto the
RD thy God, as he hath spoken.
 Moses with the elders of Israel commanded the people, saying,
ments which I command you this day.
2 And it shall be on the day when ye shall pass over Jordan unto
 LORD thy God giveth thee, that thou shalt set thee
hem with plaister: 27:3 And thou shalt
ite upon them all the words of this law, when thou art passed over,
t go in unto the land which the LORD thy God giveth
milk and honey; as the LORD God of thy
thers hath promised thee.
e it shall be when ye be gone over Jordan, that ye shall
 I command you this day, in mount Ebal, and

ar unto the LORD thy God, an
nes: thou shalt not lift up any iron tool upon them.
tar of the LORD thy God of whole stones:
and thou shalt offer burnt offerings thereon unto the LORD thy God:
halt offer peace offerings, and shalt eat there, and
d.
tones all the words of this law
nly.
 Levites spake unto all Israel,
ake heed, and hearken, O Israel; this day thou art become the
y God.
the voice of the LORD thy God, and do
 commandments and his statutes, which I command thee this day.
arged the people the same day, saying, 27:12 These
o bless the people, when ye are come
 Jordan; Simeon, and Levi, and Judah, and Issachar, and Joseph,
 And these shall stand upon mount Ebal to curse;
n, Dan, and Naphtali.
ites shall speak, and say unto all the men of Israel
d be the man that maketh any graven or
lten image, an abomination unto the LORD, the work of the hands of
nd putteth it in a secret place. And all the people
27:16 Cursed be he that setteth light by his father or his mother. And
le shall say, Amen.
that removeth his neighbour's landmark. And all the
8 Cursed be he that maketh the blind to wander out of the way. And
hall say, Amen.
 perverteth the judgment of the stranger,
 shall say, Amen.
at lieth with his father's wife; because he
the people shall say, Amen.
d be he that lieth with any manner of beast. And all the

ster, the daughter of his
daughter of his mother. And all the people shall say,
hat lieth with his mother in law. And all the
ed be he that smiteth his neighbour secretly. And all the

 slay an innocent person. And
ple shall say, Amen.
 that confirmeth not all the words of this law to do
 say, Amen.
ass, if thou shalt hearken diligently unto
e and to do all his
command thee this day, that the LORD thy God will
s of the earth: 28:2 And all these
ngs shall come on thee, and overtake thee, if thou shalt hearken
the LORD thy God.
ou be in the city, and blessed shalt thou be in
 the fruit of thy body, and the fruit of thy
he increase of thy kine, and the
f thy sheep.
basket and thy store.
t thou be when thou comest in, and blessed shalt thou
:7 The LORD shall cause thine enemies that rise up against thee to
e thy face: they shall come out against thee one way,
ys.
ssing upon thee in thy storehouses,
n all that thou settest thine hand unto; and he shall bless thee
the LORD thy God giveth thee.
LORD shall establish thee an holy people unto himself, as he
if thou shalt keep the commandments of the LORD
8:10 And all people of the earth shall see that thou art called by
LORD; and they shall be afraid of thee.

ous in goods, in the fruit of
nd in the fruit of thy cattle, and in the fruit of thy
e LORD sware unto thy fathers to give
e.
his good treasure, the heaven to
 rain unto thy land in his season, and to bless all the work
u shalt lend unto many nations, and thou shalt
all make thee the head, and not the tail; and
alt not be beneath; if that thou
unto the commandments of the LORD thy God, which I command
e and to do them: 28:14 And thou shalt not go
ommand thee this day, to the
or to the left, to go after other gods to serve them.
pass, if thou wilt not hearken unto the
oice of the LORD thy God, to observe to do all his commandments and
ich I command thee this day; that all these curses
ke thee: 28:16 Cursed shalt thou be in
e city, and cursed shalt thou be in the field.
nd thy store.
 fruit of thy body, and the fruit of thy
land, the increase of thy kine, and the flocks of thy sheep.
hou be when thou comest in, and cursed shalt thou
The LORD shall send upon thee cursing, vexation, and rebuke, in
st thine hand unto for to do, until thou be
y; because of the wickedness of
s, whereby thou hast forsaken me.
 The LORD shall make the pestilence cleave unto thee, until he
rom off the land, whither thou goest to possess
hee with a consumption, and with a fever,
reme burning, and with the
h blasting, and with mildew; and they shall pursue thee
 And thy heaven that is over thy head shall be brass, and the
hee shall be iron.
 make the rain of thy land powder and dust: from
e, until thou be destroyed.
ORD shall cause thee to be smitten before thine enemies:
against them, and flee seven ways before
them: and shalt be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth.
ase shall be meat unto all fowls of the air, and
no man shall fray them away.
LORD will smite thee with the botch of Egypt, and with the
ab, and with the itch, whereof thou canst not
ite thee with madness, and blindness, and
lt grope at noonday, as the
 in darkness, and thou shalt not prosper in thy ways: and
sed and spoiled evermore, and no man shall
 wife, and another man shall lie with her:
t not dwell therein: thou
ineyard, and shalt not gather the grapes thereof.
efore thine eyes, and thou shalt not
thereof: thine ass shall be violently taken away from before thy
t be restored to thee: thy sheep shall be given unto
have none to rescue them.
s and thy daughters shall be given unto another people,
and fail with longing for them all the day
ne hand.
nd all thy labours, shall a nation which
thou knowest not eat up; and thou shalt be only oppressed and crushed
So that thou shalt be mad for the sight of thine eyes
5 The LORD shall smite thee in the knees, and in the legs, with a
annot be healed, from the sole of thy foot unto the
ORD shall bring thee, and thy king which thou shalt set
ich neither thou nor thy fathers have
wn; and there shalt thou serve other gods, wood and stone.
ecome an astonishment, a proverb, and a byword,
shall lead thee.
 much seed out into the field, and shalt gather
 consume it.
eyards, and dress them, but shalt neither
 for the worms shall eat
hou shalt have olive trees throughout all thy coasts, but thou
self with the oil; for thine olive shall cast his
sons and daughters, but thou shalt not enjoy
.
land shall the locust consume.
e stranger that is within thee shall get up above thee very
me down very low.
o thee, and thou shalt not lend to him: he shall
 tail.
shall come upon thee, and shall pursue
ee, and overtake thee, till thou be destroyed; because thou
e voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his
commandments and his statutes which he commanded thee: 28:46 And they
 thee for a sign and for a wonder, and upon thy seed for
u servedst not the LORD thy God with joyfulness, and
e abundance of all things; 28:48
e shalt thou serve thine enemies which the LORD shall send
 and in thirst, and in nakedness, and in want
e of iron upon thy neck, until he
stroyed thee.
g a nation against thee from far, from the
flieth; a nation whose tongue
not understand; 28:50 A nation of fierce countenance, which
rson of the old, nor shew favour to the young:
thy cattle, and the fruit of thy
til thou be destroyed: which also shall not leave thee either
r the increase of thy kine, or flocks of thy

hy gates, until thy high and
 come down, wherein thou trustedst, throughout all thy
hee in all thy gates throughout all thy
and, which the LORD thy God hath given thee.
f thine own body, the flesh of thy
nd of thy daughters, which the LORD thy God hath given thee, in
he straitness, wherewith thine enemies shall
hat is tender among you, and
e, his eye shall be evil toward his brother, and toward
toward the remnant of his children which he
give to any of them of the
hildren whom he shall eat: because he hath nothing left
e straitness, wherewith thine enemies shall
6 The tender and delicate woman among you, which would not
e of her foot upon the ground for delicateness
l toward the husband of her bosom,
ward her son, and toward her daughter, 28:57 And toward her
ut from between her feet, and toward her
children which she shall bear: for she shall eat them for want of all
ly in the siege and straitness, wherewith thine enemy
tes.
do all the words of this law that
tten in this book, that thou mayest fear this glorious and
HY GOD; 28:59 Then the LORD will make thy
 seed, even great plagues,
ntinuance, and sore sicknesses, and of long continuance.
ring upon thee all the diseases of Egypt,
 cleave unto thee.
kness, and every plague, which is not written in
e LORD bring upon thee, until thou
troyed.
in number, whereas ye were as the stars
f heaven for multitude; because thou wouldest not obey the voice of
d.
t as the LORD rejoiced over you to
 good, and to multiply you; so the LORD will rejoice over you to
o bring you to nought; and ye shall be plucked from
 to possess it.
l scatter thee among all people, from the one
 and there thou shalt serve other
hich neither thou nor thy fathers have known, even wood and
ng these nations shalt thou find no ease, neither shall
est: but the LORD shall give thee there a
 sorrow of mind: 28:66 And
 hang in doubt before thee; and thou shalt fear day and
assurance of thy life: 28:67 In the morning
 and at even thou shalt say,
 were morning! for the fear of thine heart wherewith thou
ight of thine eyes which thou shalt see.

 Egypt again with ships, by
of I spake unto thee, Thou shalt see it no more again:
nto your enemies for bondmen and
n, and no man shall buy you.
 are the words of the covenant, which the LORD commanded
ldren of Israel in the land of Moab, beside
 Horeb.
Israel, and said unto them, Ye have
all that the LORD did before your eyes in the land of Egypt unto
all his servants, and unto all his land; 29:3 The
s have seen, the signs, and those
iracles: 29:4 Yet the LORD hath not given you an heart to
, and ears to hear, unto this day.
 And I have led you forty years in the wilderness: your clothes
pon you, and thy shoe is not waxen old upon thy
ad, neither have ye drunk wine or strong
drink: that ye might know that I am the LORD your God.
 this place, Sihon the king of Heshbon, and
 us unto battle, and we smote
And we took their land, and gave it for an inheritance unto
the Gadites, and to the half tribe of Manasseh.
this covenant, and do them, that ye
rosper in all that ye do.
d this day all of you before the LORD your God; your
elders, and your officers, with all the
en of Israel, 29:11 Your little ones, your wives, and thy stranger
amp, from the hewer of thy wood unto the drawer of thy
dest enter into covenant with the LORD thy
hy God maketh with thee this
hat he may establish thee to day for a people unto
 thee a God, as he hath said unto
nd as he hath sworn unto thy fathers, to Abraham, to Isaac, and
Neither with you only do I make this covenant and this oath;
t standeth here with us this day before the LORD
 not here with us this day: 29:16
 know how we have dwelt in the land of Egypt; and how we came
hich ye passed by; 29:17 And ye have seen their
 and stone, silver and gold, which
mong them:) 29:18 Lest there should be among you man, or woman,
, whose heart turneth away this day from the LORD
 of these nations; lest there should
mong you a root that beareth gall and wormwood; 29:19 And it come
heareth the words of this curse, that he bless
l have peace, though I walk in the
ation of mine heart, to add drunkenness to thirst: 29:20 The
m, but then the anger of the LORD and his
d all the curses that are
 book shall lie upon him, and the LORD shall blot out

to evil out of all the tribes
according to all the curses of the covenant that are
w: 29:22 So that the generation to come
f your children that shall rise up after you, and the stranger that
 a far land, shall say, when they see the plagues of
which the LORD hath laid upon it; 29:23
nd that the whole land thereof is brimstone, and salt, and burning,
sown, nor beareth, nor any grass groweth therein, like
Gomorrah, Admah, and Zeboim, which the
RD overthrew in his anger, and in his wrath: 29:24 Even all nations
efore hath the LORD done thus unto this land? what
nger?  29:25 Then men shall say,
they have forsaken the covenant of the LORD God of their
h them when he brought them forth out of the
 served other gods, and
gods whom they knew not, and whom he had not given
f the LORD was kindled against this
 to bring upon it all the curses that are written in this book:
rooted them out of their land in anger, and in
 cast them into another land, as
is day.
unto the LORD our God: but those things
hich are revealed belong unto us and to our children for ever, that
he words of this law.
 come to pass, when all these things are come upon
, which I have set before thee, and
shalt call them to mind among all the nations, whither the LORD
 thee, 30:2 And shalt return unto the LORD thy God,
ing to all that I command thee this
thou and thy children, with all thine heart, and with all thy
the LORD thy God will turn thy captivity, and
eturn and gather thee from all
s, whither the LORD thy God hath scattered thee.
ut unto the outmost parts of heaven,
 thence will the LORD thy God gather thee, and from thence will he
 And the LORD thy God will bring thee into the land
d thou shalt possess it; and he will do
hee good, and multiply thee above thy fathers.
cumcise thine heart, and the heart
 seed, to love the LORD thy God with all thine heart, and with
hou mayest live.
God will put all these curses upon thine
enemies, and on them that hate thee, which persecuted thee.
eturn and obey the voice of the LORD, and do all
hee this day.
 will make thee plenteous in every work of
d in the fruit of thy cattle,
fruit of thy land, for good: for the LORD will again
 he rejoiced over thy fathers: 30:10 If
hou shalt hearken unto the voice of the LORD thy God, to keep his
his statutes which are written in this book of the
ORD thy God with all thine heart, and
h all thy soul.
ent which I command thee this day, it is not
f.
 shouldest say, Who shall go up
 heaven, and bring it unto us, that we may hear it, and do
 beyond the sea, that thou shouldest say, Who
ng it unto us, that we may hear
o it?  30:14 But the word is very nigh unto thee, in thy
hat thou mayest do it.
e set before thee this day life and good, and death
nd thee this day to love the LORD thy
, to walk in his ways, and to keep his commandments and his
nts, that thou mayest live and multiply: and
he land whither thou goest to

 that thou wilt not hear, but
awn away, and worship other gods, and serve them; 30:18 I
y, that ye shall surely perish, and that ye
nd, whither thou passest over
o to possess it.
d earth to record this day against you, that I
blessing and cursing: therefore
fe, that both thou and thy seed may live: 30:20 That thou
God, and that thou mayest obey his voice, and
 he is thy life, and the length
ys: that thou mayest dwell in the land which the LORD sware
raham, to Isaac, and to Jacob, to give them.
words unto all Israel.
 unto them, I am an hundred and twenty years old this
 come in: also the LORD hath said unto
, Thou shalt not go over this Jordan.
1:3 The LORD thy God, he will go over before thee, and he will
s from before thee, and thou shalt possess them:
e thee, as the LORD hath said.
 the LORD shall do unto them as he did to Sihon and to Og,
nd unto the land of them, whom he destroyed.
 before your face, that ye may do
em according unto all the commandments which I have commanded
g and of a good courage, fear not, nor be afraid of them:
it is that doth go with thee; he will not
Moses called unto Joshua, and said unto him in the sight of
nd of a good courage: for thou must go with
D hath sworn unto their fathers
hem; and thou shalt cause them to inherit it.
th go before thee; he will be with
he will not fail thee, neither forsake thee: fear not, neither
 And Moses wrote this law, and delivered it unto the priests the
h bare the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and unto
1:10 And Moses commanded them, saying, At the end of every seven
mnity of the year of release, in the feast of
 come to appear before the LORD
n the place which he shall choose, thou shalt read this law
eir hearing.
gether, men and women, and children, and thy
t they may hear, and that they
 and fear the LORD your God, and observe to do all the words
 that their children, which have not known any
he LORD your God, as long as ye
he land whither ye go over Jordan to possess it.
es, Behold, thy days approach that
ust die: call Joshua, and present yourselves in the tabernacle
 that I may give him a charge. And Moses and
in the tabernacle of the

acle in a pillar of a cloud:
ar of the cloud stood over the door of the tabernacle.
to Moses, Behold, thou shalt sleep with thy
and go a whoring after the gods
rangers of the land, whither they go to be among them, and
ak my covenant which I have made with them.
against them in that day, and I
ake them, and I will hide my face from them, and they shall
vils and troubles shall befall them; so that
se evils come upon us, because
 not among us?  31:18 And I will surely hide my face in that
which they shall have wrought, in that they are
w therefore write ye this song for you, and teach it the
 in their mouths, that this song may be a
rael.
ht them into the land which I sware
their fathers, that floweth with milk and honey; and they shall
ed themselves, and waxen fat; then will they turn
and provoke me, and break my

y evils and troubles are
hat this song shall testify against them as a witness;
n out of the mouths of their seed: for I
know their imagination which they go about, even now, before I have
to the land which I sware.
therefore wrote this song the same day, and taught it the
:23 And he gave Joshua the son of Nun a charge, and said, Be strong
ourage: for thou shalt bring the children of Israel
o them: and I will be with thee.
And it came to pass, when Moses had made an end of writing the
 a book, until they were finished, 31:25 That
re the ark of the covenant of the
aying, 31:26 Take this book of the law, and put it in the side
venant of the LORD your God, that it may be there
:27 For I know thy rebellion, and thy stiff neck: behold, while I am
 you this day, ye have been rebellious against the LORD;
 death?  31:28 Gather unto me all the elders
t I may speak these words in
and call heaven and earth to record against them.
death ye will utterly corrupt
 and turn aside from the way which I have commanded you;
n the latter days; because ye will do evil
 to anger through the work of

ll the congregation of Israel
f this song, until they were ended.
1 Give ear, O ye heavens, and I will speak; and hear, O earth, the
h.
ain, my speech shall distil as the
s the small rain upon the tender herb, and as the showers upon
use I will publish the name of the LORD: ascribe
 He is the Rock, his work is perfect: for all his ways are
 and without iniquity, just and right is he.
 their spot is not the spot of his
en: they are a perverse and crooked generation.
 O foolish people and unwise? is not
hy father that hath bought thee? hath he not made thee, and
 Remember the days of old, consider the years
and he will shew thee; thy
ey will tell thee.
igh divided to the nations their inheritance, when
e set the bounds of the people
to the number of the children of Israel.

e; Jacob is the lot of his

 in the waste howling
him about, he instructed him, he kept him as the
agle stirreth up her nest, fluttereth over her young,
aketh them, beareth them on her wings:
:12 So the LORD alone did lead him, and there was no strange god
 He made him ride on the high places of the earth, that he might
f the fields; and he made him to suck honey out of
nty rock; 32:14 Butter of kine, and
of sheep, with fat of lambs, and rams of the breed of Bashan, and
at of kidneys of wheat; and thou didst drink the pure
But Jeshurun waxed fat, and kicked: thou art waxen fat, thou art
art covered with fatness; then he forsook God which
the Rock of his salvation.
rovoked him to jealousy with strange gods, with
nger.
, not to God; to gods whom they knew
 to new gods that came newly up, whom your fathers feared not.
that begat thee thou art unmindful, and hast
19 And when the LORD saw it, he abhorred them, because of the
, and of his daughters.
id, I will hide my face from them, I will see what
 a very froward generation, children
hom is no faith.
me to jealousy with that which is not God; they
r vanities: and I will move them to
usy with those which are not a people; I will provoke them to
nation.
mine anger, and shall burn unto the
t hell, and shall consume the earth with her increase, and set on
ons of the mountains.
 mischiefs upon them; I will spend mine arrows upon
rnt with hunger, and devoured with burning heat,
l also send the teeth of beasts upon
, with the poison of serpents of the dust.
thin, shall destroy both the
d the virgin, the suckling also with the man of gray
d scatter them into corners, I would make the
ng men: 32:27 Were it not that I
he wrath of the enemy, lest their adversaries should behave
nd lest they should say, Our hand is high, and
32:28 For they are a nation void of counsel, neither is there any
them.
 they understood this, that they
nsider their latter end!  32:30 How should one chase a
ousand to flight, except their Rock had
old them, and the LORD had shut them up?  32:31 For their rock is not
even our enemies themselves being judges.
Sodom, and of the fields of
ir grapes are grapes of gall, their clusters are bitter:
ison of dragons, and the cruel venom of
sps.
 with me, and sealed up among my
s?  32:35 To me belongeth vengeance and recompence; their foot
ime: for the day of their calamity is at hand, and
them make haste.
ll judge his people, and repent himself for his
power is gone, and there is none
 or left.
 are their gods, their rock in whom they
trusted, 32:38 Which did eat the fat of their sacrifices, and drank
ir drink offerings? let them rise up and help you, and
 See now that I, even I, am he, and there is no god with me: I
ve; I wound, and I heal: neither is there any that
2:40 For I lift up my hand to heaven, and say, I live for ever.
y glittering sword, and mine hand take hold on
 mine enemies, and will reward
hate me.
drunk with blood, and my sword shall
ur flesh; and that with the blood of the slain and of the
ing of revenges upon the enemy.
ejoice, O ye nations, with his people: for he will avenge the
, and will render vengeance to his adversaries,
 and to his people.
e and spake all the words of this song in the ears
e son of Nun.
nd of speaking all these words to all Israel:
 hearts unto all the words which
y among you this day, which ye shall command your children to
e words of this law.
t a vain thing for you; because it is your life: and
olong your days in the land, whither ye
o over Jordan to possess it.
the LORD spake unto Moses that selfsame day, saying, 32:49
untain Abarim, unto mount Nebo, which is in
Jericho; and behold the land of
hich I give unto the children of Israel for a possession:
t whither thou goest up, and be gathered unto
 in mount Hor, and was gathered
people: 32:51 Because ye trespassed against me among the
waters of MeribahKadesh, in the wilderness
the midst of the children of
2:52 Yet thou shalt see the land before thee; but thou shalt not go
e land which I give the children of Israel.
ith Moses the man of God blessed
dren of Israel before his death.
nd he said, The LORD came from Sinai, and rose up from Seir unto
rth from mount Paran, and he came with ten thousands
 went a fiery law for them.
e loved the people; all his saints are in thy hand: and
every one shall receive of thy words.
3:4 Moses commanded us a law, even the inheritance of the

e heads of the people and the
srael were gathered together.
Reuben live, and not die; and let not his men be few.
ng of Judah: and he said, Hear, LORD, the
ople: let his hands be
; and be thou an help to him from his enemies.
Thummim and thy Urim be with thy
, whom thou didst prove at Massah, and with whom thou didst
 Meribah; 33:9 Who said unto his father and to
ther did he acknowledge his
 knew his own children: for they have observed thy word,
33:10 They shall teach Jacob thy judgments, and Israel thy law: they
nse before thee, and whole burnt sacrifice upon thine
his substance, and accept the work of his hands;
at rise against him, and of them
e him, that they rise not again.
And of Benjamin he said, The beloved of the LORD shall dwell in
the Lord shall cover him all the day long, and he
.
of the LORD be his land, for the
 things of heaven, for the dew, and for the deep that coucheth
or the precious fruits brought forth by the sun,
rth by the moon, 33:15 And for the
things of the ancient mountains, and for the precious things of
33:16 And for the precious things of the earth and
d will of him that dwelt in the bush:
 the blessing come upon the head of Joseph, and upon the top of the
t was separated from his brethren.
7 His glory is like the firstling of his bullock, and his horns
of unicorns: with them he shall push the people
and they are the ten thousands of
, and they are the thousands of Manasseh.
Zebulun, in thy going out; and,
 in thy tents.
e people unto the mountain; there they shall
 they shall suck of the
seas, and of treasures hid in the sand.

hat enlargeth Gad: he
 and teareth the arm with the crown of the head.
part for himself, because there, in a
tion of the lawgiver, was he seated; and he came with the heads of
xecuted the justice of the LORD, and his judgments
 he said, Dan is a lion's whelp: he shall leap from
i he said, O Naphtali, satisfied with favour, and
D: possess thou the west and the

 blessed with children; let
able to his brethren, and let him dip his foot in oil.
ron and brass; and as thy days, so shall thy
ke unto the God of Jeshurun, who rideth upon the
ellency on the sky.
od is thy refuge, and underneath are the
everlasting arms: and he shall thrust out the enemy from before thee;
, Destroy them.
 dwell in safety alone: the fountain of Jacob
; also his heavens shall drop

ike unto thee, O people saved
, the shield of thy help, and who is the sword of thy
 shall be found liars unto thee; and thou
:1 And Moses went up from the plains of Moab unto the mountain of
of Pisgah, that is over against Jericho. And the LORD
lead, unto Dan, 34:2 And all Naphtali,
d the land of Ephraim, and Manasseh, and all the land of Judah, unto
, 34:3 And the south, and the plain of the valley of
s, unto Zoar.
to him, This is the land which I sware unto
ying, I will give it unto thy
e caused thee to see it with thine eyes, but thou shalt not
5 So Moses the servant of the LORD died there in the land of Moab,
 word of the LORD.
im in a valley in the land of Moab, over against
s sepulchre unto this day.
es was an hundred and twenty years old when he died: his
atural force abated.
ren of Israel wept for Moses in the plains of Moab
ing and mourning for Moses were ended.
34:9 And Joshua the son of Nun was full of the spirit of wisdom; for
 his hands upon him: and the children of Israel
LORD commanded Moses.
rose not a prophet since in Israel like unto Moses,
, 34:11 In all the signs and the
 which the LORD sent him to do in the land of Egypt to
ants, and to all his land, 34:12 And in
ll that mighty hand, and in all the great terror which Moses shewed
 all Israel.

ervant of the LORD it came to
the LORD spake unto Joshua the son of Nun, Moses' minister,
rvant is dead; now therefore arise, go over
 unto the land which I do give
ven to the children of Israel.
y place that the sole of your foot shall tread upon, that have
 I said unto Moses.
ness and this Lebanon even unto the great river,
of the Hittites, and unto the great
oward the going down of the sun, shall be your coast.
 be able to stand before thee all the days
ill be with thee: I will not
or forsake thee.
 good courage: for unto this people shalt thou
which I sware unto their fathers
them.
courageous, that thou mayest observe
o according to all the law, which Moses my servant commanded thee:
 to the right hand or to the left, that thou mayest
.
part out of thy mouth; but thou
itate therein day and night, that thou mayest observe to do
s written therein: for then thou shalt make thy
 have good success.
anded thee? Be strong and of a good courage; be not
d: for the LORD thy God is with thee
hersoever thou goest.
commanded the officers of the people, saying, 1:11
nd the people, saying, Prepare you
ls; for within three days ye shall pass over this Jordan, to go
and, which the LORD your God giveth you to possess
s, and to the Gadites, and to half the tribe
3 Remember the word which Moses
nt of the LORD commanded you, saying, The LORD your God hath
th given you this land.
, your little ones, and your cattle, shall remain in
on this side Jordan; but ye shall pass
fore your brethren armed, all the mighty men of valour, and help
he LORD have given your brethren rest, as he hath
sessed the land which the LORD your
iveth them: then ye shall return unto the land of your
ich Moses the LORD's servant gave you on
this side Jordan toward the sunrising.
1:16 And they answered Joshua, saying, All that thou commandest us we
whithersoever thou sendest us, we will go.
ses in all things, so will we
o thee: only the LORD thy God be with thee, as he was with
 he be that doth rebel against thy commandment, and will
 in all that thou commandest him, he shall
 good courage.
f Nun sent out of Shittim two men to spy
secretly, saying, Go view the land, even Jericho. And they went, and
arlot's house, named Rahab, and lodged there.
icho, saying, Behold, there came
ither to night of the children of Israel to search out the
king of Jericho sent unto Rahab, saying, Bring forth the
 which are entered into thine house: for
they be come to search out all the country.
nd hid them, and said thus, There
n unto me, but I wist not whence they were: 2:5 And it came to
of shutting of the gate, when it was dark, that
ent I wot not: pursue after them
 for ye shall overtake them.
e had brought them up to the roof of the house, and hid them
x, which she had laid in order upon the roof.
the way to Jordan unto the fords:
soon as they which pursued after them were gone out, they shut
 before they were laid down, she came up unto them upon the
unto the men, I know that the LORD hath given
 fallen upon us, and that all the
ants of the land faint because of you.
2:10 For we have heard how the LORD dried up the water of the Red sea
 ye came out of Egypt; and what ye did unto the two kings
e on the other side Jordan, Sihon and Og,
 soon as we had heard these things, our hearts did melt,
ny more courage in any man, because of you:
ven above, and in earth
Now therefore, I pray you, swear unto me by the LORD, since I
ess, that ye will also shew kindness unto my
en: 2:13 And that ye will save
ather, and my mother, and my brethren, and my sisters, and
deliver our lives from death.
the men answered her, Our life for yours, if ye utter not
 shall be, when the LORD hath given us the
 with thee.
 by a cord through the window: for her
use was upon the town wall, and she dwelt upon the wall.
hem, Get you to the mountain, lest the
rsuers meet you; and hide yourselves there three days, until the
ed: and afterward may ye go your way.
:17 And the men said unto her, We will be blameless of this thine
ast made us swear.
 come into the land, thou shalt bind this line of
h thou didst let us down by: and thou
lt bring thy father, and thy mother, and thy brethren, and all thy
ld, home unto thee.
e, that whosoever shall go out of the doors of thy
 shall be upon his head, and we will
uiltless: and whosoever shall be with thee in the house, his blood
head, if any hand be upon him.
 if thou utter this our business, then we will be quit of
t made us to swear.
According unto your words, so be it. And she sent
 she bound the scarlet line in the
.
 mountain, and abode there three
til the pursuers were returned: and the pursuers sought them
, but found them not.
en returned, and descended from the mountain, and
he son of Nun, and told him all
at befell them: 2:24 And they said unto Joshua, Truly the
our hands all the land; for even all the
inhabitants of the country do faint because of us.
he morning; and they removed from
, and came to Jordan, he and all the children of Israel, and
ey passed over.
 after three days, that the officers went
the people, saying, When ye
f the covenant of the LORD your God, and the priests the
e shall remove from your place, and go after
between you and it, about two thousand
bits by measure: come not near unto it, that ye may know the way by
o: for ye have not passed this way heretofore.
e, Sanctify yourselves: for to
 LORD will do wonders among you.
d Joshua spake unto the priests, saying, Take up the ark of the
over before the people. And they took up the ark of
he people.
oshua, This day will I begin to magnify
hee in the sight of all Israel, that they may know that, as I was
will be with thee.
ommand the priests that bear the ark of the
he brink of the water of
 stand still in Jordan.
said unto the children of Israel, Come hither, and hear
God.
all know that the living God is
, and that he will without fail drive out from before you the
ittites, and the Hivites, and the Perizzites, and
, and the Jebusites.
rk of the covenant of the LORD of all the earth
.
n out of the tribes of Israel,
ry tribe a man.
to pass, as soon as the soles of the feet of
ORD, the LORD of all the earth,
t in the waters of Jordan, that the waters of Jordan shall be
rs that come down from above; and they shall
e to pass, when the people removed from their tents, to
riests bearing the ark of the covenant
fore the people; 3:15 And as they that bare the ark were come unto
feet of the priests that bare the ark were dipped in
rdan overfloweth all his banks all the
me of harvest,) 3:16 That the waters which came down from above
pon an heap very far from the city Adam, that is
e down toward the sea of the plain,
the salt sea, failed, and were cut off: and the people passed
richo.
he ark of the covenant of the LORD
firm on dry ground in the midst of Jordan, and all the
y ground, until all the people were passed
 pass, when all the people were clean passed over
Joshua, saying, 4:2 Take you twelve
ut of the people, out of every tribe a man, 4:3 And command ye
ou hence out of the midst of Jordan, out of the
 firm, twelve stones, and ye shall
them over with you, and leave them in the lodging place, where
night.
e men, whom he had prepared of the
en of Israel, out of every tribe a man: 4:5 And Joshua said unto
fore the ark of the LORD your God into the midst of
an of you a stone upon his shoulder,
rding unto the number of the tribes of the children of Israel: 4:6
 a sign among you, that when your children ask their
g, What mean ye by these stones?  4:7
n ye shall answer them, That the waters of Jordan were cut off
e covenant of the LORD; when it passed over
ff: and these stones shall be
ial unto the children of Israel for ever.
s Joshua commanded, and took up
ones out of the midst of Jordan, as the LORD spake unto
mber of the tribes of the children of
ael, and carried them over with them unto the place where they
m down there.
lve stones in the midst of Jordan, in the
 bare the ark of the covenant
they are there unto this day.
the priests which bare the ark stood in the midst of Jordan,
inished that the LORD commanded Joshua to speak
hat Moses commanded Joshua: and the
e hasted and passed over.
ame to pass, when all the people were clean passed over,
assed over, and the priests, in the presence
n of Reuben, and the children of Gad, and half the
rmed before the children of Israel, as
ses spake unto them: 4:13 About forty thousand prepared for war
the LORD unto battle, to the plains of Jericho.
ed Joshua in the sight of all Israel;
 they feared him, as they feared Moses, all the days of his life.
RD spake unto Joshua, saying, 4:16 Command the priests
timony, that they come up out of Jordan.

sts, saying, Come ye up out of

s that bare the ark of the
e LORD were come up out of the midst of Jordan, and the
were lifted up unto the dry land, that the
ce, and flowed over all his
y did before.
up out of Jordan on the tenth day of the
first month, and encamped in Gilgal, in the east border of Jericho.
e twelve stones, which they took out of Jordan, did
 And he spake unto the children of Israel, saying, When your
ir fathers in time to come, saying, What mean
 your children know, saying,
over this Jordan on dry land.
the LORD your God dried up the waters of Jordan from before
ed over, as the LORD your God did to the Red
 until we were gone over: 4:24
he people of the earth might know the hand of the LORD, that
might fear the LORD your God for ever.
5:1 And it came to pass, when all the kings of the Amorites, which
 of Jordan westward, and all the kings of the
ard that the LORD had dried up
 of Jordan from before the children of Israel, until we were
r heart melted, neither was there spirit in them
of Israel.
id unto Joshua, Make thee sharp knives,
nd circumcise again the children of Israel the second time.
im sharp knives, and circumcised the children of
s.
 did circumcise: All the people
 out of Egypt, that were males, even all the men of war, died
the way, after they came out of Egypt.
5:5 Now all the people that came out were circumcised: but all the
 born in the wilderness by the way as they came forth
ot circumcised.
 Israel walked forty years in the wilderness,
war, which came out of Egypt,
ed, because they obeyed not the voice of the LORD: unto
 would not shew them the land, which the
LORD sware unto their fathers that he would give us, a land that
and honey.
 he raised up in their stead, them Joshua
 because they had not
 the way.
 they had done circumcising all the
e, that they abode in their places in the camp, till they were
e LORD said unto Joshua, This day have I rolled away the
 you. Wherefore the name of the place is
called Gilgal unto this day.
he children of Israel encamped in Gilgal, and kept the
ay of the month at even in the plains of
Jericho.
ld corn of the land on the morrow after
he passover, unleavened cakes, and parched corn in the selfsame day.
 manna ceased on the morrow after they had eaten of the
er had the children of Israel manna any
ore; but they did eat of the fruit of the land of Canaan that year.
ame to pass, when Joshua was by Jericho, that he lifted
, behold, there stood a man over against
him with his sword drawn in his hand: and Joshua went unto him, and
Art thou for us, or for our adversaries?  5:14 And he
the host of the LORD am I now come. And
oshua fell on his face to the earth, and did worship, and said unto
 my Lord unto his servant?  5:15 And the captain of the
a, Loose thy shoe from off thy foot; for
the place whereon thou standest is holy. And Joshua did so.
traitly shut up because of the children of

, I have given into thine hand
nd the king thereof, and the mighty men of valour.
ity, all ye men of war, and go round
t the city once. Thus shalt thou do six days.
fore the ark seven trumpets of
s: and the seventh day ye shall compass the city seven
 blow with the trumpets.
ll come to pass, that when they make a long blast with
hear the sound of the trumpet, all the
ople shall shout with a great shout; and the wall of the city shall
 and the people shall ascend up every man straight
e son of Nun called the priests, and said unto them,
t, and let seven priests bear seven
ets of rams' horns before the ark of the LORD.
ass on, and compass the city, and
 that is armed pass on before the ark of the LORD.
Joshua had spoken unto the people, that
he seven priests bearing the seven trumpets of rams' horns passed on
D, and blew with the trumpets: and the ark of the
m.
e priests that blew with the
d the rereward came after the ark, the priests going on,
ets.
people, saying, Ye shall not shout,
ake any noise with your voice, neither shall any word proceed out
til the day I bid you shout; then shall ye shout.
passed the city, going about it once:
 they came into the camp, and lodged in the camp.
he morning, and the priests took up the
rk of the LORD.
bearing seven trumpets of rams' horns before
y, and blew with the trumpets:
med men went before them; but the rereward came after the
sts going on, and blowing with the trumpets.
ed the city once, and returned
amp: so they did six days.
came to pass on the seventh day, that they rose early
 and compassed the city after the same
nner seven times: only on that day they compassed the city seven
 it came to pass at the seventh time, when the priests blew
ua said unto the people, Shout; for the LORD
he city shall be accursed, even it, and all that are
ab the harlot shall live, she and all
t are with her in the house, because she hid the messengers that we
nd ye, in any wise keep yourselves from the accursed thing, lest
 accursed, when ye take of the accursed thing, and
 and trouble it.
r, and gold, and vessels of brass and iron, are
ll come into the treasury of the

ts blew with the trumpets:
 pass, when the people heard the sound of the trumpet,
a great shout, that the wall fell down
at, so that the people went up into the city, every man straight
ey took the city.
 destroyed all that was in the city, both man and
 sheep, and ass, with the edge of the
rd.
wo men that had spied out the
 into the harlot's house, and bring out thence the woman,
 ye sware unto her.
men that were spies went in, and brought out Rahab,
 and her brethren, and all that she
and they brought out all her kindred, and left them without the
6:24 And they burnt the city with fire, and all that was therein: only
and the gold, and the vessels of brass and of iron, they
he house of the LORD.
aved Rahab the harlot alive, and her father's
she dwelleth in Israel even unto
; because she hid the messengers, which Joshua sent to spy out
 Joshua adjured them at that time, saying, Cursed be the man
riseth up and buildeth this city Jericho: he
s firstborn, and in his youngest
l he set up the gates of it.
e LORD was with Joshua; and his fame was noised throughout
But the children of Israel committed a trespass in the accursed
he son of Carmi, the son of Zabdi, the son of
 the accursed thing: and the
 LORD was kindled against the children of Israel.
richo to Ai, which is beside Bethaven,
 the east of Bethel, and spake unto them, saying, Go up and view the
d the men went up and viewed Ai.
d they returned to Joshua, and said unto him, Let not all the
 about two or three thousand men go up and smite
 labour thither; for they are but

e about three thousand men:
 before the men of Ai.
of Ai smote of them about thirty and six men: for they
gate even unto Shebarim, and smote them in
the people melted, and became

l to the earth upon his face
rk of the LORD until the eventide, he and the elders of
heir heads.
O LORD God, wherefore hast thou at all
ought this people over Jordan, to deliver us into the hand of the
roy us? would to God we had been content, and dwelt
O LORD, what shall I say, when Israel
neth their backs before their enemies!  7:9 For the Canaanites and
nts of the land shall hear of it, and shall environ us
from the earth: and what wilt thou do unto
unto Joshua, Get thee up;
 thou thus upon thy face?  7:11 Israel hath sinned, and
 my covenant which I commanded them: for
they have even taken of the accursed thing, and have also stolen, and
so, and they have put it even among their own stuff.
of Israel could not stand before their
emies, but turned their backs before their enemies, because they
ther will I be with you any more, except ye destroy

nctify yourselves against to
thus saith the LORD God of Israel, There is an accursed
 O Israel: thou canst not stand before
ine enemies, until ye take away the accursed thing from among you.
rning therefore ye shall be brought according to your
 the tribe which the LORD taketh shall
me according to the families thereof; and the family which the LORD
l come by households; and the household which the LORD
 man.
t is taken with the accursed thing
be burnt with fire, he and all that he hath: because he hath
ant of the LORD, and because he hath wrought
e up early in the morning, and brought Israel by
ah was taken: 7:17 And he brought
ily of Judah; and he took the family of the Zarhites: and he
the Zarhites man by man; and Zabdi was taken:
 by man; and Achan, the son of
 son of Zabdi, the son of Zerah, of the tribe of Judah, was
ua said unto Achan, My son, give, I pray thee, glory to
 make confession unto him; and tell me now
.
aid, Indeed I have sinned against
D God of Israel, and thus and thus have I done: 7:21 When I saw
goodly Babylonish garment, and two hundred shekels
f fifty shekels weight, then I coveted
em, and took them; and, behold, they are hid in the earth in the
and the silver under it.
 sent messengers, and they ran unto the tent; and,
and the silver under it.
took them out of the midst of the tent, and brought them
the children of Israel, and laid them out
all Israel with him, took Achan the son of Zerah,
and the wedge of gold, and his sons,
his daughters, and his oxen, and his asses, and his sheep, and his
at he had: and they brought them unto the valley of
 Why hast thou troubled us? the LORD shall
oned him with stones, and
h fire, after they had stoned them with stones.
reat heap of stones unto this day. So
 LORD turned from the fierceness of his anger. Wherefore the name
 called, The valley of Achor, unto this day.
ear not, neither be thou dismayed:
ll the people of war with thee, and arise, go up to Ai: see, I
hand the king of Ai, and his people, and his city,
 do to Ai and her king as thou didst
 Jericho and her king: only the spoil thereof, and the cattle
e for a prey unto yourselves: lay thee an ambush
Joshua arose, and all the people of war, to go up against Ai:
thirty thousand mighty men of valour, and sent
mmanded them, saying, Behold, ye shall lie in wait
e city: go not very far from the city,
t be ye all ready: 8:5 And I, and all the people that are with me,
to the city: and it shall come to pass, when they come
rst, that we will flee before them, 8:6
For they will come out after us) till we have drawn them from the
ll say, They flee before us, as at the first:

h, and seize upon the city:
your God will deliver it into your hand.

the city, that ye shall set
ire: according to the commandment of the LORD shall ye
u.
: and they went to lie in ambush,
de between Bethel and Ai, on the west side of Ai: but Joshua
g the people.
arly in the morning, and numbered the people,
ael, before the people to Ai.
all the people, even the people of war that were with him,
and came before the city, and pitched on the
ey between them and Ai.
k about five thousand men, and set them to lie in
the west side of the city.
n they had set the people, even all the host that was on
 their liers in wait on the west of the
ity, Joshua went that night into the midst of the valley.
s, when the king of Ai saw it, that they hasted
he city went out against Israel to
, he and all his people, at a time appointed, before the plain;
t there were liers in ambush against him behind the
l Israel made as if they were beaten before
ness.
 in Ai were called together to pursue
er them: and they pursued after Joshua, and were drawn away from
And there was not a man left in Ai or Bethel, that went not out
hey left the city open, and pursued after Israel.
hua, Stretch out the spear that is in
 hand toward Ai; for I will give it into thine hand. And Joshua
pear that he had in his hand toward the city.
ut of their place, and they ran as
s he had stretched out his hand: and they entered into the city,
asted and set the city on fire.
d when the men of Ai looked behind them, they saw, and, behold,
ty ascended up to heaven, and they had no power to
he people that fled to the wilderness
ned back upon the pursuers.
en Joshua and all Israel saw that the ambush had taken the
 of the city ascended, then they turned again,
the other issued out of the city against them; so they were
 some on this side, and some on that side: and
ne of them remain or escape.
he king of Ai they took alive, and brought him to Joshua.
s, when Israel had made an end of slaying all
n the wilderness wherein they
, and when they were all fallen on the edge of the sword,
 that all the Israelites returned unto Ai,

 that day, both of men and
elve thousand, even all the men of Ai.
8:26 For Joshua drew not his hand back, wherewith he stretched out the
 he had utterly destroyed all the inhabitants of Ai.
 spoil of that city Israel took for a prey
 of the LORD which he

 heap for ever, even a
is day.
ed on a tree until eventide: and as
as the sun was down, Joshua commanded that they should take his
he tree, and cast it at the entering of the gate of
reat heap of stones, that remaineth
this day.
ar unto the LORD God of Israel in mount
bal, 8:31 As Moses the servant of the LORD commanded the children of
is written in the book of the law of Moses, an altar of
 man hath lift up any iron: and they
red thereon burnt offerings unto the LORD, and sacrificed peace
And he wrote there upon the stones a copy of the law of Moses,
e presence of the children of Israel.
:33 And all Israel, and their elders, and officers, and their judges,
 side the ark and on that side before the priests the
f the covenant of the LORD, as well the
tranger, as he that was born among them; half of them over against
nd half of them over against mount Ebal; as Moses the
nded before, that they should bless the
eople of Israel.
read all the words of the law, the blessings and
 written in the book of the law.
here was not a word of all that Moses commanded, which Joshua
he congregation of Israel, with the women, and
hat were conversant among them.
 it came to pass, when all the kings which were on this side
and in the valleys, and in all the coasts of the
e Hittite, and the Amorite, the
, the Perizzite, the Hivite, and the Jebusite, heard thereof;
d themselves together, to fight with Joshua and
3 And when the inhabitants of Gibeon heard what Joshua had done unto
 Ai, 9:4 They did work wilily, and went and made as if
nd took old sacks upon their asses, and
ine bottles, old, and rent, and bound up; 9:5 And old shoes and
feet, and old garments upon them; and all the bread
mouldy.
o the camp at Gilgal, and said unto
and to the men of Israel, We be come from a far country: now
ague with us.
 said unto the Hivites, Peradventure ye dwell
gue with you?  9:8 And they said
hua, We are thy servants. And Joshua said unto them, Who are
me ye?  9:9 And they said unto him, From a very
ecause of the name of the LORD thy
or we have heard the fame of him, and all that he did in Egypt,
e did to the two kings of the Amorites, that were
eshbon, and to Og king of Bashan,
as at Ashtaroth.
ers and all the inhabitants of our country spake
you for the journey, and go to meet
 and say unto them, We are your servants: therefore now make ye a

provision out of our houses on
 came forth to go unto you; but now, behold, it is dry, and
these bottles of wine, which we filled, were
ese our garments and our shoes
 old by reason of the very long journey.

 and asked not counsel at the
e LORD.
 them, and made a league with them, to
t them live: and the princes of the congregation sware unto them.
e to pass at the end of three days after they had made
y heard that they were their neighbours,
and that they dwelt among them.
d the children of Israel journeyed, and came unto their cities
w their cities were Gibeon, and Chephirah, and
And the children of Israel smote them not, because the princes of
had sworn unto them by the LORD God of Israel. And
ainst the princes.
nces said unto all the congregation, We have sworn
ael: now therefore we may not touch

even let them live, lest wrath
, because of the oath which we sware unto them.
em, Let them live; but let them be
 of wood and drawers of water unto all the congregation; as the
d them.
, and he spake unto them, saying,
re have ye beguiled us, saying, We are very far from you; when
9:23 Now therefore ye are cursed, and there shall
ondmen, and hewers of wood and
 water for the house of my God.
d they answered Joshua, and said, Because it was certainly told
hat the LORD thy God commanded his servant Moses to
estroy all the inhabitants of the land
om before you, therefore we were sore afraid of our lives because of
done this thing.
we are in thine hand: as it seemeth good and
9:26 And so did he unto them, and delivered them out of the hand of
 Israel, that they slew them not.
And Joshua made them that day hewers of wood and drawers of water
ion, and for the altar of the LORD, even unto this
d choose.
n Adonizedec king of Jerusalem had heard
how Joshua had taken Ai, and had utterly destroyed it; as he had done
d her king, so he had done to Ai and her king; and how
d made peace with Israel, and were among
them; 10:2 That they feared greatly, because Gibeon was a great city,
 royal cities, and because it was greater than Ai, and
hty.
Jerusalem, sent unto Hoham king of
, and unto Piram king of Jarmuth, and unto Japhia king of
ing of Eglon, saying, 10:4 Come up unto me,
for it hath made peace with
th the children of Israel.
re the five kings of the Amorites, the king of Jerusalem,
ing of Jarmuth, the king of Lachish, the king
r, and went up, they and all
 and encamped before Gibeon, and made war against it.
sent unto Joshua to the camp to Gilgal,
aying, Slack not thy hand from thy servants; come up to us quickly,
d help us: for all the kings of the Amorites that dwell
ed together against us.
ascended from Gilgal, he, and all the people of war
n of valour.
o Joshua, Fear them not: for I have
ered them into thine hand; there shall not a man of them stand
 Joshua therefore came unto them suddenly, and went up from Gilgal
:10 And the LORD discomfited them before Israel, and slew them with
er at Gibeon, and chased them along the way that goeth
hem to Azekah, and unto Makkedah.
 And it came to pass, as they fled from before Israel, and were
o Bethhoron, that the LORD cast down great stones
, and they died: they were more which
d with hailstones than they whom the children of Israel slew with
12 Then spake Joshua to the LORD in the day when the LORD delivered
 before the children of Israel, and he said in the
 still upon Gibeon; and thou, Moon, in
e valley of Ajalon.
tood still, and the moon stayed, until the people
 enemies. Is not this written in the
 of Jasher? So the sun stood still in the midst of heaven, and
n about a whole day.
s no day like that before it or after it, that the
 a man: for the LORD fought for

l with him, unto the camp to
0:16 But these five kings fled, and hid themselves in a cave at
And it was told Joshua, saying, The five kings are found hid in

es upon the mouth of the cave,
n by it for to keep them: 10:19 And stay ye not, but pursue
 smite the hindmost of them; suffer them not to
RD your God hath delivered them
 hand.
Joshua and the children of Israel had
e an end of slaying them with a very great slaughter, till they
 the rest which remained of them entered into
eople returned to the camp to Joshua at Makkedah in
ainst any of the children of Israel.
:22 Then said Joshua, Open the mouth of the cave, and bring out
to me out of the cave.
id so, and brought forth those five kings unto him out
usalem, the king of Hebron, the king of
armuth, the king of Lachish, and the king of Eglon.
en they brought out those kings unto
ua, that Joshua called for all the men of Israel, and said unto
 men of war which went with him, Come near, put
ings. And they came near, and put
eet upon the necks of them.
oshua said unto them, Fear not, nor be dismayed, be strong
 thus shall the LORD do to all your enemies
erward Joshua smote them, and slew them, and hanged them
re hanging upon the trees until the evening.
e of the going down of the sun,
ua commanded, and they took them down off the trees, and cast
erein they had been hid, and laid great stones in
til this very day.
oshua took Makkedah, and smote it with the edge of
he utterly destroyed, them, and all
ouls that were therein; he let none remain: and he did to the
e did unto the king of Jericho.
hen Joshua passed from Makkedah, and all Israel with him, unto
gainst Libnah: 10:30 And the LORD delivered it
 hand of Israel; and he smote it
 edge of the sword, and all the souls that were therein; he
but did unto the king thereof as he did unto
ua passed from Libnah, and all Israel with him, unto
it, and fought against it: 10:32 And the
LORD delivered Lachish into the hand of Israel, which took it on the
d smote it with the edge of the sword, and all the souls
ng to all that he had done to Libnah.
0:33 Then Horam king of Gezer came up to help Lachish; and Joshua
 people, until he had left him none remaining.
ed unto Eglon, and all Israel with
nd they encamped against it, and fought against it: 10:35 And
day, and smote it with the edge of the sword, and
e utterly destroyed that day,
o all that he had done to Lachish.
6 And Joshua went up from Eglon, and all Israel with him, unto
ght against it: 10:37 And they took it, and smote
d the king thereof, and all the
ereof, and all the souls that were therein; he left none
l that he had done to Eglon; but destroyed
therein.
 all Israel with him, to Debir; and
t against it: 10:39 And he took it, and the king thereof, and all
f; and they smote them with the edge of the sword,
uls that were therein; he left none
ning: as he had done to Hebron, so he did to Debir, and to the
had done also to Libnah, and to her king.
f the hills, and of the south,
 vale, and of the springs, and all their kings: he left none
 destroyed all that breathed, as the LORD God of
hua smote them from Kadeshbarnea even unto Gaza, and all
n unto Gibeon.
s and their land did Joshua take at one time,
 for Israel.
 and all Israel with him, unto the camp to
n Jabin king of Hazor had heard those
ngs, that he sent to Jobab king of Madon, and to the king of
ng of Achshaph, 11:2 And to the kings that were
of the plains south of Chinneroth,
 the valley, and in the borders of Dor on the west, 11:3 And to
e east and on the west, and to the Amorite, and the
 the Jebusite in the mountains, and to
e Hivite under Hermon in the land of Mizpeh.
 their hosts with them, much
 as the sand that is upon the sea shore in multitude, with
 many.
re met together, they came and pitched
gether at the waters of Merom, to fight against Israel.
to Joshua, Be not afraid because of them: for
ver them up all slain before
 shalt hough their horses, and burn their chariots with
e, and all the people of war with him, against them
; and they fell upon them.
 LORD delivered them into the hand of Israel, who smote
great Zidon, and unto Misrephothmaim, and
hey smote them, until they
 remaining.
em as the LORD bade him: he houghed their
e.
 back, and took Hazor, and smote
 thereof with the sword: for Hazor beforetime was the head of

were therein with the edge of
utterly destroying them: there was not any left to breathe:
 fire.
e kings, and all the kings of them,
oshua take, and smote them with the edge of the sword, and he
m, as Moses the servant of the LORD commanded.
tood still in their strength, Israel
ed none of them, save Hazor only; that did Joshua burn.
f these cities, and the cattle, the children
ves; but every man they smote
ge of the sword, until they had destroyed them, neither

rvant, so did Moses command
o did Joshua; he left nothing undone of all that the LORD
 So Joshua took all that land, the hills, and all the south
nd of Goshen, and the valley, and the plain,
lley of the same; 11:17 Even
nt Halak, that goeth up to Seir, even unto Baalgad in the
ount Hermon: and all their kings he took, and
oshua made war a long time with all those kings.
made peace with the children of
ave the Hivites the inhabitants of Gibeon: all other they
For it was of the LORD to harden their hearts, that they should
 in battle, that he might destroy them utterly, and
 but that he might destroy them, as the
ORD commanded Moses.
time came Joshua, and cut off the Anakims from the
ir, from Anab, and from all the
 of Judah, and from all the mountains of Israel: Joshua
 their cities.
the Anakims left in the land of the children
in Ashdod, there remained.
hua took the whole land, according to all that the LORD
 gave it for an inheritance unto Israel
ccording to their divisions by their tribes. And the land rested from
Now these are the kings of the land, which the children of Israel
sed their land on the other side Jordan toward the
r Arnon unto mount Hermon, and all the
ain on the east: 12:2 Sihon king of the Amorites, who dwelt in
rom Aroer, which is upon the bank of the river
ver, and from half Gilead, even
river Jabbok, which is the border of the children of Ammon;
 to the sea of Chinneroth on the east, and unto
 sea on the east, the way to
h; and from the south, under Ashdothpisgah: 12:4 And the
, which was of the remnant of the giants,
5 And reigned in mount
cah, and in all Bashan, unto the border of the
 half Gilead, the border of Sihon
 Heshbon.
nt of the LORD and the children of Israel
gave it for a possession unto
tes, and the Gadites, and the half tribe of Manasseh.
s of the country which Joshua and the
ldren of Israel smote on this side Jordan on the west, from Baalgad
f Lebanon even unto the mount Halak, that goeth up to
the tribes of Israel for a possession
ording to their divisions; 12:8 In the mountains, and in the
ains, and in the springs, and in the wilderness,
ites, the Amorites, and the
he Perizzites, the Hivites, and the Jebusites: 12:9 The
ing of Ai, which is beside Bethel, one;
2:10 The king of Jerusalem, one; the king of Hebron, one; 12:11 The
, one; the king of Lachish, one; 12:12 The king of
ne; 12:13 The king of Debir, one; the
g of Geder, one; 12:14 The king of Hormah, one; the king of Arad,
ng of Libnah, one; the king of Adullam, one; 12:16
ing of Bethel, one; 12:17 The king of
puah, one; the king of Hepher, one; 12:18 The king of Aphek, one;
ron, one; 12:19 The king of Madon, one; the king of
himronmeron, one; the king of Achshaph,
ne; 12:21 The king of Taanach, one; the king of Megiddo, one; 12:22
esh, one; the king of Jokneam of Carmel, one; 12:23 The
 Dor, one; the king of the nations of
gal, one; 12:24 The king of Tirzah, one: all the kings thirty and
Joshua was old and stricken in years; and the LORD said unto
stricken in years, and there remaineth yet very
This is the land that yet remaineth: all the borders of the
shuri, 13:3 From Sihor, which is before Egypt,
ward, which is counted to the
five lords of the Philistines; the Gazathites, and the
s, the Gittites, and the Ekronites; also
the Avites: 13:4 From the south, all the land of the Canaanites, and
 beside the Sidonians unto Aphek, to the borders of the
 of the Giblites, and all Lebanon, toward
ermon unto the entering into
3:6 All the inhabitants of the hill country from Lebanon unto
ll the Sidonians, them will I drive out from
vide thou it by lot unto the
or an inheritance, as I have commanded thee.
for an inheritance unto the nine
and the half tribe of Manasseh, 13:8 With whom the Reubenites
received their inheritance, which Moses gave
Moses the servant of the LORD
13:9 From Aroer, that is upon the bank of the river Arnon,
the midst of the river, and all the plain of
ities of Sihon king of the
h reigned in Heshbon, unto the border of the children of
nd the border of the Geshurites and
athites, and all mount Hermon, and all Bashan unto Salcah; 13:12
 Og in Bashan, which reigned in Ashtaroth and in
 of the giants: for these did Moses
, and cast them out.
 the children of Israel expelled not the Geshurites,
Geshurites and the Maachathites dwell
ng the Israelites until this day.
 Only unto the tribes of Levi he gave none inheritance; the
God of Israel made by fire are their
ritance, as he said unto them.
d Moses gave unto the tribe of the children of Reuben
r families.
rom Aroer, that is on the bank of the river
t of the river, and all the
ba; 13:17 Heshbon, and all her cities that are in the
 and Bethbaalmeon, 13:18 And Jahaza, and
Kedemoth, and Mephaath, 13:19 And Kirjathaim, and Sibmah, and
ount of the valley, 13:20 And Bethpeor, and
 And all the cities of the
 the kingdom of Sihon king of the Amorites, which
ote with the princes of Midian, Evi,
Rekem, and Zur, and Hur, and Reba, which were dukes of Sihon,
ry.
the soothsayer, did the children of
l slay with the sword among them that were slain by them.
 the children of Reuben was Jordan, and the
e of the children of Reuben
amilies, the cities and the villages thereof.
to the tribe of Gad, even unto the
en of Gad according to their families.
13:25 And their coast was Jazer, and all the cities of Gilead, and
 the children of Ammon, unto Aroer that is before
to Ramathmizpeh, and Betonim; and
hanaim unto the border of Debir; 13:27 And in the valley,
 and Succoth, and Zaphon, the rest of the
and his border, even unto the
 sea of Chinnereth on the other side Jordan eastward.
ce of the children of Gad after their
ilies, the cities, and their villages.
13:29 And Moses gave inheritance unto the half tribe of Manasseh: and
possession of the half tribe of the children of Manasseh
0 And their coast was from Mahanaim, all Bashan, all the kingdom
an, and all the towns of Jair, which are in Bashan,
lf Gilead, and Ashtaroth, and Edrei,
es of the kingdom of Og in Bashan, were pertaining unto the
son of Manasseh, even to the one half of the

es did distribute for
plains of Moab, on the other side Jordan, by
he tribe of Levi Moses gave not any inheritance: the
nheritance, as he said unto them.
And these are the countries which the children of Israel
anaan, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua
thers of the tribes of the
rael, distributed for inheritance to them.
the LORD commanded by the hand
for the nine tribes, and for the half tribe.
ance of two tribes and an half
he other side Jordan: but unto the Levites he gave none
14:4 For the children of Joseph were two tribes, Manasseh and Ephraim:
ey gave no part unto the Levites in the land, save cities
uburbs for their cattle and for their
stance.
s, so the children of Israel did, and
y divided the land.
ren of Judah came unto Joshua in Gilgal: and Caleb
e said unto him, Thou knowest the
hat the LORD said unto Moses the man of God concerning me and

the servant of the LORD sent me
shbarnea to espy out the land; and I brought him word again
.
nt up with me made the heart of
e melt: but I wholly followed the LORD my God.
saying, Surely the land whereon thy
have trodden shall be thine inheritance, and thy children's for
hast wholly followed the LORD my God.
4:10 And now, behold, the LORD hath kept me alive, as he said, these
 years, even since the LORD spake this word unto Moses,
l wandered in the wilderness: and now, lo,
ld.
y as I was in the day that Moses
 as my strength was then, even so is my strength now, for war,
to come in.
 this mountain, whereof the LORD spake in
ow the Anakims were there,
ities were great and fenced: if so be the LORD will be
e to drive them out, as the LORD said.
14:13 And Joshua blessed him, and gave unto Caleb the son of Jephunneh
n inheritance.
ecame the inheritance of Caleb the son of
ause that he wholly followed
 of Israel.
n before was Kirjatharba; which Arba was a
d had rest from war.
 the lot of the tribe of the children of Judah by
r of Edom the wilderness of Zin
 was the uttermost part of the south coast.
the shore of the salt sea, from
hat looketh southward: 15:3 And it went out to the south side
d passed along to Zin, and ascended up on the
sed along to Hezron, and went up
 and fetched a compass to Karkaa: 15:4 From thence it passed
 out unto the river of Egypt; and the goings out
s shall be your south coast.
he east border was the salt sea, even unto the end of
n the north quarter was from the bay of the sea at
:6 And the border went up to
nd passed along by the north of Betharabah; and the border
Bohan the son of Reuben: 15:7 And the border
f Achor, and so northward,
 Gilgal, that is before the going up to Adummim, which
river: and the border passed toward the
aters of Enshemesh, and the goings out thereof were at Enrogel: 15:8
 went up by the valley of the son of Hinnom unto the
e same is Jerusalem: and the border went
up to the top of the mountain that lieth before the valley of Hinnom
h is at the end of the valley of the giants northward:
n from the top of the hill unto the
ain of the water of Nephtoah, and went out to the cities of mount
order was drawn to Baalah, which is Kirjathjearim:
rom Baalah westward unto mount Seir,
passed along unto the side of mount Jearim, which is Chesalon, on
nd went down to Bethshemesh, and passed on to Timnah:
 unto the side of Ekron northward: and
e border was drawn to Shicron, and passed along to mount Baalah, and
Jabneel; and the goings out of the border were at the
rder was to the great sea, and the coast thereof.
en of Judah round about according to
r families.
n of Jephunneh he gave a part among the
hildren of Judah, according to the commandment of the LORD to Joshua,
 of Arba the father of Anak, which city is Hebron.
he three sons of Anak, Sheshai, and
n, and Talmai, the children of Anak.
:15 And he went up thence to the inhabitants of Debir: and the name
 was Kirjathsepher.
d, He that smiteth Kirjathsepher, and taketh it, to
ter to wife.
of Kenaz, the brother of Caleb, took it: and
e.
me unto him, that she moved him to
 her father a field: and she lighted off her ass; and Caleb said
ldest thou?  15:19 Who answered, Give me a blessing;
 land; give me also springs of water.
 he gave her the upper springs, and the nether springs.
ance of the tribe of the children of Judah
d the uttermost cities of the tribe of the children of Judah
om southward were Kabzeel, and Eder, and Jagur,
dadah, 15:23 And Kedesh, and Hazor,
thnan, 15:24 Ziph, and Telem, and Bealoth, 15:25 And Hazor,
and Hezron, which is Hazor, 15:26 Amam, and
ah, and Heshmon, and Bethpalet,
 Hazarshual, and Beersheba, and Bizjothjah, 15:29 Baalah, and
And Eltolad, and Chesil, and Hormah, 15:31 And
, 15:32 And Lebaoth, and Shilhim,
, and Rimmon: all the cities are twenty and nine, with their
 the valley, Eshtaol, and Zoreah, and Ashnah,
ah, and Enam, 15:35 Jarmuth, and
 Socoh, and Azekah, 15:36 And Sharaim, and Adithaim, and
fourteen cities with their villages: 15:37
8 And Dilean, and Mizpeh, and
5:39 Lachish, and Bozkath, and Eglon, 15:40 And Cabbon, and
5:41 And Gederoth, Bethdagon, and Naamah, and
illages: 15:42 Libnah, and Ether,
an, 15:43 And Jiphtah, and Ashnah, and Nezib, 15:44 And Keilah,
eshah; nine cities with their villages: 15:45
s: 15:46 From Ekron even unto the
l that lay near Ashdod, with their villages: 15:47 Ashdod with
llages, Gaza with her towns and her villages, unto
t sea, and the border thereof: 15:48
in the mountains, Shamir, and Jattir, and Socoh, 15:49 And Dannah,
h, which is Debir, 15:50 And Anab, and Eshtemoh, and
lon, and Giloh; eleven cities with their
villages: 15:52 Arab, and Dumah, and Eshean, 15:53 And Janum, and
Aphekah, 15:54 And Humtah, and Kirjatharba, which is
with their villages: 15:55 Maon, Carmel,
and Ziph, and Juttah, 15:56 And Jezreel, and Jokdeam, and Zanoah,
h, and Timnah; ten cities with their villages: 15:58
:59 And Maarath, and Bethanoth, and
on; six cities with their villages: 15:60 Kirjathbaal, which is
Rabbah; two cities with their villages: 15:61 In
, and Secacah, 15:62 And Nibshan,
 city of Salt, and Engedi; six cities with their villages.
ites the inhabitants of Jerusalem, the children
but the Jebusites dwell with the
 of Judah at Jerusalem unto this day.
6:1 And the lot of the children of Joseph fell from Jordan by
er of Jericho on the east, to the wilderness that
mount Bethel, 16:2 And goeth out from
hel to Luz, and passeth along unto the borders of Archi to Ataroth,
down westward to the coast of Japhleti, unto the coast
 to Gezer; and the goings out thereof are
seph, Manasseh and Ephraim, took their
heritance.
hildren of Ephraim according to their
ilies was thus: even the border of their inheritance on the east
dar, unto Bethhoron the upper; 16:6 And the border
ethah on the north side; and the
ent about eastward unto Taanathshiloh, and passed by it on the
7 And it went down from Janohah to Ataroth, and to
d went out at Jordan.
ent out from Tappuah westward unto the river Kanah;
 at the sea. This is the inheritance of
he tribe of the children of Ephraim by their families.
es for the children of Ephraim were among
eh, all the cities with their

tes that dwelt in Gezer: but
es dwell among the Ephraimites unto this day, and serve
e was also a lot for the tribe of Manasseh; for he was the
wit, for Machir the firstborn of Manasseh, the
an of war, therefore he had Gilead
shan.
 rest of the children of Manasseh by
r families; for the children of Abiezer, and for the children of
 children of Asriel, and for the children of
r, and for the children of
 were the male children of Manasseh the son of Joseph by
t Zelophehad, the son of Hepher, the son of Gilead, the son of
anasseh, had no sons, but daughters: and these are
ah, and Noah, Hoglah, Milcah, and

 the priest, and before Joshua
 Nun, and before the princes, saying, The LORD commanded
tance among our brethren. Therefore
ding to the commandment of the LORD he gave them an inheritance
of their father.
n portions to Manasseh, beside the land of
er side Jordan; 17:6 Because
s of Manasseh had an inheritance among his sons: and the
d the land of Gilead.
t of Manasseh was from Asher to Michmethah, that
er went along on the right hand unto
inhabitants of Entappuah.
sseh had the land of Tappuah: but Tappuah on the border
 children of Ephraim; 17:9 And the coast
descended unto the river Kanah, southward of the river: these cities
 among the cities of Manasseh: the coast of Manasseh
the river, and the outgoings of it were
t the sea: 17:10 Southward it was Ephraim's, and northward it was
he sea is his border; and they met together in Asher
on the east.
Issachar and in Asher Bethshean and her
owns, and Ibleam and her towns, and the inhabitants of Dor and her
nhabitants of Endor and her towns, and the inhabitants
d the inhabitants of Megiddo and her
s, even three countries.
children of Manasseh could not drive out the inhabitants
anaanites would dwell in that land.
13 Yet it came to pass, when the children of Israel were waxen
t the Canaanites to tribute, but did not utterly
hildren of Joseph spake unto Joshua, saying, Why hast
 one portion to inherit, seeing I am a
eat people, forasmuch as the LORD hath blessed me hitherto?  17:15
red them, If thou be a great people, then get thee up
down for thyself there in the land of the
hraim be too narrow for thee.
 the children of Joseph said, The hill is not enough for us:
 that dwell in the land of the valley have
ethshean and her towns, and
of the valley of Jezreel.
hua spake unto the house of Joseph, even to Ephraim and
rt a great people, and hast great power:
thou shalt not have one lot only: 17:18 But the mountain shall be
a wood, and thou shalt cut it down: and the outgoings
u shalt drive out the Canaanites, though
they have iron chariots, and though they be strong.
on of the children of Israel assembled
gether at Shiloh, and set up the tabernacle of the congregation
 was subdued before them.
e remained among the children of Israel seven tribes,
eir inheritance.
nto the children of Israel, How long are ye
the LORD God of your fathers
ou?  18:4 Give out from among you three men for each
nd they shall rise, and go through the
nd, and describe it according to the inheritance of them; and they
 to me.
nto seven parts: Judah shall abide in
ir coast on the south, and the house of Joseph shall abide in their
orth.
the land into seven parts, and bring
description hither to me, that I may cast lots for you here before
.
ng you; for the priesthood of the
 their inheritance: and Gad, and Reuben, and half the tribe of
ved their inheritance beyond Jordan on the east,
D gave them.
d went away: and Joshua charged them that
 walk through the land, and
and come again to me, that I may here cast lots for you

h the land, and described it by
to seven parts in a book, and came again to Joshua to the
And Joshua cast lots for them in Shiloh before the LORD: and
he land unto the children of Israel according to
lot of the tribe of the children of Benjamin came up
nd the coast of their lot came forth
een the children of Judah and the children of Joseph.
he north side was from Jordan; and the
rder went up to the side of Jericho on the north side, and went up
tains westward; and the goings out thereof were at the
8:13 And the border went over from thence toward Luz, to the side of
Bethel, southward; and the border descended to
h on the south side of the nether
on.
ce, and compassed the corner of the
outhward, from the hill that lieth before Bethhoron southward;
hereof were at Kirjathbaal, which is
athjearim, a city of the children of Judah: this was the west
 the south quarter was from the end of Kirjathjearim, and the
e west, and went out to the well of waters of
own to the end of the mountain
 before the valley of the son of Hinnom, and which is in the
n the north, and descended to the valley of
uth, and descended to Enrogel,
was drawn from the north, and went forth to Enshemesh, and
th, which is over against the going up of
han the son of Reuben, 18:18
long toward the side over against Arabah northward, and
9 And the border passed along to the side
s of the border were at the
the salt sea at the south end of Jordan: this was the
dan was the border of it on the east side. This was the
 of Benjamin, by the coasts thereof round
:21 Now the cities of the tribe of the children of Benjamin
lies were Jericho, and Bethhoglah, and the
nd Zemaraim, and Bethel, 18:23
and Pharah, and Ophrah, 18:24 And Chepharhaammonai, and
ies with their villages: 18:25 Gibeon, and
d Chephirah, and Mozah, 18:27
and Irpeel, and Taralah, 18:28 And Zelah, Eleph, and
beath, and Kirjath; fourteen cities with
their villages. This is the inheritance of the children of Benjamin
eir families.
ame forth to Simeon, even for the tribe of
r families: and their
hin the inheritance of the children of Judah.
nce Beersheba, and Sheba, and
:3 And Hazarshual, and Balah, and Azem, 19:4 And Eltolad,
9:5 And Ziklag, and Bethmarcaboth, and
zarsusah, 19:6 And Bethlebaoth, and Sharuhen; thirteen cities and
9:7 Ain, Remmon, and Ether, and Ashan; four cities
 the villages that were round about
 cities to Baalathbeer, Ramath of the south. This is the
f the children of Simeon according to their
 the children of Judah was the inheritance
of the children of Judah was
 them: therefore the children of Simeon had their
e of them.
 up for the children of Zebulun according
r inheritance was unto Sarid:
heir border went up toward the sea, and Maralah, and
ched to the river that is before
 19:12 And turned from Sarid eastward toward the sunrising
othtabor, and then goeth out to Daberath, and
ence passeth on along on the east
ahhepher, to Ittahkazin, and goeth out to Remmonmethoar to
er compasseth it on the north side to
nathon: and the outgoings thereof are in the valley of Jiphthahel:
h, and Nahallal, and Shimron, and Idalah, and
illages.
of the children of Zebulun according to
heir families, these cities with their villages.
t to Issachar, for the children of
ar according to their families.
nd their border was toward Jezreel, and Chesulloth, and Shunem,
 and Shihon, and Anaharath, 19:20 And Rabbith, and
eth, and Engannim, and Enhaddah, and
pazzez; 19:22 And the coast reacheth to Tabor, and Shahazimah, and
 the outgoings of their border were at Jordan: sixteen

ibe of the children of Issachar
 to their families, the cities and their villages.
ut for the tribe of the children of
 according to their families.
 their border was Helkath, and Hali, and Beten, and Achshaph,
 and Amad, and Misheal; and reacheth to Carmel
7 And turneth toward the sunrising
hdagon, and reacheth to Zebulun, and to the valley of Jiphthahel
ide of Bethemek, and Neiel, and goeth out to Cabul
on, and Rehob, and Hammon, and Kanah,
n unto great Zidon; 19:29 And then the coast turneth to Ramah, and
ty Tyre; and the coast turneth to Hosah; and the
rom the coast to Achzib: 19:30 Ummah
, and Aphek, and Rehob: twenty and two cities with their villages.
the inheritance of the tribe of the children of Asher
these cities with their villages.
 The sixth lot came out to the children of Naphtali, even for the
ali according to their families.
And their coast was from Heleph, from Allon to Zaanannim, and
neel, unto Lakum; and the outgoings thereof were
t turneth westward to Aznothtabor,
eth out from thence to Hukkok, and reacheth to Zebulun on the
eth to Asher on the west side, and to Judah upon
:35 And the fenced cities are Ziddim, Zer, and Hammath, Rakkath, and
:36 And Adamah, and Ramah, and Hazor, 19:37 And Kedesh,
38 And Iron, and Migdalel, Horem, and
hanath, and Bethshemesh; nineteen cities with their villages.
nheritance of the tribe of the children of Naphtali
e cities and their villages.
the seventh lot came out for the tribe of the children of
milies.
heritance was Zorah, and Eshtaol, and
hemesh, 19:42 And Shaalabbin, and Ajalon, and Jethlah, 19:43 And
ah, and Ekron, 19:44 And Eltekeh, and Gibbethon, and
Beneberak, and Gathrimmon, 19:46 And
rkon, and Rakkon, with the border before Japho.
en of Dan went out too little for
herefore the children of Dan went up to fight against Leshem,
e it with the edge of the sword, and possessed
shem, Dan, after the name of Dan
ther.
the tribe of the children of Dan
g to their families, these cities with their villages.
n end of dividing the land for inheritance
gave an inheritance to Joshua
Nun among them: 19:50 According to the word of the LORD
h he asked, even Timnathserah in mount
hraim: and he built the city, and dwelt therein.
, which Eleazar the priest, and Joshua
e son of Nun, and the heads of the fathers of the tribes of the
 divided for an inheritance by lot in Shiloh before
bernacle of the congregation. So they
e an end of dividing the country.
The LORD also spake unto Joshua, saying, 20:2 Speak to the
ng, Appoint out for you cities of refuge,
oses: 20:3 That the slayer
ny person unawares and unwittingly may flee thither: and
from the avenger of blood.
n he that doth flee unto one of those cities shall stand
e of the city, and shall declare his cause
they shall take him into the
em, and give him a place, that he may dwell among them.
f blood pursue after him, then they shall not
because he smote his neighbour
y, and hated him not beforetime.
nd he shall dwell in that city, until he stand before the
, and until the death of the high priest that
e slayer return, and come unto
ty, and unto his own house, unto the city from whence he
ointed Kedesh in Galilee in mount Naphtali, and
tharba, which is Hebron, in the
of Judah.
rdan by Jericho eastward, they assigned
ezer in the wilderness upon the plain out of the tribe of Reuben, and
ead out of the tribe of Gad, and Golan in Bashan out of
0:9 These were the cities appointed for all the children of Israel,
anger that sojourneth among them, that whosoever
ht flee thither, and not die by the
of the avenger of blood, until he stood before the congregation.
ear the heads of the fathers of the Levites unto
a the son of Nun, and unto the heads
he fathers of the tribes of the children of Israel; 21:2 And they
t Shiloh in the land of Canaan, saying, The LORD
give us cities to dwell in, with the
rbs thereof for our cattle.
e children of Israel gave unto the Levites out of their
ment of the LORD, these cities and their
suburbs.
the families of the Kohathites: and the
hildren of Aaron the priest, which were of the Levites, had by lot
 of Judah, and out of the tribe of Simeon, and out of
en cities.
ldren of Kohath had by lot out of the
ilies of the tribe of Ephraim, and out of the tribe of Dan, and out
be of Manasseh, ten cities.
e children of Gershon had by lot out of the families of the
out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe
ibe of Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen
s.
 families had out of the tribe of
 and out of the tribe of Gad, and out of the tribe of Zebulun,
:8 And the children of Israel gave by lot unto the Levites these
suburbs, as the LORD commanded by the hand of Moses.
e tribe of the children of Judah, and out
hese cities which are here
ame.
 being of the families of the
 who were of the children of Levi, had: for theirs was the
they gave them the city of Arba the father of Anak, which
ll country of Judah, with the suburbs thereof
ds of the city, and the villages thereof, gave they
or his possession.
 to the children of Aaron the priest Hebron with
e for the slayer; and Libnah with
urbs, 21:14 And Jattir with her suburbs, and Eshtemoa with her
olon with her suburbs, and Debir with her suburbs,
and Juttah with her suburbs, and
esh with her suburbs; nine cities out of those two tribes.
ribe of Benjamin, Gibeon with her suburbs, Geba
th her suburbs, and Almon with her
s; four cities.
 the children of Aaron, the priests, were
:20 And the families of the children of Kohath, the Levites which
hildren of Kohath, even they had the cities of their
m.
h her suburbs in mount Ephraim, to
ity of refuge for the slayer; and Gezer with her suburbs, 21:22
r suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs; four
be of Dan, Eltekeh with her suburbs, Gibbethon
 her suburbs, Gathrimmon with her
; four cities.
f tribe of Manasseh, Tanach with her suburbs,
cities.
ith their suburbs for the families of
 children of Kohath that remained.
7 And unto the children of Gershon, of the families of the
r half tribe of Manasseh they gave Golan in
f refuge for the slayer; and
ith her suburbs; two cities.
out of the tribe of Issachar, Kishon with her suburbs,
:29 Jarmuth with her suburbs, Engannim
th her suburbs; four cities.
out of the tribe of Asher, Mishal with her suburbs, Abdon
elkath with her suburbs, and Rehob with her
of the tribe of Naphtali, Kedesh in Galilee with her
e for the slayer; and Hammothdor with
 suburbs, and Kartan with her suburbs; three cities.
Gershonites according to their families
ere thirteen cities with their suburbs.

en of Merari, the rest of the
t of the tribe of Zebulun, Jokneam with her suburbs, and
1:35 Dimnah with her suburbs, Nahalal with
ut of the tribe of Reuben, Bezer with her suburbs, and
:37 Kedemoth with her suburbs, and
th with her suburbs; four cities.
 And out of the tribe of Gad, Ramoth in Gilead with her suburbs,
fuge for the slayer; and Mahanaim with her suburbs,
 Jazer with her suburbs; four cities in
ll.
ldren of Merari by their families,
were remaining of the families of the Levites, were by their lot
21:41 All the cities of the Levites within the possession of the
 were forty and eight cities with their suburbs.
e with their suburbs round about them:
us were all these cities.
 LORD gave unto Israel all the land which he sware to
they possessed it, and dwelt therein.
1:44 And the LORD gave them rest round about, according to all that
heir fathers: and there stood not a man of all their
delivered all their enemies into their
nd.
 good thing which the LORD had
o the house of Israel; all came to pass.

and the Gadites, and the half
nasseh, 22:2 And said unto them, Ye have kept all that
D commanded you, and have obeyed my voice
 not left your brethren these
nto this day, but have kept the charge of the commandment
22:4 And now the LORD your God hath given rest unto your brethren, as
hem: therefore now return ye, and get you unto your
r possession, which Moses the servant
the LORD gave you on the other side Jordan.
 commandment and the law, which
 servant of the LORD charged you, to love the LORD your God,
 ways, and to keep his commandments, and to
all your heart and with all

m away: and they went unto

 Manasseh Moses had given
ashan: but unto the other half thereof gave Joshua
e Jordan westward. And when Joshua
hem away also unto their tents, then he blessed them, 22:8 And
saying, Return with much riches unto your tents,
lver, and with gold, and with brass,
with iron, and with very much raiment: divide the spoil of your
rethren.
n and the children of Gad and the half
ibe of Manasseh returned, and departed from the children of Israel
hich is in the land of Canaan, to go unto the country
ir possession, whereof they were
d, according to the word of the LORD by the hand of Moses.
me unto the borders of Jordan, that are in the
en and the children of Gad and the
ribe of Manasseh built there an altar by Jordan, a great altar
And the children of Israel heard say, Behold, the children of
en of Gad and the half tribe of Manasseh have
of Canaan, in the borders of
he passage of the children of Israel.
2:12 And when the children of Israel heard of it, the whole
ldren of Israel gathered themselves together at
m.
t unto the children of Reuben, and
 children of Gad, and to the half tribe of Manasseh, into the
has the son of Eleazar the priest, 22:14 And with
use a prince throughout all the
 Israel; and each one was an head of the house of their
 of Israel.
e children of Reuben, and to the children
, unto the land of Gilead,
 with them, saying, 22:16 Thus saith the whole
ass is this that ye have committed
t the God of Israel, to turn away this day from following the
 builded you an altar, that ye might rebel this
 iniquity of Peor too little for
 which we are not cleansed until this day, although there was
egation of the LORD, 22:18 But that ye must turn
ORD? and it will be, seeing ye rebel
ay against the LORD, that to morrow he will be wroth with the
 Israel.
land of your possession be unclean, then
pass ye over unto the land of the possession of the LORD, wherein the
acle dwelleth, and take possession among us: but rebel
bel against us, in building you an altar
beside the altar of the LORD our God.
2:20 Did not Achan the son of Zerah commit a trespass in the accursed
ath fell on all the congregation of Israel? and that man
iniquity.
uben and the children of Gad and the half
 the heads of the thousands
:22 The LORD God of gods, the LORD God of gods, he
w; if it be in rebellion, or if in
ression against the LORD, (save us not this day,) 22:23 That we
tar to turn from following the LORD, or if to offer
offering, or if to offer peace
thereon, let the LORD himself require it; 22:24 And if we
or fear of this thing, saying, In time to
hildren, saying, What have ye
the LORD God of Israel?  22:25 For the LORD hath made
d you, ye children of Reuben and children
hall your children make our
e from fearing the LORD.
e we said, Let us now prepare to build us an altar, not
 sacrifice: 22:27 But that it may be a
tness between us, and you, and our generations after us, that we
ce of the LORD before him with our burnt offerings,
th our peace offerings; that your
n may not say to our children in time to come, Ye have no part
8 Therefore said we, that it shall be, when they should so say to
rations in time to come, that we may say again,
the LORD, which our fathers made,
 burnt offerings, nor for sacrifices; but it is a witness
:29 God forbid that we should rebel against the LORD, and turn this
ing the LORD, to build an altar for burnt offerings,
rifices, beside the altar of the LORD
 God that is before his tabernacle.
30 And when Phinehas the priest, and the princes of the
he thousands of Israel which were with him,
uben and the children of Gad
dren of Manasseh spake, it pleased them.

e priest said unto the
, and to the children of Gad, and to the children of
 that the LORD is among us, because ye
ve not committed this trespass against the LORD: now ye have
 of Israel out of the hand of the LORD.

 priest, and the princes,
he children of Reuben, and from the children of Gad,
o the land of Canaan, to the children of
Israel, and brought them word again.
:33 And the thing pleased the children of Israel; and the children
d God, and did not intend to go up against them in
ein the children of Reuben and Gad

he children of Gad called the
or it shall be a witness between us that the LORD is God.
s a long time after that the LORD had given
 round about, that Joshua waxed
tricken in age.
for all Israel, and for their elders, and for
d for their officers, and said
 I am old and stricken in age: 23:3 And ye have seen all
h done unto all these nations because of
you; for the LORD your God is he that hath fought for you.
vided unto you by lot these nations that remain,
es, from Jordan, with all the
t I have cut off, even unto the great sea westward.
e shall expel them from before you, and
rive them from out of your sight; and ye shall possess their land, as
 God hath promised unto you.
 therefore very courageous to keep and to do all that is
 law of Moses, that ye turn not aside
refrom to the right hand or to the left; 23:7 That ye come not
 these that remain among you; neither make mention
ause to swear by them, neither serve
, nor bow yourselves unto them: 23:8 But cleave unto the LORD your
done unto this day.
ath driven out from before you great nations and
h been able to stand before you unto
 day.
a thousand: for the LORD your God, he
is that fighteth for you, as he hath promised you.
 unto yourselves, that ye love the LORD
our God.
e go back, and cleave unto the remnant
 these nations, even these that remain among you, and shall make
m, and go in unto them, and they to you: 23:13 Know
our God will no more drive out any of
se nations from before you; but they shall be snares and traps unto
es in your sides, and thorns in your eyes, until ye
which the LORD your God hath given you.

e way of all the earth: and
l your hearts and in all your souls, that not one thing
 things which the LORD your God spake
cerning you; all are come to pass unto you, and not one thing hath

that as all good things are
, which the LORD your God promised you; so shall the LORD
hings, until he have destroyed you from off
hath given you.
sgressed the covenant of the LORD your God,
nd served other gods, and bowed
s to them; then shall the anger of the LORD be kindled
rish quickly from off the good land which
a gathered all the tribes of Israel to Shechem, and
, and for their heads, and for their
es, and for their officers; and they presented themselves before
oshua said unto all the people, Thus saith the LORD God of
lt on the other side of the flood in old time,
nd the father of Nachor: and they
other gods.
 Abraham from the other side of the flood,
anaan, and multiplied his
him Isaac.
acob and Esau: and I gave unto Esau mount
ildren went down into Egypt.
t Moses also and Aaron, and I plagued Egypt, according to
em: and afterward I brought you out.
:6 And I brought your fathers out of Egypt: and ye came unto the
ians pursued after your fathers with chariots and
7 And when they cried unto the LORD, he put darkness between you
 and brought the sea upon them, and covered them;
ve done in Egypt: and ye dwelt in the
derness a long season.
ht you into the land of the Amorites, which dwelt on
y fought with you: and I gave them into
our hand, that ye might possess their land; and I destroyed them from

of Moab, arose and warred
 and sent and called Balaam the son of Beor to curse
rken unto Balaam; therefore he blessed
u still: so I delivered you out of his hand.
came unto Jericho: and the men of
 fought against you, the Amorites, and the Perizzites, and the
Hittites, and the Girgashites, the Hivites, and
 into your hand.
ornet before you, which drave them out from
morites; but not with thy
 thy bow.
land for which ye did not labour, and
ies which ye built not, and ye dwell in them; of the vineyards and
 ye planted not do ye eat.
erefore fear the LORD, and serve him in sincerity and in
ds which your fathers served on the other
e ye the LORD.
l unto you to serve the LORD, choose you this
ods which your fathers served
n the other side of the flood, or the gods of the Amorites,
 but as for me and my house, we will serve the
ed and said, God forbid that we should
rsake the LORD, to serve other gods; 24:17 For the LORD our God, he
ght us up and our fathers out of the land of Egypt,
which did those great signs in our
 and preserved us in all the way wherein we went, and among all
whom we passed: 24:18 And the LORD drave out from
e Amorites which dwelt in the land:
fore will we also serve the LORD; for he is our God.
he people, Ye cannot serve the LORD: for
he is an holy God; he is a jealous God; he will not forgive your
 your sins.
D, and serve strange gods, then he will
urn and do you hurt, and consume you, after that he hath done you
d the people said unto Joshua, Nay; but we will serve the
 said unto the people, Ye are witnesses against
the LORD, to serve him. And they
 are witnesses.
 away, said he, the strange gods which are
he LORD God of Israel.
ople said unto Joshua, The LORD our God will we serve,

e people that day, and set them
 and an ordinance in Shechem.
 Joshua wrote these words in the book of the law of God, and
d set it up there under an oak, that was by the
 Joshua said unto all the people, Behold, this stone shall be
r it hath heard all the words of the LORD which
fore a witness unto you, lest ye
r God.
epart, every man unto his inheritance.
24:29 And it came to pass after these things, that Joshua the son of
nt of the LORD, died, being an hundred and ten years
him in the border of his inheritance in
imnathserah, which is in mount Ephraim, on the north side of the hill
24:31 And Israel served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the
ders that overlived Joshua, and which had known all the
had done for Israel.
s of Joseph, which the children of Israel brought up
hechem, in a parcel of ground which
 bought of the sons of Hamor the father of Shechem for an hundred
 and it became the inheritance of the children of
son of Aaron died; and they buried him in a hill
, which was given him in mount

ter the death of Joshua it came to pass, that the children
, saying, Who shall go up for us against the
m?  1:2 And the LORD said, Judah
 up: behold, I have delivered the land into his hand.
eon his brother, Come up with me into my
lot, that we may fight against the Canaanites; and I likewise will go
o thy lot. So Simeon went with him.
 And Judah went up; and the LORD delivered the Canaanites and the
heir hand: and they slew of them in Bezek ten
donibezek in Bezek: and they fought against him,
he Perizzites.
 and they pursued after him, and caught him,
oes.
e and ten kings, having their thumbs
their great toes cut off, gathered their meat under my table: as I
d hath requited me. And they brought him to Jerusalem,
w the children of Judah had fought against Jerusalem, and had
 it with the edge of the sword, and set the city
children of Judah went down to fight against the
tain, and in the south, and in the
.
nites that dwelt in Hebron: (now
 of Hebron before was Kirjatharba:) and they slew Sheshai, and

e inhabitants of Debir: and the
ebir before was Kirjathsepher: 1:12 And Caleb said, He that
and taketh it, to him will I give Achsah my
he son of Kenaz, Caleb's younger brother, took it:
ter to wife.
when she came to him, that she moved him to
ted from off her ass; and Caleb
 her, What wilt thou?  1:15 And she said unto him, Give me a
t given me a south land; give me also springs of
r springs and the nether springs.
And the children of the Kenite, Moses' father in law, went up out
lm trees with the children of Judah into the
e south of Arad; and they went
among the people.
ith Simeon his brother, and they slew the
terly destroyed it. And the
ity was called Hormah.
took Gaza with the coast thereof, and Askelon with the
h the coast thereof.
was with Judah; and he drave out the inhabitants of
ve out the inhabitants of the valley,
ause they had chariots of iron.
d they gave Hebron unto Caleb, as Moses said: and he expelled
 of Anak.
amin did not drive out the Jebusites that
ell with the children of
salem unto this day.
 of Joseph, they also went up against Bethel: and
nd the house of Joseph sent to descry Bethel. (Now the name of
Luz.)  1:24 And the spies saw a man come forth out
him, Shew us, we pray thee, the
into the city, and we will shew thee mercy.
ance into the city, they smote
ith the edge of the sword; but they let go the man and all
the man went into the land of the Hittites, and built a city,
hereof Luz: which is the name thereof unto this
rive out the inhabitants of Bethshean and
 the inhabitants of Dor and
r the inhabitants of Ibleam and her towns, nor the
owns: but the Canaanites would dwell
hat land.
n Israel was strong, that they put the
naanites to tribute, and did not utterly drive them out.
 drive out the Canaanites that dwelt in Gezer;
ong them.
e out the inhabitants of Kitron, nor the
inhabitants of Nahalol; but the Canaanites dwelt among them, and
.
inhabitants of Accho, nor the
 of Zidon, nor of Ahlab, nor of Achzib, nor of Helbah, nor
1:32 But the Asherites dwelt among the
naanites, the inhabitants of the land: for they did not drive them
ther did Naphtali drive out the inhabitants of Bethshemesh,
Bethanath; but he dwelt among the Canaanites,
less the inhabitants of
f Bethanath became tributaries unto them.
en of Dan into the mountain:
ld not suffer them to come down to the valley: 1:35 But
 mount Heres in Aijalon, and in Shaalbim:
iled, so that they became

om the going up to Akrabbim,
k, and upward.
LORD came up from Gilgal to Bochim, and said,
 have brought you unto the land
ware unto your fathers; and I said, I will never break my
 And ye shall make no league with the inhabitants of this land; ye
 their altars: but ye have not obeyed my voice: why
re I also said, I will not drive them
 from before you; but they shall be as thorns in your sides, and
e a snare unto you.
pass, when the angel of the LORD spake these words
 that the people lifted up their
nd wept.
f that place Bochim: and they sacrificed
there unto the LORD.
a had let the people go, the children of Israel went
 to possess the land.
e served the LORD all the days of Joshua, and all the
ved Joshua, who had seen all the great
rks of the LORD, that he did for Israel.

nt of the LORD, died, being an
d ten years old.
m in the border of his inheritance in
nathheres, in the mount of Ephraim, on the north side of the hill
d also all that generation were gathered unto their fathers:
r generation after them, which knew not the
ne for Israel.
 Israel did evil in the sight of the LORD, and
 the LORD God of their fathers,
ught them out of the land of Egypt, and followed other gods,
ple that were round about them, and bowed
RD to anger.
LORD, and served Baal and Ashtaroth.
14 And the anger of the LORD was hot against Israel, and he
 hands of spoilers that spoiled them, and he
ies round about, so that they
ny longer stand before their enemies.
:15 Whithersoever they went out, the hand of the LORD was against
 the LORD had said, and as the LORD had sworn unto
ressed.
ed up judges, which delivered them out
 the hand of those that spoiled them.
:17 And yet they would not hearken unto their judges, but they went a
 other gods, and bowed themselves unto them: they turned
ch their fathers walked in, obeying the
ommandments of the LORD; but they did not so.
up judges, then the LORD was with
ge, and delivered them out of the hand of their enemies all the
for it repented the LORD because of their groanings
d them and vexed them.
 to pass, when the judge was dead, that they returned,
e than their fathers, in following other
gods to serve them, and to bow down unto them; they ceased not from
s, nor from their stubborn way.
d the anger of the LORD was hot against Israel; and he said,
le hath transgressed my covenant which I
commanded their fathers, and have not hearkened unto my voice; 2:21 I
 henceforth drive out any from before them of the nations
 died: 2:22 That through them I may prove
 the LORD to walk therein, as
rs did keep it, or not.
the LORD left those nations, without driving them out
 them into the hand of Joshua.
these are the nations which the LORD left, to prove Israel by
 Israel as had not known all the wars of Canaan;
he children of Israel might know, to
h them war, at the least such as before knew nothing thereof; 3:3
s of the Philistines, and all the Canaanites, and the
at dwelt in mount Lebanon, from mount
lhermon unto the entering in of Hamath.

, to know whether they would
 the commandments of the LORD, which he commanded their
s.
 among the Canaanites, Hittites,
ites, and Perizzites, and Hivites, and Jebusites: 3:6 And they
 to be their wives, and gave their daughters to

 in the sight of the LORD, and
 LORD their God, and served Baalim and the groves.
 LORD was hot against Israel, and he
 them into the hand of Chushanrishathaim king of Mesopotamia: and
srael served Chushanrishathaim eight years.
ried unto the LORD, the LORD
deliverer to the children of Israel, who delivered them,
naz, Caleb's younger brother.
the Spirit of the LORD came upon him, and he judged Israel,
d the LORD delivered Chushanrishathaim king of
and prevailed against

 And Othniel the son of Kenaz
12 And the children of Israel did evil again in the sight of the
 strengthened Eglon the king of Moab against Israel,
the sight of the LORD.
ered unto him the children of Ammon and Amalek, and
essed the city of palm trees.
he children of Israel served Eglon the king of Moab eighteen
n the children of Israel cried unto the LORD, the LORD
Ehud the son of Gera, a Benjamite, a man
lefthanded: and by him the children of Israel sent a present unto
 Moab.
which had two edges, of a cubit
nd he did gird it under his raiment upon his right thigh.
 present unto Eglon king of Moab: and Eglon was
 had made an end to offer the present, he sent away
t.
m the quarries that were by
aid, I have a secret errand unto thee, O king: who said,
 stood by him went out from him.
nd Ehud came unto him; and he was sitting in a summer parlour,
self alone. And Ehud said, I have a message from
 of his seat.
is left hand, and took the dagger from his
y: 3:22 And the haft also went
he blade; and the fat closed upon the blade, so that he
ut of his belly; and the dirt came out.

ch, and shut the doors of the
n him, and locked them.
s gone out, his servants came; and when they saw that,
lour were locked, they said, Surely he
vereth his feet in his summer chamber.
3:25 And they tarried till they were ashamed: and, behold, he opened
of the parlour; therefore they took a key, and opened
 was fallen down dead on the earth.
6 And Ehud escaped while they tarried, and passed beyond the
unto Seirath.
 when he was come, that he blew a trumpet in
ren of Israel went down with him
 mount, and he before them.
 said unto them, Follow after me: for the LORD hath
ites into your hand. And they went down
fter him, and took the fords of Jordan toward Moab, and suffered not
over.
t time about ten thousand men, all
 and all men of valour; and there escaped not a man.
t day under the hand of Israel. And the
and had rest fourscore years.
after him was Shamgar the son of Anath, which slew of the
en with an ox goad: and he also delivered
 again did evil in the sight of the
 when Ehud was dead.
old them into the hand of Jabin king of Canaan, that
of whose host was Sisera, which dwelt in
Harosheth of the Gentiles.
children of Israel cried unto the LORD: for he had nine
nd twenty years he mightily oppressed the
 prophetess, the wife of Lapidoth, she judged Israel
welt under the palm tree of Deborah between Ramah and
the children of Israel came up to her for
Barak the son of Abinoam out of
htali, and said unto him, Hath not the LORD God of Israel
 draw toward mount Tabor, and take with thee
phtali and of the children of
:7 And I will draw unto thee to the river Kishon Sisera,
y, with his chariots and his multitude; and
4:8 And Barak said unto her, If thou wilt go with me, then I will go:
ilt not go with me, then I will not go.

hee: notwithstanding the
u takest shall not be for thine honour; for the LORD
d of a woman. And Deborah arose, and
 with Barak to Kedesh.
alled Zebulun and Naphtali to Kedesh; and he went up
eet: and Deborah went up with him.
 Now Heber the Kenite, which was of the children of Hobab the
s, had severed himself from the Kenites, and
naim, which is by Kedesh.
 shewed Sisera that Barak the son of Abinoam was gone up
d Sisera gathered together all his chariots, even nine hundred
d all the people that were with him, from
of Kishon.
arak, Up; for this is the day in which the
nd: is not the LORD gone out
 So Barak went down from mount Tabor, and ten thousand men
he LORD discomfited Sisera, and all his chariots, and all
f the sword before Barak; so that Sisera
lighted down off his chariot, and fled away on his feet.
fter the chariots, and after the host, unto
host of Sisera fell upon the
sword; and there was not a man left.
17 Howbeit Sisera fled away on his feet to the tent of Jael the wife
enite: for there was peace between Jabin the king of
he Kenite.
et Sisera, and said unto him, Turn in, my
e had turned in unto her into
he covered him with a mantle.
he said unto her, Give me, I pray thee, a little water to
And she opened a bottle of milk, and gave him
 he said unto her, Stand in the door of the tent, and it
h come and enquire of thee, and say, Is
here any man here? that thou shalt say, No.
il of the tent, and took an
 hand, and went softly unto him, and smote the nail into
it into the ground: for he was fast asleep
ld, as Barak pursued Sisera, Jael came out to meet him,
d I will shew thee the man whom thou
est. And when he came into her tent, behold, Sisera lay dead, and
is temples.
 day Jabin the king of Canaan before the
children of Israel.
f the children of Israel prospered, and prevailed
 until they had destroyed Jabin king
anaan.
the son of Abinoam on that day,
:2 Praise ye the LORD for the avenging of Israel, when the
 themselves.
 ear, O ye princes; I, even I, will sing
unto the LORD; I will sing praise to the LORD God of Israel.
wentest out of Seir, when thou marchedst out of
ed, and the heavens dropped, the
lso dropped water.
lted from before the LORD, even that Sinai from
:6 In the days of Shamgar the son of Anath, in the days of Jael, the
unoccupied, and the travellers walked through byways.
villages ceased, they ceased in Israel,
ntil that I Deborah arose, that I arose a mother in Israel.
ds; then was war in the gates: was there a shield
d in Israel?  5:9 My heart is toward
governors of Israel, that offered themselves willingly among the
he LORD.
ite asses, ye that sit in judgment, and
alk by the way.
vered from the noise of archers in the places
hearse the righteous acts of the
en the righteous acts toward the inhabitants of his villages
the people of the LORD go down to the gates.
wake, utter a song: arise, Barak,
d thy captivity captive, thou son of Abinoam.
h have dominion over the nobles
 people: the LORD made me have dominion over the mighty.
there a root of them against Amalek; after
 Machir came down governors,
ebulun they that handle the pen of the writer.
ere with Deborah; even Issachar, and
 Barak: he was sent on foot into the valley. For the divisions of
 great thoughts of heart.
est thou among the sheepfolds, to hear the bleatings of
ns of Reuben there were great searchings of
an: and why did Dan remain in ships?
r continued on the sea shore, and abode in his breaches.
i were a people that jeoparded their lives
 field.
 then fought the kings of Canaan in
ch by the waters of Megiddo; they took no gain of money.
aven; the stars in their courses fought
gainst Sisera.
 swept them away, that ancient river, the
n down strength.
sehoofs broken by the means of the pransings,

he LORD, curse ye bitterly the
s thereof; because they came not to the help of the LORD, to
gainst the mighty.
omen shall Jael the wife of Heber the Kenite be,
n the tent.
e gave him milk; she brought forth butter
d to the nail, and her right hand to the workmen's
smote Sisera, she smote off his head,
n she had pierced and stricken through his temples.
 fell, he lay down: at her feet he bowed,
wn dead.
ed out at a window, and cried through
 lattice, Why is his chariot so long in coming? why tarry the
s?  5:29 Her wise ladies answered her, yea, she
ve they not sped? have they not
he prey; to every man a damsel or two; to Sisera a prey of
f divers colours of needlework, of divers
 for the necks of them that
l?  5:31 So let all thine enemies perish, O LORD: but let
the sun when he goeth forth in his might. And
 And the children of Israel did evil in the sight of the LORD: and
ed them into the hand of Midian seven years.
 against Israel: and because of
nites the children of Israel made them the dens which are in
es, and strong holds.
, when Israel had sown, that the Midianites came up,
ildren of the east, even they came up
inst them; 6:4 And they encamped against them, and destroyed the
rth, till thou come unto Gaza, and left no
r ox, nor ass.
h their cattle and their tents, and they came
th they and their camels were
ber: and they entered into the land to destroy it.
overished because of the Midianites; and
the children of Israel cried unto the LORD.
ldren of Israel cried unto the
se of the Midianites, 6:8 That the LORD sent a prophet unto
 which said unto them, Thus saith the LORD God
pt, and brought you forth out of
e of bondage; 6:9 And I delivered you out of the hand of the
the hand of all that oppressed you, and drave
u their land; 6:10 And I said
 am the LORD your God; fear not the gods of the Amorites,
ut ye have not obeyed my voice.
d there came an angel of the LORD, and sat under an oak which
ertained unto Joash the Abiezrite: and his son
ss, to hide it from the
12 And the angel of the LORD appeared unto him, and said unto him,
 thee, thou mighty man of valour.
And Gideon said unto him, Oh my Lord, if the LORD be with us, why
befallen us? and where be all his miracles which our
d not the LORD bring us up from Egypt?
t now the LORD hath forsaken us, and delivered us into the hands of

 said, Go in this thy might, and
lt save Israel from the hand of the Midianites: have not I
said unto him, Oh my Lord, wherewith shall I
r in Manasseh, and I am the
ather's house.
nto him, Surely I will be with thee, and thou
.
ave found grace in thy sight,
e a sign that thou talkest with me.
8 Depart not hence, I pray thee, until I come unto thee, and bring
, and set it before thee. And he said, I will tarry
And Gideon went in, and made ready a kid, and unleavened cakes of
: the flesh he put in a basket, and he put the broth
nto him under the oak, and presented it.

 Take the flesh and the
 and lay them upon this rock, and pour out the broth.
he angel of the LORD put forth the end of the staff that
ed the flesh and the unleavened cakes; and
consumed the flesh and the
es. Then the angel of the LORD departed out of his
erceived that he was an angel of the LORD,
se I have seen an angel of the
to face.
m, Peace be unto thee; fear not: thou
lt not die.
ltar there unto the LORD, and called it
ehovahshalom: unto this day it is yet in Ophrah of the Abiezrites.
me to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him,
lock, even the second bullock of seven
ars old, and throw down the altar of Baal that thy father hath, and
ove that is by it: 6:26 And build an altar unto the
is rock, in the ordered place, and take
he second bullock, and offer a burnt sacrifice with the wood of the
u shalt cut down.
 ten men of his servants, and did as the LORD had
ause he feared his father's
d the men of the city, that he could not do it by day,
6:28 And when the men of the city arose early in the morning, behold,
Baal was cast down, and the grove was cut down that was
ck was offered upon the altar that was
ilt.
 Who hath done this thing? And when
enquired and asked, they said, Gideon the son of Joash hath done
0 Then the men of the city said unto Joash, Bring out thy son, that
ause he hath cast down the altar of Baal, and because
at was by it.
all that stood against him, Will ye plead for
plead for him, let him be put to
ilst it is yet morning: if he be a god, let him plead for
 cast down his altar.
 that day he called him Jerubbaal, saying, Let Baal
ath thrown down his altar.
l the Midianites and the Amalekites and the children of
ther, and went over, and pitched in the
alley of Jezreel.
f the LORD came upon Gideon, and he blew a
him.
hout all Manasseh; who also was
after him: and he sent messengers unto Asher, and unto
and they came up to meet them.
 Gideon said unto God, If thou wilt save Israel by mine hand,
37 Behold, I will put a fleece of wool in the
e only, and it be dry upon all
beside, then shall I know that thou wilt save Israel by mine
d.
arly on the morrow, and thrust the
 together, and wringed the dew out of the fleece, a bowl full of
 Gideon said unto God, Let not thine anger be hot against me,
this once: let me prove, I pray thee, but this
dry only upon the fleece, and upon
e ground let there be dew.
 did so that night: for it was dry upon the fleece only,
he ground.
ideon, and all the people that were with
him, rose up early, and pitched beside the well of Harod: so that the
idianites were on the north side of them, by the hill of
:2 And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people that are with thee are
 to give the Midianites into their hands, lest Israel
saying, Mine own hand hath saved me.
3 Now therefore go to, proclaim in the ears of the people, saying,
rful and afraid, let him return and depart early from
ned of the people twenty and two
; and there remained ten thousand.
And the LORD said unto Gideon, The people are yet too many; bring
e water, and I will try them for thee there: and it
to thee, This shall go with thee, the
e shall go with thee; and of whomsoever I say unto thee, This shall
e, the same shall not go.
ught down the people unto the water: and the LORD said
lappeth of the water with his tongue, as a
lf; likewise every one that
pon his knees to drink.
ber of them that lapped, putting their hand to their
 but all the rest of the people bowed
n upon their knees to drink water.
And the LORD said unto Gideon, By the three hundred men that
, and deliver the Midianites into thine hand:
 man unto his place.
took victuals in their hand, and their trumpets: and
 every man unto his tent, and retained
ose three hundred men: and the host of Midian was beneath him in the
 And it came to pass the same night, that the LORD said unto him,
own unto the host; for I have delivered it into thine
r to go down, go thou with Phurah thy servant down
 hear what they say; and afterward
thine hands be strengthened to go down unto the host. Then went
 his servant unto the outside of the armed men that
he Midianites and the Amalekites and all the children of the
valley like grasshoppers for multitude; and
e sand by the sea side for
7:13 And when Gideon was come, behold, there was a man that told a
ellow, and said, Behold, I dreamed a dream, and, lo, a
 into the host of Midian, and came unto a
turned it, that the tent lay
14 And his fellow answered and said, This is nothing else save the
the son of Joash, a man of Israel: for into his hand
 all the host.
 Gideon heard the telling of the dream, and
shipped, and returned into the
rael, and said, Arise; for the LORD hath delivered into your
n.
d men into three companies, and he
trumpet in every man's hand, with empty pitchers, and lamps

nd do likewise: and, behold,
to the outside of the camp, it shall be that, as I do, so
 I blow with a trumpet, I and all that are with me, then blow
on every side of all the camp, and say, The sword
19 So Gideon, and the hundred men that were with him, came unto the
camp in the beginning of the middle watch; and they had
d they blew the trumpets, and brake the
itchers that were in their hands.
And the three companies blew the trumpets, and brake the
ps in their left hands, and the trumpets in
hey cried, The sword of the
Gideon.
n his place round about the camp; and
 the host ran, and cried, and fled.
2 And the three hundred blew the trumpets, and the LORD set every
st his fellow, even throughout all the host: and the
rerath, and to the border of
 unto Tabbath.
el gathered themselves together out of
phtali, and out of Asher, and out of all Manasseh, and pursued after
.
ghout all mount Ephraim, saying,
n against the Midianites, and take before them the waters unto
. Then all the men of Ephraim gathered themselves
o Bethbarah and Jordan.
ook two princes of the Midianites, Oreb and Zeeb; and
Oreb, and Zeeb they slew at the winepress
the heads of Oreb and Zeeb to
he other side Jordan.
f Ephraim said unto him, Why hast thou served us
hen thou wentest to fight with the
ites?  And they did chide with him sharply.
I done now in comparison of you?
he gleaning of the grapes of Ephraim better than the vintage
ath delivered into your hands the princes of
able to do in comparison of you?
ir anger was abated toward him, when he had said that.
dan, and passed over, he, and the three
undred men that were with him, faint, yet pursuing them.
 men of Succoth, Give, I pray you, loaves of
for they be faint, and I am
r Zebah and Zalmunna, kings of Midian.
8:6 And the princes of Succoth said, Are the hands of Zebah and
ne hand, that we should give bread unto thine army?
when the LORD hath delivered Zebah and
lmunna into mine hand, then I will tear your flesh with the thorns
s and with briers.
hence to Penuel, and spake unto them likewise: and
s the men of Succoth had answered him.
8:9 And he spake also unto the men of Penuel, saying, When I come
 will break down this tower.
ebah and Zalmunna were in Karkor, and their hosts with them,
 men, all that were left of all the hosts of the
ll an hundred and twenty thousand
t drew sword.
y the way of them that dwelt in tents on the
the host; for the host was
2 And when Zebah and Zalmunna fled, he pursued after them, and took
f Midian, Zebah and Zalmunna, and discomfited all the
son of Joash returned from battle before the sun
n of the men of Succoth, and
him: and he described unto him the princes of Succoth, and
 threescore and seventeen men.
 he came unto the men of Succoth, and said, Behold Zebah and
 did upbraid me, saying, Are the hands of Zebah
t we should give bread unto thy men
are weary?  8:16 And he took the elders of the city, and thorns
nd briers, and with them he taught the men of
 tower of Penuel, and slew the men of the
 Zalmunna, What manner of men were
hom ye slew at Tabor? And they answered, As thou art, so were
led the children of a king.
 said, They were my brethren, even the sons of my mother:
 had saved them alive, I would not slay you.
stborn, Up, and slay them. But the
drew not his sword: for he feared, because he was yet a youth.
d Zalmunna said, Rise thou, and fall upon us: for as
. And Gideon arose, and slew Zebah and
lmunna, and took away the ornaments that were on their camels'
the men of Israel said unto Gideon, Rule thou over us, both
thy son's son also: for thou hast delivered us
 Gideon said unto them, I will not rule over you, neither
u: the LORD shall rule over you.
nd Gideon said unto them, I would desire a request of you, that
ery man the earrings of his prey. (For they had
Ishmaelites.)  8:25 And they
 will willingly give them. And they spread a garment, and
n the earrings of his prey.
e weight of the golden earrings that he requested was a
shekels of gold; beside ornaments, and
llars, and purple raiment that was on the kings of Midian, and
at were about their camels' necks.
 And Gideon made an ephod thereof, and put it in his city, even in
Israel went thither a whoring after it: which thing
 to his house.
dued before the children of Israel, so that
 the country was in quietness
 in the days of Gideon.
aal the son of Joash went and dwelt in his own house.
ore and ten sons of his body begotten: for
bine that was in Shechem, she also bare him a son,

n a good old age, and was
epulchre of Joash his father, in Ophrah of the
ass, as soon as Gideon was dead, that the
 a whoring after Baalim, and
ith their god.
 Israel remembered not the LORD their God, who
of all their enemies on every
Neither shewed they kindness to the house of Jerubbaal,
o all the goodness which he had shewed unto
 Jerubbaal went to Shechem unto his
r's brethren, and communed with them, and with all the family of
other's father, saying, 9:2 Speak, I pray you, in
m, Whether is better for you, either
 all the sons of Jerubbaal, which are threescore and ten persons,
r that one reign over you? remember also that I am
 And his mother's brethren spake of him in the ears of all the men
hese words: and their hearts inclined to follow
 brother.
ore and ten pieces of silver out of the
ouse of Baalberith, wherewith Abimelech hired vain and light persons,
d him.
s house at Ophrah, and slew his
the sons of Jerubbaal, being threescore and ten persons, upon
nding yet Jotham the youngest son of Jerubbaal
 And all the men of Shechem gathered together, and all the house of
, and made Abimelech king, by the plain of the pillar
nd when they told it to Jotham, he went and stood in the top of
lifted up his voice, and cried, and said unto them,
hem, that God may hearken unto you.
 The trees went forth on a time to anoint a king over them; and
olive tree, Reign thou over us.
 the olive tree said unto them, Should I leave my fatness,
our God and man, and go to be promoted over
the fig tree, Come thou, and
s.
, Should I forsake my sweetness,
ood fruit, and go to be promoted over the trees?  9:12 Then
 vine, Come thou, and reign over us.
13 And the vine said unto them, Should I leave my wine, which
 and go to be promoted over the trees?  9:14 Then
le, Come thou, and reign over us.
And the bramble said unto the trees, If in truth ye anoint me
ome and put your trust in my shadow: and if not,
and devour the cedars of Lebanon.
Now therefore, if ye have done truly and sincerely, in that ye
king, and if ye have dealt well with Jerubbaal and
m according to the deserving of his
; 9:17 (For my father fought for you, and adventured his life
u out of the hand of Midian: 9:18 And ye are
s day, and have slain his sons,
e and ten persons, upon one stone, and have made Abimelech,
ant, king over the men of Shechem, because he
e dealt truly and sincerely with
l and with his house this day, then rejoice ye in Abimelech,
ce in you: 9:20 But if not, let fire come out
 Shechem, and the house of Millo;
 fire come out from the men of Shechem, and from the house of
melech.
led, and went to Beer, and dwelt there,
or fear of Abimelech his brother.
When Abimelech had reigned three years over Israel, 9:23 Then God
it between Abimelech and the men of Shechem; and the
usly with Abimelech: 9:24 That the
y done to the threescore and ten sons of Jerubbaal might come,
aid upon Abimelech their brother, which slew them;
ch aided him in the killing of his
en.
rs in wait for him in the top of
tains, and they robbed all that came along that way by them:
ech.
 with his brethren, and went over to
hem: and the men of Shechem put their confidence in him.
nto the fields, and gathered their vineyards,
 and went into the house of their
d did eat and drink, and cursed Abimelech.
o is Abimelech, and who is
we should serve him? is not he the son of Jerubbaal? and
he men of Hamor the father of Shechem: for
 to God this people were under
hen would I remove Abimelech. And he said to Abimelech,
me out.
f the city heard the words of Gaal the
n of Ebed, his anger was kindled.
And he sent messengers unto Abimelech privily, saying, Behold,
 and his brethren be come to Shechem; and, behold,
ee.
u and the people that is with thee,
ie in wait in the field: 9:33 And it shall be, that in the
sun is up, thou shalt rise early, and set upon
he people that is with him come
st thee, then mayest thou do to them as thou shalt find
lech rose up, and all the people that were with him, by
gainst Shechem in four companies.
And Gaal the son of Ebed went out, and stood in the entering of
y: and Abimelech rose up, and the people that were

d to Zebul, Behold, there
n from the top of the mountains. And Zebul said unto
the mountains as if they were men.
 And Gaal spake again, and said, See there come people down by the
nd, and another company come along by the plain of
l unto him, Where is now thy mouth, wherewith thou
e should serve him? is not this the
e that thou hast despised? go out, I pray now, and fight with
l went out before the men of Shechem, and fought with
ech chased him, and he fled before him, and many were
unto the entering of the gate.
 Abimelech dwelt at Arumah: and Zebul thrust out Gaal and his
hould not dwell in Shechem.
 came to pass on the morrow, that the people went out into
 Abimelech.
, and divided them into three companies,
and laid wait in the field, and looked, and, behold, the people were
 of the city; and he rose up against them, and smote
nd the company that was with him, rushed forward,
gate of the city: and the two other
nies ran upon all the people that were in the fields, and slew
imelech fought against the city all that day; and he took
ople that was therein, and beat down the
city, and sowed it with salt.
when all the men of the tower of Shechem heard that, they
he house of the god Berith.
 was told Abimelech, that all the men of the tower of
r.
nt Zalmon, he and all the people
e with him; and Abimelech took an axe in his hand, and cut
ees, and took it, and laid it on his shoulder,
ith him, What ye have seen me do,
ste, and do as I have done.
l the people likewise cut down every man his bough, and
 them to the hold, and set the hold on fire
ower of Shechem died also,
nd men and women.
ech to Thebez, and encamped against Thebez, and
rong tower within the city, and thither fled
 the city, and shut it to them,
hem up to the top of the tower.
d Abimelech came unto the tower, and fought against it, and
 of the tower to burn it with fire.
3 And a certain woman cast a piece of a millstone upon Abimelech's
 brake his skull.
astily unto the young man his armourbearer, and
slay me, that men say not of me, A
slew him. And his young man thrust him through, and he died.
n of Israel saw that Abimelech was dead, they

Abimelech, which he did unto
in slaying his seventy brethren: 9:57 And all the evil of
d render upon their heads: and upon them came
aal.
se to defend Israel Tola the son of
 the son of Dodo, a man of Issachar; and he dwelt in Shamir in
:2 And he judged Israel twenty and three years, and died, and was

dite, and judged Israel twenty
ars.
ode on thirty ass colts, and they
rty cities, which are called Havothjair unto this day, which
ead.
 in Camon.
ael did evil again in the sight of the
RD, and served Baalim, and Ashtaroth, and the gods of Syria, and the
 and the gods of Moab, and the gods of the children of
hilistines, and forsook the LORD, and
ved not him.
LORD was hot against Israel, and he sold
them into the hands of the Philistines, and into the hands of the
.
ressed the children of Israel:
ears, all the children of Israel that were on the other side
the Amorites, which is in Gilead.
Moreover the children of Ammon passed over Jordan to fight also
against Benjamin, and against the house of Ephraim;
sed.
ried unto the LORD, saying, We have
d against thee, both because we have forsaken our God, and also
0:11 And the LORD said unto the children of Israel, Did not I deliver
Egyptians, and from the Amorites, from the children of
nes?  10:12 The Zidonians also, and the
malekites, and the Maonites, did oppress you; and ye cried to me, and
ou out of their hand.
 forsaken me, and served other gods: wherefore I will
 Go and cry unto the gods which ye have chosen; let them deliver
 your tribulation.
en of Israel said unto the LORD, We have sinned:
 good unto thee; deliver us only, we
 thee, this day.
y the strange gods from among them, and served
or the misery of Israel.
 children of Ammon were gathered together, and encamped
 of Israel assembled themselves together,
people and princes of Gilead said one to another, What
 fight against the children of Ammon? he
shall be head over all the inhabitants of Gilead.
 was a mighty man of valour, and he was
he son of an harlot: and Gilead begat Jephthah.
ons; and his wife's sons grew up, and
y thrust out Jephthah, and said unto him, Thou shalt not inherit in
use; for thou art the son of a strange woman.
ethren, and dwelt in the land of
 there were gathered vain men to Jephthah, and went out with
me to pass in process of time, that the children of

ren of Ammon made war against
 elders of Gilead went to fetch Jephthah out of the land of
 unto Jephthah, Come, and be our captain, that
mon.
ders of Gilead, Did not ye hate me,
xpel me out of my father's house? and why are ye come unto me now
stress?  11:8 And the elders of Gilead said unto
to thee now, that thou mayest go
 and fight against the children of Ammon, and be our head over
of Gilead.
the elders of Gilead, If ye bring me home
mon, and the LORD deliver
 shall I be your head?  11:10 And the elders of Gilead
 be witness between us, if we do not so
ccording to thy words.
hah went with the elders of Gilead, and the people
hem: and Jephthah uttered all his
efore the LORD in Mizpeh.
hthah sent messengers unto the king of the children of
u to do with me, that thou art come
st me to fight in my land?  11:13 And the king of the children of
to the messengers of Jephthah, Because Israel took
out of Egypt, from Arnon even unto
, and unto Jordan: now therefore restore those lands again
Jephthah sent messengers again unto the king of the children
id unto him, Thus saith Jephthah, Israel took
nd of the children of Ammon:
en Israel came up from Egypt, and walked through the
nd came to Kadesh; 11:17 Then Israel
 messengers unto the king of Edom, saying, Let me, I pray thee,
nd: but the king of Edom would not hearken thereto.
to the king of Moab: but he would not
sent: and Israel abode in Kadesh.
 Then they went along through the wilderness, and compassed the
he land of Moab, and came by the east side of the
other side of Arnon, but came not
the border of Moab: for Arnon was the border of Moab.
ngers unto Sihon king of the Amorites, the
m, Let us pass, we pray thee,
 land into my place.
usted not Israel to pass through his coast: but
her, and pitched in Jahaz, and
inst Israel.
Israel delivered Sihon and all his people
hem: so Israel possessed all
the Amorites, the inhabitants of that country.
oasts of the Amorites, from Arnon
to Jabbok, and from the wilderness even unto Jordan.
 Israel hath dispossessed the Amorites
om before his people Israel, and shouldest thou possess it?  11:24
ssess that which Chemosh thy god giveth thee to
 God shall drive out from before
 will we possess.
u any thing better than Balak the son of Zippor,
gainst Israel, or did he ever fight
st them, 11:26 While Israel dwelt in Heshbon and her towns, and
wns, and in all the cities that be along by the
s? why therefore did ye not recover
within that time?  11:27 Wherefore I have not sinned against
e wrong to war against me: the LORD the Judge be
n of Israel and the children of

 Ammon hearkened not unto the
phthah which he sent him.
e Spirit of the LORD came upon Jephthah, and he passed
nd passed over Mizpeh of Gilead, and from
children of Ammon.
owed a vow unto the LORD, and said, If thou shalt
 of Ammon into mine hands, 11:31 Then
shall be, that whatsoever cometh forth of the doors of my house to
return in peace from the children of Ammon, shall
offer it up for a burnt offering.
 So Jephthah passed over unto the children of Ammon to fight
LORD delivered them into his hands.
33 And he smote them from Aroer, even till thou come to Minnith,
, and unto the plain of the vineyards, with a very
en of Ammon were subdued before the
ren of Israel.
to Mizpeh unto his house, and, behold, his
els and with dances: and she
 child; beside her he had neither son nor daughter.
en he saw her, that he rent his clothes,
and said, Alas, my daughter! thou hast brought me very low, and thou
m that trouble me: for I have opened my mouth unto the

 if thou hast opened thy mouth
ORD, do to me according to that which hath proceeded out of
 the LORD hath taken vengeance for thee of
mmon.
r, Let this thing be done for me: let
alone two months, that I may go up and down upon the mountains, and
nity, I and my fellows.
id, Go. And he sent her away for two months: and she
bewailed her virginity upon the
.
of two months, that she returned
 father, who did with her according to his vow which he had
man. And it was a custom in Israel, 11:40 That
to lament the daughter of Jephthah
leadite four days in a year.
he men of Ephraim gathered themselves together, and went
ephthah, Wherefore passedst thou over to
fight against the children of Ammon, and didst not call us to go with
 burn thine house upon thee with fire.
12:2 And Jephthah said unto them, I and my people were at great strife
ldren of Ammon; and when I called you, ye delivered me not
2:3 And when I saw that ye delivered me not, I put my life in my
over against the children of Ammon, and the LORD
fore then are ye come up unto me
, to fight against me?  12:4 Then Jephthah gathered together
 and fought with Ephraim: and the men of Gilead
e Gileadites are fugitives of
ng the Ephraimites, and among the Manassites.
ssages of Jordan before the
and it was so, that when those Ephraimites which were
 that the men of Gilead said unto him,
t thou an Ephraimite? If he said, Nay; 12:6 Then said they unto him,
leth: and he said Sibboleth: for he could not frame to
y took him, and slew him at the passages
of Jordan: and there fell at that time of the Ephraimites forty and

s. Then died Jephthah the
was buried in one of the cities of Gilead.
judged Israel.
ons, and thirty daughters, whom he sent
broad, and took in thirty daughters from abroad for his sons. And he
seven years.
 was buried at Bethlehem.
er him Elon, a Zebulonite, judged Israel; and he judged
And Elon the Zebulonite died, and was buried in Aijalon in the

llel, a Pirathonite, judged
:14 And he had forty sons and thirty nephews, that rode on
olts: and he judged Israel eight years.

athonite died, and was buried
 in the land of Ephraim, in the mount of the Amalekites.
 Israel did evil again in the sight of the
he hand of the Philistines

h, of the family of the
me was Manoah; and his wife was barren, and bare not.
ORD appeared unto the woman, and said unto
arest not: but thou shalt
ear a son.
 pray thee, and drink not wine nor strong
5 For, lo, thou shalt
a son; and no razor shall come on his head: for the
God from the womb: and he shall begin
deliver Israel out of the hand of the Philistines.
old her husband, saying, A man of God
e unto me, and his countenance was like the countenance of an angel
rrible: but I asked him not whence he was, neither told
 said unto me, Behold, thou shalt conceive,
or strong drink, neither eat
thing: for the child shall be a Nazarite to God from the
th.
, and said, O my Lord, let the man
 which thou didst send come again unto us, and teach us what we
hild that shall be born.
earkened to the voice of Manoah; and the angel of God
she sat in the field: but Manoah her
and was not with her.
an made haste, and ran, and shewed her husband, and
hath appeared unto me, that came unto
the other day.
and went after his wife, and came to the man,
hat spakest unto the woman? And
I am.
y words come to pass. How shall we
the child, and how shall we do unto him?  13:13 And the angel of
 Manoah, Of all that I said unto the woman let her
 of any thing that cometh of the vine, neither
nor eat any unclean thing: all
manded her let her observe.
anoah said unto the angel of the LORD, I pray thee, let us
all have made ready a kid for thee.
16 And the angel of the LORD said unto Manoah, Though thou detain
t of thy bread: and if thou wilt offer a burnt
e LORD. For Manoah knew not that
n angel of the LORD.
aid unto the angel of the LORD, What is thy name,
s we may do thee honour?  13:18 And
ngel of the LORD said unto him, Why askest thou thus after my
cret?  13:19 So Manoah took a kid with a meat
unto the LORD: and the angel did
sly; and Manoah and his wife looked on.

 went up toward heaven from
, that the angel of the LORD ascended in the flame of the
 wife looked on it, and fell on their faces
f the LORD did no more appear to Manoah and to
as an angel of the LORD.
ah said unto his wife, We shall surely die, because we
his wife said unto him, If the LORD were pleased to kill us,
ived a burnt offering and a meat offering at our
d us all these things, nor would as
is time have told us such things as these.
lled his name Samson: and the
 and the LORD blessed him.
e Spirit of the LORD began to move him at times in the
d Eshtaol.
 Timnath, and saw a woman in Timnath of
he daughters of the Philistines.
nd he came up, and told his father and his mother, and said, I
 Timnath of the daughters of the Philistines: now

id unto him, Is there never a
 the daughters of thy brethren, or among all my people,
ife of the uncircumcised Philistines? And
me; for she pleaseth me well.
his father and his mother knew not that it was of the LORD,
ion against the Philistines: for at that time
ael.
s father and his mother, to Timnath,
came to the vineyards of Timnath: and, behold, a young lion roared
14:6 And the Spirit of the LORD came mightily upon him, and he rent
 have rent a kid, and he had nothing in his hand: but
 mother what he had done.
ent down, and talked with the woman; and she pleased
 a time he returned to take her, and he turned aside to
: and, behold, there was a swarm of bees
and honey in the carcase of the lion.
4:9 And he took thereof in his hands, and went on eating, and came to
d mother, and he gave them, and they did eat: but he told
n the honey out of the carcase of the lion.
e woman: and Samson made there a
or so used the young men to do.
nd it came to pass, when they saw him, that they brought thirty
th him.
, I will now put forth a riddle unto
 if ye can certainly declare it me within the seven days of the
out, then I will give you thirty sheets and thirty
 ye cannot declare it me, then shall
ive me thirty sheets and thirty change of garments. And they said
th thy riddle, that we may hear it.
14 And he said unto them, Out of the eater came forth meat, and out
ame forth sweetness. And they could not in three days
And it came to pass on the seventh day, that they said unto
hy husband, that he may declare unto us the
r's house with fire: have ye
 take that we have? is it not so?  14:16 And Samson's wife
d, Thou dost but hate me, and lovest me not:
children of my people, and hast
it me. And he said unto her, Behold, I have not told it my
d shall I tell it thee?  14:17 And she wept
feast lasted: and it came to
seventh day, that he told her, because she lay sore upon
le to the children of her people.
 And the men of the city said unto him on the seventh day before
 What is sweeter than honey? And what is stronger
em, If ye had not plowed with my
ye had not found out my riddle.
nd the Spirit of the LORD came upon him, and he went down to
rty men of them, and took their spoil, and gave
expounded the riddle. And his anger
indled, and he went up to his father's house.
o his companion, whom he had used
friend.
 a while after, in the time of wheat
est, that Samson visited his wife with a kid; and he said, I will
into the chamber. But her father would not suffer him
her said, I verily thought that thou hadst utterly
to thy companion: is not her younger
er fairer than she? take her, I pray thee, instead of her.
oncerning them, Now shall I be more blameless
m a displeasure.
nd caught three hundred foxes, and took
irebrands, and turned tail to tail, and put a firebrand in the midst
ils.
s on fire, he let them go into the
ng corn of the Philistines, and burnt up both the shocks, and
n, with the vineyards and olives.
Then the Philistines said, Who hath done this? And they answered,
n law of the Timnite, because he had taken his wife,
. And the Philistines came up, and burnt
her and her father with fire.
Samson said unto them, Though ye have done this, yet will I
after that I will cease.
ote them hip and thigh with a great slaughter: and he
p of the rock Etam.
stines went up, and pitched in Judah, and spread
he men of Judah said, Why are ye come up against us? And
son are we come up, to do to him as he hath
d men of Judah went to the top of the rock
ot that the Philistines are
s? what is this that thou hast done unto us? And he said
o me, so have I done unto them.
nd they said unto him, We are come down to bind thee, that we
 the hand of the Philistines. And Samson said
l not fall upon me yourselves.
d they spake unto him, saying, No; but we will bind thee fast,
o their hand: but surely we will not kill thee.
ds, and brought him up from the
15:14 And when he came unto Lehi, the Philistines shouted against him:
it of the LORD came mightily upon him, and the cords that
 as flax that was burnt with fire, and his
5 And he found a new jawbone of an ass, and put forth his hand,
ew a thousand men therewith.
Samson said, With the jawbone of an ass, heaps upon heaps,
ave I slain a thousand men.
t came to pass, when he had made an end of speaking, that
out of his hand, and called that place
mathlehi.
, and called on the LORD, and said, Thou
hast given this great deliverance into the hand of thy servant: and
 for thirst, and fall into the hand of the
ollow place that was in the
e came water thereout; and when he had drunk, his spirit
: wherefore he called the name thereof
hakkore, which is in Lehi unto this day.

f the Philistines twenty
hen went Samson to Gaza, and saw there an harlot, and went in
 it was told the Gazites, saying, Samson is come hither. And
 and laid wait for him all night in the gate of
ght, saying, In the morning, when
ay, we shall kill him.
lay till midnight, and arose at midnight, and took the
y, and the two posts, and went away with
them, bar and all, and put them upon his shoulders, and carried them
of an hill that is before Hebron.
And it came to pass afterward, that he loved a woman in the
name was Delilah.
 the Philistines came up unto her, and said unto
is great strength lieth, and by what
s we may prevail against him, that we may bind him to afflict him;
 thee every one of us eleven hundred pieces of silver.
amson, Tell me, I pray thee, wherein thy
great strength lieth, and wherewith thou mightest be bound to afflict
 And Samson said unto her, If they bind me with seven green withs
ried, then shall I be weak, and be as another man.
listines brought up to her seven green
ths which had not been dried, and she bound him with them.
n lying in wait, abiding with her in the
chamber.
listines be upon thee, Samson. And he
ke the withs, as a thread of tow is broken when it toucheth the
th was not known.
d unto Samson, Behold, thou hast mocked me, and
hee, wherewith thou mightest be

me fast with new ropes that
cupied, then shall I be weak, and be as another man.
 new ropes, and bound him therewith, and
said unto him, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And there were
biding in the chamber. And he brake them from off his
And Delilah said unto Samson, Hitherto thou hast mocked me, and
me wherewith thou mightest be bound. And he said
n locks of my head with the web.
And she fastened it with the pin, and said unto him, The
Samson. And he awaked out of his sleep, and
 with the web.
him, How canst thou say, I love thee, when
cked me these three times, and
old me wherein thy great strength lieth.

sed him daily with her words,
im, so that his soul was vexed unto death; 16:17 That he
d said unto her, There hath not come a razor
rite unto God from my mother's
 be shaven, then my strength will go from me, and I shall
any other man.
aw that he had told her all his heart, she
listines, saying, Come up this
he hath shewed me all his heart. Then the lords of the
, and brought money in their hand.
9 And she made him sleep upon her knees; and she called for a man,
im to shave off the seven locks of his head; and she
strength went from him.
aid, The Philistines be upon thee, Samson. And he awoke
 I will go out as at other times before,
and shake myself. And he wist not that the LORD was departed from him.
the Philistines took him, and put out his eyes, and brought
ound him with fetters of brass; and he did
eit the hair of his head began to grow again after he was
 lords of the Philistines gathered them together for to
o Dagon their god, and to rejoice: for they
 enemy into our hand.
e people saw him, they praised their god: for they
o our hands our enemy, and the
of our country, which slew many of us.
16:25 And it came to pass, when their hearts were merry, that they
amson, that he may make us sport. And they called for
e; and he made them sport: and they set
im between the pillars.
n said unto the lad that held him by the hand, Suffer
s whereupon the house standeth, that I
y lean upon them.
as full of men and women; and all the lords of
e were upon the roof about three
 men and women, that beheld while Samson made sport.
 the LORD, and said, O Lord God, remember
y thee, only this once, O
 be at once avenged of the Philistines for my two eyes.
d of the two middle pillars upon which the
p, of the one with his right
 the other with his left.
son said, Let me die with the Philistines. And he bowed
 and the house fell upon the lords, and
pon all the people that were therein. So the dead which he slew at
ore than they which he slew in his life.

e of his father came down, and
and brought him up, and buried him between Zorah and Eshtaol
 Manoah his father. And he judged Israel twenty
of mount Ephraim, whose name was Micah.

ven hundred shekels of silver
aken from thee, about which thou cursedst, and spakest of
, the silver is with me; I took it. And his
D, my son.
d the eleven hundred shekels of silver to
 dedicated the silver unto
my hand for my son, to make a graven image and a molten
 restore it unto thee.
ored the money unto his mother; and his mother took
and gave them to the founder, who made
ereof a graven image and a molten image: and they were in the house
:5 And the man Micah had an house of gods, and made an ephod, and
secrated one of his sons, who became his priest.
king in Israel, but every man did that
ich was right in his own eyes.
 there was a young man out of Bethlehemjudah of the family of
te, and he sojourned there.
e man departed out of the city from Bethlehemjudah to
 place: and he came to mount Ephraim to
he house of Micah, as he journeyed.
9 And Micah said unto him, Whence comest thou? And he said unto
of Bethlehemjudah, and I go to sojourn where I may
 said unto him, Dwell with me, and be unto me a father
e thee ten shekels of silver by the year,
So the Levite went in.
vite was content to dwell with the man; and the young
s sons.
 Levite; and the young man became his
est, and was in the house of Micah.
13 Then said Micah, Now know I that the LORD will do me good,
e to my priest.
e was no king in Israel: and in those days the
inheritance to dwell in; for unto
y all their inheritance had not fallen unto them among the
2 And the children of Dan sent of their family five men from their
alour, from Zorah, and from Eshtaol, to spy out the
y said unto them, Go, search the land:
o when they came to mount Ephraim, to the house of Micah, they
3 When they were by the house of Micah, they knew the voice of the
vite: and they turned in thither, and said unto him,
hat makest thou in this place? and what
ast thou here?  18:4 And he said unto them, Thus and thus dealeth
d hath hired me, and I am his priest.
8:5 And they said unto him, Ask counsel, we pray thee, of God, that
ther our way which we go shall be prosperous.
 Go in peace: before the LORD is
 wherein ye go.
departed, and came to Laish, and saw the people
areless, after the manner of the
s, quiet and secure; and there was no magistrate in the land,
o shame in any thing; and they were far from the
h any man.
r brethren to Zorah and Eshtaol: and their
8:9 And they said, Arise, that
up against them: for we have seen the land, and, behold, it
e still? be not slothful to go, and to enter to
go, ye shall come unto a people secure, and to a large
into your hands; a place where there is no

 family of the Danites, out of
out of Eshtaol, six hundred men appointed with weapons of
nt up, and pitched in Kirjathjearim, in Judah:
anehdan unto this day: behold, it
nd Kirjathjearim.
 thence unto mount Ephraim, and came unto the
d the five men that went to spy out the country of
ren, Do ye know that there is in these
uses an ephod, and teraphim, and a graven image, and a molten image?
consider what ye have to do.
they turned thitherward, and came to the house of the young
to the house of Micah, and saluted him.

ith their weapons of war,
he children of Dan, stood by the entering of the gate.
t went to spy out the land went up, and came
 and the ephod, and the
 molten image: and the priest stood in the entering
d men that were appointed with weapons
 war.
 house, and fetched the carved image,
 ephod, and the teraphim, and the molten image. Then said the
t do ye?  18:19 And they said unto him, Hold thy
th, and go with us, and be to us a
 and a priest: is it better for thee to be a priest unto the
hat thou be a priest unto a tribe and a family
eart was glad, and he took the
 the teraphim, and the graven image, and went in the midst
So they turned and departed, and put the little ones and the
e before them.
 a good way from the house of Micah, the men
s house were gathered together,
ook the children of Dan.
 cried unto the children of Dan. And they turned their
What aileth thee, that thou comest with
uch a company?  18:24 And he said, Ye have taken away my gods which I
 priest, and ye are gone away: and what have I more? and
nto me, What aileth thee?  18:25 And the
children of Dan said unto him, Let not thy voice be heard among us,
ows run upon thee, and thou lose thy life, with the
6 And the children of Dan went their way: and when Micah saw that
ong for him, he turned and went back unto his house.
gs which Micah had made, and the priest
hich he had, and came unto Laish, unto a people that were at quiet
they smote them with the edge of the sword, and burnt
And there was no deliverer, because it was far from Zidon, and
 with any man; and it was in the valley that lieth
ity, and dwelt therein.
called the name of the city Dan, after the name of Dan
nto Israel: howbeit the name of the city
was Laish at the first.
hildren of Dan set up the graven image: and Jonathan,
f Manasseh, he and his sons were priests
to the tribe of Dan until the day of the captivity of the land.
t them up Micah's graven image, which he made, all
as in Shiloh.
in those days, when there was no king in
Israel, that there was a certain Levite sojourning on the side of
o took to him a concubine out of Bethlehemjudah.
e whore against him, and went away
im unto her father's house to Bethlehemjudah, and was there four
9:3 And her husband arose, and went after her, to speak friendly unto
ring her again, having his servant with him, and a couple
 him into her father's house: and when the
d to meet him.
aw, the damsel's father, retained him; and he
d eat and drink, and lodged
5 And it came to pass on the fourth day, when they arose early in
 he rose up to depart: and the damsel's father said
ine heart with a morsel of bread, and
erward go your way.
own, and did eat and drink both of them together:
unto the man, Be content, I pray
d tarry all night, and let thine heart be merry.
 depart, his father in law urged him:
refore he lodged there again.
he arose early in the morning on the fifth day to depart; and
aid, Comfort thine heart, I pray thee. And they
id eat both of them.
man rose up to depart, he, and his concubine, and
he damsel's father, said unto him,
, now the day draweth toward evening, I pray you tarry all
roweth to an end, lodge here, that thine heart
early on your way, that thou
me.
hat night, but he rose up and
nd came over against Jebus, which is Jerusalem; and there
addled, his concubine also was with him.

ay was far spent; and the
to his master, Come, I pray thee, and let us turn in
s, and lodge in it.
r said unto him, We will not turn aside hither into
 not of the children of Israel; we will
ass over to Gibeah.
nto his servant, Come, and let us draw near to one
ht, in Gibeah, or in Ramah.
hey passed on and went their way; and the sun went down
 Gibeah, which belongeth to Benjamin.
9:15 And they turned aside thither, to go in and to lodge in Gibeah:
nt in, he sat him down in a street of the city: for
 into his house to lodging.
behold, there came an old man from his work out of the
o of mount Ephraim; and he sojourned in
ibeah: but the men of the place were Benjamites.
his eyes, he saw a wayfaring man in
treet of the city: and the old man said, Whither goest thou? and
?  19:18 And he said unto him, We are passing from
f mount Ephraim; from thence am I: and
went to Bethlehemjudah, but I am now going to the house of the LORD;
o man that receiveth me to house.
 Yet there is both straw and provender for our asses; and there
lso for me, and for thy handmaid, and for the young
 there is no want of any thing.
nd the old man said, Peace be with thee; howsoever let all thy
nly lodge not in the street.
e brought him into his house, and gave provender unto the
eir feet, and did eat and drink.
Now as they were making their hearts merry, behold, the men of
ns of Belial, beset the house round about, and
aster of the house, the old man,
Bring forth the man that came into thine house, that we may
the man, the master of the house, went out unto them, and
rethren, nay, I pray you, do not so wickedly;
e house, do not this folly.
d, here is my daughter a maiden, and his concubine; them I
humble ye them, and do with them what seemeth
ot so vile a thing.
ould not hearken to him: so the man took his
them; and they knew her, and
ll the night until the morning: and when the day began to

g of the day, and fell down at
f the man's house where her lord was, till it was light.
up in the morning, and opened the doors of the
nd, behold, the woman his
allen down at the door of the house, and her hands were
8 And he said unto her, Up, and let us be going. But none
 took her up upon an ass, and the man rose up, and gat him
 And when he was come into his house, he took a knife, and laid
ne, and divided her, together with her bones, into
 all the coasts of Israel.
 was so, that all that saw it said, There was no such deed
ay that the children of Israel came up out of
ider of it, take advice, and
inds.
ael went out, and the congregation
thered together as one man, from Dan even to Beersheba, with the
to the LORD in Mizpeh.
ef of all the people, even of all the tribes of
 assembly of the people of God,
red thousand footmen that drew sword.
0:3 (Now the children of Benjamin heard that the children of Israel
 Mizpeh.) Then said the children of Israel, Tell us,
 And the Levite, the husband of the
 that was slain, answered and said, I came into Gibeah that
I and my concubine, to lodge.
the men of Gibeah rose against me, and beset the house round
, and thought to have slain me: and my concubine
.
 her in pieces, and sent her
ll the country of the inheritance of Israel: for they have
olly in Israel.
 children of Israel; give here your advice and
arose as one man, saying, We will not any of
 of us turn into his house.
w this shall be the thing which we will do to Gibeah; we
it; 20:10 And we will take ten men of an
hundred throughout all the tribes of Israel, and an hundred of a
ousand out of ten thousand, to fetch victual for the
 they come to Gibeah of Benjamin,
ng to all the folly that they have wrought in Israel.
ael were gathered against the city, knit
together as one man.
es of Israel sent men through all the tribe of
 this that is done among you?
herefore deliver us the men, the children of Belial, which
ay put them to death, and put away evil from
ould not hearken to the voice of
ethren the children of Israel.
t the children of Benjamin gathered themselves together out of
ah, to go out to battle against the children of
f Benjamin were numbered at that time out of
 that drew sword, beside the
of Gibeah, which were numbered seven hundred chosen men.
ple there were seven hundred chosen men
efthanded; every one could sling stones at an hair breadth, and not
And the men of Israel, beside Benjamin, were numbered four
t drew sword: all these were men of war.

and went up to the house of
d counsel of God, and said, Which of us shall go up first
 children of Benjamin? And the LORD said,
 children of Israel rose up in the morning, and encamped
nd the men of Israel went out to battle against Benjamin; and
 themselves in array to fight against them at
Benjamin came forth out of Gibeah, and
stroyed down to the ground of the Israelites that day twenty and two

encouraged themselves, and set
le again in array in the place where they put themselves in

 and wept before the LORD
 asked counsel of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up again
ren of Benjamin my brother? And the LORD
said, Go up against him.)  20:24 And the children of Israel came near
hildren of Benjamin the second day.
25 And Benjamin went forth against them out of Gibeah the second
 down to the ground of the children of Israel again
e drew the sword.
ildren of Israel, and all the people, went up,
wept, and sat there before the
fasted that day until even, and offered burnt offerings and
the LORD.
ael enquired of the LORD, (for the ark of
ys, 20:28 And Phinehas, the
r, the son of Aaron, stood before it in those days,)
ut to battle against the children of
amin my brother, or shall I cease? And the LORD said, Go up; for
eliver them into thine hand.
Israel set liers in wait round about Gibeah.
t up against the children of
the third day, and put themselves in array against Gibeah,
:31 And the children of Benjamin went out against the people, and
rom the city; and they began to smite of the people,
n the highways, of which one goeth up to
the house of God, and the other to Gibeah in the field, about thirty

d, They are smitten down before
 the first. But the children of Israel said, Let us flee, and
ty unto the highways.
 men of Israel rose up out of their place, and put
: and the liers in wait of Israel came
rth out of their places, even out of the meadows of Gibeah.
against Gibeah ten thousand chosen men out of all
but they knew not that evil was near
.
ore Israel: and the children of
stroyed of the Benjamites that day twenty and five thousand
 these drew the sword.
ldren of Benjamin saw that they were smitten: for the
he Benjamites, because they trusted unto
the liers in wait which they had set beside Gibeah.
asted, and rushed upon Gibeah; and the
ers in wait drew themselves along, and smote all the city with the
d.
n between the men of Israel and
 in wait, that they should make a great flame with smoke rise

 in the battle, Benjamin began
nd kill of the men of Israel about thirty persons: for they
mitten down before us, as in the first battle.
arise up out of the city with a
 smoke, the Benjamites looked behind them, and, behold, the
ded up to heaven.
n of Israel turned again, the men of Benjamin
as come upon them.
 turned their backs before the men of Israel unto
e battle overtook them; and them
me out of the cities they destroyed in the midst of them.
d the Benjamites round about, and chased them,
gainst Gibeah toward the
:44 And there fell of Benjamin eighteen thousand men; all these were

the wilderness unto the rock of
nd they gleaned of them in the highways five thousand men;
hem unto Gidom, and slew two thousand men of
that day of Benjamin were twenty and five
se were men of valour.
ndred men turned and fled to the wilderness unto the
rock Rimmon four months.
men of Israel turned again upon the children of
dge of the sword, as well the men
y city, as the beast, and all that came to hand: also they set
es that they came to.
of Israel had sworn in Mizpeh, saying, There shall
unto Benjamin to wife.
ple came to the house of God, and abode there till
heir voices, and wept sore; 21:3 And
, O LORD God of Israel, why is this come to pass in Israel, that
 day one tribe lacking in Israel?  21:4 And it came
 people rose early, and built there an
tar, and offered burnt offerings and peace offerings.
rael said, Who is there among all the
bes of Israel that came not up with the congregation unto the LORD?
de a great oath concerning him that came not up to the
hall surely be put to death.
he children of Israel repented them for Benjamin their
one tribe cut off from Israel this day.

hat remain, seeing we have
ORD that we will not give them of our daughters to
 one is there of the tribes of Israel
t came not up to Mizpeh to the LORD? And, behold, there came none
Jabeshgilead to the assembly.
the people were numbered, and, behold, there were none of the
gilead there.
n sent thither twelve thousand men of the
o and smite the inhabitants
ad with the edge of the sword, with the women and the
s the thing that ye shall do, Ye shall utterly destroy
that hath lain by man.
ound among the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead four
wn no man by lying with any male:
y brought them unto the camp to Shiloh, which is in the land of
d the whole congregation sent some to speak to the children of
n the rock Rimmon, and to call peaceably unto
n at that time; and they gave them wives
which they had saved alive of the women of Jabeshgilead: and yet so
hem not.
them for Benjamin, because that the LORD
had made a breach in the tribes of Israel.
ion said, How shall we do for
hem that remain, seeing the women are destroyed out of
id, There must be an inheritance for them
 be not destroyed out of
 Howbeit we may not give them wives of our daughters: for the
ve sworn, saying, Cursed be he that giveth a wife
aid, Behold, there is a feast of the LORD in Shiloh
he north side of Bethel, on the east
 of the highway that goeth up from Bethel to Shechem, and on the

dren of Benjamin, saying, Go
ait in the vineyards; 21:21 And see, and, behold, if the
ut to dance in dances, then come ye out of
is wife of the daughters of
o to the land of Benjamin.
 shall be, when their fathers or their brethren come unto
ill say unto them, Be favourable unto them
o each man his wife in the
d not give unto them at this time, that ye should be
ren of Benjamin did so, and took them wives,
t danced, whom they caught: and
 and returned unto their inheritance, and repaired the

d thence at that time, every
ribe and to his family, and they went out from thence

in Israel: every man did that
ight in his own eyes.
 Ruth
days when the judges ruled, that there
s a famine in the land. And a certain man of Bethlehemjudah went to
country of Moab, he, and his wife, and his two sons.
was Elimelech, and the name of his wife
aomi, and the name of his two sons Mahlon and Chilion, Ephrathites of
h. And they came into the country of Moab, and continued
h Naomi's husband died; and she was left, and her two
em wives of the women of Moab; the name of the one
ther Ruth: and they dwelled there
en years.
ed also both of them; and the woman was
eft of her two sons and her husband.
6 Then she arose with her daughters in law, that she might return
of Moab: for she had heard in the country of Moab how
 people in giving them bread.
fore she went forth out of the place where she was, and her
th her; and they went on the way to return unto
 said unto her two daughters in law, Go, return each to
D deal kindly with you, as ye have dealt
with the dead, and with me.
D grant you that ye may find rest, each of you in the house
e kissed them; and they lifted up their voice,
 her, Surely we will return with thee unto thy
 again, my daughters: why will ye go with me?
b, that they may be your
Turn again, my daughters, go your way; for I am too
ould say, I have hope, if I should have
n husband also to night, and should also bear sons; 1:13 Would ye
ll they were grown? would ye stay for them from
 for it grieveth me much for your
hat the hand of the LORD is gone out against me.
ice, and wept again: and Orpah kissed
 mother in law; but Ruth clave unto her.

 law is gone back unto her
to her gods: return thou after thy sister in law.
not to leave thee, or to return from
owing after thee: for whither thou goest, I will go; and where
 lodge: thy people shall be my people, and thy God
ill I die, and there will I be buried:
e LORD do so to me, and more also, if ought but death part thee and
n she saw that she was stedfastly minded to go with her, then
o her.
 came to Bethlehem. And it came to
when they were come to Bethlehem, that all the city was moved
said, Is this Naomi?  1:20 And she said unto
 for the Almighty hath dealt
y with me.
 LORD hath brought me home again empty:
hy then call ye me Naomi, seeing the LORD hath testified against me,
ty hath afflicted me?  1:22 So Naomi returned, and Ruth
 in law, with her, which returned out of
the country of Moab: and they came to Bethlehem in the beginning of

band's, a mighty man of wealth,
mily of Elimelech; and his name was Boaz.
omi, Let me now go to the
n ears of corn after him in whose sight I shall find
r, Go, my daughter.
nd came, and gleaned in the field after the
part of the field belonging
o was of the kindred of Elimelech.
And, behold, Boaz came from Bethlehem, and said unto the reapers,
you. And they answered him, The LORD bless thee.
ant that was set over the reapers,
damsel is this?  2:6 And the servant that was set over the
d, It is the Moabitish damsel that came back
 2:7 And she said, I pray you,
an and gather after the reapers among the sheaves: so she
even from the morning until now, that she
n said Boaz unto Ruth, Hearest thou not, my daughter? Go not to
eld, neither go from hence, but abide here fast by
e on the field that they do reap, and
thou after them: have I not charged the young men that they shall
nd when thou art athirst, go unto the vessels, and
n have drawn.
 face, and bowed herself to the ground, and
n thine eyes, that thou
owledge of me, seeing I am a stranger?  2:11 And Boaz
t hath fully been shewed me, all that
u hast done unto thy mother in law since the death of thine
ast left thy father and thy mother, and the
 a people which thou knewest
re.
and a full reward be given thee of
RD God of Israel, under whose wings thou art come to trust.
et me find favour in thy sight, my lord; for that
hat thou hast spoken friendly unto
handmaid, though I be not like unto one of thine handmaidens.
unto her, At mealtime come thou hither, and eat of
 the vinegar. And she sat beside the
ers: and he reached her parched corn, and she did eat, and was

, Boaz commanded his young men,
et her glean even among the sheaves, and reproach her not:
ome of the handfuls of purpose for her, and
d rebuke her not.
n the field until even, and beat out that she had
h of barley.
nd went into the city: and her mother in law
ght forth, and gave to her that
eserved after she was sufficed.
d her mother in law said unto her, Where hast thou gleaned to
htest thou? blessed be he that did take knowledge
r in law with whom she had wrought,
aid, The man's name with whom I wrought to day is Boaz.
her daughter in law, Blessed be he of the
to the living and to the
said unto her, The man is near of kin unto us, one of
 Ruth the Moabitess said, He said unto me also, Thou shalt
n, until they have ended all my harvest.

er in law, It is good, my
thou go out with his maidens, that they meet thee not
o she kept fast by the maidens of Boaz to glean unto the end of
of wheat harvest; and dwelt with her mother in law.
law said unto her, My daughter, shall I
ot seek rest for thee, that it may be well with thee?  3:2 And now is
ur kindred, with whose maidens thou wast?  Behold, he
the threshingfloor.
erefore, and anoint thee, and put thy raiment upon
loor: but make not thyself known unto
 man, until he shall have done eating and drinking.
lieth down, that thou shalt mark the
e where he shall lie, and thou shalt go in, and uncover his feet,
; and he will tell thee what thou shalt do.
hou sayest unto me I will do.
he went down unto the floor, and did according to all that
er.
nk, and his heart was merry, he
ie down at the end of the heap of corn: and she came softly,
, and laid her down.
 pass at midnight, that the man was afraid, and
n lay at his feet.
 art thou? And she answered, I am Ruth thine
ver thine handmaid; for thou art
insman.
ou of the LORD, my daughter: for thou
t shewed more kindness in the latter end than at the beginning,
llowedst not young men, whether poor or rich.
; I will do to thee all that thou
st: for all the city of my people doth know that thou art a
 And now it is true that I am thy near kinsman: howbeit there is a
han I.
all be in the morning, that if he will
rform unto thee the part of a kinsman, well; let him do the
he will not do the part of a kinsman to thee,
to thee, as the LORD liveth: lie
il the morning.
 feet until the morning: and she rose up before
, Let it not be known that a woman
nto the floor.
 the vail that thou hast upon thee, and hold
ed six measures of barley, and laid it
 her: and she went into the city.
And when she came to her mother in law, she said, Who art thou,
e told her all that the man had done to her.
s of barley gave he me; for he
, Go not empty unto thy mother in law.
3:18 Then said she, Sit still, my daughter, until thou know how the
l: for the man will not be in rest, until he have
:1 Then went Boaz up to the gate, and sat him down there: and,
of whom Boaz spake came by; unto whom he said, Ho,
 here. And he turned aside, and sat

of the city, and said, Sit ye
And they sat down.
 the kinsman, Naomi, that is come again out of the
l of land, which was our brother
h's: 4:4 And I thought to advertise thee, saying, Buy it
d before the elders of my people. If thou
lt not redeem it, then tell
y know: for there is none to redeem it beside thee; and I
d, I will redeem it.
, What day thou buyest the field of the hand of
h the Moabitess, the wife of the
 raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance.
cannot redeem it for myself, lest I mar
ine own inheritance: redeem thou my right to thyself; for I cannot
7 Now this was the manner in former time in Israel concerning
ing changing, for to confirm all things; a man
 his neighbour: and this was a
in Israel.
id unto Boaz, Buy it for thee. So he drew
he elders, and unto all the people, Ye are
ll that was Elimelech's, and
 Chilion's and Mahlon's, of the hand of Naomi.
the wife of Mahlon, have I purchased
e my wife, to raise up the name of the dead upon his inheritance,
the dead be not cut off from among his brethren, and
 are witnesses this day.
he people that were in the gate, and the elders, said,
ake the woman that is come into thine
se like Rachel and like Leah, which two did build the house of
worthily in Ephratah, and be famous in Bethlehem:
e house of Pharez, whom Tamar bare
udah, of the seed which the LORD shall give thee of this young
az took Ruth, and she was his wife: and when he went in unto
 conception, and she bare a son.
nd the women said unto Naomi, Blessed be the LORD, which hath
y without a kinsman, that his name may be famous
 unto thee a restorer of thy life, and a nourisher
er in law, which loveth thee, which is
tter to thee than seven sons, hath born him.
aid it in her bosom, and became
o it.
 gave it a name, saying, There is a
orn to Naomi; and they called his name Obed: he is the father of
of David.
tions of Pharez: Pharez begat Hezron,
9 And Hezron begat Ram, and Ram begat Amminadab, 4:20 And Amminadab
and Nahshon begat Salmon, 4:21 And Salmon begat Boaz,
 Obed begat Jesse, and Jesse begat David.
wise Called:
s
Ramathaimzophim, of mount Ephraim,
s name was Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of Elihu, the
of Zuph, an Ephrathite: 1:2 And he had two wives;
nd the name of the other Peninnah:
ninnah had children, but Hannah had no children.
his city yearly to worship and to
ce unto the LORD of hosts in Shiloh. And the two sons of Eli,
the priests of the LORD, were there.
4 And when the time was that Elkanah offered, he gave to Peninnah
all her sons and her daughters, portions: 1:5 But
ion; for he loved Hannah: but the
d shut up her womb.
ry also provoked her sore, for to make her fret,
omb.
 when she went up to the house of
D, so she provoked her; therefore she wept, and did not eat.
h her husband to her, Hannah, why weepest thou?
 thy heart grieved? am not I better
ee than ten sons?  1:9 So Hannah rose up after they had eaten in
they had drunk. Now Eli the priest sat upon a seat
ORD.
soul, and prayed unto the LORD, and
sore.
d, O LORD of hosts, if thou wilt
ook on the affliction of thine handmaid, and remember me, and
maid, but wilt give unto thine handmaid a man
LORD all the days of his life,
shall no razor come upon his head.
 And it came to pass, as she continued praying before the LORD,
 mouth.
er heart; only her lips moved, but her
ice was not heard: therefore Eli thought she had been drunken.
unto her, How long wilt thou be drunken? put away
annah answered and said, No, my lord, I am a woman of a
unk neither wine nor strong drink, but have
1:16 Count not thine handmaid for a daughter of Belial: for out of the
 my complaint and grief have I spoken hitherto.
Go in peace: and the God of Israel
thee thy petition that thou hast asked of him.
aid find grace in thy sight. So the
 went her way, and did eat, and her countenance was no more sad.
se up in the morning early, and worshipped before the
to their house to Ramah: and Elkanah knew
her.
en the time was come about after
ad conceived, that she bare a son, and called his name Samuel,
ve asked him of the LORD.
man Elkanah, and all his house, went up to offer unto the
, and his vow.
 up; for she said unto her husband, I will not
 then I will bring him, that he
r before the LORD, and there abide for ever.
to her, Do what seemeth thee good;
until thou have weaned him; only the LORD establish his word. So
nd gave her son suck until she weaned him.
took him up with her, with three
, and one ephah of flour, and a bottle of wine, and brought
he LORD in Shiloh: and the child was young.
ught the child to Eli.
d, Oh my lord, as thy soul liveth, my lord, I am the
 praying unto the LORD.
hild I prayed; and the LORD hath given me my petition
erefore also I have lent him to the LORD;
the LORD. And he worshipped
e.
heart rejoiceth in the LORD, mine
 exalted in the LORD: my mouth is enlarged over mine enemies;
thy salvation.
s the LORD: for there is none beside thee:

let not arrogancy come out of
 for the LORD is a God of knowledge, and by him actions are
s of the mighty men are broken, and they that stumbled are

emselves for bread; and they
ngry ceased: so that the barren hath born seven; and she
 waxed feeble.
d maketh alive: he bringeth down to the grave,
eth poor, and maketh rich: he bringeth low, and
e poor out of the dust, and lifteth up the beggar
ong princes, and to make them inherit
 throne of glory: for the pillars of the earth are the LORD's, and
world upon them.
eet of his saints, and the wicked shall be
l no man prevail.
of the LORD shall be broken to pieces; out of
e LORD shall judge the ends of
 and he shall give strength unto his king, and exalt the
:11 And Elkanah went to Ramah to his house. And the child did
D before Eli the priest.
ons of Eli were sons of Belial; they knew not the LORD.
tom with the people was, that, when any man
 came, while the flesh was in
ith a fleshhook of three teeth in his hand; 2:14 And he
kettle, or caldron, or pot; all that the
fleshhook brought up the priest took for himself. So they did in
e Israelites that came thither.
so before they burnt the fat, the priest's servant came, and
acrificed, Give flesh to roast for the priest;
 thee, but raw.
d unto him, Let them not fail to burn the fat
hy soul desireth; then he would
m, Nay; but thou shalt give it me now: and if not, I will
 Wherefore the sin of the young men was very great before the
d the offering of the LORD.
muel ministered before the LORD, being a child, girded with
Moreover his mother made him a little coat, and brought it to him
, when she came up with her husband to offer the
blessed Elkanah and his wife, and said, The LORD give
he loan which is lent to the LORD. And
ey went unto their own home.
he LORD visited Hannah, so that she conceived, and bare
s. And the child Samuel grew before the
ORD.
rd all that his sons did unto all
 and how they lay with the women that assembled at the door of
e congregation.
hem, Why do ye such things? for I hear of your

rt that I hear: ye make the
 to transgress.
inst another, the judge shall judge him: but if
ll intreat for him? Notwithstanding
hearkened not unto the voice of their father, because the LORD
2:26 And the child Samuel grew on, and was in favour both with the
ith men.
od unto Eli, and said unto him, Thus
h the LORD, Did I plainly appear unto the house of thy father,
ypt in Pharaoh's house?  2:28 And did I choose him
to be my priest, to offer upon mine
, to burn incense, to wear an ephod before me? and did I give
 father all the offerings made by fire of the
ick ye at my sacrifice and at
ng, which I have commanded in my habitation; and honourest
ke yourselves fat with the chiefest of all the
 Wherefore the LORD God of Israel
I said indeed that thy house, and the house of thy father,
r ever: but now the LORD saith, Be it far from
onour, and they that despise me
lightly esteemed.
 come, that I will cut off thine arm, and the arm
 shall not be an old man in thine

habitation, in all the wealth
hall give Israel: and there shall not be an old man in
3 And the man of thine, whom I shall not cut off from mine altar,
me thine eyes, and to grieve thine heart: and all the
 die in the flower of their age.
nd this shall be a sign unto thee, that shall come upon thy two
 Phinehas; in one day they shall die both of them.
faithful priest, that shall do according
to that which is in mine heart and in my mind: and I will build him a
nd he shall walk before mine anointed for ever.
hat every one that is left in thine
 shall come and crouch to him for a piece of silver and a morsel
l say, Put me, I pray thee, into one of the priests'
e of bread.
nistered unto the LORD before Eli. And the
ays; there was no open vision.
it came to pass at that time, when Eli was laid down in his
an to wax dim, that he could not see; 3:3 And
emple of the LORD, where the ark
as, and Samuel was laid down to sleep; 3:4 That the LORD
ered, Here am I.
i, and said, Here am I; for thou calledst me.
gain. And he went and lay down.
 the LORD called yet again, Samuel. And Samuel arose and went
e am I; for thou didst call me. And he answered,
in.
 LORD, neither was the word of the
et revealed unto him.
called Samuel again the third time. And he arose and
 I; for thou didst call me. And Eli
ived that the LORD had called the child.

lie down: and it shall be, if
e, that thou shalt say, Speak, LORD; for thy servant
y down in his place.
came, and stood, and called as at other times,
, Speak; for thy servant heareth.
And the LORD said to Samuel, Behold, I will do a thing in Israel,
 ears of every one that heareth it shall tingle.
against Eli all things which I have
n concerning his house: when I begin, I will also make an end.
ld him that I will judge his house for ever for the
use his sons made themselves vile, and
 restrained them not.
e I have sworn unto the house of Eli, that the
 purged with sacrifice nor
ver.
ing, and opened the doors of the
 the LORD. And Samuel feared to shew Eli the vision.
 and said, Samuel, my son. And he
d, Here am I.
 the thing that the LORD hath said unto thee?
do so to thee, and more also, if
e any thing from me of all the things that he said unto thee.
d him every whit, and hid nothing from him. And he
 what seemeth him good.
 grew, and the LORD was with him, and did let none of

eersheba knew that Samuel was
 to be a prophet of the LORD.
the LORD appeared again in Shiloh: for the LORD revealed
h by the word of the LORD.
word of Samuel came to all Israel. Now Israel went out
attle, and pitched beside Ebenezer: and
he Philistines pitched in Aphek.
d the Philistines put themselves in array against Israel: and
le, Israel was smitten before the Philistines:
ld about four thousand men.
n the people were come into the camp, the elders of Israel
 LORD smitten us to day before the
tines? Let us fetch the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of
, when it cometh among us, it may save us out of
 the people sent to Shiloh, that they might bring from thence
nt of the LORD of hosts, which dwelleth between
Eli, Hophni and Phinehas, were
 the ark of the covenant of God.
d when the ark of the covenant of the LORD came into the camp,
ith a great shout, so that the earth rang again.
rd the noise of the shout, they said,
t meaneth the noise of this great shout in the camp of the Hebrews?
tood that the ark of the LORD was come into the camp.
e afraid, for they said, God is come into
 there hath not been such a
ore.
 us out of the hand of these mighty
 these are the Gods that smote the Egyptians with all the plagues
.
e men, O ye Philistines, that ye
ervants unto the Hebrews, as they have been to you: quit
ight.
and Israel was smitten, and they fled
ry man into his tent: and there was a very great slaughter; for
l thirty thousand footmen.
 ark of God was taken; and the two sons of Eli, Hophni and

of the army, and came to
day with his clothes rent, and with earth upon his
lo, Eli sat upon a seat by the wayside
tching: for his heart trembled for the ark of God. And when the man
ity, and told it, all the city cried out.
e crying, he said, What meaneth
 of this tumult? And the man came in hastily, and told Eli.
ty and eight years old; and his eyes were dim,
he man said unto Eli, I am he that came out of the army, and
he army. And he said, What is there done, my
and said, Israel is fled before
stines, and there hath been also a great slaughter among the
ns also, Hophni and Phinehas, are dead, and the
 came to pass, when he made mention of the ark of God, that
at backward by the side of the gate, and his
 old man, and heavy. And he had
rael forty years.
 in law, Phinehas' wife, was with child, near to
he tidings that the ark of God was
 and that her father in law and her husband were dead, she bowed
led; for her pains came upon her.
And about the time of her death the women that stood by her said
; for thou hast born a son. But she answered not,
1 And she named the child Ichabod, saying, The glory is departed
se the ark of God was taken, and because of her
:22 And she said, The glory is departed from Israel: for the ark of

God, and brought it from
hdod.
 ark of God, they brought it into the
se of Dagon, and set it by Dagon.
nd when they of Ashdod arose early on the morrow, behold, Dagon
 face to the earth before the ark of the LORD. And
his place again.
e early on the morrow morning, behold, Dagon was
 before the ark of the LORD; and the
 of Dagon and both the palms of his hands were cut off upon the
 stump of Dagon was left to him.
erefore neither the priests of Dagon, nor any that come into
n the threshold of Dagon in Ashdod unto this
as heavy upon them of Ashdod, and he
royed them, and smote them with emerods, even Ashdod and the
 And when the men of Ashdod saw that it was so, they said, The ark
rael shall not abide with us: for his hand is sore

ll the lords of the Philistines
, and said, What shall we do with the ark of the God of
Let the ark of the God of Israel be carried
rk of the God of Israel about

arried it about, the hand of
 against the city with a very great destruction: and he
both small and great, and they had emerods
 they sent the ark of God to Ekron. And it came to pass,
Ekron, that the Ekronites cried out, saying,
 God of Israel to us, to slay us
people.
together all the lords of the
, and said, Send away the ark of the God of Israel, and let
place, that it slay us not, and our people: for
ughout all the city; the hand of
very heavy there.
 died not were smitten with the emerods: and the

 country of the Philistines

 priests and the diviners,
hall we do to the ark of the LORD? tell us wherewith we

 ark of the God of Israel, send
pty; but in any wise return him a trespass offering: then ye
t shall be known to you why his hand is not
, What shall be the trespass offering which we shall
Five golden emerods, and five golden
, according to the number of the lords of the Philistines: for one
u all, and on your lords.
 ye shall make images of your emerods, and images of your
nd ye shall give glory unto the God of
rael: peradventure he will lighten his hand from off you, and from
nd from off your land.
en do ye harden your hearts, as the Egyptians and
en he had wrought wonderfully among
 did they not let the people go, and they departed?  6:7 Now
art, and take two milch kine, on which there
 the cart, and bring their
om them: 6:8 And take the ark of the LORD, and lay it
wels of gold, which ye return him for a
respass offering, in a coffer by the side thereof; and send it away,
.
y of his own coast to
e hath done us this great evil: but if not, then we
and that smote us: it was a chance that
appened to us.
 and took two milch kine, and tied them to the
me: 6:11 And they laid the ark of
D upon the cart, and the coffer with the mice of gold and the
ds.
 way to the way of Bethshemesh, and
along the highway, lowing as they went, and turned not aside to
o the left; and the lords of the Philistines went
hshemesh.
were reaping their wheat harvest in the
alley: and they lifted up their eyes, and saw the ark, and rejoiced
:14 And the cart came into the field of Joshua, a Bethshemite, and
re there was a great stone: and they clave the wood of
ne a burnt offering unto the LORD.
 And the Levites took down the ark of the LORD, and the coffer
erein the jewels of gold were, and put them on the
shemesh offered burnt offerings and
ficed sacrifices the same day unto the LORD.
Philistines had seen it, they
 Ekron the same day.
 the golden emerods which the Philistines returned
 LORD; for Ashdod one, for Gaza one,
Askelon one, for Gath one, for Ekron one; 6:18 And the golden
e number of all the cities of the Philistines
fenced cities, and of country
ven unto the great stone of Abel, whereon they set down the
stone remaineth unto this day in the field of
he smote the men of Bethshemesh, because they had looked into
even he smote of the people fifty thousand and
le lamented, because the LORD had
 many of the people with a great slaughter.
 Who is able to stand before this
RD God? and to whom shall he go up from us?  6:21 And they sent
nhabitants of Kirjathjearim, saying, The
Philistines have brought again the ark of the LORD; come ye down, and
o you.
 came, and fetched up the ark of the
, and brought it into the house of Abinadab in the hill, and
 son to keep the ark of the LORD.
nd it came to pass, while the ark abode in Kirjathjearim, that
or it was twenty years: and all the house of
 And Samuel spake unto all the house of Israel, saying, If ye do
RD with all your hearts, then put away the strange
u, and prepare your hearts unto the
 and serve him only: and he will deliver you out of the hand of

way Baalim and Ashtaroth, and
LORD only.
all Israel to Mizpeh, and I will pray for
ed together to Mizpeh, and drew water, and poured
d on that day, and said there, We
nned against the LORD. And Samuel judged the children of Israel
nd when the Philistines heard that the children of Israel were
 Mizpeh, the lords of the Philistines went up
 of Israel heard it, they were
the Philistines.
f Israel said to Samuel, Cease not to cry unto
l save us out of the hand of the
nes.
, and offered it for a burnt
lly unto the LORD: and Samuel cried unto the LORD for
m.
he burnt offering, the Philistines
ear to battle against Israel: but the LORD thundered with a
ay upon the Philistines, and discomfited them;

 Mizpeh, and pursued the
 smote them, until they came under Bethcar.
t it between Mizpeh and Shen, and
the name of it Ebenezer, saying, Hitherto hath the LORD helped
hilistines were subdued, and they came no more into the
nd of the LORD was against the Philistines
cities which the Philistines had taken from Israel were
ron even unto Gath; and the coasts thereof
he Philistines. And there was
en Israel and the Amorites.
muel judged Israel all the days of his life.
n circuit to Bethel, and Gilgal,
eh, and judged Israel in all those places.
there was his house; and there
Israel; and there he built an altar unto the LORD.
Samuel was old, that he made his sons
ges over Israel.
s firstborn was Joel; and the name of his
eba.
 ways, but turned aside after lucre,
took bribes, and perverted judgment.
4 Then all the elders of Israel gathered themselves together, and
to Ramah, 8:5 And said unto him, Behold, thou art
 ways: now make us a king to judge us
e all the nations.
spleased Samuel, when they said, Give us a king to
 the LORD.
amuel, Hearken unto the voice of the
le in all that they say unto thee: for they have not rejected
ejected me, that I should not reign over them.
ch they have done since the day that
ought them up out of Egypt even unto this day, wherewith they have
 served other gods, so do they also unto thee.
ir voice: howbeit yet protest
to them, and shew them the manner of the king that shall
nd Samuel told all the words of the LORD unto the people that

er of the king that shall reign
 He will take your sons, and appoint them for himself, for
his horsemen; and some shall run before his
im captains over thousands, and captains
over fifties; and will set them to ear his ground, and to reap his
make his instruments of war, and instruments of his
ake your daughters to be confectionaries, and to be
4 And he will take your fields, and your vineyards, and your
est of them, and give them to his servants.
ur seed, and of your vineyards,
to his officers, and to his servants.
:16 And he will take your menservants, and your maidservants, and
ung men, and your asses, and put them to his work.
 your sheep: and ye shall be his
.
 because of your king which ye
 chosen you; and the LORD will not hear you in that day.
ople refused to obey the voice of Samuel; and
ng over us; 8:20 That we also may
 all the nations; and that our king may judge us, and go out
ur battles.
he words of the people, and he rehearsed
them in the ears of the LORD.
the LORD said to Samuel, Hearken unto their voice, and make
 said unto the men of Israel, Go ye every man
 man of Benjamin, whose name was Kish, the son of
of Bechorath, the son of Aphiah, a
ite, a mighty man of power.
had a son, whose name was Saul, a choice young man, and a
 among the children of Israel a goodlier
person than he: from his shoulders and upward he was higher than any

r were lost. And Kish said to
n, Take now one of the servants with thee, and arise, go
 he passed through mount Ephraim, and passed through the land
 found them not: then they passed through the
ot: and he passed through the
 Benjamites, but they found them not.
:5 And when they were come to the land of Zuph, Saul said to his
ith him, Come, and let us return; lest my father
ke thought for us.
 him, Behold now, there is in this city a man of
all that he saith cometh surely to
now let us go thither; peradventure he can shew us our way that
7 Then said Saul to his servant, But, behold, if we go, what shall
? for the bread is spent in our vessels, and there is
 man of God: what have we?  9:8 And the
ervant answered Saul again, and said, Behold, I have here at hand the
f a shekel of silver: that will I give to the man of God,
9 (Beforetime in Israel, when a man went to enquire of God, thus he
d let us go to the seer: for he that is now called a
a Seer.)  9:10 Then said Saul to his
ant, Well said; come, let us go. So they went unto the city where
s.
 the city, they found young
 out to draw water, and said unto them, Is the seer here?
em, and said, He is; behold, he is before
o the city; for there is a
he people to day in the high place: 9:13 As soon as ye
all straightway find him, before he go up
will not eat until he come,
th bless the sacrifice; and afterwards they eat that be
ou up; for about this time ye shall find
him.
y: and when they were come into the
 behold, Samuel came out against them, for to go up to the high
the LORD had told Samuel in his ear a day before Saul came,
about this time I will send thee a man out of
anoint him to be captain over my
srael, that he may save my people out of the hand of the
oked upon my people, because their cry is
 Saul, the LORD said unto him, Behold the man
all reign over my people.
l drew near to Samuel in the gate, and said, Tell me, I
 house is.
l, and said, I am the seer: go up before
me unto the high place; for ye shall eat with me to day, and to morrow
hee go, and will tell thee all that is in thine heart.
s that were lost three days ago, set not thy
on whom is all the desire of
t not on thee, and on all thy father's house?  9:21 And
not I a Benjamite, of the smallest of the
 of all the families of the
amin? wherefore then speakest thou so to me?  9:22 And
vant, and brought them into the parlour,
and made them sit in the chiefest place among them that were bidden,
ut thirty persons.
 unto the cook, Bring the portion which I gave
 it by thee.
the shoulder, and that which was upon it,
Behold that which is left!
thee, and eat: for unto this time hath it been kept for
nvited the people. So Saul did eat with
amuel that day.
 come down from the high place into the city,
p of the house.
ly: and it came to pass about the spring of the
 top of the house, saying, Up, that
 send thee away. And Saul arose, and they went out both of them,
oad.
o the end of the city, Samuel said
l, Bid the servant pass on before us, (and he passed on), but
ile, that I may shew thee the word of God.
nd poured it upon his head, and
m, and said, Is it not because the LORD hath anointed thee to
nheritance?  10:2 When thou art departed from me
en by Rachel's sepulchre in the
 Benjamin at Zelzah; and they will say unto thee, The asses
eek are found: and, lo, thy father hath left
or you, saying, What shall I do
n?  10:3 Then shalt thou go on forward from thence, and thou
n of Tabor, and there shall meet thee three men
ying three kids, and another
ee loaves of bread, and another carrying a bottle of wine:
e thee, and give thee two loaves of bread;

 hill of God, where is the
e Philistines: and it shall come to pass, when thou art
hat thou shalt meet a company of prophets
altery, and a tabret, and a
arp, before them; and they shall prophesy: 10:6 And the
e upon thee, and thou shalt prophesy with
n.
 are come unto thee, that thou do
sion serve thee; for God is with thee.
10:8 And thou shalt go down before me to Gilgal; and, behold, I will
 thee, to offer burnt offerings, and to sacrifice
ven days shalt thou tarry, till I
 thee, and shew thee what thou shalt do.

ned his back to go from
him another heart: and all those signs came to pass
y came thither to the hill, behold, a company of
f God came upon him, and he
ong them.
en all that knew him beforetime saw that,
 then the people said one to
t is this that is come unto the son of Kish? Is Saul also
2 And one of the same place answered and
said, But who is their father? Therefore it became a proverb, Is Saul
e prophets?  10:13 And when he had made an end of
place.
 him and to his servant, Whither went
  And he said, To seek the asses: and when we saw that they were no
to Samuel.
 Tell me, I pray thee, what Samuel said
nto you.
ncle, He told us plainly that the asses
ere found. But of the matter of the kingdom, whereof Samuel spake, he

ether unto the LORD to Mizpeh;
said unto the children of Israel, Thus saith the LORD God of
srael out of Egypt, and delivered you out of the
the hand of all kingdoms, and of
t oppressed you: 10:19 And ye have this day rejected your God,
u out of all your adversities and your
ibulations; and ye have said unto him, Nay, but set a king over us.
resent yourselves before the LORD by your tribes, and
nd when Samuel had caused all the tribes of Israel to come
min was taken.
 the tribe of Benjamin to come near by their
n, and Saul the son of Kish was
d when they sought him, he could not be found.
he LORD further, if the man should
me thither. And the LORD answered, Behold he hath hid himself
0:23 And they ran and fetched him thence: and when he stood among the
s higher than any of the people from his shoulders and
said to all the people, See ye him whom the LORD hath
ke him among all the people? And all the
people shouted, and said, God save the king.
e manner of the kingdom, and wrote
a book, and laid it up before the LORD. And Samuel sent all the
man to his house.
ent home to Gibeah; and there went with him a
ched.
said, How shall this man save us? And
y despised him, and brought no presents. But he held his peace.
the Ammonite came up, and encamped against
said unto Nahash, Make a
, and we will serve thee.
sh the Ammonite answered them, On this condition will I
hat I may thrust out all your right eyes,
.
to him, Give us seven days'
 we may send messengers unto all the coasts of Israel:
 to save us, we will come out to thee.
11:4 Then came the messengers to Gibeah of Saul, and told the tidings
f the people: and all the people lifted up their voices,
old, Saul came after the herd out of the field; and Saul
le that they weep? And they told him the
tidings of the men of Jabesh.
the Spirit of God came upon Saul when he heard those tidings,
dled greatly.
f oxen, and hewed them in pieces, and sent
 by the hands of messengers,
oever cometh not forth after Saul and after Samuel, so
en. And the fear of the LORD fell on the
people, and they came out with one consent.
ek, the children of Israel were
dred thousand, and the men of Judah thirty thousand.
messengers that came, Thus shall ye say
nto the men of Jabeshgilead, To morrow, by that time the sun be hot,
help. And the messengers came and shewed it to the men
d.
id, To morrow we will come out
and ye shall do with us all that seemeth good unto you.
e morrow, that Saul put the people in three
 of the host in the morning
ew the Ammonites until the heat of the day: and it came
mained were scattered, so that two of them
 people said unto Samuel, Who is he that said, Shall Saul
men, that we may put them to death.
13 And Saul said, There shall not a man be put to death this day:
RD hath wrought salvation in Israel.
:14 Then said Samuel to the people, Come, and let us go to Gilgal,
ngdom there.
ent to Gilgal; and there they made Saul king
hey sacrificed sacrifices of
ngs before the LORD; and there Saul and all the men of
12:1 And Samuel said unto all Israel, Behold, I have hearkened unto
ll that ye said unto me, and have made a king over you.
 king walketh before you: and I am old and
h you: and I have walked
my childhood unto this day.
, here I am: witness against me before the LORD, and before
have I taken? or whose ass have I taken? or
essed? or of whose hand have I
ny bribe to blind mine eyes therewith? and I will restore it
said, Thou hast not defrauded us, nor oppressed us,
f any man's hand.
 them, The LORD is witness against you, and his
ye have not found ought in my hand.
hey answered, He is witness.
amuel said unto the people, It is the LORD that advanced
brought your fathers up out of the land of
, that I may reason with you before the
ORD of all the righteous acts of the LORD, which he did to you and to

nd your fathers cried unto the
 the LORD sent Moses and Aaron, which brought forth your
made them dwell in this place.
 when they forgat the LORD their God, he sold them into the
 of the host of Hazor, and into the hand of the
he king of Moab, and they fought
them.
D, and said, We have sinned, because
ave forsaken the LORD, and have served Baalim and Ashtaroth: but
 of the hand of our enemies, and we will serve thee.
bbaal, and Bedan, and Jephthah, and
l, and delivered you out of the hand of your enemies on every
safe.
 the king of the children of Ammon
gainst you, ye said unto me, Nay; but a king shall reign over
r God was your king.
e behold the king whom ye have chosen, and whom ye
ORD hath set a king over you.
ye will fear the LORD, and serve him, and obey his voice, and
 commandment of the LORD, then shall both ye and
ou continue following the LORD your
12:15 But if ye will not obey the voice of the LORD, but rebel
ent of the LORD, then shall the hand of the LORD
your fathers.
 and see this great thing, which the LORD
not wheat harvest to day? I will call unto the LORD, and
rain; that ye may perceive and see that your
e in the sight of the LORD, in
 a king.
e LORD; and the LORD sent thunder and
n that day: and all the people greatly feared the LORD and Samuel.
the people said unto Samuel, Pray for thy servants unto
ie not: for we have added unto all our sins
nd Samuel said unto the people, Fear not: ye have done all this
n not aside from following the LORD, but serve the
And turn ye not aside: for then should
 go after vain things, which cannot profit nor deliver; for they are
 For the LORD will not forsake his people for his great name's
h pleased the LORD to make you his people.
hat I should sin against the
ing to pray for you: but I will teach you the good and the
ar the LORD, and serve him in truth with all
ngs he hath done for you.
ye shall still do wickedly, ye shall be consumed, both ye
ul reigned one year; and when he had reigned two years over
 him three thousand men of Israel; whereof two
and in mount Bethel, and a
with Jonathan in Gibeah of Benjamin: and the rest of the
o his tent.
 garrison of the Philistines that was in
Geba, and the Philistines heard of it. And Saul blew the trumpet
 land, saying, Let the Hebrews hear.
:4 And all Israel heard say that Saul had smitten a garrison of the
d that Israel also was had in abomination with the
 called together after Saul to Gilgal.
13:5 And the Philistines gathered themselves together to fight with
thousand chariots, and six thousand horsemen, and
e sea shore in multitude: and they
p, and pitched in Michmash, eastward from Bethaven.
aw that they were in a strait, (for the
eople were distressed,) then the people did hide themselves in caves,
ts, and in rocks, and in high places, and in pits.
ent over Jordan to the land of Gad and
lead. As for Saul, he was yet in Gilgal, and all the people followed

ing to the set time that Samuel
nted: but Samuel came not to Gilgal; and the people were
9 And Saul said, Bring hither a burnt offering to me, and peace
ffered the burnt offering.
 came to pass, that as soon as he had made an end of
ehold, Samuel came; and Saul went out to
meet him, that he might salute him.
11 And Samuel said, What hast thou done? And Saul said, Because I
le were scattered from me, and that thou camest not
that the Philistines gathered
together at Michmash; 13:12 Therefore said I, The
on me to Gilgal, and I have not made
lication unto the LORD: I forced myself therefore, and offered a

done foolishly: thou hast not
mmandment of the LORD thy God, which he commanded thee: for
 established thy kingdom upon Israel for ever.
t continue: the LORD hath sought him
n after his own heart, and the LORD hath commanded him to be
e, because thou hast not kept that which the
el arose, and gat him up from Gilgal unto Gibeah of
 people that were present with him,
 six hundred men.
onathan his son, and the people that were present
jamin: but the Philistines encamped
chmash.
 of the camp of the Philistines in
companies: one company turned unto the way that leadeth to
 Shual: 13:18 And another company turned the
turned to the way of the border
eth to the valley of Zeboim toward the wilderness.
ound throughout all the land of Israel:
or the Philistines said, Lest the Hebrews make them swords or spears:
 the Israelites went down to the Philistines, to sharpen
is coulter, and his axe, and his mattock.
cks, and for the coulters, and
rks, and for the axes, and to sharpen the goads.
day of battle, that there was neither
rd nor spear found in the hand of any of the people that were with
n: but with Saul and with Jonathan his son was there
on of the Philistines went out to the passage of
ass upon a day, that Jonathan the son of Saul
 armour, Come, and let us go over
Philistines' garrison, that is on the other side. But he told
:2 And Saul tarried in the uttermost part of Gibeah under a
is in Migron: and the people that were with him
d Ahiah, the son of Ahitub,
ther, the son of Phinehas, the son of Eli, the LORD's
ephod. And the people knew not that
han was gone.
ages, by which Jonathan sought to go over
 a sharp rock on the one
p rock on the other side: and the name of the one was
her Seneh.
e was situate northward over against
mash, and the other southward over against Gibeah.
young man that bare his armour, Come,
 let us go over unto the garrison of these uncircumcised: it may be
ill work for us: for there is no restraint to the LORD

 Do all that is in thine
; behold, I am with thee according to thy heart.
 we will pass over unto these men, and
 will discover ourselves unto them.
9 If they say thus unto us, Tarry until we come to you; then we
 our place, and will not go up unto them.
o us; then we will go up: for
th delivered them into our hand: and this shall be a sign
h of them discovered themselves unto the garrison of the
stines said, Behold, the Hebrews come forth
mselves.
son answered Jonathan and his
r, and said, Come up to us, and we will shew you a thing.
s armourbearer, Come up after me: for the
 Israel.
upon his hands and upon his feet, and
 armourbearer after him: and they fell before Jonathan; and his
fter him.
r, which Jonathan and his armourbearer
de, was about twenty men, within as it were an half acre of land,
xen might plow.
mbling in the host, in the field, and among all
poilers, they also trembled, and
h quaked: so it was a very great trembling.
eah of Benjamin looked; and,
multitude melted away, and they went on beating down one
d Saul unto the people that were with him, Number now,
 And when they had numbered, behold,
than and his armourbearer were not there.
ither the ark of God. For the
was at that time with the children of Israel.
ul talked unto the priest, that the
 that was in the host of the Philistines went on and increased:
the priest, Withdraw thine hand.
And Saul and all the people that were with him assembled
to the battle: and, behold, every man's
word was against his fellow, and there was a very great discomfiture.
ver the Hebrews that were with the Philistines before that
 them into the camp from the country round
the Israelites that were with
nathan.
srael which had hid themselves in mount
phraim, when they heard that the Philistines fled, even they also
er them in the battle.
D saved Israel that day: and the battle passed over
 men of Israel were distressed that day: for Saul had
ursed be the man that eateth any food
il evening, that I may be avenged on mine enemies. So none of the
 food.
ame to a wood; and there was honey
he ground.
re come into the wood, behold, the honey
dropped; but no man put his hand to his mouth: for the people feared
4:27 But Jonathan heard not when his father charged the people with
fore he put forth the end of the rod that was in his
ycomb, and put his hand to his mouth;
 his eyes were enlightened.
answered one of the people, and said, Thy father straitly
n oath, saying, Cursed be the man that eateth
e faint.
ather hath troubled the land: see, I
 you, how mine eyes have been enlightened, because I tasted a

le had eaten freely to day of
f their enemies which they found? for had there not been
er among the Philistines?  14:31 And they
ash to Aijalon: and the
faint.
he spoil, and took sheep, and oxen,
alves, and slew them on the ground: and the people did eat them
14:33 Then they told Saul, saying, Behold, the people sin against the
 they eat with the blood. And he said, Ye have
o me this day.
perse yourselves among the people, and say
 ox, and every man his sheep,
em here, and eat; and sin not against the LORD in eating
 the people brought every man his ox with him that night, and
4:35 And Saul built an altar unto the LORD: the same was the first
ilt unto the LORD.
 Let us go down after the Philistines by night,
ght, and let us not leave a man of
And they said, Do whatsoever seemeth good unto thee. Then said
raw near hither unto God.
l asked counsel of God, Shall I go down after the
em into the hand of Israel? But he
ed him not that day.
d, Draw ye near hither, all the chief of the people:
sin hath been this day.
he LORD liveth, which saveth Israel, though it be in
ly die. But there was not a man among
 the people that answered him.
en said he unto all Israel, Be ye on one side, and I and
 the other side. And the people said unto
14:41 Therefore Saul said unto the LORD God of Israel, Give a perfect
aul and Jonathan were taken: but the people escaped.
ts between me and Jonathan my son. And
nathan was taken.
to Jonathan, Tell me what thou hast done. And
t taste a little honey with the
e rod that was in mine hand, and, lo, I must die.
 so and more also: for thou shalt
die, Jonathan.
d unto Saul, Shall Jonathan die, who hath
od forbid: as the LORD
l not one hair of his head fall to the ground; for
y. So the people rescued Jonathan,
e died not.
m following the Philistines: and the
istines went to their own place.
So Saul took the kingdom over Israel, and fought against all his
ide, against Moab, and against the children of
 the kings of Zobah, and against
istines: and whithersoever he turned himself, he vexed them.
d an host, and smote the Amalekites, and delivered
that spoiled them.
f Saul were Jonathan, and Ishui, and Melchishua:
 were these; the name of the
rab, and the name of the younger Michal: 14:50 And the
oam, the daughter of Ahimaaz: and the name
e son of Ner, Saul's uncle.
ish was the father of Saul; and Ner the father of Abner was
:52 And there was sore war against the Philistines all the days of
aul saw any strong man, or any valiant man, he took
so said unto Saul, The LORD sent me to anoint thee to be
 Israel: now therefore hearken thou unto the
2 Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I remember that which Amalek did to
laid wait for him in the way, when he came up from
Amalek, and utterly destroy all that they have,
an and woman, infant and suckling,
 sheep, camel and ass.
thered the people together, and numbered them in
en, and ten thousand men of Judah.
 And Saul came to a city of Amalek, and laid wait in the valley.
id unto the Kenites, Go, depart, get you down from
troy you with them: for ye shewed
s to all the children of Israel, when they came up out of
arted from among the Amalekites.
nd Saul smote the Amalekites from Havilah until thou comest to
gainst Egypt.
 king of the Amalekites alive, and utterly
f the sword.
le spared Agag, and the best of the sheep,
d the lambs, and all that was
ould not utterly destroy them: but every thing that was
destroyed utterly.
word of the LORD unto Samuel, saying, 15:11 It
 to be king: for he is turned back
ollowing me, and hath not performed my commandments. And it
cried unto the LORD all night.
d when Samuel rose early to meet Saul in the morning, it was
aul came to Carmel, and, behold, he set him up a
ed on, and gone down to Gilgal.
nd Samuel came to Saul: and Saul said unto him, Blessed be thou
 performed the commandment of the LORD.

this bleating of the sheep in
and the lowing of the oxen which I hear?  15:15 And Saul
em from the Amalekites: for the people
ared the best of the sheep and of the oxen, to sacrifice unto the
 the rest we have utterly destroyed.
:16 Then Samuel said unto Saul, Stay, and I will tell thee what the
to me this night. And he said unto him, Say on.
wast little in thine own sight, wast
 not made the head of the tribes of Israel, and the LORD anointed
rael?  15:18 And the LORD sent thee on a journey, and
the sinners the Amalekites, and fight
inst them until they be consumed.
 Wherefore then didst thou not obey the voice of the LORD, but
poil, and didst evil in the sight of the LORD?
, I have obeyed the voice of the
d have gone the way which the LORD sent me, and have brought
k, and have utterly destroyed the Amalekites.
oil, sheep and oxen, the chief of
ngs which should have been utterly destroyed, to sacrifice unto
 Gilgal.
e LORD as great delight in burnt
s and sacrifices, as in obeying the voice of the LORD? Behold,
an sacrifice, and to hearken than the fat of rams.
sin of witchcraft, and stubbornness is
 iniquity and idolatry. Because thou hast rejected the word of the
so rejected thee from being king.
 And Saul said unto Samuel, I have sinned: for I have
of the LORD, and thy words: because I
red the people, and obeyed their voice.

my sin, and turn again with
y worship the LORD.
id unto Saul, I will not return with thee: for thou
ORD, and the LORD hath rejected thee
 being king over Israel.
amuel turned about to go away, he laid hold upon the
nt.
 LORD hath rent the kingdom of
m thee this day, and hath given it to a neighbour of thine,
u.
l will not lie nor repent: for he
a man, that he should repent.
n he said, I have sinned: yet honour me now, I pray thee,
eople, and before Israel, and turn again with
od.
Saul; and Saul worshipped the LORD.
32 Then said Samuel, Bring ye hither to me Agag the king of the
g came unto him delicately. And Agag said, Surely

h made women childless, so
er be childless among women. And Samuel hewed Agag in
gal.
nd Saul went up to his house to
 Saul.
 see Saul until the day of his death:
ertheless Samuel mourned for Saul: and the LORD repented that he
 over Israel.
to Samuel, How long wilt thou mourn for Saul,
ing over Israel? fill thine horn
, and go, I will send thee to Jesse the Bethlehemite: for I
 among his sons.
How can I go? if Saul hear it, he will kill me.
ith thee, and say, I am come to
 to the LORD.
e sacrifice, and I will shew thee what thou
 him whom I name unto thee.
muel did that which the LORD spake, and came to Bethlehem.
wn trembled at his coming, and said, Comest
eably: I am come to sacrifice
RD: sanctify yourselves, and come with me to the sacrifice.
 and his sons, and called them to the
rifice.
they were come, that he looked on
and said, Surely the LORD's anointed is before him.
amuel, Look not on his countenance, or on
 refused him: for the LORD
an seeth; for man looketh on the outward appearance, but
art.
nd made him pass before Samuel. And
id, Neither hath the LORD chosen this.
16:9 Then Jesse made Shammah to pass by. And he said, Neither hath the
this.
his sons to pass before Samuel. And
l said unto Jesse, The LORD hath not chosen these.
se, Are here all thy children? And he
d, There remaineth yet the youngest, and, behold, he keepeth the
said unto Jesse, Send and fetch him: for we will not

Now he was ruddy, and withal of
ul countenance, and goodly to look to. And the LORD said,
is is he.
rn of oil, and anointed him in the midst
of his brethren: and the Spirit of the LORD came upon David from that
So Samuel rose up, and went to Ramah.
6:14 But the Spirit of the LORD departed from Saul, and an evil
D troubled him.
ts said unto him, Behold now, an evil spirit
our lord now command thy servants, which are before thee, to
 a cunning player on an harp: and it shall come
God is upon thee, that he shall
 his hand, and thou shalt be well.
7 And Saul said unto his servants, Provide me now a man that can
ng him to me.
f the servants, and said, Behold, I have seen
 is cunning in playing, and a
ant man, and a man of war, and prudent in matters, and a
D is with him.
t messengers unto Jesse, and said, Send me

bread, and a bottle of wine,
nd sent them by David his son unto Saul.

before him: and he loved him
 he became his armourbearer.
Saul sent to Jesse, saying, Let David, I pray thee, stand
und favour in my sight.
me to pass, when the evil spirit from God was upon
nd played with his hand: so Saul was
eshed, and was well, and the evil spirit departed from him.
nes gathered together their armies to battle, and
, which belongeth to Judah, and
etween Shochoh and Azekah, in Ephesdammim.
re gathered together, and
valley of Elah, and set the battle in array against the
e Philistines stood on a mountain on the one side, and
n the other side: and there was a valley
between them.
 champion out of the camp of the Philistines,
was six cubits and a span.
had an helmet of brass upon his head, and he was armed
 weight of the coat was five thousand
kels of brass.
of brass upon his legs, and a target of brass
e staff of his spear was like a weaver's beam; and his
dred shekels of iron: and one bearing a
hield went before him.
d and cried unto the armies of Israel, and said unto
et your battle in array? am not I a
stine, and ye servants to Saul? choose you a man for you, and let
me.
, and to kill me, then will we be
rvants: but if I prevail against him, and kill him, then shall
and serve us.
said, I defy the armies of Israel this day;
er.
d those words of the Philistine,
e dismayed, and greatly afraid.
ow David was the son of that Ephrathite of Bethlehemjudah,
d he had eight sons: and the man went among

se went and followed Saul to the
and the names of his three sons that went to the battle were
nd next unto him Abinadab, and the third
Shammah.
st: and the three eldest followed Saul.

ul to feed his father's sheep
m.
orning and evening, and presented
 forty days.
David his son, Take now for thy brethren an
en loaves, and run to the camp
thren; 17:18 And carry these ten cheeses unto the captain of
ok how thy brethren fare, and take their pledge.
l the men of Israel, were in the
f Elah, fighting with the Philistines.
17:20 And David rose up early in the morning, and left the sheep with
 took, and went, as Jesse had commanded him; and he came
 was going forth to the fight, and shouted
the Philistines had put the battle in array, army
left his carriage in the hand of the keeper of the
 and came and saluted his brethren.
23 And as he talked with them, behold, there came up the champion,
f Gath, Goliath by name, out of the armies of the
to the same words: and David heard

hey saw the man, fled from him,
sore afraid.
l said, Have ye seen this man that is come
: and it shall be, that the
th him, the king will enrich him with great riches, and
 and make his father's house free in
el.
at stood by him, saying, What shall
ne to the man that killeth this Philistine, and taketh away the
l? for who is this uncircumcised Philistine, that
living God?  17:27 And the people
d him after this manner, saying, So shall it be done to the man

 when he spake unto the men;
anger was kindled against David, and he said, Why camest
 whom hast thou left those few sheep in the
aughtiness of thine heart; for
ome down that thou mightest see the battle.
 done? Is there not a cause?
 turned from him toward another, and spake after the same
swered him again after the former manner.
ch David spake, they rehearsed
e Saul: and he sent for him.
David said to Saul, Let no man's heart fail because of him;
 fight with this Philistine.
Saul said to David, Thou art not able to go against this
im: for thou art but a youth, and he a man
d said unto Saul, Thy servant kept his father's sheep,
 bear, and took a lamb out of the flock:
17:35 And I went out after him, and smote him, and delivered it out of
nd when he arose against me, I caught him by his beard,
.
and the bear: and this
istine shall be as one of them, seeing he hath

at delivered me out of the paw
n, and out of the paw of the bear, he will deliver me out of
stine. And Saul said unto David, Go, and the
rmed David with his armour, and he put an helmet of
med him with a coat of mail.
David girded his sword upon his armour, and he assayed to
 it. And David said unto Saul, I cannot go
And David put them off him.
e took his staff in his hand, and chose him five smooth
d put them in a shepherd's bag which he
ad, even in a scrip; and his sling was in his hand: and he drew near
ine.
nd drew near unto David; and the man
 bare the shield went before him.
 And when the Philistine looked about, and saw David, he
but a youth, and ruddy, and of a fair
ntenance.
 unto David, Am I a dog, that thou comest
sed David by his gods.
ilistine said to David, Come to me, and I will give
 air, and to the beasts of the field.
7:45 Then said David to the Philistine, Thou comest to me with a
spear, and with a shield: but I come to thee in the
God of the armies of Israel, whom thou
st defied.
 deliver thee into mine hand; and I will
smite thee, and take thine head from thee; and I will give the
 of the Philistines this day unto the fowls of the
he earth; that all the earth may know
t there is a God in Israel.
ll this assembly shall know that the LORD saveth not with
battle is the LORD's, and he will give you
pass, when the Philistine arose, and came, and
hastened, and ran toward the army
 the Philistine.
s hand in his bag, and took thence a stone, and
in his forehead, that the stone
 his forehead; and he fell upon his face to the earth.
ver the Philistine with a sling and with a
w him; but there was no sword
 of David.
nd stood upon the Philistine, and took his
reof, and slew him, and cut
therewith. And when the Philistines saw their champion
2 And the men of Israel and of Judah arose, and shouted, and
s, until thou come to the valley, and to the
the Philistines fell down by the way to Shaaraim,

d from chasing after the
 they spoiled their tents.
vid took the head of the Philistine, and brought it to
mour in his tent.
aw David go forth against the Philistine, he said
st, Abner, whose son is this youth?
bner said, As thy soul liveth, O king, I cannot tell.
quire thou whose son the stripling is.
17:57 And as David returned from the slaughter of the Philistine,
nd brought him before Saul with the head of the
d Saul said to him, Whose son art thou, thou young man? And
e son of thy servant Jesse the Bethlehemite.
d made an end of speaking unto
 the soul of Jonathan was knit with the soul of David, and
s own soul.
 day, and would let him go no more home to
n and David made a covenant, because he loved him as
than stripped himself of the robe that was upon him, and
garments, even to his sword, and to his bow,
ent out whithersoever Saul sent him, and behaved
ver the men of war, and he was
n the sight of all the people, and also in the sight of
d it came to pass as they came, when David was returned from
hilistine, that the women came out of all cities
 meet king Saul, with tabrets, with
and with instruments of musick.
d the women answered one another as they played, and said, Saul
sands, and David his ten thousands.
8 And Saul was very wroth, and the saying displeased him; and he
cribed unto David ten thousands, and to me they have
at can he have more but the kingdom?
 And Saul eyed David from that day and forward.
morrow, that the evil spirit from God
e upon Saul, and he prophesied in the midst of the house: and David
 hand, as at other times: and there was a javelin in
 cast the javelin; for he said, I will smite David even
vid avoided out of his presence twice.
18:12 And Saul was afraid of David, because the LORD was with him, and
 from Saul.
d him from him, and made him his captain
over a thousand; and he went out and came in before the people.
ehaved himself wisely in all his ways; and the LORD
e when Saul saw that he behaved himself very wisely, he
 But all Israel and Judah loved David, because he went out and

y elder daughter Merab, her will
hee to wife: only be thou valiant for me, and fight the LORD's
 said, Let not mine hand be upon him, but let the hand of the
im.
 am I? and what is my life, or my
s family in Israel, that I should be son in law to the king?
ass at the time when Merab Saul's daughter
e was given unto Adriel the
o wife.
r loved David: and they told Saul, and
e thing pleased him.
d, I will give him her, that she may be a snare to
ilistines may be against him.
aul said to David, Thou shalt this day be my son in law in

ying, Commune with David
y, Behold, the king hath delight in thee, and all his
fore be the king's son in law.
d Saul's servants spake those words in the ears of David. And
t to you a light thing to be a king's son in law,
lightly esteemed?  18:24 And the
 of Saul told him, saying, On this manner spake David.
shall ye say to David, The king desireth not
 the Philistines, to be avenged
ng's enemies. But Saul thought to make David fall by the hand

hese words, it pleased David
he king's son in law: and the days were not expired.
and went, he and his men, and slew of the
ought their foreskins, and
 in full tale to the king, that he might be the king's
m Michal his daughter to wife.
d Saul saw and knew that the LORD was with David, and that
oved him.
re afraid of David; and Saul became
's enemy continually.
inces of the Philistines went forth: and it came to
at David behaved himself more wisely
 all the servants of Saul; so that his name was much set by.
to Jonathan his son, and to all his servants, that
But Jonathan Saul's son delighted much in David: and Jonathan
aul my father seeketh to kill thee: now
herefore, I pray thee, take heed to thyself until the morning, and
t place, and hide thyself: 19:3 And I will go out and
 field where thou art, and I will commune
hat I will tell thee.
 spake good of David unto Saul his father, and said
against his servant, against David;
se he hath not sinned against thee, and because his works have
ry good: 19:5 For he did put his life in his hand,
 LORD wrought a great salvation for
srael: thou sawest it, and didst rejoice: wherefore then wilt
cent blood, to slay David without a cause?  19:6
of Jonathan: and Saul sware, As the
liveth, he shall not be slain.
 Jonathan called David, and Jonathan shewed him all those
rought David to Saul, and he was in his presence, as in
re was war again: and David went out, and fought with the
m with a great slaughter; and they fled from
the LORD was upon Saul, as he sat in his
house with his javelin in his hand: and David played with his hand.
l sought to smite David even to the wall with the
of Saul's presence, and he smote the
lin into the wall: and David fled, and escaped that night.
essengers unto David's house, to watch him, and
hal David's wife told him, saying,
u save not thy life to night, to morrow thou shalt be slain.
David down through a window: and he went, and
l took an image, and laid it in the bed, and put a
lster, and covered it with a cloth.
14 And when Saul sent messengers to take David, she said, He is
Saul sent the messengers again to see David, saying, Bring
 that I may slay him.
e messengers were come in, behold, there was an image
goats' hair for his bolster.
Saul said unto Michal, Why hast thou deceived me so, and
 he is escaped? And Michal answered Saul, He
kill thee?  19:18 So David fled,
ped, and came to Samuel to Ramah, and told him all that Saul
e and Samuel went and dwelt in Naioth.
19:19 And it was told Saul, saying, Behold, David is at Naioth in
nd Saul sent messengers to take David: and when they saw the
s prophesying, and Samuel standing as appointed
on the messengers of Saul, and they
prophesied.
Saul, he sent other messengers, and they
prophesied likewise. And Saul sent messengers again the third time,
sied also.
amah, and came to a great well that is in
amuel and David? And one
ey be at Naioth in Ramah.
went thither to Naioth in Ramah: and the Spirit of God
nt on, and prophesied, until he came to
aioth in Ramah.
ff his clothes also, and prophesied before
d all that day and all that
ore they say, Is Saul also among the prophets?  20:1 And
Ramah, and came and said before Jonathan,
and what is my sin before thy
t he seeketh my life?  20:2 And he said unto him, God
ehold, my father will do nothing either
reat or small, but that he will shew it me: and why should my father
g from me? it is not so.
 sware moreover, and said, Thy father certainly knoweth
thine eyes; and he saith, Let not Jonathan
 as the LORD liveth, and as
th, there is but a step between me and death.
 Whatsoever thy soul desireth, I
n do it for thee.
nto Jonathan, Behold, to morrow is the new moon,
the king at meat: but let me go,
ay hide myself in the field unto the third day at even.
 miss me, then say, David earnestly asked
m his city: for there is a
ce there for all the family.
 say thus, It is well; thy servant shall have peace: but if
be sure that evil is determined by him.

h thy servant; for thou hast
servant into a covenant of the LORD with thee:
niquity, slay me thyself; for why
st thou bring me to thy father?  20:9 And Jonathan said, Far be
f I knew certainly that evil were determined by my
ould not I tell it thee?  20:10 Then
 David to Jonathan, Who shall tell me? or what if thy father
20:11 And Jonathan said unto David, Come, and
y went out both of them into the

RD God of Israel, when I have
father about to morrow any time, or the third day, and,
ward David, and I then send not unto thee,
nd much more to Jonathan: but
e my father to do thee evil, then I will shew it thee, and
u mayest go in peace: and the LORD be with

 live shew me the kindness of
hat I die not: 20:15 But also thou shalt not cut off thy
 ever: no, not when the LORD hath cut off
ace of the earth.
e a covenant with the house of David, saying, Let
and of David's enemies.
han caused David to swear again, because he loved him:
 his own soul.
 to David, To morrow is the new moon: and thou
ll be empty.
tayed three days, then thou shalt go down
 didst hide thyself when the
 in hand, and shalt remain by the stone Ezel.
 on the side thereof, as though I
 a mark.
 a lad, saying, Go, find out the arrows.
If I expressly say unto the lad, Behold, the arrows are on this side
them; then come thou: for there is peace to thee, and no

man, Behold, the arrows are
go thy way: for the LORD hath sent thee away.
ich thou and I have spoken of,
e LORD be between thee and me for ever.

and when the new moon was
sat him down to eat meat.
 king sat upon his seat, as at other times, even upon a
han arose, and Abner sat by Saul's side,
and David's place was empty.
rtheless Saul spake not any thing that day: for he thought,
 him, he is not clean; surely he is not clean.
orrow, which was the second day of
nth, that David's place was empty: and Saul said unto Jonathan
ometh not the son of Jesse to meat, neither
han answered Saul, David
leave of me to go to Bethlehem: 20:29 And he said, Let
family hath a sacrifice in the city; and
my brother, he hath commanded me to be there: and now, if I have found
ine eyes, let me get away, I pray thee, and see my
t unto the king's table.
l's anger was kindled against Jonathan, and he said unto
rse rebellious woman, do not I know that
thou hast chosen the son of Jesse to thine own confusion, and unto the
 thy mother's nakedness?  20:31 For as long as the son of
und, thou shalt not be established, nor thy
im unto me, for he shall surely
0:32 And Jonathan answered Saul his father, and said unto him,
e slain? what hath he done?  20:33 And Saul cast a
reby Jonathan knew that it was
 of his father to slay David.
Jonathan arose from the table in fierce anger, and did eat no
f the month: for he was grieved for David,

, that Jonathan went out into
t the time appointed with David, and a little lad with him.
o his lad, Run, find out now the arrows which I
an arrow beyond him.
 lad was come to the place of the arrow which
er the lad, and said, Is not the
yond thee?  20:38 And Jonathan cried after the lad, Make
d Jonathan's lad gathered up the arrows, and
ad knew not any thing: only Jonathan and David knew the
an gave his artillery unto his lad, and said unto him,

David arose out of a place
th, and fell on his face to the ground, and bowed
sed one another, and wept one with
r, until David exceeded.
than said to David, Go in peace, forasmuch as we have
of the LORD, saying, The LORD be between
me and thee, and between my seed and thy seed for ever. And he arose
and Jonathan went into the city.
hen came David to Nob to Ahimelech the priest: and Ahimelech was
ing of David, and said unto him, Why art thou alone,
d David said unto Ahimelech the priest,
he king hath commanded me a business, and hath said unto me, Let no
ing of the business whereabout I send thee, and what I
ave appointed my servants to such and such
nder thine hand? give me five loaves of
read in mine hand, or what there is present.
and said, There is no common bread
mine hand, but there is hallowed bread; if the young men have
ast from women.
 the priest, and said unto him, Of a truth
 three days, since I came out,
ssels of the young men are holy, and the bread is in a
t were sanctified this day in the vessel.
ead: for there was no bread
 shewbread, that was taken from before the LORD, to put
t was taken away.
n of the servants of Saul was there that day,
e was Doeg, an Edomite, the
he herdmen that belonged to Saul.
And David said unto Ahimelech, And is there not here under thine
d? for I have neither brought my sword nor my
usiness required haste.
iest said, The sword of Goliath the Philistine, whom
Elah, behold, it is here wrapped in a
th behind the ephod: if thou wilt take that, take it: for there is
at here. And David said, There is none like that; give
ose and fled that day for fear of Saul, and went to
11 And the servants of Achish said unto him, Is not this David the
? did they not sing one to another of him in dances,
ousands, and David his ten thousands?
12 And David laid up these words in his heart, and was sore afraid
ng of Gath.
haviour before them, and feigned himself
mad in their hands, and scrabbled on the doors of the gate, and let
l down upon his beard.
Achish unto his servants, Lo, ye see the man is mad:
 him to me?  21:15 Have I need of mad
, that ye have brought this fellow to play the mad man in my
ellow come into my house?  22:1 David therefore
 cave Adullam: and when his
all his father's house heard it, they went down thither
ne that was in distress, and every one that was in
contented, gathered themselves unto
and he became a captain over them: and there were with him about

 Moab: and he said unto the
 Let my father and my mother, I pray thee, come forth,
 what God will do for me.
rought them before the king of Moab: and they dwelt with
id was in the hold.
t Gad said unto David, Abide not in the hold;
 Judah. Then David departed, and
o the forest of Hareth.
heard that David was discovered, and the men that were
 Gibeah under a tree in Ramah, having his
ere standing about him;) 22:7
aid unto his servants that stood about him, Hear now, ye
f Jesse give every one of you fields and
vineyards, and make you all captains of thousands, and captains of
hat all of you have conspired against me, and there is
 son hath made a league with the son of
esse, and there is none of you that is sorry for me, or sheweth unto
 hath stirred up my servant against me, to lie in wait,
answered Doeg the Edomite, which was set
over the servants of Saul, and said, I saw the son of Jesse coming to
lech the son of Ahitub.
quired of the LORD for him, and gave him victuals, and
h the Philistine.
ent to call Ahimelech the priest, the son of
e priests that were in Nob: and
 all of them to the king.
l said, Hear now, thou son of Ahitub. And he answered,
 And Saul said unto him, Why have ye conspired against me, thou
e, in that thou hast given him bread, and a sword,
, that he should rise against me, to
in wait, as at this day?  22:14 Then Ahimelech answered the king,
 is so faithful among all thy servants as David,
d goeth at thy bidding, and is
 in thine house?  22:15 Did I then begin to enquire of God
me: let not the king impute any thing unto his
father: for thy servant knew
ll this, less or more.
ng said, Thou shalt surely die, Ahimelech, thou, and
17 And the king said unto the footmen that stood about him, Turn,
sts of the LORD: because their hand also is with
he fled, and did not shew it to me.
he servants of the king would not put forth their hand to fall
the LORD.
eg, Turn thou, and fall upon the priests.
upon the priests, and slew on
urscore and five persons that did wear a linen ephod.
the priests, smote he with the edge of the
sucklings, and oxen, and
, with the edge of the sword.
 one of the sons of Ahimelech the son of Ahitub, named
after David.
David that Saul had slain the LORD's
sts.
, I knew it that day, when Doeg the
te was there, that he would surely tell Saul: I have occasioned
e persons of thy father's house.
Abide thou with me, fear not: for he that seeketh my life
h me thou shalt be in safeguard.
hen they told David, saying, Behold, the Philistines fight
 rob the threshingfloors.
e David enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go and
he LORD said unto David, Go, and smite
e Philistines, and save Keilah.
d David's men said unto him, Behold, we be afraid here in
 if we come to Keilah against the armies of
red of the LORD yet again. And
nswered him and said, Arise, go down to Keilah; for I will
into thine hand.
men went to Keilah, and fought with the
hilistines, and brought away their cattle, and smote them with a
o David saved the inhabitants of Keilah.

the son of Ahimelech fled to
lah, that he came down with an ephod in his hand.
David was come to Keilah. And Saul
God hath delivered him into mine hand; for he is shut in, by
hat hath gates and bars.
called all the people together to war, to go down to
is men.
ecretly practised mischief against him;
nd he said to Abiathar the priest, Bring hither the ephod.
 O LORD God of Israel, thy servant hath
ertainly heard that Saul seeketh to come to Keilah, to destroy the
.
me up into his hand? will Saul
 as thy servant hath heard? O LORD God of Israel, I beseech
 And the LORD said, He will come down.
23:12 Then said David, Will the men of Keilah deliver me and my men
f Saul? And the LORD said, They will deliver thee up.
n, which were about six hundred, arose and
soever they could go. And it
l that David was escaped from Keilah; and he forbare to go
d abode in the wilderness in strong holds, and remained
ness of Ziph. And Saul sought him every
ay, but God delivered him not into his hand.
me out to seek his life: and David
 the wilderness of Ziph in a wood.
6 And Jonathan Saul's son arose, and went to David into the wood,
his hand in God.
 him, Fear not: for the hand of Saul my father
be king over Israel, and I shall
unto thee; and that also Saul my father knoweth.
nt before the LORD: and David abode in
e wood, and Jonathan went to his house.

o Gibeah, saying, Doth not
self with us in strong holds in the wood, in the hill of
south of Jeshimon?  23:20 Now therefore, O
ire of thy soul to come down;
t shall be to deliver him into the king's hand.
e of the LORD; for ye have compassion
me.
and know and see his place where
t is, and who hath seen him there: for it is told me that he

e of all the lurking places
th himself, and come ye again to me with the certainty,
 it shall come to pass, if he be in the
and, that I will search him out throughout all the thousands of
 they arose, and went to Ziph before Saul: but David and his
ness of Maon, in the plain on the south of
 went to seek him. And they told David;
herefore he came down into a rock, and abode in the wilderness of
ul heard that, he pursued after David in the
went on this side of the mountain, and David and his
in: and David made haste to get away for
fear of Saul; for Saul and his men compassed David and his men round
them.
unto Saul, saying, Haste thee, and
for the Philistines have invaded the land.
suing after David, and went
hilistines: therefore they called that place
ent up from thence, and dwelt in strong holds at
s, when Saul was returned from following the
ing, Behold, David is in the
f Engedi.
usand chosen men out of all Israel, and
ent to seek David and his men upon the rocks of the wild goats.
to the sheepcotes by the way, where was a cave; and
 and David and his men remained in the
des of the cave.
vid said unto him, Behold the day of which the
deliver thine enemy into thine
 thou mayest do to him as it shall seem good unto thee. Then
ff the skirt of Saul's robe privily.
:5 And it came to pass afterward, that David's heart smote him,
off Saul's skirt.
 his men, The LORD forbid that I should do this
ointed, to stretch forth mine hand
t him, seeing he is the anointed of the LORD.
ith these words, and suffered them
 rise against Saul. But Saul rose up out of the cave, and went
David also arose afterward, and went out of the cave, and cried
 My lord the king. And when Saul looked behind him,
the earth, and bowed himself.
David said to Saul, Wherefore hearest thou men's words,
th thy hurt?  24:10 Behold, this day thine
ivered thee to day into mine
cave: and some bade me kill thee: but mine eye spared
put forth mine hand against my lord; for
he is the LORD's anointed.
er, my father, see, yea, see the skirt of thy robe in my
f the skirt of thy robe, and killed thee
not, know thou and see that there is neither evil nor transgression in
nd I have not sinned against thee; yet thou huntest my
e LORD judge between me and thee, and the LORD avenge me of
ll not be upon thee.
 proverb of the ancients, Wickedness proceedeth from
l not be upon thee.
 the king of Israel come out? after whom dost thou
a flea.
ge, and judge between me and thee, and
e, and plead my cause, and deliver me out of thine hand.
s, when David had made an end of speaking
 this thy voice, my son
ifted up his voice, and wept.
 he said to David, Thou art more righteous than I: for thou
whereas I have rewarded thee evil.
8 And thou hast shewed this day how that thou hast dealt well with
 when the LORD had delivered me into thine hand, thou
 if a man find his enemy, will he let him go well away?
hee good for that thou hast done unto me
this day.
 well that thou shalt surely be king, and
lished in thine hand.
herefore unto me by the LORD, that thou wilt not cut
 thou wilt not destroy my name out of my
father's house.
nto Saul. And Saul went home; but David and his
5:1 And Samuel died; and all the Israelites were gathered together,
m, and buried him in his house at Ramah. And David
erness of Paran.
an in Maon, whose possessions were in Carmel;
d three thousand sheep, and a
ats: and he was shearing his sheep in Carmel.
bal; and the name of his wife
d she was a woman of good understanding, and of a beautiful
n was churlish and evil in his doings; and he
d David heard in the wilderness that Nabal did shear his sheep.
nt out ten young men, and David said unto the young
go to Nabal, and greet him in my name:
:6 And thus shall ye say to him that liveth in prosperity, Peace be
nd peace be to thine house, and peace be unto all that
 have heard that thou hast shearers: now thy shepherds
them not, neither was there ought missing
mel.
ill shew thee. Wherefore let the
n find favour in thine eyes: for we come in a good day: give,
er cometh to thine hand unto thy servants, and to
avid's young men came, they spake to Nabal according to
 of David, and ceased.
answered David's servants, and said, Who is David? and
re be many servants now a days that break
Shall I then take my bread, and my water, and my flesh that I
earers, and give it unto men, whom I know not
ng men turned their way, and went
and came and told him all those sayings.

ye on every man his sword. And
d on every man his sword; and David also girded on his
er David about four hundred men; and two
hundred abode by the stuff.
ne of the young men told Abigail, Nabal's wife, saying,
rs out of the wilderness to salute our
ster; and he railed on them.
the men were very good unto us, and we were not hurt,
as long as we were conversant with them,
when we were in the fields: 25:16 They were a wall unto us both by
ll the while we were with them keeping the sheep.
nsider what thou wilt do; for evil is
ermined against our master, and against all his household: for he
Belial, that a man cannot speak to him.

wo hundred loaves, and two
e, and five sheep ready dressed, and five measures of
clusters of raisins, and two hundred
s of figs, and laid them on asses.
9 And she said unto her servants, Go on before me; behold, I come
e told not her husband Nabal.
 it was so, as she rode on the ass, that she came down by the
nd, behold, David and his men came down against
 David had said, Surely in vain have I kept all that this
ness, so that nothing was missed of all that
ed me evil for good.
also do God unto the enemies of David, if I leave of
 morning light any that pisseth against
he wall.
id, she hasted, and lighted off the ass,
and fell before David on her face, and bowed herself to the ground,
at his feet, and said, Upon me, my lord, upon me let
e handmaid, I pray thee, speak in thine
udience, and hear the words of thine handmaid.
, regard this man of Belial, even
for as his name is, so is he; Nabal is his name, and folly is
 handmaid saw not the young men of my lord, whom
efore, my lord, as the LORD liveth, and as thy soul
thholden thee from coming to shed
and from avenging thyself with thine own hand, now let thine
 seek evil to my lord, be as Nabal.
27 And now this blessing which thine handmaid hath brought unto my
n be given unto the young men that follow my lord.
 trespass of thine handmaid: for the
 will certainly make my lord a sure house; because my lord
the LORD, and evil hath not been found in thee
risen to pursue thee, and to seek thy soul: but the
in the bundle of life with the LORD thy
od; and the souls of thine enemies, them shall he sling out, as out
f a sling.
ass, when the LORD shall have done to my
lord according to all the good that he hath spoken concerning thee,
appointed thee ruler over Israel; 25:31 That this shall
offence of heart unto my lord, either that
my lord hath avenged himself:
e LORD shall have dealt well with my lord, then remember
nd David said to Abigail, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel,
ay to meet me: 25:33 And blessed be thy advice,
t me this day from coming to shed
and from avenging myself with mine own hand.
God of Israel liveth, which hath
back from hurting thee, except thou hadst hasted and come to
had not been left unto Nabal by the morning
.
hat which she had brought him,
nto her, Go up in peace to thine house; see, I have
e accepted thy person.
l came to Nabal; and, behold, he held a feast in his
g; and Nabal's heart was merry within
, for he was very drunken: wherefore she told him nothing, less or
morning light.
s in the morning, when the wine was gone out
ese things, that his heart died
m, and he became as a stone.
it came to pass about ten days after, that the LORD smote
5:39 And when David heard that Nabal was dead, he said, Blessed be
ath pleaded the cause of my reproach from the hand of
ant from evil: for the LORD hath returned
. And David sent and communed
l, to take her to him to wife.
d when the servants of David were come to Abigail to Carmel,
aying, David sent us unto thee, to take thee to
, and bowed herself on her face to the earth, and
be a servant to wash the feet of the
ants of my lord.
ed, and arose and rode upon an ass, with five
and she went after the messengers
d, and became his wife.
o took Ahinoam of Jezreel; and they were also both of
Saul had given Michal his daughter, David's wife, to Phalti
 was of Gallim.
ame unto Saul to Gibeah, saying, Doth not David
h, which is before Jeshimon?  26:2
aul arose, and went down to the wilderness of Ziph, having three
n of Israel with him, to seek David in the
ched in the hill of Hachilah, which is before
 in the wilderness, and he saw
came after him into the wilderness.
4 David therefore sent out spies, and understood that Saul was come

ace where Saul had pitched:
eld the place where Saul lay, and Abner the son of Ner,
d Saul lay in the trench, and the people
pitched round about him.
ered David and said to Ahimelech the Hittite, and to
other to Joab, saying, Who will go down
ith me to Saul to the camp? And Abishai said, I will go down with
David and Abishai came to the people by night: and, behold,
n the trench, and his spear stuck in the ground
eople lay round about him.
id Abishai to David, God hath delivered thine enemy into
herefore let me smite him, I pray thee, with
nd I will not smite him the

 him not: for who can stretch
and against the LORD's anointed, and be guiltless?  26:10
s the LORD liveth, the LORD shall smite him;
all descend into battle, and
6:11 The LORD forbid that I should stretch forth mine hand against
ted: but, I pray thee, take thou now the spear that is
e of water, and let us go.
id took the spear and the cruse of water from Saul's
y, and no man saw it, nor knew it,
r awaked: for they were all asleep; because a deep sleep from
pon them.
 the other side, and stood on the top of
an hill afar off; a great space being between them: 26:14 And David
ople, and to Abner the son of Ner, saying, Answerest
swered and said, Who art thou that
 to the king?  26:15 And David said to Abner, Art not thou a
s like to thee in Israel? wherefore then hast
there came one of the people in
y the king thy lord.
s not good that thou hast done. As the LORD liveth,
e have not kept your master, the LORD's
nointed.
pear is, and the cruse of water that was
at his bolster.
id's voice, and said, Is this thy voice, my son
ce, my lord, O king.
 Wherefore doth my lord thus pursue after his
at evil is in mine hand?  26:19
fore, I pray thee, let my lord the king hear the words of his
have stirred thee up against me, let him accept
ldren of men, cursed be they before
ORD; for they have driven me out this day from abiding in the
RD, saying, Go, serve other gods.
 Now therefore, let not my blood fall to the earth before the
 the king of Israel is come out to seek a flea,
n the mountains.
I have sinned: return, my son David: for I will
ul was precious in thine eyes this
ehold, I have played the fool, and have erred exceedingly.
ed and said, Behold the king's spear! and let
tch it.
man his righteousness and his
s; for the LORD delivered thee into my hand to day, but I
ine hand against the LORD's anointed.
6:24 And, behold, as thy life was much set by this day in mine eyes,
 be much set by in the eyes of the LORD, and let him
ion.
ssed be thou, my son David: thou
th do great things, and also shalt still prevail. So David
l returned to his place.
 said in his heart, I shall now perish one day by the
g better for me than that I should
ly escape into the land of the Philistines; and Saul shall
e any more in any coast of Israel: so shall I
avid arose, and he passed over with the six hundred men that
ish, the son of Maoch, king of Gath.
:3 And David dwelt with Achish at Gath, he and his men, every man
d, even David with his two wives, Ahinoam the
tess, Nabal's wife.
d Saul that David was fled to Gath: and he sought
d David said unto Achish, If I have now found grace in thine
 a place in some town in the country, that I may
rvant dwell in the royal city with
 27:6 Then Achish gave him Ziklag that day: wherefore Ziklag
ngs of Judah unto this day.
e time that David dwelt in the country of the Philistines
months.
 up, and invaded the Geshurites, and
Gezrites, and the Amalekites: for those nations were of old the
land, as thou goest to Shur, even unto the land of
he land, and left neither man nor woman alive,
n, and the asses, and the camels,
 apparel, and returned, and came to Achish.
e made a road to day? And David
inst the south of Judah, and against the south of the
e south of the Kenites.
 saved neither man nor woman alive, to bring tidings to
uld tell on us, saying, So did David, and
elleth in the country of the

g, He hath made his people
 to abhor him; therefore he shall be my servant for
ss in those days, that the Philistines gathered
to fight with Israel. And Achish
o David, Know thou assuredly, that thou shalt go out with me
y men.
urely thou shalt know what thy servant
n do. And Achish said to David, Therefore will I make thee keeper of
ever.
 Israel had lamented him, and buried
in Ramah, even in his own city. And Saul had put away those that
ts, and the wizards, out of the land.
8:4 And the Philistines gathered themselves together, and came and
m: and Saul gathered all Israel together, and they
hen Saul saw the host of the Philistines, he was afraid, and
bled.
e LORD, the LORD answered him not,
r by dreams, nor by Urim, nor by prophets.
 Seek me a woman that hath a
rit, that I may go to her, and enquire of her. And his
, there is a woman that hath a familiar
pirit at Endor.
 himself, and put on other raiment, and he
e to the woman by night: and
ray thee, divine unto me by the familiar spirit, and bring
name unto thee.
 unto him, Behold, thou knowest what Saul hath
 have familiar spirits, and the
out of the land: wherefore then layest thou a snare for my
?  28:10 And Saul sware to her by the LORD,
 no punishment happen to thee
ing.
all I bring up unto thee? And he
ing me up Samuel.
man saw Samuel, she cried with a loud voice: and
hy hast thou deceived me? for thou
ul.
e not afraid: for what sawest thou?
he woman said unto Saul, I saw gods ascending out of the earth.
 unto her, What form is he of? And she said, An old
d with a mantle. And Saul perceived
it was Samuel, and he stooped with his face to the ground, and
:15 And Samuel said to Saul, Why hast thou disquieted me, to bring
answered, I am sore distressed; for the Philistines
 departed from me, and answereth me no
re, neither by prophets, nor by dreams: therefore I have called
est make known unto me what I shall do.

st thou ask of me, seeing the
arted from thee, and is become thine enemy?  28:17 And the
s he spake by me: for the LORD hath rent the
t to thy neighbour, even to
Because thou obeyedst not the voice of the LORD, nor
on Amalek, therefore hath the LORD done
his thing unto thee this day.
eover the LORD will also deliver Israel with thee into the
 and to morrow shalt thou and thy sons be with
host of Israel into the hand of
stines.
y all along on the earth, and was sore
raid, because of the words of Samuel: and there was no strength in
eaten no bread all the day, nor all the night.
, and saw that he was sore troubled,
said unto him, Behold, thine handmaid hath obeyed thy voice, and I
 in my hand, and have hearkened unto thy words which
 Now therefore, I pray thee, hearken thou also unto the voice of
d let me set a morsel of bread before thee; and eat,
, when thou goest on thy way.
 he refused, and said, I will not eat. But his servants,
ompelled him; and he hearkened unto their
t upon the bed.
 a fat calf in the house; and she hasted, and
d it, and did bake unleavened
of: 28:25 And she brought it before Saul, and before his
. Then they rose up, and went away that
ight.
 together all their armies to Aphek:
the Israelites pitched by a fountain which is in Jezreel.
he Philistines passed on by hundreds, and by
d on in the rereward with
 Then said the princes of the Philistines, What do these Hebrews
said unto the princes of the Philistines, Is not
e king of Israel, which hath been
 these days, or these years, and I have found no fault in him
 unto this day?  29:4 And the princes of the
he princes of the Philistines
im, Make this fellow return, that he may go again to his
inted him, and let him not go down with us
dversary to us: for wherewith
econcile himself unto his master? should it not be with the
:5 Is not this David, of whom they sang one to
 his thousands, and David his ten
ds?  29:6 Then Achish called David, and said unto him, Surely,
thou hast been upright, and thy going out and thy
good in my sight: for I have not
il in thee since the day of thy coming unto me unto this day:
s favour thee not.
eturn, and go in peace, that thou displease not
:8 And David said unto Achish, But what have I done? and what hast
y servant so long as I have been with thee unto this
gainst the enemies of my lord the king?
9:9 And Achish answered and said to David, I know that thou art good
s an angel of God: notwithstanding the princes of the
ll not go up with us to the battle.
10 Wherefore now rise up early in the morning with thy master's
ome with thee: and as soon as ye be up early in the
.
rly to depart in the morning, to
nto the land of the Philistines. And the Philistines went up
d it came to pass, when David and his men were come to Ziklag
t the Amalekites had invaded the south, and
it with fire; 30:2 And had
n captives, that were therein: they slew not any, either
d them away, and went on their way.
3 So David and his men came to the city, and, behold, it was burned
their wives, and their sons, and their daughters, were
 David and the people that were with him lifted up their
 had no more power to weep.
vid's two wives were taken captives, Ahinoam the
 of Nabal the Carmelite.
 was greatly distressed; for the people spake of stoning
ll the people was grieved, every man for his
encouraged himself in the LORD

st, Ahimelech's son, I pray
e hither the ephod. And Abiathar brought thither the
vid enquired at the LORD, saying, Shall I pursue after this
 them? And he answered him, Pursue: for thou
t fail recover all.
 he and the six hundred men that were with him, and
those that were left behind stayed.
10 But David pursued, he and four hundred men: for two hundred
were so faint that they could not go over the
an Egyptian in the field, and brought him to
eat; and they made him drink
 And they gave him a piece of a cake of figs, and two
 he had eaten, his spirit came again to
im: for he had eaten no bread, nor drunk any water, three days and

longest thou? and whence art
 said, I am a young man of Egypt, servant to an Amalekite;
ecause three days agone I fell sick.
:14 We made an invasion upon the south of the Cherethites, and upon
 belongeth to Judah, and upon the south of Caleb; and

bring me down to this company?
d, Swear unto me by God, that thou wilt neither kill me, nor
nds of my master, and I will bring thee down to
had brought him down, behold, they were spread
d drinking, and dancing, because
he great spoil that they had taken out of the land of the
he land of Judah.
 them from the twilight even unto the evening of
t a man of them, save four hundred
men, which rode upon camels, and fled.
30:18 And David recovered all that the Amalekites had carried away:
ed his two wives.
othing lacking to them, neither small nor great,
r spoil, nor any thing that they had
n to them: David recovered all.
nd David took all the flocks and the herds, which they drave
tle, and said, This is David's spoil.
0:21 And David came to the two hundred men, which were so faint that
 follow David, whom they had made also to abide at the
orth to meet David, and to meet the people
near to the people, he saluted
0:22 Then answered all the wicked men and men of Belial, of those
vid, and said, Because they went not with us, we will
oil that we have recovered, save to every
may lead them away, and
Then said David, Ye shall not do so, my brethren, with that
en us, who hath preserved us, and delivered the
ur hand.
o you in this matter? but as his part is
that goeth down to the battle, so shall his part be that tarrieth by
y shall part alike.
 from that day forward, that he made it a statute
this day.
Ziklag, he sent of the spoil unto the
ers of Judah, even to his friends, saying, Behold a present for you
 the enemies of the LORD; 30:27 To them which were in
e in south Ramoth, and to them which were
n Aroer, and to them which
th, and to them which were in Eshtemoa, 30:29 And to
 to them which were in the cities of the
Jerahmeelites, and to them which were in the cities of the Kenites,
em which were in Hormah, and to them which were in
e in Athach, 30:31 And to them which
 in Hebron, and to all the places where David himself and his men
t.
nst Israel: and the men of Israel
om before the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa.
istines followed hard upon Saul and upon his sons;
n, and Abinadab, and Melchishua,
ons.
nst Saul, and the archers hit him;
 was sore wounded of the archers.
Then said Saul unto his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust
th; lest these uncircumcised come and thrust me
urbearer would not; for he was sore
d. Therefore Saul took a sword, and fell upon it.
saw that Saul was dead, he fell
upon his sword, and died with him.
 So Saul died, and his three sons, and his armourbearer, and all
 day together.
 Israel that were on the other side of the
side Jordan, saw that the men
led, and that Saul and his sons were dead, they forsook the
he Philistines came and dwelt in them.
31:8 And it came to pass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to
n, that they found Saul and his three sons fallen in
 cut off his head, and stripped off his armour, and sent
stines round about, to publish it in the
house of their idols, and among the people.
house of Ashtaroth: and they
 body to the wall of Bethshan.
d when the inhabitants of Jabeshgilead heard of that which the
 to Saul; 31:12 All the valiant men arose, and
 Saul and the bodies of his sons
 wall of Bethshan, and came to Jabesh, and burnt them there.
their bones, and buried them under a tree at

alled:

of Saul, when David was
 slaughter of the Amalekites, and David had abode two
ven to pass on the third day, that,
d, a man came out of the camp from Saul with his clothes rent,
ead: and so it was, when he came to David, that he
ance.
 whence comest thou? And he said unto
, Out of the camp of Israel am I escaped.
he matter? I pray thee, tell
e answered, That the people are fled from the battle, and many of
re fallen and dead; and Saul and Jonathan his son are
aid unto the young man that told him, How knowest thou
on be dead?  1:6 And the young man that
old him said, As I happened by chance upon mount Gilboa, behold, Saul
is spear; and, lo, the chariots and horsemen followed
en he looked behind him, he saw me, and called unto me. And

And I answered him, I am an

thee, upon me, and slay me:
s come upon me, because my life is yet whole in me.
 slew him, because I was sure that he
ld not live after that he was fallen: and I took the crown that was
and the bracelet that was on his arm, and have brought

 and rent them; and likewise
that were with him: 1:12 And they mourned, and wept, and
l, and for Jonathan his son, and for the
people of the LORD, and for the house of Israel; because they were
ord.
 man that told him, Whence art thou?
he answered, I am the son of a stranger, an Amalekite.
im, How wast thou not afraid to stretch
orth thine hand to destroy the LORD's anointed?  1:15 And David
oung men, and said, Go near, and fall upon him. And
:16 And David said unto him, Thy blood be upon thy head; for thy
ed against thee, saying, I have slain the LORD's
ed with this lamentation over Saul and over
em teach the children of Judah
 the bow: behold, it is written in the book of Jasher.)
s slain upon thy high places: how are the
 publish it not in the
; lest the daughters of the Philistines rejoice,
cised triumph.
boa, let there be no dew, neither let there be
ngs: for there the shield of the
s vilely cast away, the shield of Saul, as though he had not
.
m the fat of the mighty, the bow
han turned not back, and the sword of Saul returned not empty.
than were lovely and pleasant in their lives, and in
ded: they were swifter than eagles, they
were stronger than lions.
ters of Israel, weep over Saul, who clothed you in
o put on ornaments of gold upon your
rel.
the midst of the battle! O Jonathan,
 wast slain in thine high places.
I am distressed for thee, my brother Jonathan: very pleasant hast
: thy love to me was wonderful, passing the love of
ty fallen, and the weapons of war perished!  2:1
at David enquired of the LORD,
all I go up into any of the cities of Judah? And the LORD
 David said, Whither shall I go up? And he
up thither, and his two wives also, Ahinoam the
ife the Carmelite.
 were with him did David bring up, every man with
the cities of Hebron.
f Judah came, and there they anointed David king over
told David, saying, That the men of
hgilead were they that buried Saul.
 And David sent messengers unto the men of Jabeshgilead, and said
d be ye of the LORD, that ye have shewed this
ul, and have buried him.
e LORD shew kindness and truth unto you: and I also will
 because ye have done this thing.
herefore now let your hands be strengthened, and be ye valiant:
l is dead, and also the house of Judah have
Abner the son of Ner, captain of Saul's host, took Ishbosheth
brought him over to Mahanaim; 2:9 And made him
ites, and over Jezreel, and over
 and over Benjamin, and over all Israel.

rs old when he began to reign
, and reigned two years. But the house of Judah followed
e that David was king in Hebron over the house of
ths.
 the servants of Ishbosheth the son
ul, went out from Mahanaim to Gibeon.
:13 And Joab the son of Zeruiah, and the servants of David, went out,
her by the pool of Gibeon: and they sat down, the one on
and the other on the other side of the pool.
 young men now arise, and play
 And Joab said, Let them arise.
en there arose and went over by number twelve of Benjamin,
sheth the son of Saul, and twelve of the
servants of David.
 every one his fellow by the head, and thrust his
ey fell down together: wherefore that
ce was called Helkathhazzurim, which is in Gibeon.
 battle that day; and Abner was beaten,
nd the men of Israel, before the servants of David.
s of Zeruiah there, Joab, and Abishai,
d Asahel: and Asahel was as light of foot as a wild roe.
after Abner; and in going he turned not to the
owing Abner.
ind him, and said, Art thou Asahel? And he
o him, Turn thee aside to thy right hand or to
f the young men, and take thee his
.
following of him.
gain to Asahel, Turn thee aside from following
 the ground? how then should I
 face to Joab thy brother?  2:23 Howbeit he refused to turn
with the hinder end of the spear smote him
 out behind him; and he fell
and died in the same place: and it came to pass, that as
where Asahel fell down and died stood still.
fter Abner: and the sun went down
ey were come to the hill of Ammah, that lieth before Giah by
ess of Gibeon.
 Benjamin gathered themselves together after
 on the top of an hill.
 called to Joab, and said, Shall the sword devour for
it will be bitterness in the latter end?
how long shall it be then, ere thou bid the people return from
hren?  2:27 And Joab said, As God liveth, unless
the morning the people had gone up
one from following his brother.
 Joab blew a trumpet, and all the people stood still, and
ore, neither fought they any more.
 And Abner and his men walked all that night through the plain,
dan, and went through all Bithron, and they came to
rned from following Abner: and when he had gathered
lacked of David's servants nineteen men
nd Asahel.
id had smitten of Benjamin, and of Abner's
e men died.
l, and buried him in the sepulchre of his
and his men went all night,
 to Hebron at break of day.
re was long war between the house of Saul and the house of
tronger and stronger, and the house of Saul
o David were sons born in Hebron: and his firstborn was
elitess; 3:3 And his second, Chileab, of
Abigail the wife of Nabal the Carmelite; and the third, Absalom the
he daughter of Talmai king of Geshur; 3:4 And the
th; and the fifth, Shephatiah the son
Abital; 3:5 And the sixth, Ithream, by Eglah David's wife. These
 in Hebron.
ile there was war between the house of Saul
 himself strong for the house

was Rizpah, the daughter of
bosheth said to Abner, Wherefore hast thou gone in unto
 Then was Abner very wroth for the words of
, which against Judah do shew
is day unto the house of Saul thy father, to his brethren,
have not delivered thee into the hand of
David, that thou chargest me to day with a fault concerning this
God to Abner, and more also, except, as the LORD
to him; 3:10 To translate the
m the house of Saul, and to set up the throne of David over
from Dan even to Beersheba.
 could not answer Abner a word again, because he feared
 messengers to David on his behalf, saying, Whose
y league with me, and, behold, my
all be with thee, to bring about all Israel unto thee.
will make a league with thee: but one thing
not see my face, except thou
Michal Saul's daughter, when thou comest to see my face.
engers to Ishbosheth Saul's son, saying,
Deliver me my wife Michal, which I espoused to me for an hundred
hilistines.
nd took her from her husband, even from
haltiel the son of Laish.
husband went with her along weeping behind her to
him, Go, return. And he returned.
And Abner had communication with the elders of Israel, saying, Ye
in times past to be king over you: 3:18 Now then do
 David, saying, By the hand of my
 David I will save my people Israel out of the hand of the
the hand of all their enemies.
 Abner also spake in the ears of Benjamin: and Abner went also
 of David in Hebron all that seemed good to
le house of Benjamin.
e to David to Hebron, and twenty men with him. And
t were with him a feast.
 said unto David, I will arise and go, and will gather
king, that they may make a league with
ee, and that thou mayest reign over all that thine heart desireth.
bner away; and he went in peace.
nd, behold, the servants of David and Joab came from pursuing a
in a great spoil with them: but Abner was not with
 him away, and he was gone in peace.
23 When Joab and all the host that was with him were come, they told
Abner the son of Ner came to the king, and he hath sent
 peace.
, and said, What hast thou done?
Abner came unto thee; why is it that thou hast sent him away,
  3:25 Thou knowest Abner the son of Ner, that he
 thy going out and thy coming in, and
know all that thou doest.
 Joab was come out from David, he sent messengers after
ain from the well of Sirah: but David knew
ned to Hebron, Joab took him aside in the
 him there under the fifth
ied, for the blood of Asahel his brother.
 he said, I and my kingdom are
before the LORD for ever from the blood of Abner the son of
n the head of Joab, and on all his father's
house of Joab one that hath an
that is a leper, or that leaneth on a staff, or that falleth
lacketh bread.
i his brother slew Abner, because he had slain
e battle.
and to all the people that were with him,
cloth, and mourn before
avid himself followed the bier.
d they buried Abner in Hebron: and the king lifted up his
ave of Abner; and all the people wept.
3:33 And the king lamented over Abner, and said, Died Abner as a fool
Thy hands were not bound, nor thy feet put into fetters:
cked men, so fellest thou. And all the
ople wept again over him.
 all the people came to cause David to eat meat while it
saying, So do God to me, and more also, if I
un be down.
k notice of it, and it pleased them: as
hatsoever the king did pleased all the people.
rael understood that day that it was
of the king to slay Abner the son of Ner.
s, Know ye not that there is a
 a great man fallen this day in Israel?  3:39 And I am this
ed king; and these men the sons of Zeruiah be
d the doer of evil according to
dness.
at Abner was dead in Hebron, his hands
re feeble, and all the Israelites were troubled.
hat were captains of bands: the name
he one was Baanah, and the name of the other Rechab, the sons of
e, of the children of Benjamin: (for Beeroth also
And the Beerothites fled to Gittaim, and were sojourners there
4 And Jonathan, Saul's son, had a son that was
old when the tidings came of Saul
athan out of Jezreel, and his nurse took him up, and fled: and
she made haste to flee, that he fell, and became
h.
thite, Rechab and Baanah, went,
about the heat of the day to the house of Ishbosheth, who lay
4:6 And they came thither into the midst of the house, as though they
tched wheat; and they smote him under the fifth rib: and
her escaped.
o the house, he lay on his bed in his
chamber, and they smote him, and slew him, and beheaded him, and
 gat them away through the plain all night.
osheth unto David to Hebron, and
the king, Behold the head of Ishbosheth the son of Saul thine
hy life; and the LORD hath avenged my lord the
ed.
aanah his brother, the sons of
 Beerothite, and said unto them, As the LORD liveth, who
of all adversity, 4:10 When one told me,
saying, Behold, Saul is dead, thinking to have brought good tidings, I
 him, and slew him in Ziklag, who thought that I would
his tidings: 4:11 How much more, when
ked men have slain a righteous person in his own house upon his
erefore now require his blood of your hand, and
 And David commanded his young men,
hey slew them, and cut off their hands and their feet, and hanged
pool in Hebron. But they took the head of Ishbosheth,
e of Abner in Hebron.
 the tribes of Israel to David unto Hebron, and
one and thy flesh.
t, when Saul was king over us, thou wast he that
el: and the LORD said to thee, Thou
 feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be a captain over Israel.
lders of Israel came to the king to Hebron; and king
in Hebron before the LORD: and they
ted David king over Israel.
as thirty years old when he began to reign, and he reigned
ebron he reigned over Judah seven years and six months: and in
 thirty and three years over all Israel and Judah.
ent to Jerusalem unto the Jebusites, the
inhabitants of the land: which spake unto David, saying, Except thou
blind and the lame, thou shalt not come in hither:
ither.
strong hold of Zion: the same is the
 of David.
ay, Whosoever getteth up to the gutter,
nd smiteth the Jebusites, and the lame and the blind that are hated
, he shall be chief and captain. Wherefore they said,
not come into the house.
welt in the fort, and called it the city of David. And
 Millo and inward.
on, and grew great, and the LORD God of hosts was
of Tyre sent messengers to David, and cedar trees,
they built David an house.
id perceived that the LORD had established him king over
alted his kingdom for his people Israel's
cubines and wives out of Jerusalem,
 he was come from Hebron: and there were yet sons and daughters
:14 And these be the names of those that were born unto him in
 and Shobab, and Nathan, and Solomon, 5:15 Ibhar
 Japhia, 5:16 And Elishama, and
nd Eliphalet.
ines heard that they had anointed David king
up to seek David; and David
and went down to the hold.
listines also came and spread themselves in the valley of
d enquired of the LORD, saying, Shall I go up to the
 them into mine hand? And the LORD said
nto David, Go up: for I will doubtless deliver the Philistines into
5:20 And David came to Baalperazim, and David smote them there, and
hath broken forth upon mine enemies before me, as the
e called the name of that place
im.
es, and David and his men burned

n, and spread themselves in
 Rephaim.
of the LORD, he said, Thou shalt not go
p; but fetch a compass behind them, and come upon them over against
ees.
est the sound of a going in the tops
he mulberry trees, that then thou shalt bestir thyself: for then
out before thee, to smite the host of the
 the LORD had commanded him; and smote the
 Gazer.
her all the chosen men of Israel,
thousand.
 with all the people that were with him
rom Baale of Judah, to bring up from thence the ark of God, whose
 the name of the LORD of hosts that dwelleth between
 set the ark of God upon a new cart, and brought it out of
at was in Gibeah: and Uzzah and Ahio, the sons
6:4 And they brought it out of the house of Abinadab which was at
ing the ark of God: and Ahio went before the ark.
 of Israel played before the LORD on
manner of instruments made of fir wood, even on harps, and on
mbrels, and on cornets, and on cymbals.

ingfloor, Uzzah put forth his
 ark of God, and took hold of it; for the oxen shook it.
 LORD was kindled against Uzzah; and God smote
e died by the ark of God.
 was displeased, because the LORD had made a breach upon
ame of the place Perezuzzah to this day.

t day, and said, How shall the
 LORD come to me?  6:10 So David would not remove the ark of
 the city of David: but David carried it aside
te.
ued in the house of Obededom the
three months: and the LORD blessed Obededom, and all his
was told king David, saying, The LORD hath blessed the
hat pertaineth unto him, because of the
rk of God. So David went and brought up the ark of God from the house
nto the city of David with gladness.
13 And it was so, that when they that bare the ark of the LORD had
he sacrificed oxen and fatlings.
nd David danced before the LORD with all his might; and David
en ephod.
se of Israel brought up the ark of the
RD with shouting, and with the sound of the trumpet.
ORD came into the city of David, Michal
aul's daughter looked through a window, and saw king David leaping
re the LORD; and she despised him in her heart.
of the LORD, and set it in his place,
the midst of the tabernacle that David had pitched for it: and
offerings and peace offerings before the LORD.
 an end of offering burnt offerings
eace offerings, he blessed the people in the name of the LORD of
 he dealt among all the people, even among the whole multitude
o the women as men, to every one a cake of bread,
flagon of wine. So all the people
d every one to his house.
id returned to bless his household. And Michal the
t David, and said, How glorious was
ing of Israel to day, who uncovered himself to day in the eyes of
his servants, as one of the vain fellows shamelessly
David said unto Michal, It was before
 LORD, which chose me before thy father, and before all his house,
ler over the people of the LORD, over Israel:
.
 thus, and will be base in mine
: and of the maidservants which thou hast spoken of, of them
ur.
of Saul had no child unto the day
death.
e king sat in his house, and the LORD
 given him rest round about from all his enemies; 7:2 That the king
n the prophet, See now, I dwell in an house of cedar,
ithin curtains.
the king, Go, do all that is in thine heart;
it came to pass that night, that the word of the LORD came
 Go and tell my servant David, Thus saith the
r me to dwell in?  7:6 Whereas I
 dwelt in any house since the time that I brought up the
Egypt, even to this day, but have walked in
ll the places wherein I have walked with all the children of
with any of the tribes of Israel, whom I
commanded to feed my people Israel, saying, Why build ye not me an
 7:8 Now therefore so shalt thou say unto my servant
hosts, I took thee from the sheepcote,
om following the sheep, to be ruler over my people, over Israel: 7:9
 thee whithersoever thou wentest, and have cut off all
ht, and have made thee a great name, like
n the earth.
nt a place for my people Israel, and will
e of their own, and move no
 shall the children of wickedness afflict them any more,
 since the time that I commanded judges to
d thee to rest from all thine
so the LORD telleth thee that he will make thee an house.
be fulfilled, and thou shalt sleep with thy
hee, which shall proceed out of
s, and I will establish his kingdom.
13 He shall build an house for my name, and I will stablish the
om for ever.
 and he shall be my son. If he commit
quity, I will chasten him with the rod of men, and with the stripes
 of men: 7:15 But my mercy shall not depart away from
whom I put away before thee.
hine house and thy kingdom shall be established for ever
all be established for ever.
ding to all these words, and according to all this vision,
 David.
nd sat before the LORD, and he said,
am I, O Lord GOD? and what is my house, that thou hast brought me
nd this was yet a small thing in thy sight, O Lord
f thy servant's house for a great
o come. And is this the manner of man, O Lord GOD?  7:20 And
e unto thee? for thou, Lord GOD, knowest thy
and according to thine own heart, hast thou
y servant know them.
u art great, O LORD God: for there is none like
de thee, according to all that we
ard with our ears.
tion in the earth is like thy people, even like
 a people to himself, and to make
ame, and to do for you great things and terrible, for thy land,
which thou redeemedst to thee from Egypt, from the
r thou hast confirmed to thyself thy
le Israel to be a people unto thee for ever: and thou, LORD, art

 thou hast spoken concerning
 and concerning his house, establish it for ever, and do
 And let thy name be magnified for ever, saying, The LORD of hosts
Israel: and let the house of thy servant David be
For thou, O LORD of hosts, God of Israel, hast revealed to thy
ill build thee an house: therefore hath thy
 prayer unto thee.
 GOD, thou art that God, and thy words be true,
s unto thy servant: 7:29 Therefore
t it please thee to bless the house of thy servant, that it may
efore thee: for thou, O Lord GOD, hast spoken it:
se of thy servant be blessed for

avid smote the Philistines,
hem: and David took Methegammah out of the hand of the
mote Moab, and measured them with a line, casting them
h two lines measured he to put to death,
and with one full line to keep alive. And so the Moabites became
and brought gifts.
 Hadadezer, the son of Rehob, king of Zobah, as he
e river Euphrates.
rom him a thousand chariots, and seven hundred
n: and David houghed all the
es, but reserved of them for an hundred chariots.
ascus came to succour Hadadezer king of
obah, David slew of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men.
arrisons in Syria of Damascus: and the Syrians
t gifts. And the LORD preserved
thersoever he went.
the shields of gold that were on the servants of
usalem.
rothai, cities of Hadadezer, king David
ook exceeding much brass.
king of Hamath heard that David had smitten all the host
i sent Joram his son unto king David, to
salute him, and to bless him, because he had fought against Hadadezer,
him: for Hadadezer had wars with Toi. And Joram brought
 and vessels of gold, and vessels of brass:
 unto the LORD, with the silver
that he had dedicated of all nations which he subdued; 8:12
and of the children of Ammon, and of the
Philistines, and of Amalek, and of the spoil of Hadadezer, son of
bah.
 he returned from smiting of the
in the valley of salt, being eighteen thousand men.
Edom; throughout all Edom put he
s, and all they of Edom became David's servants. And the LORD
ersoever he went.
d over all Israel; and David executed judgment
8:16 And Joab the son of Zeruiah was over the host; and Jehoshaphat
ud was recorder; 8:17 And Zadok the son of Ahitub, and
r, were the priests; and Seraiah was the
scribe; 8:18 And Benaiah the son of Jehoiada was over both the
Pelethites; and David's sons were chief rulers.
any that is left of the house of
at I may shew him kindness for Jonathan's sake?  9:2 And there
Saul a servant whose name was Ziba. And when they
ng said unto him, Art thou Ziba?  And
said, Thy servant is he.
ng said, Is there not yet any of the house of Saul, that
 God unto him? And Ziba said unto the king,
on his feet.
 him, Where is he? And Ziba said unto the
r, the son of Ammiel, in
Then king David sent, and fetched him out of the house of Machir,
, from Lodebar.
th, the son of Jonathan, the son of Saul, was
 and did reverence. And David
bosheth. And he answered, Behold thy servant!  9:7 And
t: for I will surely shew thee kindness
or Jonathan thy father's sake, and will restore thee all the land of
r; and thou shalt eat bread at my table continually.
d said, What is thy servant, that thou
ouldest look upon such a dead dog as I am?  9:9 Then the king called
s servant, and said unto him, I have given unto thy
 to Saul and to all his house.
u therefore, and thy sons, and thy servants, shall till the
shalt bring in the fruits, that thy master's
heth thy master's son shall eat
ay at my table. Now Ziba had fifteen sons and twenty
ba unto the king, According to all that my lord the
, so shall thy servant do. As for
sheth, said the king, he shall eat at my table, as one of the
And Mephibosheth had a young son, whose name was Micha. And all
ouse of Ziba were servants unto Mephibosheth.
alem: for he did eat continually at
ing's table; and was lame on both his feet.
that the king of the children of
ed, and Hanun his son reigned in his stead.
dness unto Hanun the son of
s father shewed kindness unto me. And David sent to
servants for his father. And David's
ants came into the land of the children of Ammon.
ldren of Ammon said unto Hanun their
, Thinkest thou that David doth honour thy father, that he hath
o thee? hath not David rather sent his servants
to spy it out, and to overthrow it?
Wherefore Hanun took David's servants, and shaved off the one
 and cut off their garments in the middle, even
ay.
he sent to meet them, because the
e greatly ashamed: and the king said, Tarry at Jericho until
and then return.
dren of Ammon saw that they stank before David,
d the Syrians of Bethrehob and the
s of Zoba, twenty thousand footmen, and of king Maacah a
b twelve thousand men.
vid heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the
children of Ammon came out, and put the battle in array
ate: and the Syrians of Zoba, and of Rehob,
ves in the field.
at the front of the battle was against him before
hoice men of Israel, and put them in
y against the Syrians: 10:10 And the rest of the people he
of Abishai his brother, that he might put them
on.
e too strong for me, then thou
 me: but if the children of Ammon be too strong for thee,
 thee.
t us play the men for our people, and
 the cities of our God: and the LORD do that which seemeth him
oab drew nigh, and the people that were with him, unto the
ns: and they fled before him.
 when the children of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled,
ore Abishai, and entered into the city. So Joab
, and came to Jerusalem.
 the Syrians saw that they were smitten before Israel,
ether.
ought out the Syrians that were beyond
e river: and they came to Helam; and Shobach the captain of the host
ent before them.
told David, he gathered all Israel together, and
lam. And the Syrians set themselves
ray against David, and fought with him.

 and David slew the men of
chariots of the Syrians, and forty thousand horsemen,
 of their host, who died there.
nd when all the kings that were servants to Hadarezer saw that
fore Israel, they made peace with Israel, and
 help the children of Ammon any
11:1 And it came to pass, after the year was expired, at the time when
th to battle, that David sent Joab, and his servants with
they destroyed the children of Ammon, and
at Jerusalem.
in an eveningtide, that David arose from off
he king's house: and from the
 a woman washing herself; and the woman was very beautiful
d David sent and enquired after the woman. And one said, Is not
 daughter of Eliam, the wife of Uriah the Hittite?
and took her; and she came in unto
nd he lay with her; for she was purified from her uncleanness:
o her house.
ed, and sent and told David, and said, I am
oab, saying, Send me Uriah the Hittite. And
hen Uriah was come unto him, David demanded of him how Joab
 did, and how the war prospered.
nd David said to Uriah, Go down to thy house, and wash thy feet.
 out of the king's house, and there followed him a
1:9 But Uriah slept at the door of the king's house with all the
rd, and went not down to his house.
10 And when they had told David, saying, Uriah went not down unto
said unto Uriah, Camest thou not from thy journey?
unto thine house?  11:11 And Uriah
nto David, The ark, and Israel, and Judah, abide in tents; and
e servants of my lord, are encamped in the open
ouse, to eat and to drink, and to
h my wife? as thou livest, and as thy soul liveth, I will not
12 And David said to Uriah, Tarry here to day also, and to morrow I
epart. So Uriah abode in Jerusalem that day, and the
d had called him, he did eat and drink before him;
en he went out to lie on his bed with
 servants of his lord, but went not down to his house.
in the morning, that David wrote a letter to
.
ing, Set ye Uriah in the
 hottest battle, and retire ye from him, that he may
And it came to pass, when Joab observed the city, that he
ce where he knew that valiant men were.

nd fought with Joab: and
of the people of the servants of David; and Uriah the
hen Joab sent and told David all the things concerning the war;
he messenger, saying, When thou hast made an end of
unto the king, 11:20 And if so be that
e king's wrath arise, and he say unto thee, Wherefore approached ye
e city when ye did fight? knew ye not that they would
ho smote Abimelech the son of
h? did not a woman cast a piece of a millstone upon him
 in Thebez? why went ye nigh the wall? then
 is dead also.
ent, and came and shewed David all that Joab
senger said unto David, Surely the men prevailed
nto the field, and we were upon them
 unto the entering of the gate.
nd the shooters shot from off the wall upon thy servants; and
rvants be dead, and thy servant Uriah the Hittite
 said unto the messenger, Thus shalt thou say unto
se thee, for the sword devoureth one
ell as another: make thy battle more strong against the city, and
 encourage thou him.
 wife of Uriah heard that Uriah her husband was

avid sent and fetched her to
nd she became his wife, and bare him a son. But the thing
eased the LORD.
Nathan unto David. And he came unto him, and
ne city; the one rich, and the
.
flocks and herds: 12:3 But the
ad nothing, save one little ewe lamb, which he had bought
grew up together with him, and with his
hildren; it did eat of his own meat, and drank of his own cup, and
, and was unto him as a daughter.
And there came a traveller unto the rich man, and he spared to
k and of his own herd, to dress for the wayfaring
ook the poor man's lamb, and dressed
or the man that was come to him.
nd David's anger was greatly kindled against the man; and he
 LORD liveth, the man that hath done this thing
 restore the lamb fourfold, because
d this thing, and because he had no pity.
 the man. Thus saith the LORD
el, I anointed thee king over Israel, and I delivered thee
 12:8 And I gave thee thy master's house, and
d gave thee the house of Israel
dah; and if that had been too little, I would moreover have
d such things.
 despised the commandment of the LORD, to do
iah the Hittite with the sword,
taken his wife to be thy wife, and hast slain him with the
 Ammon.
hall never depart from thine house;
se thou hast despised me, and hast taken the wife of Uriah the
fe.
I will raise up evil against thee
thine own house, and I will take thy wives before thine eyes,
y neighbour, and he shall lie with thy wives in
 thou didst it secretly: but I will do this thing before all
 sun.
 I have sinned against the LORD. And
an said unto David, The LORD also hath put away thy sin; thou
14 Howbeit, because by this deed thou hast given great occasion to
he LORD to blaspheme, the child also that is born unto
:15 And Nathan departed unto his house. And the LORD struck the
wife bare unto David, and it was very sick.
r the child; and David fasted,
n, and lay all night upon the earth.
:17 And the elders of his house arose, and went to him, to raise him
rth: but he would not, neither did he eat bread with
pass on the seventh day, that the child died. And
ell him that the child was dead: for
 said, Behold, while the child was yet alive, we spake unto him,
earken unto our voice: how will he then vex himself,
is dead?  12:19 But when David saw that
is servants whispered, David perceived that the child was dead:
d unto his servants, Is the child dead? And they
vid arose from the earth, and washed, and anointed
, and came into the house of the LORD,
d worshipped: then he came to his own house; and when he required,
efore him, and he did eat.
aid his servants unto him, What thing is this that thou
and weep for the child, while it was alive;
 rise and eat bread.
 While the child was yet alive, I fasted and wept:
 GOD will be gracious to me, that the
ld may live?  12:23 But now he is dead, wherefore should I fast?
ck again? I shall go to him, but he shall not return
orted Bathsheba his wife, and went in unto her,
n, and he called his name Solomon:
e LORD loved him.
the hand of Nathan the prophet; and he called his
D.
 of the children of Ammon, and
oyal city.
rs to David, and said, I have fought
nst Rabbah, and have taken the city of waters.
t of the people together, and encamp
nst the city, and take it: lest I take the city, and it be called

ogether, and went to Rabbah,
gainst it, and took it.
ok their king's crown from off his head, the weight
th the precious stones: and it was set
 David's head. And he brought forth the spoil of the city in great
:31 And he brought forth the people that were therein, and put them
 under harrows of iron, and under axes of iron, and
k-kiln: and thus did he unto all the
es of the children of Ammon. So David and all the people returned

t Absalom the son of David had
ter, whose name was Tamar; and Amnon the son of David loved
was so vexed, that he fell sick for his sister Tamar;
on thought it hard for him to do anything
hose name was Jonadab, the son of
 David's brother: and Jonadab was a very subtil man.
hy art thou, being the king's son, lean
rom day to day? wilt thou not tell me? And Amnon said unto him, I
other Absalom's sister.
b said unto him, Lay thee down on thy bed, and make
er cometh to see thee, say unto him, I
ay thee, let my sister Tamar come, and give me meat, and dress the
, that I may see it, and eat it at her hand.
self sick: and when the king was
see him, Amnon said unto the king, I pray thee, let Tamar my
me a couple of cakes in my sight, that I may eat
nt home to Tamar, saying, Go now to thy brother

's house; and he was laid down.
ook flour, and kneaded it, and made cakes in his sight, and
13:9 And she took a pan, and poured them out before him; but he
 Amnon said, Have out all men from me. And they
10 And Amnon said unto Tamar, Bring the meat into the chamber, that
ine hand. And Tamar took the cakes which she had made,
amber to Amnon her brother.
hen she had brought them unto him to eat, he took hold of
ome lie with me, my sister.
he answered him, Nay, my brother, do not force me; for no
ne in Israel: do not thou this folly.
3:13 And I, whither shall I cause my shame to go? and as for thee,
 one of the fools in Israel. Now therefore, I pray
e will not withhold me from thee.
 Howbeit he would not hearken unto her voice: but, being stronger
her, and lay with her.
 hated her exceedingly; so that the hatred wherewith
the love wherewith he had loved her. And
Amnon said unto her, Arise, be gone.
:16 And she said unto him, There is no cause: this evil in sending
er than the other that thou didst unto me. But he
:17 Then he called his servant that ministered unto him, and said,
an out from me, and bolt the door after her.
s colours upon her: for with such
ere the king's daughters that were virgins apparelled. Then his
 out, and bolted the door after her.
:19 And Tamar put ashes on her head, and rent her garment of divers
s on her, and laid her hand on her head, and went on
er brother said unto her, Hath Amnon thy brother
eace, my sister: he is thy brother;
d not this thing. So Tamar remained desolate in her brother
21 But when king David heard of all these things, he was very
bsalom spake unto his brother Amnon neither good nor bad:
because he had forced his sister Tamar.

years, that Absalom had
Baalhazor, which is beside Ephraim: and Absalom
24 And Absalom came to the king, and said, Behold now, thy servant
rs; let the king, I beseech thee, and his servants go
d the king said to Absalom, Nay, my son, let us not all now
le unto thee. And he pressed him: howbeit he
6 Then said Absalom, If not, I pray thee, let my brother Amnon go
king said unto him, Why should he go with thee?
 he let Amnon and all the king's
with him.
ed his servants, saying, Mark ye now when
n I say unto you, Smite
him, fear not: have not I commanded you? be
d the servants of Absalom did unto Amnon as Absalom had
king's sons arose, and every man gat him up upon his
t came to pass, while they were in the way, that tidings
alom hath slain all the king's sons, and
there is not one of them left.
en the king arose, and tare his garments, and lay on the
s stood by with their clothes rent.
32 And Jonadab, the son of Shimeah David's brother, answered and
ord suppose that they have slain all the young men
is dead: for by the appointment of
m this hath been determined from the day that he forced his
Now therefore let not my lord the king take the thing to his
ll the king's sons are dead: for Amnon only is
 the young man that kept the watch lifted
re came much people by the
l side behind him.
id unto the king, Behold, the king's sons come: as
3:36 And it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of speaking,
the king's sons came, and lifted up their voice and
 his servants wept very sore.
 Absalom fled, and went to Talmai, the son of Ammihud, king
urned for his son every day.
bsalom fled, and went to Geshur, and was there three years.
 king David longed to go forth unto Absalom: for
 seeing he was dead.
son of Zeruiah perceived that the king's heart was
 sent to Tekoah, and fetched thence a wise woman, and
eign thyself to be a mourner, and put on
now mourning apparel, and anoint not thyself with oil, but be as a
 long time mourned for the dead: 14:3 And come to the
r unto him. So Joab put the words in her
mouth.
h spake to the king, she fell on her
 to the ground, and did obeisance, and said, Help, O king.
 unto her, What aileth thee? And she answered, I
husband is dead.
had two sons, and they two strove together in
 them, but the one smote the
lew him.
mily is risen against thine handmaid,
 they said, Deliver him that smote his brother, that we may kill
of his brother whom he slew; and we will destroy the
uench my coal which is left, and shall
t leave to my husband neither name nor remainder upon the earth.
g said unto the woman, Go to thine house, and I will

he king, My lord, O king, the
 on me, and on my father's house: and the king and his
0 And the king said, Whoever saith ought unto thee, bring him to
ot touch thee any more.
 she, I pray thee, let the king remember the LORD thy
uffer the revengers of blood to destroy
ny more, lest they destroy my son. And he said, As the LORD liveth,
 one hair of thy son fall to the earth.

maid, I pray thee, speak one
 lord the king. And he said, Say on.
:13 And the woman said, Wherefore then hast thou thought such a
eople of God? for the king doth speak this thing as
e king doth not fetch home again his
shed.
are as water spilt on the ground,
annot be gathered up again; neither doth God respect any
 means, that his banished be not expelled
m come to speak of this thing unto my lord
made me afraid: and thy
will now speak unto the king; it may be that the king
is handmaid.
ar, to deliver his handmaid out of the hand
 son together out of the
od.
 word of my lord the king shall now
mfortable: for as an angel of God, so is my lord the king to
therefore the LORD thy God will be with thee.
id unto the woman, Hide not from
ay thee, the thing that I shall ask thee. And the woman said,
now speak.
not the hand of Joab with thee in all
s?  And the woman answered and said, As thy soul liveth, my lord
 turn to the right hand or to the left from ought
: for thy servant Joab, he bade me,
e put all these words in the mouth of thine handmaid: 14:20 To
m of speech hath thy servant Joab done this thing:
o the wisdom of an angel of God, to
all things that are in the earth.
 And the king said unto Joab, Behold now, I have done this thing:
ng the young man Absalom again.
nd Joab fell to the ground on his face, and bowed himself, and
d Joab said, To day thy servant knoweth that I
rd, O king, in that the king hath
ed the request of his servant.
 Joab arose and went to Geshur, and brought Absalom to
king said, Let him turn to his own house, and let him
eturned to his own house, and saw not the
here was none to be so much praised as
salom for his beauty: from the sole of his foot even to the crown of
 was no blemish in him.
he polled his head, (for it was at every year's end
hair was heavy on him, therefore he
d it:) he weighed the hair of his head at two hundred shekels
ht.
orn three sons, and one daughter,
ame was Tamar: she was a woman of a fair countenance.
full years in Jerusalem, and saw not the
king's face.
nt for Joab, to have sent him to the king;
e sent again the second time,
t come.
s servants, See, Joab's field is near
e, and he hath barley there; go and set it on fire. And Absalom's
field on fire.
nd came to Absalom unto his house, and said
et my field on fire?  14:32 And
nswered Joab, Behold, I sent unto thee, saying, Come hither,
o the king, to say, Wherefore am I come from
e been there still: now
see the king's face; and if there be any iniquity in
So Joab came to the king, and told him: and when he had called
 to the king, and bowed himself on his face to the
king kissed Absalom.
o pass after this, that Absalom prepared him
run before him.
p early, and stood beside the way of the gate:
t had a controversy came to the
judgment, then Absalom called unto him, and said, Of what
d, Thy servant is of one of the tribes of
, See, thy matters are good and right;
t there is no man deputed of the king to hear thee.
h that I were made judge in the land,
t every man which hath any suit or cause might come unto me, and I
tice!  15:5 And it was so, that when any man came nigh
he put forth his hand, and took him, and
kissed him.
 Absalom to all Israel that came to the
ing for judgment: so Absalom stole the hearts of the men of Israel.
ame to pass after forty years, that Absalom said unto the
 go and pay my vow, which I have vowed unto
rvant vowed a vow while I abode at Geshur in Syria,
 me again indeed to Jerusalem, then I
l serve the LORD.
d unto him, Go in peace. So he arose, and went to
 spies throughout all the tribes of Israel,
 the trumpet, then ye shall
reigneth in Hebron.
lom went two hundred men out of Jerusalem, that
 simplicity, and they knew not any

the Gilonite, David's
s city, even from Giloh, while he offered
; for the people increased
th Absalom.
enger to David, saying, The hearts of the
 And David said unto all his servants that were with him at
et us flee; for we shall not else escape from
e overtake us suddenly, and bring
on us, and smite the city with the edge of the sword.
ts said unto the king, Behold, thy servants
king shall appoint.
went forth, and all his household after him. And
e concubines, to keep the house.
And the king went forth, and all the people after him, and
was far off.
 passed on beside him; and all the
hites, and all the Pelethites, and all the Gittites, six hundred
er him from Gath, passed on before the king.
e Gittite, Wherefore goest thou
 us? return to thy place, and abide with the king: for thou
o an exile.
ut yesterday, should I this day make thee
er I may, return thou, and
brethren: mercy and truth be with thee.

id, As the LORD liveth, and
e king liveth, surely in what place my lord the king
life, even there also will thy servant
.
 pass over. And Ittai the Gittite
over, and all his men, and all the little ones that were with
 the country wept with a loud voice, and all the people
himself passed over the brook Kidron, and
y of the wilderness.
 also, and all the Levites were with him, bearing
nd they set down the ark of God; and
thar went up, until all the people had done passing out of the
he king said unto Zadok, Carry back the ark of God into the
avour in the eyes of the LORD, he will bring me
 habitation: 15:26 But if he thus
have no delight in thee; behold, here am I, let him do to me as
im.
 the priest, Art not thou a seer?
into the city in peace, and your two sons with you, Ahimaaz thy
he son of Abiathar.
arry in the plain of the wilderness, until there

ied the ark of God again to
d they tarried there.
ent up by the ascent of mount Olivet, and wept as he
red, and he went barefoot: and all the
ople that was with him covered every man his head, and they went up,
y went up.
ying, Ahithophel is among the conspirators
pray thee, turn the counsel of
 into foolishness.
 pass, that when David was come to the top of the
ehold, Hushai the Archite came to
m with his coat rent, and earth upon his head: 15:33 Unto whom
passest on with me, then thou shalt be a burden
o the city, and say unto Absalom, I
be thy servant, O king; as I have been thy father's servant
 also be thy servant: then mayest thou for me
15:35 And hast thou not there with thee Zadok and Abiathar the
it shall be, that what thing soever thou shalt
halt tell it to Zadok and Abiathar
iests.
th them their two sons, Ahimaaz
on, and Jonathan Abiathar's son; and by them ye shall send
 ye can hear.
riend came into the city, and Absalom came
as a little past the top of the hill, behold,
him, with a couple of asses
upon them two hundred loaves of bread, and an hundred
ndred of summer fruits, and a bottle of
ine.
What meanest thou by these? And Ziba
, The asses be for the king's household to ride on; and the bread
for the young men to eat; and the wine, that such as
 drink.
re is thy master's son? And Ziba said
o the king, Behold, he abideth at Jerusalem: for he said, To day
 Israel restore me the kingdom of my father.
old, thine are all that pertained
phibosheth. And Ziba said, I humbly beseech thee that I may
, my lord, O king.
avid came to Bahurim, behold, thence came out a
aul, whose name was Shimei, the son
ra: he came forth, and cursed still as he came.
 and at all the servants of king
nd all the people and all the mighty men were on his right

 Come out, come out, thou
 thou man of Belial: 16:8 The LORD hath returned upon
se of Saul, in whose stead thou hast
ned; and the LORD hath delivered the kingdom into the hand of
 behold, thou art taken in thy mischief, because
n said Abishai the son of Zeruiah unto the king, Why should
lord the king? let me go over, I pray thee, and
 king said, What have I to do with you, ye sons of
use the LORD hath said unto him, Curse
vid. Who shall then say, Wherefore hast thou done so?  16:11 And
hai, and to all his servants, Behold, my son, which
h my life: how much more now may this
jamite do it? let him alone, and let him curse; for the LORD hath
:12 It may be that the LORD will look on mine affliction, and that
quite me good for his cursing this day.

e way, Shimei went along on
de over against him, and cursed as he went, and threw

 that were with him, came weary,
eshed themselves there.
om, and all the people the men of Israel, came to
m.
ai the Archite, David's friend,
unto Absalom, that Hushai said unto Absalom, God save the

is thy kindness to thy friend?
t thou not with thy friend?  16:18 And Hushai said unto
LORD, and this people, and all the men of
im will I abide.
should I serve? should I not serve in the
thy father's presence, so
y presence.
Ahithophel, Give counsel among you what we
nto Absalom, Go in unto thy father's
ubines, which he hath left to keep the house; and all Israel shall
rt abhorred of thy father: then shall the hands of all
.
pon the top of the house; and
t in unto his father's concubines in the sight of all
sel of Ahithophel, which he counselled in those
at the oracle of God: so was all
sel of Ahithophel both with David and with Absalom.
 unto Absalom, Let me now choose out
ve thousand men, and I will arise and pursue after David this
l come upon him while he is weary and weak
l the people that are with him
; and I will smite the king only: 17:3 And I will bring back
ee: the man whom thou seekest is as if all
peace.
lom well, and all the elders of

the Archite also, and let us
e what he saith.
as come to Absalom, Absalom spake unto him,
is manner: shall we do after
if not; speak thou.
d unto Absalom, The counsel that Ahithophel hath

ather and his men, that they
n, and they be chafed in their minds, as a bear robbed of
and thy father is a man of war, and will not
 he is hid now in some pit, or in some other place: and it
some of them be overthrown at the first, that
is a slaughter among the people
ow Absalom.
aliant, whose heart is as the heart of a
lion, shall utterly melt: for all Israel knoweth that thy father is a
nd they which be with him are valiant men.
ael be generally gathered unto
 Dan even to Beersheba, as the sand that is by the sea for
 go to battle in thine own person.
2 So shall we come upon him in some place where he shall be found,
t upon him as the dew falleth on the ground: and of
 with him there shall not be left so
 as one.
n into a city, then shall all Israel
g ropes to that city, and we will draw it into the river, until
all stone found there.
m and all the men of Israel said, The counsel of
the counsel of Ahithophel. For the
ad appointed to defeat the good counsel of Ahithophel, to the
might bring evil upon Absalom.
en said Hushai unto Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, Thus
 counsel Absalom and the elders of Israel; and
17:16 Now therefore send quickly, and tell David, saying, Lodge not
he plains of the wilderness, but speedily pass over;
 and all the people that are with him.
17:17 Now Jonathan and Ahimaaz stayed by Enrogel; for they might not
e into the city: and a wench went and told them; and

 told Absalom: but they went
 away quickly, and came to a man's house in Bahurim, which
 whither they went down.
woman took and spread a covering over the well's mouth,
eon; and the thing was not known.
 And when Absalom's servants came to the woman to the house, they
imaaz and Jonathan? And the woman said unto them,
ter. And when they had sought and
ot find them, they returned to Jerusalem.
ere departed, that they came up
e well, and went and told king David, and said unto David,
over the water: for thus hath Ahithophel
counselled against you.
d arose, and all the people that were with him, and
 morning light there lacked not one of
em that was not gone over Jordan.
 And when Ahithophel saw that his counsel was not followed, he
 arose, and gat him home to his house, to his
 and hanged himself, and died,
ried in the sepulchre of his father.
:24 Then David came to Mahanaim. And Absalom passed over Jordan, he
 of Israel with him.
made Amasa captain of the host instead of Joab:
name was Ithra an Israelite, that
 to Abigail the daughter of Nahash, sister to Zeruiah Joab's
rael and Absalom pitched in the land of Gilead.
avid was come to Mahanaim, that Shobi
 son of Nahash of Rabbah of the children of Ammon, and Machir the
Lodebar, and Barzillai the Gileadite of Rogelim,
d earthen vessels, and wheat, and
 and flour, and parched corn, and beans, and lentiles, and
 honey, and butter, and sheep, and cheese of
at were with him, to eat: for
The people is hungry, and weary, and thirsty, in the
numbered the people that were with him, and set
 of hundreds over them.
sent forth a third part of the people under the hand of
r the hand of Abishai the son of Zeruiah,
e hand of Ittai the Gittite.
 said unto the people, I will surely go forth with you
 people answered, Thou shalt not go forth: for if we flee
for us; neither if half of us die, will they
n thousand of us: therefore now
ter that thou succour us out of the city.
seemeth you best I will do. And
stood by the gate side, and all the people came out by

shai and Ittai, saying, Deal
y sake with the young man, even with Absalom. And all the
g gave all the captains charge concerning
nto the field against Israel: and the
tle was in the wood of Ephraim; 18:7 Where the people of Israel
he servants of David, and there was there a great
sand men.
 scattered over the face of all the
ry: and the wood devoured more people that day than the sword
 Absalom met the servants of David. And Absalom rode upon a
 under the thick boughs of a great oak, and his
 was taken up between the heaven
earth; and the mule that was under him went away.
 and told Joab, and said, Behold, I saw
bsalom hanged in an oak.
 said unto the man that told him, And, behold, thou
not smite him there to the ground? and
would have given thee ten shekels of silver, and a girdle.
 unto Joab, Though I should receive a thousand
would I not put forth mine hand
he king's son: for in our hearing the king charged thee and
ng, Beware that none touch the young man
Absalom.
wrought falsehood against mine own life:
for there is no matter hid from the king, and thou thyself wouldest
f against me.
ay not tarry thus with thee. And he took
three darts in his hand, and thrust them through the heart of Absalom,
 yet alive in the midst of the oak.
15 And ten young men that bare Joab's armour compassed about and
 slew him.
pet, and the people returned from pursuing
ple.
ast him into a great pit in the
 laid a very great heap of stones upon him: and all Israel
nt.
ad taken and reared up for himself
ar, which is in the king's dale: for he said, I have no son to
mbrance: and he called the pillar after his own
y, Absalom's place.
maaz the son of Zadok, Let me now run, and bear the
 hath avenged him of his enemies.
 And Joab said unto him, Thou shalt not bear tidings this day,
tidings another day: but this day thou shalt bear
n is dead.
i, Go tell the king what thou hast seen.
And Cushi bowed himself unto Joab, and ran.
dok yet again to Joab, But
 me, I pray thee, also run after Cushi. And Joab said,
son, seeing that thou hast no tidings
dy?  18:23 But howsoever, said he, let me run. And he said unto
aaz ran by the way of the plain, and overran Cushi.
he two gates: and the watchman went up to
 lifted up his eyes, and
ld a man running alone.
atchman cried, and told the king. And the king said, If
gs in his mouth. And he came apace, and
rew near.
other man running: and the watchman
d unto the porter, and said, Behold another man running alone.
e also bringeth tidings.
watchman said, Me thinketh the running of the foremost
az the son of Zadok. And the king said, He
ngs.
 unto the king, All is well. And he
down to the earth upon his face before the king, and said,
God, which hath delivered up the men that
king.
oung man Absalom safe? And Ahimaaz
ed, When Joab sent the king's servant, and me thy servant, I saw
t I knew not what it was.
 king said unto him, Turn aside, and stand here. And he
ll.
Cushi said, Tidings, my lord the
r the LORD hath avenged thee this day of all them that rose up
32 And the king said unto Cushi, Is the young man Absalom safe? And
 The enemies of my lord the king, and all that rise
e as that young man is.
ing was much moved, and went up to the chamber over the
ent, thus he said, O my son Absalom, my
on, my son Absalom! would God I had died for thee, O Absalom, my son,
 And it was told Joab, Behold, the king weepeth and
nd the victory that day was turned into mourning unto all the
e heard say that day how the king was grieved for
at them by stealth that day into the city, as
they flee in battle.
covered his face, and the king cried with a loud
, my son, my son!  19:5 And Joab
o the house to the king, and said, Thou hast shamed this day
ervants, which this day have saved thy life, and
aughters, and the lives of thy
 the lives of thy concubines; 19:6 In that thou lovest thine
y friends. For thou hast declared this day, that
 servants: for this day I perceive,
if Absalom had lived, and all we had died this day, then it had

 speak comfortably unto thy
 I swear by the LORD, if thou go not forth, there will
 night: and that will be worse unto thee
than all the evil that befell thee from thy youth until now.
rose, and sat in the gate. And they told unto all
ing doth sit in the gate. And all the
ple came before the king: for Israel had fled every man to his
l the people were at strife throughout all the tribes of
aved us out of the hand of our enemies, and
Philistines; and now he is fled
e land for Absalom.
whom we anointed over us, is dead in battle. Now
of bringing the king back?  19:11
g David sent to Zadok and to Abiathar the priests, saying,
 Judah, saying, Why are ye the last to bring
 speech of all Israel is come to
, even to his house.
ethren, ye are my bones and my flesh: wherefore then
the king?  19:13 And say ye to Amasa,
 thou not of my bone, and of my flesh? God do so to me, and more
ot captain of the host before me continually in the
owed the heart of all the men of Judah, even as the
sent this word unto the king, Return
, and all thy servants.
ng returned, and came to Jordan. And Judah came to
to conduct the king over Jordan.
And Shimei the son of Gera, a Benjamite, which was of Bahurim,
 with the men of Judah to meet king David.
 Benjamin with him, and Ziba the
of the house of Saul, and his fifteen sons and his twenty
ey went over Jordan before the king.
:18 And there went over a ferry boat to carry over the king's
what he thought good. And Shimei the son of Gera
as come over Jordan; 19:19 And said
the king, Let not my lord impute iniquity unto me, neither do
ich thy servant did perversely the day that my
 that the king should take it to
t.
 I have sinned: therefore, behold,
ome the first this day of all the house of Joseph to go down to
ng.
h answered and said, Shall not
put to death for this, because he cursed the LORD's
, What have I to do with you, ye sons
Zeruiah, that ye should this day be adversaries unto me? shall
 to death this day in Israel? for do not I know
?  19:23 Therefore the king said
mei, Thou shalt not die. And the king sware unto him.
son of Saul came down to meet the king, and
ed his beard, nor washed his
m the day the king departed until the day he came again in
ame to pass, when he was come to Jerusalem to meet the
o him, Wherefore wentest not thou with me,
 lord, O king, my servant
r thy servant said, I will saddle me an ass, that I may
 king; because thy servant is lame.
27 And he hath slandered thy servant unto my lord the king; but my
 as an angel of God: do therefore what is good in
y father's house were but dead men before my lord
servant among them that did eat at
own table. What right therefore have I yet to cry any more unto
d the king said unto him, Why speakest thou any
hou and Ziba divide the land.
 Mephibosheth said unto the king, Yea, let him take all,
ing is come again in peace unto his own
ouse.
 came down from Rogelim, and went
rdan with the king, to conduct him over Jordan.
ed man, even fourscore years old: and
had provided the king of sustenance while he lay at Mahanaim; for
at man.
rzillai, Come thou over with me, and I
ll feed thee with me in Jerusalem.
4 And Barzillai said unto the king, How long have I to live, that
th the king unto Jerusalem?  19:35 I am this day
cern between good and evil? can thy
nt taste what I eat or what I drink? can I hear any more the
nd singing women? wherefore then should thy
e king?  19:36 Thy servant will
le way over Jordan with the king: and why should the king
h a reward?  19:37 Let thy servant, I pray
 mine own city, and be buried
e of my father and of my mother. But behold thy servant
th my lord the king; and do to him what
hall seem good unto thee.
 king answered, Chimham shall go over with me, and I will
l seem good unto thee: and whatsoever thou
thee.
r Jordan. And when the king was come
, the king kissed Barzillai, and blessed him; and he returned unto

nd Chimham went on with him:
people of Judah conducted the king, and also half the
d, behold, all the men of Israel came to the king, and said
 our brethren the men of Judah stolen thee
 household, and all David's
 over Jordan?  19:42 And all the men of Judah answered
he king is near of kin to us: wherefore
hen be ye angry for this matter? have we eaten at all of the king's
e given us any gift?  19:43 And the men of Israel
id, We have ten parts in the king,
 have also more right in David than ye: why then did ye despise
 should not be first had in bringing back our king?
ah were fiercer than the words of the
 of Israel.
be there a man of Belial, whose name was
Sheba, the son of Bichri, a Benjamite: and he blew a trumpet, and
part in David, neither have we inheritance in the son
nts, O Israel.
ael went up from after David, and followed
Judah clave unto their king,
even to Jerusalem.
to his house at Jerusalem; and the king took the
had left to keep the house, and put
in ward, and fed them, but went not in unto them. So they were
 of their death, living in widowhood.
0:4 Then said the king to Amasa, Assemble me the men of Judah within
d be thou here present.
ent to assemble the men of Judah: but he tarried longer
had appointed him.
to Abishai, Now shall Sheba the son of Bichri do
e thou thy lord's servants, and
ter him, lest he get him fenced cities, and escape us.
ter him Joab's men, and the Cherethites, and
: and they went out of
ue after Sheba the son of Bichri.
When they were at the great stone which is in Gibeon, Amasa went
oab's garment that he had put on was girded unto
word fastened upon his loins in the
h thereof; and as he went forth it fell out.
u in health, my brother? And Joab
asa by the beard with the right hand to kiss him.
 the sword that was in Joab's hand: so
 smote him therewith in the fifth rib, and shed out his bowels to
truck him not again; and he died. So Joab and Abishai
ba the son of Bichri.
Joab's men stood by him, and said, He that favoureth
, let him go after Joab.
a wallowed in blood in the midst of the highway. And
people stood still, he removed Amasa out
of the highway into the field, and cast a cloth upon him, when he saw
e that came by him stood still.
hen he was removed out of the highway, all the people went on
 after Sheba the son of Bichri.
nd he went through all the tribes of Israel unto Abel, and to
the Berites: and they were gathered together, and
 they came and besieged him in Abel of Bethmaachah, and they
 the city, and it stood in the trench: and all
red the wall, to throw it down.
hen cried a wise woman out of the city, Hear, hear; say, I pray
e near hither, that I may speak with thee.
er, the woman said, Art thou
e answered, I am he. Then she said unto him, Hear the
he answered, I do hear.
spake, saying, They were wont to speak in old time,
ounsel at Abel: and so they ended the
ter.
aceable and faithful in Israel: thou
est to destroy a city and a mother in Israel: why wilt thou
nce of the LORD?  20:20 And Joab answered and
hat I should swallow up or
:21 The matter is not so: but a man of mount Ephraim, Sheba the son
me, hath lifted up his hand against the king, even
 and I will depart from the city. And
 woman said unto Joab, Behold, his head shall be thrown to thee
0:22 Then the woman went unto all the people in her wisdom. And they
ad of Sheba the son of Bichri, and cast it out to Joab.
they retired from the city, every man to
his tent. And Joab returned to Jerusalem unto the king.
ll the host of Israel: and Benaiah the son of
 over the Pelethites: 20:24 And
s over the tribute: and Jehoshaphat the son of Ahilud was
 was scribe: and Zadok and Abiathar were the
e was a chief ruler about David.
hen there was a famine in the days of David three years, year
 enquired of the LORD. And the LORD answered, It
use, because he slew the Gibeonites.
:2 And the king called the Gibeonites, and said unto them; (now the
 not of the children of Israel, but of the remnant of
n of Israel had sworn unto them: and Saul
ildren of Israel and Judah.)
re David said unto the Gibeonites, What shall I do for
make the atonement, that ye may bless the
beonites said unto him, We
ilver nor gold of Saul, nor of his house; neither for us
 Israel. And he said, What ye shall say,
that will I do for you.
nswered the king, The man that consumed us, and that
uld be destroyed from remaining in any
 the coasts of Israel, 21:6 Let seven men of his sons be delivered
will hang them up unto the LORD in Gibeah of Saul,
e king said, I will give them.
 the king spared Mephibosheth, the son of Jonathan the son of
LORD's oath that was between them, between David
1:8 But the king took the two sons of Rizpah the daughter of Aiah,
to Saul, Armoni and Mephibosheth; and the five sons of
 whom she brought up for Adriel the son of
elivered them into the hands
nites, and they hanged them in the hill before the LORD:
gether, and were put to death in the days of
inning of barley harvest.
pah the daughter of Aiah took sackcloth, and spread it
the beginning of harvest until water
ped upon them out of heaven, and suffered neither the birds of the
hem by day, nor the beasts of the field by night.
t Rizpah the daughter of Aiah, the
ine of Saul, had done.
went and took the bones of Saul and the bones of
abeshgilead, which had stolen them
he street of Bethshan, where the Philistines had hanged them,
had slain Saul in Gilboa: 21:13 And he brought up
 the bones of Jonathan his son; and
gathered the bones of them that were hanged.
than his son buried they in the
f Benjamin in Zelah, in the sepulchre of Kish his father: and
at the king commanded. And after that God was
over the Philistines had yet war again with Israel; and
rvants with him, and fought against the
hilistines: and David waxed faint.
6 And Ishbibenob, which was of the sons of the giant, the weight
ghed three hundred shekels of brass in weight, he
ought to have slain David.
ishai the son of Zeruiah succoured him, and smote the
hen the men of David sware unto him,
ng, Thou shalt go no more out with us to battle, that thou quench
Israel.
 this, that there was again a battle
 the Philistines at Gob: then Sibbechai the Hushathite slew Saph,
sons of the giant.
again a battle in Gob with the Philistines, where
 Bethlehemite, slew the brother of
h the Gittite, the staff of whose spear was like a weaver's
e was yet a battle in Gath, where was a man of great
d six fingers, and on every foot six
, four and twenty in number; and he also was born to the giant.
 defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimeah the
 These four were born to the giant in Gath, and fell by the hand
he hand of his servants.
 spake unto the LORD the words of this song in the day
him out of the hand of all his enemies,
nd out of the hand of Saul: 22:2 And he said, The LORD is my rock,
 and my deliverer; 22:3 The God of my rock; in him
nd the horn of my salvation, my high
r, and my refuge, my saviour; thou savest me from violence.
he LORD, who is worthy to be praised: so shall I
5 When the waves of death compassed me, the floods of ungodly men
2:6 The sorrows of hell compassed me about; the
In my distress I called upon the
d cried to my God: and he did hear my voice out of his temple,
 into his ears.
ok and trembled; the foundations of heaven

strils, and fire out of his
d: coals were kindled by it.
owed the heavens also, and came down; and darkness was under
 he rode upon a cherub, and did fly: and he was seen upon the

d about him, dark waters, and
s of the skies.
tness before him were coals of fire kindled.
, and the most High uttered his

ed them; lightning, and

ared, the foundations of the
iscovered, at the rebuking of the LORD, at the blast of

he drew me out of many waters;
elivered me from my strong enemy, and from them that hated
rong for me.
 the day of my calamity: but the LORD was my
o into a large place: he delivered me,
cause he delighted in me.
D rewarded me according to my righteousness: according to
 hath he recompensed me.
ve kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly
For all his judgments were before me: and as for his statutes, I
m them.
 him, and have kept myself from mine
uity.
ompensed me according to my
; according to my cleanness in his eye sight.
hew thyself merciful, and with the
t man thou wilt shew thyself upright.
2:27 With the pure thou wilt shew thyself pure; and with the froward
 thyself unsavoury.
cted people thou wilt save: but thine eyes are upon
ring them down.
amp, O LORD: and the LORD will lighten my
 through a troop: by my God have I leaped
 is perfect; the word of the LORD is tried:
in him.
LORD? and who is a rock, save our God?
:33 God is my strength and power: and he maketh my way perfect.
y feet like hinds' feet: and setteth me upon my high
y hands to war; so that a bow of steel is broken by
lso given me the shield of thy salvation: and thy

e; so that my feet did not
 I have pursued mine enemies, and destroyed them; and turned not
consumed them.
d them, and wounded them, that they could not
feet.
h strength to battle: them that rose
gainst me hast thou subdued under me.
2:41 Thou hast also given me the necks of mine enemies, that I might
hat hate me.
re was none to save; even unto the LORD, but
d I beat them as small as the dust of the earth, I did
e street, and did spread them abroad.
2:44 Thou also hast delivered me from the strivings of my people,
 to be head of the heathen: a people which I knew not
ngers shall submit themselves unto me: as soon as they hear,
 unto me.
ay, and they shall be afraid out of their
nd blessed be my rock; and exalted be the God
 It is God that avengeth me, and that bringeth down the people
nd that bringeth me forth from mine enemies: thou also hast
ove them that rose up against me: thou hast
2:50 Therefore I will give thanks unto thee, O LORD, among the
sing praises unto thy name.
 the tower of salvation for his king: and sheweth mercy to
, and to his seed for evermore.
w these be the last words of David. David the son of Jesse
s raised up on high, the anointed of the God
rael, said, 23:2 The Spirit of
pake by me, and his word was in my tongue.
of Israel spake to me, He that
r men must be just, ruling in the fear of God.
of the morning, when the sun riseth,
 a morning without clouds; as the tender grass springing out of
shining after rain.
use be not so with God; yet he hath made with me an
n all things, and sure: for this is all
y salvation, and all my desire, although he make it not to grow.
s of Belial shall be all of them as thorns thrust
n with hands: 23:7 But the man that
 touch them must be fenced with iron and the staff of a spear;
terly burned with fire in the same place.
en whom David had: The
t in the seat, chief among the captains; the same
his spear against eight hundred, whom
slew at one time.
s Eleazar the son of Dodo the Ahohite, one of the
 they defied the Philistines that
ere gathered together to battle, and the men of Israel were
se, and smote the Philistines until his hand
 sword: and the LORD wrought a
ory that day; and the people returned after him only to
im was Shammah the son of Agee the Hararite. And the
ther into a troop, where was a piece of
round full of lentiles: and the people fled from the Philistines.
ood in the midst of the ground, and defended it, and
LORD wrought a great victory.
 three of the thirty chief went down, and came to David in
e cave of Adullam: and the troop of the
hilistines pitched in the valley of Rephaim.
 and the garrison of the
then in Bethlehem.
ed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of
, which is by the gate!  23:16 And
ree mighty men brake through the host of the Philistines, and
 well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and
ertheless he would not drink
 poured it out unto the LORD.
 he said, Be it far from me, O LORD, that I should do this:
f the men that went in jeopardy of their lives?
ese things did these three mighty

he son of Zeruiah, was chief
 And he lifted up his spear against three hundred, and
among three.
urable of three? therefore he was their
aptain: howbeit he attained not unto the first three.
f Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man, of
Kabzeel, who had done many acts, he slew two lionlike men of Moab: he
o and slew a lion in the midst of a pit in time of snow:
ian, a goodly man: and the Egyptian had a
m with a staff, and plucked
 of the Egyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear.
Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and had the name
as more honourable than the thirty, but he attained not to
id set him over his guard.
 the brother of Joab was one of the thirty; Elhanan the
3:25 Shammah the Harodite, Elika the
dite, 23:26 Helez the Paltite, Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite,
 Anethothite, Mebunnai the Hushathite, 23:28 Zalmon
athite, 23:29 Heleb the son of Baanah,
Netophathite, Ittai the son of Ribai out of Gibeah of the children
30 Benaiah the Pirathonite, Hiddai of the brooks of
hite, Azmaveth the Barhumite, 23:32
ba the Shaalbonite, of the sons of Jashen, Jonathan, 23:33
iam the son of Sharar the Hararite, 23:34
the Maachathite, Eliam the
hel the Gilonite, 23:35 Hezrai the Carmelite, Paarai the
 of Nathan of Zobah, Bani the Gadite, 23:37
te, armourbearer to Joab the
ah, 23:38 Ira an Ithrite, Gareb an Ithrite, 23:39 Uriah
en in all.
the LORD was kindled against Israel, and
he moved David against them to say, Go, number Israel and Judah.
g said to Joab the captain of the host, which was with
tribes of Israel, from Dan even to
eba, and number ye the people, that I may know the number of the
d Joab said unto the king, Now the LORD thy God add unto the
r they be, an hundredfold, and that the eyes of
y doth my lord the king delight in
hing?  24:4 Notwithstanding the king's word prevailed against
 captains of the host. And Joab and the captains
ence of the king, to number the
 Israel.
an, and pitched in Aroer, on the right
de of the city that lieth in the midst of the river of Gad, and
Then they came to Gilead, and to the land of
, and about to Zidon, 24:7 And
e strong hold of Tyre, and to all the cities of the Hivites,
 and they went out to the south of Judah, even
ad gone through all the land, they came to
twenty days.
sum of the number of the people unto the
king: and there were in Israel eight hundred thousand valiant men that
rd; and the men of Judah were five hundred thousand men.
smote him after that he had numbered the
people.
 have sinned greatly in that I have
 and now, I beseech thee, O LORD, take away the iniquity of thy
 done very foolishly.
vid was up in the morning, the word of the LORD came
seer, saying, 24:12 Go and say unto
, Thus saith the LORD, I offer thee three things; choose thee one
ay do it unto thee.
o David, and told him, and said unto him, Shall
e in thy land? or wilt thou flee
nths before thine enemies, while they pursue thee? or that
tilence in thy land? now advise, and see what
t me.
am in a great strait: let us fall now
o the hand of the LORD; for his mercies are great: and let me not
d of man.
ilence upon Israel from the morning even
to the time appointed: and there died of the people from Dan even to
nty thousand men.
gel stretched out his hand upon Jerusalem to
he evil, and said to the angel
oyed the people, It is enough: stay now thine hand. And the
y the threshingplace of Araunah the Jebusite.
 when he saw the angel that smote
ple, and said, Lo, I have sinned, and I have done wickedly: but
ave they done? let thine hand, I pray thee, be
house.
avid, and said unto him, Go up, rear
ltar unto the LORD in the threshingfloor of Araunah the Jebusite.
, according to the saying of Gad, went up as the LORD
ah looked, and saw the king and his servants coming on
 out, and bowed himself before the king on
raunah said, Wherefore is my lord the king come to his
 buy the threshingfloor of thee, to build
ay be stayed from the people.
 Araunah said unto David, Let my lord the king take and offer
unto him: behold, here be oxen for burnt
sacrifice, and threshing instruments and other instruments of the oxen

king, give unto the king. And
d unto the king, The LORD thy God accept thee.
ah, Nay; but I will surely buy it of
 at a price: neither will I offer burnt offerings unto the LORD my
h doth cost me nothing. So David bought the
hekels of silver.
 there an altar unto the LORD, and offered burnt
the LORD was intreated for the land,
the plague was stayed from Israel.

Called:

in years; and they covered
es, but he gat no heat.
is servants said unto him, Let there be sought for my
 and let her stand before the king, and
et her cherish him, and let her lie in thy bosom, that my lord the
t.
 throughout all the coasts of
 found Abishag a Shunammite, and brought her to the king.
very fair, and cherished the king, and
nistered to him: but the king knew her not.
exalted himself, saying, I will
and he prepared him chariots and horsemen, and fifty men to
And his father had not displeased him at any time in saying, Why
 and he also was a very goodly man; and his mother
nd he conferred with Joab the son of Zeruiah, and with Abiathar
y following Adonijah helped him.
t Zadok the priest, and Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and Nathan
imei, and Rei, and the mighty men which belonged to

d fat cattle by the stone of
ich is by Enrogel, and called all his brethren the king's
Judah the king's servants: 1:10 But Nathan
 men, and Solomon his brother,
not.
athsheba the mother of Solomon,
ast thou not heard that Adonijah the son of Haggith doth
knoweth it not?  1:12 Now therefore come,
hat thou mayest save thine
the life of thy son Solomon.
d get thee in unto king David, and say unto him, Didst not
wear unto thine handmaid, saying, Assuredly
nd he shall sit upon my throne?
doth Adonijah reign?  1:14 Behold, while thou yet talkest
so will come in after thee, and confirm thy
to the king into the chamber: and the
g was very old; and Abishag the Shunammite ministered unto the
thsheba bowed, and did obeisance unto the king. And the
ou?  1:17 And she said unto him, My lord,
ne handmaid, saying,
y son shall reign after me, and he shall sit upon
d, Adonijah reigneth; and now, my lord the king,
ath slain oxen and fat cattle and
n abundance, and hath called all the sons of the king, and
 Joab the captain of the host: but Solomon thy
And thou, my lord, O king, the eyes of all Israel are upon thee,
t tell them who shall sit on the throne of my lord
rwise it shall come to pass, when my lord the king shall
at I and my son Solomon shall be counted
offenders.
talked with the king, Nathan the prophet
also came in.
ng, saying, Behold Nathan the prophet. And
bowed himself before the king
ce to the ground.
 My lord, O king, hast thou said, Adonijah shall
pon my throne?  1:25 For he is gone
this day, and hath slain oxen and fat cattle and sheep in
d all the king's sons, and the captains of
behold, they eat and drink
d say, God save king Adonijah.
 me, even me thy servant, and Zadok the priest, and Benaiah
d thy servant Solomon, hath he not called.
 king, and thou hast not shewed
hy servant, who should sit on the throne of my lord the king
king David answered and said, Call me Bathsheba.
nce, and stood before the king.
d the king sware, and said, As the LORD liveth, that hath
ll distress, 1:30 Even as I sware unto thee
redly Solomon thy son shall
e, and he shall sit upon my throne in my stead; even so
y.
ace to the earth, and did
e king, and said, Let my lord king David live for ever.
 Call me Zadok the priest, and Nathan the
 And they came before the
he king also said unto them, Take with you the servants of your
omon my son to ride upon mine own mule, and bring
adok the priest and Nathan the
oint him there king over Israel: and blow ye with the
ng Solomon.
after him, that he may come and sit upon my
d: and I have appointed him to
ver Israel and over Judah.
aiah the son of Jehoiada answered the king, and said,
 the king say so too.
hath been with my lord the king, even so be he with
eater than the throne of my lord king
id.
n the prophet, and Benaiah the son
oiada, and the Cherethites, and the Pelethites, went down, and
de upon king David's mule, and brought him to
ook an horn of oil out of the tabernacle,
rumpet; and all the people
 king Solomon.
came up after him, and the people piped with
 that the earth rent with the
em.
s that were with him heard it as
 made an end of eating. And when Joab heard the sound of the
efore is this noise of the city being in an
ehold, Jonathan the son of
riest came; and Adonijah said unto him, Come in; for
ingest good tidings.
answered and said to Adonijah, Verily our lord king

ok the priest, and Nathan the
d Benaiah the son of Jehoiada, and the Cherethites, and the
ve caused him to ride upon the king's mule:
e prophet have anointed him
: and they are come up from thence rejoicing, so that the
the noise that ye have heard.
also Solomon sitteth on the throne of the kingdom.
ervants came to bless our lord king
, saying, God make the name of Solomon better than thy name, and
eater than thy throne. And the king bowed himself
us said the king, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel,
 my throne this day, mine eyes even
g it.
 with Adonijah were afraid, and rose
and went every man his way.
onijah feared because of Solomon, and arose, and went, and
 of the altar.
omon, saying, Behold, Adonijah feareth king
n the horns of the altar,
g Solomon swear unto me today that he will not slay his
1:52 And Solomon said, If he will shew himself a worthy man, there
r of him fall to the earth: but if wickedness shall be

ught him down from the altar.
 and bowed himself to king Solomon: and Solomon said unto

 he should die; and he charged
s son, saying, 2:2 I go the way of all the earth: be thou
w thyself a man; 2:3 And keep the charge of
to keep his statutes, and his
s, and his judgments, and his testimonies, as it is written
at thou mayest prosper in all that thou doest,
lf: 2:4 That the LORD may continue
rd which he spake concerning me, saying, If thy children take
 walk before me in truth with all their heart and
not fail thee (said he) a man on the
ne of Israel.
 also what Joab the son of Zeruiah did to me,
f the hosts of Israel, unto Abner
 of Ner, and unto Amasa the son of Jether, whom he slew, and
in peace, and put the blood of war upon his
 his shoes that were on his
Do therefore according to thy wisdom, and let not his hoar head go
e in peace.
the sons of Barzillai the Gileadite, and
let them be of those that eat at thy table: for so they came to me
use of Absalom thy brother.
hold, thou hast with thee Shimei the son of Gera, a
sed me with a grievous curse in the day
hen I went to Mahanaim: but he came down to meet me at Jordan, and I
y the LORD, saying, I will not put thee to death with
re hold him not guiltless: for thou art a wise man, and
to do unto him; but his hoar head bring
hou down to the grave with blood.
So David slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city of
he days that David reigned over Israel were forty years:
Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned
n upon the throne of David his father; and his
2:13 And Adonijah the son of Haggith came to Bathsheba the mother of
he said, Comest thou peaceably? And he said, Peaceably.
have somewhat to say unto thee. And she said,
west that the kingdom was mine, and that all
hould reign: howbeit the kingdom
d about, and is become my brother's: for it was his from the
I ask one petition of thee, deny me not. And she said
 he said, Speak, I pray thee, unto Solomon the king, (for he
) that he give me Abishag the Shunammite to
 I will speak for thee unto the king.
:19 Bathsheba therefore went unto king Solomon, to speak unto him for
 the king rose up to meet her, and bowed himself unto
ne, and caused a seat to be set for the
ing's mother; and she sat on his right hand.
ll petition of thee; I pray thee,
not nay. And the king said unto her, Ask on, my mother: for I
.
unammite be given to Adonijah thy
 to wife.
d and said unto his mother, And why dost
thou ask Abishag the Shunammite for Adonijah? ask for him the kingdom
is mine elder brother; even for him, and for Abiathar the
son of Zeruiah.
sware by the LORD, saying, God do so to me, and
ken this word against his own life.
4 Now therefore, as the LORD liveth, which hath established me, and
hrone of David my father, and who hath made me an
hall be put to death this day.
 king Solomon sent by the hand of Benaiah the son of Jehoiada;
 that he died.
he priest said the king, Get thee to Anathoth,
worthy of death: but I will not at
ime put thee to death, because thou barest the ark of the LORD
father, and because thou hast been afflicted in
.
rom being priest unto the LORD;
ight fulfil the word of the LORD, which he spake concerning
loh.
r Joab had turned after Adonijah,
he turned not after Absalom. And Joab fled unto the tabernacle
ght hold on the horns of the altar.
9 And it was told king Solomon that Joab was fled unto the
and, behold, he is by the altar. Then Solomon
ing, Go, fall upon him.
h came to the tabernacle of the LORD, and said unto
forth. And he said, Nay; but I will die
ere. And Benaiah brought the king word again, saying, Thus said Joab,
nswered me.
 him, Do as he hath said, and fall upon
im, and bury him; that thou mayest take away the innocent blood,
rom me, and from the house of my father.

 upon his own head, who fell
 more righteous and better than he, and slew them with the
ot knowing thereof, to wit, Abner the son of
d Amasa the son of Jether,
 host of Judah.
therefore return upon the head of Joab, and
 upon David, and upon his seed,
his house, and upon his throne, shall there be peace for ever
4 So Benaiah the son of Jehoiada went up, and fell upon him, and
as buried in his own house in the wilderness.
on of Jehoiada in his room over the
 and Zadok the priest did the king put in the room of Abiathar.
 sent and called for Shimei, and said unto him, Build
nd dwell there, and go not forth thence
ny whither.
on the day thou goest out, and passest over
ertain that thou shalt surely
ood shall be upon thine own head.
And Shimei said unto the king, The saying is good: as my lord the
o will thy servant do. And Shimei dwelt in Jerusalem
 to pass at the end of three years, that two of the
o Achish son of Maachah king of Gath.
 they told Shimei, saying, Behold, thy servants be in Gath.
, and saddled his ass, and went to Gath to Achish
went, and brought his servants from

ei had gone from Jerusalem to
as come again.
nd called for Shimei, and said unto him, Did I
and protested unto thee, saying,
 a certain, on the day thou goest out, and walkest abroad any
alt surely die? and thou saidst unto me, The word
3 Why then hast thou not kept the oath of the LORD, and the
 charged thee with?  2:44 The king said
oreover to Shimei, Thou knowest all the wickedness which thine heart
hat thou didst to David my father: therefore the LORD
pon thine own head; 2:45 And king Solomon
 shall be established before
 ever.
ah the son of Jehoiada; which went
nd fell upon him, that he died. And the kingdom was established
mon.
 Pharaoh king of Egypt, and took
s daughter, and brought her into the city of David, until he
lding his own house, and the house of the LORD,
ut.
igh places, because there was no
ilt unto the name of the LORD, until those days.
walking in the statutes of David his
er: only he sacrificed and burnt incense in high places.
 Gibeon to sacrifice there; for that was the
erings did Solomon offer upon

omon in a dream by night: and
sk what I shall give thee.
mon said, Thou hast shewed unto thy servant David my
as he walked before thee in truth, and
 righteousness, and in uprightness of heart with thee; and thou hast
his great kindness, that thou hast given him a son to
his day.
ou hast made thy servant king instead of
David my father: and I am but a little child: I know not how to go out

thy people which thou hast
t people, that cannot be numbered nor counted for
thy servant an understanding heart to judge thy
good and bad: for who is able to
is thy so great a people?  3:10 And the speech pleased the
sked this thing.
 him, Because thou hast asked this thing, and
 neither hast asked riches for
or hast asked the life of thine enemies; but hast asked for
o discern judgment; 3:12 Behold, I have done
en thee a wise and an
; so that there was none like thee before thee,
like unto thee.
ven thee that which thou hast not asked, both
ll not be any among the kings
hee all thy days.
 walk in my ways, to keep my statutes and my
walk, then I will lengthen thy
:15 And Solomon awoke; and, behold, it was a dream. And he came to
tood before the ark of the covenant of the LORD, and
d offered peace offerings, and made a
st to all his servants.
there two women, that were harlots, unto the king, and
d the one woman said, O my lord, I and this woman dwell in one
ivered of a child with her in the house.

fter that I was delivered,
n was delivered also: and we were together; there was no
use, save we two in the house.
 this woman's child died in the night; because she overlaid
se at midnight, and took my son from beside me, while
d it in her bosom, and laid her dead
d in my bosom.
the morning to give my child suck, behold, it
t in the morning, behold, it was
on, which I did bear.
r woman said, Nay; but the living is my son, and the
, No; but the dead is thy son, and the
ving is my son. Thus they spake before the king.
 saith, This is my son that liveth,
hy son is the dead: and the other saith, Nay; but thy son is the
s the living.
ring me a sword. And they brought a sword
d, Divide the living child in two, and give half

ving child was unto the king,
els yearned upon her son, and she said, O my lord, give her
n no wise slay it. But the other said, Let it
 it.
id, Give her the living child, and
wise slay it: she is the mother thereof.

t which the king had judged;
red the king: for they saw that the wisdom of God was in
1 So king Solomon was king over all Israel.
he had; Azariah the son of Zadok
st, 4:3 Elihoreph and Ahiah, the sons of Shisha, scribes;
ilud, the recorder.
 son of Jehoiada was over the host: and Zadok and
d Azariah the son of Nathan was over
officers: and Zabud the son of Nathan was principal officer, and
 4:6 And Ahishar was over the household: and
tribute.
icers over all Israel, which provided
tuals for the king and his household: each man his month in a year

of Hur, in mount Ephraim: 4:9
Dekar, in Makaz, and in Shaalbim, and Bethshemesh, and
of Hesed, in Aruboth; to him pertained
choh, and all the land of Hepher: 4:11 The son of Abinadab, in all
r; which had Taphath the daughter of Solomon to wife:
 to him pertained Taanach and Megiddo,
d all Bethshean, which is by Zartanah beneath Jezreel, from
h, even unto the place that is beyond Jokneam:
ad; to him pertained the towns of
e son of Manasseh, which are in Gilead; to him also pertained
which is in Bashan, threescore great cities with
ab the son of Iddo had Mahanaim:
maaz was in Naphtali; he also took Basmath the daughter of
anah the son of Hushai was in Asher and in
h, in Issachar: 4:18 Shimei
ah, in Benjamin: 4:19 Geber the son of Uri was in the
ntry of Sihon king of the Amorites, and
f Og king of Bashan; and he was the only officer which was in the
ah and Israel were many, as the sand which is by the sea in
rinking, and making merry.
omon reigned over all kingdoms from the river unto the
 unto the border of Egypt: they brought
resents, and served Solomon all the days of his life.
n for one day was thirty measures of fine
:23 Ten fat oxen, and twenty
the pastures, and an hundred sheep, beside harts, and
 fatted fowl.
over all the region on this side the river,
e kings on this side the river:
d peace on all sides round about him.
:25 And Judah and Israel dwelt safely, every man under his vine and
ree, from Dan even to Beersheba, all the days of
orty thousand stalls of horses for his chariots,
:27 And those officers provided victual for king Solomon, and for all
o king Solomon's table, every man in his month: they
 also and straw for the horses and dromedaries brought they
e officers were, every man according to his
sdom and understanding exceeding much, and
t is on the sea shore.
's wisdom excelled the wisdom of all the children of
wisdom of Egypt.
than all men; than Ethan the Ezrahite, and
of Mahol: and his fame was in
 round about.
housand proverbs: and his songs were a
ousand and five.
rees, from the cedar tree that is in Lebanon
t of the wall: he spake also of
nd of fowl, and of creeping things, and of fishes.
ple to hear the wisdom of Solomon, from
ll kings of the earth, which had heard of his wisdom.
sent his servants unto Solomon; for he had
 the room of his father: for
er a lover of David.
nt to Hiram, saying, 5:3 Thou knowest how that David
ouse unto the name of the LORD his God
r the wars which were about him on every side, until the LORD put
les of his feet.
y God hath given me rest on every side, so that
 occurrent.
to build an house unto the name of the LORD
 father, saying, Thy son, whom
 upon thy throne in thy room, he shall build an house unto
efore command thou that they hew me cedar trees out of
ll be with thy servants: and unto thee
ll I give hire for thy servants according to all that thou shalt
knowest that there is not among us any that can
idonians.
 Hiram heard the words of Solomon, that
e rejoiced greatly, and said, Blessed be the LORD this day, which
avid a wise son over this great people.

have considered the things
test to me for: and I will do all thy desire concerning
ning timber of fir.
ll bring them down from Lebanon unto the sea: and I
ts unto the place that thou shalt
 me, and will cause them to be discharged there, and thou shalt
hou shalt accomplish my desire, in giving food for
ave Solomon cedar trees and fir trees according to all
mon gave Hiram twenty thousand measures of wheat for food
nty measures of pure oil: thus gave Solomon
LORD gave Solomon wisdom, as he promised him: and there
 Solomon; and they two made a league
ther.
vy out of all Israel; and the levy
irty thousand men.
m to Lebanon, ten thousand a month by courses: a
o months at home: and Adoniram was
he levy.
e and ten thousand that bare burdens,
 fourscore thousand hewers in the mountains; 5:16 Beside the chief
icers which were over the work, three thousand and
the people that wrought in the work.
17 And the king commanded, and they brought great stones, costly
stones, to lay the foundation of the house.
's builders did hew them, and the
uarers: so they prepared timber and stones to build the house.
 pass in the four hundred and eightieth year after
 out of the land of Egypt, in the
year of Solomon's reign over Israel, in the month Zif, which is
hat he began to build the house of the LORD.
 built for the LORD, the length
as threescore cubits, and the breadth thereof twenty cubits,
 thirty cubits.
e the temple of the house, twenty cubits was
readth of the house; and ten
he breadth thereof before the house.
4 And for the house he made windows of narrow lights.
 the house he built chambers round about,
t, both of the temple and of
and he made chambers round about: 6:6 The nethermost
 and the middle was six cubits broad,
 the third was seven cubits broad: for without in the wall of the
rowed rests round about, that the beams should not be
house.
n building, was built of stone made
 before it was brought thither: so that there was neither hammer
ol of iron heard in the house, while it was in
ddle chamber was in the right side of the
rs into the middle chamber,
e middle into the third.
t the house, and finished it; and covered the house with

t all the house, five cubits
ey rested on the house with timber of cedar.
o Solomon, saying, 6:12 Concerning
ouse which thou art in building, if thou wilt walk in my
udgments, and keep all my commandments to
 with thee, which I spake
father: 6:13 And I will dwell among the children of
 people Israel.
he house, and finished it.
built the walls of the house within with boards of cedar,
se, and the walls of the ceiling: and he
covered them on the inside with wood, and covered the floor of the
s of fir.
ts on the sides of the house, both the
oor and the walls with boards of cedar: he even built them for it
the oracle, even for the most holy place.
 before it, was forty cubits
8 And the cedar of the house within was carved with knops and open
 cedar; there was no stone seen.
nd the oracle he prepared in the house within, to set there the
 of the LORD.
e forepart was twenty cubits in length, and
bits in the height thereof: and
id it with pure gold; and so covered the altar which was of
on overlaid the house within with pure gold: and he made
of gold before the oracle; and he overlaid
e he overlaid with gold, until he had finished
that was by the oracle he overlaid
old.
 two cherubims of olive tree, each
bits high.
 one wing of the cherub, and five cubits
the other wing of the cherub: from the uttermost part of the one wing
rmost part of the other were ten cubits.

: both the cherubims were of
and one size.
e cherub was ten cubits, and so was it of the
cherubims within the inner house: and they
ms, so that the wing of the
he one wall, and the wing of the other cherub touched the
gs touched one another in the midst of the
bims with gold.
the walls of the house round about with carved
and open flowers, within and
6:30 And the floors of the house he overlaid with gold, within and
 And for the entering of the oracle he made doors of olive tree:
e posts were a fifth part of the wall.
6:32 The two doors also were of olive tree; and he carved upon them
rubims and palm trees and open flowers, and overlaid
d upon the cherubims, and upon the palm
rees.
 of the temple posts of olive tree, a
rth part of the wall.
doors were of fir tree: the two leaves of the one
aves of the other door were folding.
35 And he carved thereon cherubims and palm trees and open flowers:
m with gold fitted upon the carved work.

hree rows of hewed stone, and
dar beams.
the foundation of the house of the LORD
aid, in the month Zif: 6:38 And in the eleventh year, in the month
e eighth month, was the house finished throughout all
ing to all the fashion of it. So was he
even years in building it.
mon was building his own house thirteen years, and he
2 He built also the house of the forest of Lebanon; the length
ed cubits, and the breadth thereof fifty cubits,
ts, upon four rows of cedar pillars,
 cedar beams upon the pillars.
it was covered with cedar above upon the beams, that lay on
teen in a row.
ws in three rows, and light was against light
ors and posts were square, with the windows: and
anks.
s; the length thereof was fifty
nd the breadth thereof thirty cubits: and the porch was
pillars and the thick beam were before
em.
rone where he might judge, even the
 of judgment: and it was covered with cedar from one side of the
.
another court within the porch,
 of the like work. Solomon made also an house for Pharaoh's
aken to wife, like unto this porch.
 All these were of costly stones, according to the measures of
with saws, within and without, even from the
the outside toward the great
10 And the foundation was of costly stones, even great stones,
, and stones of eight cubits.
above were costly stones, after the measures of hewed stones,
nd the great court round about was with three rows of hewed
dar beams, both for the inner court of the
the house.
nd fetched Hiram out of Tyre.
as a widow's son of the tribe of Naphtali, and his father was
er in brass: and he was filled with wisdom, and
all works in brass. And he came to
olomon, and wrought all his work.
For he cast two pillars of brass, of eighteen cubits high apiece:
lve cubits did compass either of them about.
lten brass, to set upon the tops
illars: the height of the one chapiter was five cubits, and
 chapiter was five cubits: 7:17 And nets of
, for the chapiters which were
op of the pillars; seven for the one chapiter, and seven for

s round about upon the one
ver the chapiters that were upon the top, with
other chapiter.
that were upon the top of the pillars were of

lars had pomegranates also
ainst the belly which was by the network: and the
rows round about upon the other

porch of the temple: and he set
ght pillar, and called the name thereof Jachin: and he set up
called the name thereof Boaz.
upon the top of the pillars was lily work: so was the work of

its from the one brim to the
s round all about, and his height was five cubits: and a
compass it round about.
the brim of it round about there were knops compassing
ng the sea round about: the knops were
st in two rows, when it was cast.
It stood upon twelve oxen, three looking toward the north, and
 the west, and three looking toward the south, and
nd the sea was set above upon them,
ll their hinder parts were inward.
 And it was an hand breadth thick, and the brim thereof was
f a cup, with flowers of lilies: it contained
de ten bases of brass; four cubits was the length of one
breadth thereof, and three cubits the height
es was on this manner: they had borders,
and the borders were between the ledges: 7:29 And on the borders that
the ledges were lions, oxen, and cherubims: and upon the
ove: and beneath the lions and oxen were
certain additions made of thin work.
30 And every base had four brasen wheels, and plates of brass: and
 thereof had undersetters: under the laver were
 every addition.
it within the chapiter and above was a cubit:
 the work of the base, a cubit
f: and also upon the mouth of it were gravings with their
round.
four wheels; and the axletrees of the
els were joined to the base: and the height of a wheel was a cubit
.
ike the work of a chariot wheel:
letrees, and their naves, and their felloes, and their spokes,
7:34 And there were four undersetters to the four corners of one base:
rsetters were of the very base itself.
7:35 And in the top of the base was there a round compass of half a
 on the top of the base the ledges thereof and the
.
thereof, and on the borders
raved cherubims, lions, and palm trees, according to the
nd additions round about.
is manner he made the ten bases: all of them had one
size.
rass: one laver contained forty
d every laver was four cubits: and upon every one of the ten
39 And he put five bases on the right side of the house, and five on
of the house: and he set the sea on the right side of
st the south.
avers, and the shovels, and the basons. So
that he made king Solomon for
f the LORD: 7:41 The two pillars, and the two bowls of the
he top of the two pillars; and the two
tworks, to cover the two bowls of the chapiters which were upon the
ars; 7:42 And four hundred pomegranates for the two
granates for one network, to cover the
o bowls of the chapiters that were upon the pillars; 7:43 And the
n lavers on the bases; 7:44 And one sea, and twelve
e pots, and the shovels, and the
and all these vessels, which Hiram made to king Solomon for
were of bright brass.
 of Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground

nweighed, because they were
y: neither was the weight of the brass found out.
essels that pertained unto the house of
he LORD: the altar of gold, and the table of gold, whereupon the
9 And the candlesticks of pure gold, five on the
before the oracle, with the flowers,
the lamps, and the tongs of gold, 7:50 And the bowls, and the
ons, and the spoons, and the censers of pure
 the doors of the inner house,
oly place, and for the doors of the house, to wit, of the
ded all the work that king Solomon made for the house of
ght in the things which David his father had
ld, and the vessels, did he put
 treasures of the house of the LORD.
1 Then Solomon assembled the elders of Israel, and all the heads of
 chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto
at they might bring up the ark of the
enant of the LORD out of the city of David, which is Zion.
 Israel assembled themselves unto king Solomon
hich is the seventh month.
the elders of Israel came, and the priests took up the
 up the ark of the LORD, and the tabernacle of the
essels that were in the tabernacle,
those did the priests and the Levites bring up.
 congregation of Israel, that were
led unto him, were with him before the ark, sacrificing sheep
not be told nor numbered for multitude.

 the covenant of the LORD
 into the oracle of the house, to the most holy place,
cherubims.
 forth their two wings over the place of
the ark, and the cherubims covered the ark and the staves thereof
 they drew out the staves, that the ends of the staves were
ace before the oracle, and they were not seen
 day.
save the two tables of stone, which
 put there at Horeb, when the LORD made a covenant with the
n they came out of the land of Egypt.
:10 And it came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy
 cloud filled the house of the LORD, 8:11 So that the
nister because of the cloud: for the
y of the LORD had filled the house of the LORD.
 said that he would dwell in the
rkness.
n house to dwell in, a settled place
thee to abide in for ever.
 king turned his face about, and blessed all the
he congregation of Israel stood;)
d he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, which spake with
 my father, and hath with his hand fulfilled it,
brought forth my people Israel out
pt, I chose no city out of all the tribes of Israel to build an
 might be therein; but I chose David to be over my
s in the heart of David my father to build an house for
 Israel.
vid my father, Whereas it was in thine
art to build an house unto my name, thou didst well that it was in
8:19 Nevertheless thou shalt not build the house; but thy son that
 out of thy loins, he shall build the house unto my
 performed his word that he spake, and I am
, and sit on the throne of
 LORD promised, and have built an house for the name of
8:21 And I have set there a place for the ark, wherein is the covenant
 which he made with our fathers, when he brought them out
8:22 And Solomon stood before the altar of the LORD in the presence of
regation of Israel, and spread forth his hands toward
D God of Israel, there is no God like
e, in heaven above, or on earth beneath, who keepest covenant and
rvants that walk before thee with all their heart:
ant David my father that thou
him: thou spakest also with thy mouth, and hast fulfilled
 is this day.
God of Israel, keep with thy servant David my
ng, There shall not fail thee a
 sight to sit on the throne of Israel; so that thy children
 that they walk before me as thou hast walked
Israel, let thy word, I pray thee, be verified,
 David my father.
eed dwell on the earth? behold, the heaven and
e; how much less this house that I
uilded?  8:28 Yet have thou respect unto the prayer of thy
lication, O LORD my God, to hearken unto the
nt prayeth before thee to day:
thine eyes may be open toward this house night and day, even
ich thou hast said, My name shall be there: that
r which thy servant shall make
s place.
upplication of thy servant, and of thy
ople Israel, when they shall pray toward this place: and hear thou
elling place: and when thou hearest, forgive.
s neighbour, and an oath be laid
 to cause him to swear, and the oath come before thine altar
en hear thou in heaven, and do, and judge thy
ring his way upon his head; and
g the righteous, to give him according to his righteousness.
 Israel be smitten down before the enemy, because
d shall turn again to thee, and
hy name, and pray, and make supplication unto thee in this
ou in heaven, and forgive the sin of thy
people Israel, and bring them again unto the land which thou gavest
ers.
here is no rain, because they have
 against thee; if they pray toward this place, and confess thy
their sin, when thou afflictest them: 8:36 Then
e sin of thy servants, and of thy
Israel, that thou teach them the good way wherein they should
pon thy land, which thou hast given to thy people
ere be in the land famine, if there be pestilence, blasting,
there be caterpiller; if their enemy besiege
soever plague, whatsoever
be; 8:38 What prayer and supplication soever be made by
le Israel, which shall know every man the
 his hands toward this house:
ear thou in heaven thy dwelling place, and forgive, and do,
ccording to his ways, whose heart thou knowest;
the hearts of all the children of
:40 That they may fear thee all the days that they live in the
st unto our fathers.
erning a stranger, that is not of thy people Israel,
y for thy name's sake; 8:42 (For they
ll hear of thy great name, and of thy strong hand, and of thy
hen he shall come and pray toward this house;
 place, and do according to all
stranger calleth to thee for: that all people of the earth
ar thee, as do thy people Israel; and that
ave builded, is called by thy
44 If thy people go out to battle against their enemy, whithersoever
d them, and shall pray unto the LORD toward the city
ward the house that I have built for thy
name: 8:45 Then hear thou in heaven their prayer and their
in their cause.
t thee, (for there is no man that sinneth not,)
liver them to the enemy, so that
ry them away captives unto the land of the enemy, far or near;
ll bethink themselves in the land whither they
nd make supplication unto thee in
d of them that carried them captives, saying, We have sinned,
ely, we have committed wickedness; 8:48 And so
t, and with all their soul, in the
f their enemies, which led them away captive, and pray unto thee
 which thou gavest unto their fathers, the city
se which I have built for thy name:
Then hear thou their prayer and their supplication in heaven thy
d maintain their cause, 8:50 And forgive thy people
and all their transgressions wherein
 have transgressed against thee, and give them compassion before
hem captive, that they may have compassion on them:
d thine inheritance, which thou
t forth out of Egypt, from the midst of the furnace of iron:
ay be open unto the supplication of thy servant,
eople Israel, to hearken unto them
 that they call for unto thee.
 thou didst separate them from among all the people of the
itance, as thou spakest by the hand of Moses
fathers out of Egypt, O LORD
 And it was so, that when Solomon had made an end of praying all
pplication unto the LORD, he arose from before the
 on his knees with his hands spread up
 heaven.
 all the congregation of Israel with a
ud voice, saying, 8:56 Blessed be the LORD, that hath given rest
rael, according to all that he promised: there hath
good promise, which he promised by the
nd of Moses his servant.
our God be with us, as he was with our fathers: let him
s: 8:58 That he may incline our hearts unto
ep his commandments, and his
d his judgments, which he commanded our fathers.
rewith I have made supplication before
e LORD, be nigh unto the LORD our God day and night, that he
his servant, and the cause of his people Israel
equire: 8:60 That all the people of
arth may know that the LORD is God, and that there is none else.
art therefore be perfect with the LORD our God, to
p his commandments, as at this day.
2 And the king, and all Israel with him, offered sacrifice before
 And Solomon offered a sacrifice of peace offerings, which he
, two and twenty thousand oxen, and an hundred
ng and all the children of Israel
ed the house of the LORD.
 day did the king hallow the middle of the court that was
ORD: for there he offered burnt offerings,
eace offerings: because the
that was before the LORD was too little to receive the
ferings, and the fat of the peace
gs.
a feast, and all Israel with him, a
 congregation, from the entering in of Hamath unto the river of
ORD our God, seven days and seven days, even
ay he sent the people away: and they blessed the
yful and glad of heart for all the
ss that the LORD had done for David his servant, and for Israel
And it came to pass, when Solomon had finished the building of the
D, and the king's house, and all Solomon's desire
hat the LORD appeared to Solomon the
nd time, as he had appeared unto him at Gibeon.
 have heard thy prayer and thy
on, that thou hast made before me: I have hallowed this
t, to put my name there for ever; and mine
tually.
e me, as David thy father walked, in
grity of heart, and in uprightness, to do according to all that I
ee, and wilt keep my statutes and my judgments: 9:5
e of thy kingdom upon Israel for ever,
 I promised to David thy father, saying, There shall not fail thee a
hrone of Israel.
 all turn from following me, ye or your
hildren, and will not keep my commandments and my statutes which I
you, but go and serve other gods, and worship them:
out of the land which I have given
and this house, which I have hallowed for my name, will I cast
 Israel shall be a proverb and a byword among all
ich is high, every one that passeth
 shall be astonished, and shall hiss; and they shall say, Why
us unto this land, and to this house?  9:9 And
ook the LORD their God, who
 their fathers out of the land of Egypt, and have taken
ave worshipped them, and served them:
refore hath the LORD brought upon them all this evil.
 the end of twenty years, when Solomon had
ORD, and the king's house,
m the king of Tyre had furnished Solomon with cedar
old, according to all his desire,) that
hen king Solomon gave Hiram twenty cities in the land of Galilee.
came out from Tyre to see the cities which Solomon had
him not.
are these which thou hast given me, my
other? And he called them the land of Cabul unto this day.
 the king sixscore talents of gold.
5 And this is the reason of the levy which king Solomon raised; for
use of the LORD, and his own house, and Millo, and the
, and Megiddo, and Gezer.
aoh king of Egypt had gone up, and taken Gezer, and burnt
he Canaanites that dwelt in the city, and
 Solomon's wife.
 Gezer, and Bethhoron the nether, 9:18 And
n the land, 9:19 And all the
ore that Solomon had, and cities for his chariots, and
 that which Solomon desired to build in
erusalem, and in Lebanon, and in all the land of his dominion.
eople that were left of the Amorites, Hittites,
 which were not of the children of
, 9:21 Their children that were left after them in the land,
srael also were not able utterly to destroy,
of bondservice unto this day.
of the children of Israel did Solomon make no bondmen: but
d his servants, and his princes, and his
captains, and rulers of his chariots, and his horsemen.
 of the officers that were over Solomon's
rule over the people that
work.
up out of the city of David unto her
e which Solomon had built for her: then did he build Millo.
in a year did Solomon offer burnt offerings and
h he built unto the LORD, and he
cense upon the altar that was before the LORD. So he finished
d king Solomon made a navy of ships in Eziongeber, which is
ore of the Red sea, in the land of Edom.

ants, shipmen that had
ea, with the servants of Solomon.
And they came to Ophir, and fetched from thence gold, four
ts, and brought it to king Solomon.
1 And when the queen of Sheba heard of the fame of Solomon
he LORD, she came to prove him with hard
questions.
em with a very great train, with camels
hat bare spices, and very much gold, and precious stones: and when
Solomon, she communed with him of all that was in her
ld her all her questions: there was not any thing
her not.
ba had seen all Solomon's wisdom, and
 house that he had built, 10:5 And the meat of his table, and the
rvants, and the attendance of his ministers, and
 and his ascent by which he went up
the house of the LORD; there was no more spirit in her.
king, It was a true report that I heard in
dom.
rds, until I came, and mine eyes had
 it: and, behold, the half was not told me: thy wisdom and
 fame which I heard.
 men, happy are these thy servants, which stand
ear thy wisdom.
D thy God, which delighted in thee, to set thee
e LORD loved Israel for ever,
ade he thee king, to do judgment and justice.
red and twenty talents of gold, and
ices very great store, and precious stones: there came no more
ices as these which the queen of Sheba gave to
also of Hiram, that brought gold from Ophir,
almug trees, and precious
2 And the king made of the almug trees pillars for the house of
he king's house, harps also and psalteries for
ees, nor were seen unto this day.
 And king Solomon gave unto the queen of Sheba all her desire,
, beside that which Solomon gave her of his royal
 to her own country, she and her servants.
 to Solomon in one year was six
hreescore and six talents of gold, 10:15 Beside that he had
 of the traffick of the spice merchants, and of
 governors of the country.
ng Solomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six
t to one target.
e hundred shields of beaten gold; three pound of
ing put them in the house of the
f Lebanon.
 a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it
ad six steps, and the top of the throne was round
ither side on the place of the seat,
two lions stood beside the stays.
 And twelve lions stood there on the one side and on the other
there was not the like made in any kingdom.
 vessels were of gold, and all
s of the house of the forest of Lebanon were of pure gold;
was nothing accounted of in the days of
olomon.
 navy of Tharshish with the navy of
: once in three years came the navy of Tharshish, bringing gold,
 and apes, and peacocks.
Solomon exceeded all the kings of the earth for riches
 all the earth sought to Solomon, to hear his wisdom, which
t.
 present, vessels of silver, and
of gold, and garments, and armour, and spices, horses, and
ar.
 chariots and horsemen: and he had
sand and four hundred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen,
he cities for chariots, and with the king at
silver to be in Jerusalem as stones, and
cedars made he to be as the sycomore trees that are in the vale, for
10:28 And Solomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the
ants received the linen yarn at a price.

 of Egypt for six hundred
er, and an horse for an hundred and fifty: and so for
, and for the kings of Syria, did they
ing them out by their means.
ing Solomon loved many strange women, together with the
of the Moabites, Ammonites, Edomites,
onians, and Hittites: 11:2 Of the nations concerning which the LORD
hildren of Israel, Ye shall not go in to them, neither
 for surely they will turn away your heart
se in love.
ed wives, princesses, and three hundred
oncubines: and his wives turned away his heart.
lomon was old, that his wives turned
 his heart after other gods: and his heart was not perfect with
s was the heart of David his father.
:5 For Solomon went after Ashtoreth the goddess of the Zidonians,
the abomination of the Ammonites.
And Solomon did evil in the sight of the LORD, and went not fully
s did David his father.
olomon build an high place for Chemosh, the abomination
s before Jerusalem, and for Molech, the
bomination of the children of Ammon.
:8 And likewise did he for all his strange wives, which burnt
d unto their gods.
s angry with Solomon, because his heart was turned
ch had appeared unto him twice, 11:10
 had commanded him concerning this thing, that he should not go
ut he kept not that which the LORD commanded.
Solomon, Forasmuch as this is done
e, and thou hast not kept my covenant and my statutes, which I
 I will surely rend the kingdom from thee, and
2 Notwithstanding in thy days I will not do it for David thy
ill rend it out of the hand of thy son.

e kingdom; but will give one
 son for David my servant's sake, and for Jerusalem's sake
11:14 And the LORD stirred up an adversary unto Solomon, Hadad the
of the king's seed in Edom.
t came to pass, when David was in Edom, and Joab the
p to bury the slain, after he had
 every male in Edom; 11:16 (For six months did Joab remain
ntil he had cut off every male in Edom:) 11:17
ites of his father's servants with
o go into Egypt; Hadad being yet a little child.
an, and came to Paran: and they took
with them out of Paran, and they came to Egypt, unto Pharaoh king
ave him an house, and appointed him victuals, and
 found great favour in the sight of Pharaoh, so that he
 of his own wife, the sister of Tahpenes
the queen.
enes bare him Genubath his son, whom
enes weaned in Pharaoh's house: and Genubath was in Pharaoh's
ons of Pharaoh.
ard in Egypt that David slept with his fathers,
st was dead, Hadad said to Pharaoh,
e depart, that I may go to mine own country.
t what hast thou lacked with me,
hold, thou seekest to go to thine own country? And he
t me go in any wise.
red him up another adversary, Rezon the son of
dadezer king of Zobah: 11:24 And
red men unto him, and became captain over a band, when David
d they went to Damascus, and dwelt therein, and
e was an adversary to Israel all the days of Solomon,
d did: and he abhorred Israel, and
d over Syria.
n of Nebat, an Ephrathite of Zereda,
mon's servant, whose mother's name was Zeruah, a widow woman, even
 hand against the king.
was the cause that he lifted up his hand against the
 repaired the breaches of the city of
id his father.
am was a mighty man of valour: and Solomon
ious, he made him ruler over
ge of the house of Joseph.
 came to pass at that time when Jeroboam went out of
ijah the Shilonite found him in the way;
and he had clad himself with a new garment; and they two were alone in
1:30 And Ahijah caught the new garment that was on him,
s: 11:31 And he said to Jeroboam, Take thee
e God of Israel, Behold, I will
kingdom out of the hand of Solomon, and will give ten tribes
 shall have one tribe for my servant David's
ty which I have chosen out of
bes of Israel:) 11:33 Because that they have forsaken me,
reth the goddess of the Zidonians, Chemosh
god of the children of Ammon,
t walked in my ways, to do that which is right in mine
s and my judgments, as did David his
er.
hole kingdom out of his hand: but I
make him prince all the days of his life for David my servant's
 because he kept my commandments and my statutes:
 out of his son's hand, and will give
unto thee, even ten tribes.
nto his son will I give one tribe, that David my servant
ore me in Jerusalem, the city which I have
 And I will take thee, and thou shalt reign according to all that
, and shalt be king over Israel.
And it shall be, if thou wilt hearken unto all that I command
n my ways, and do that is right in my sight, to
s, as David my servant did; that I
e with thee, and build thee a sure house, as I built for David,
l unto thee.
afflict the seed of David, but not for ever.
ll Jeroboam. And Jeroboam arose,
 into Egypt, unto Shishak king of Egypt, and was in Egypt
n.
lomon, and all that he did, and
m, are they not written in the book of the acts of Solomon?
 Solomon reigned in Jerusalem over all Israel
 slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city
am his son reigned in his stead.
nd Rehoboam went to Shechem: for all Israel were come to Shechem

 the son of Nebat, who was yet
heard of it, (for he was fled from the presence of king
 in Egypt;) 12:3 That they sent and called
on of Israel came, and spake
m, saying, 12:4 Thy father made our yoke grievous: now
vous service of thy father, and his heavy
e will serve thee.
o them, Depart yet for three days, then come again

he old men, that stood before
 father while he yet lived, and said, How do ye advise that
e?  12:7 And they spake unto him, saying, If
e this day, and wilt serve them,
er them, and speak good words to them, then they will be thy
12:8 But he forsook the counsel of the old men, which they had given
lted with the young men that were grown up with him, and
:9 And he said unto them, What counsel give
have spoken to me, saying, Make
which thy father did put upon us lighter?  12:10 And the
up with him spake unto him, saying, Thus
shalt thou speak unto this people that spake unto thee, saying, Thy
 yoke heavy, but make thou it lighter unto us; thus
ttle finger shall be thicker than my
er's loins.
ther did lade you with a heavy yoke, I will
sed you with whips, but I will
ou with scorpions.
d all the people came to Rehoboam the third day,
 Come to me again the third day.
And the king answered the people roughly, and forsook the old
ey gave him; 12:14 And spake to them after the
 father made your yoke heavy, and
add to your yoke: my father also chastised you with whips, but
with scorpions.
g hearkened not unto the people; for the cause
form his saying, which the LORD
Ahijah the Shilonite unto Jeroboam the son of Nebat.
 that the king hearkened not unto them,
he people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in David?
 inheritance in the son of Jesse: to your tents, O
se, David. So Israel departed unto
tents.
 Israel which dwelt in the cities of
h, Rehoboam reigned over them.
en king Rehoboam sent Adoram, who was over the tribute; and
ith stones, that he died. Therefore king
Rehoboam made speed to get him up to his chariot, to flee to
 Israel rebelled against the house of David unto this day.
ass, when all Israel heard that Jeroboam was
him unto the congregation, and
ing over all Israel: there was none that followed the house
 of Judah only.
 was come to Jerusalem, he assembled all the
amin, an hundred and fourscore
hosen men, which were warriors, to fight against the house
kingdom again to Rehoboam the son of Solomon.
 Shemaiah the man of God, saying,
peak unto Rehoboam, the son of Solomon, king of Judah, and unto
dah and Benjamin, and to the remnant of the people,
RD, Ye shall not go up, nor fight
 your brethren the children of Israel: return every man to his
g is from me. They hearkened therefore to the word
art, according to the word of the

nt Ephraim, and dwelt therein;
ut from thence, and built Penuel.
 And Jeroboam said in his heart, Now shall the kingdom return to
: 12:27 If this people go up to do sacrifice in the
 then shall the heart of this people
 again unto their lord, even unto Rehoboam king of Judah, and they
nd go again to Rehoboam king of Judah.
12:28 Whereupon the king took counsel, and made two calves of gold,
hem, It is too much for you to go up to Jerusalem:
 brought thee up out of the land of
.
nd the other put he in Dan.
his thing became a sin: for the people went to worship
n.
laces, and made priests of the
the people, which were not of the sons of Levi.
st in the eighth month, on the
day of the month, like unto the feast that is in Judah, and
ar. So did he in Bethel, sacrificing unto the
d in Bethel the priests of the
s which he had made.
d upon the altar which he had made in Bethel the
 even in the month which he had
f his own heart; and ordained a feast unto the children of
pon the altar, and burnt incense.
And, behold, there came a man of God out of Judah by the word of
el: and Jeroboam stood by the altar to burn incense.
e altar in the word of the LORD, and said,
old, a child shall be born
 of David, Josiah by name; and upon thee shall he offer
ces that burn incense upon thee, and men's
And he gave a sign the same day, saying, This is the sign which
n; Behold, the altar shall be rent, and the ashes
out.
g Jeroboam heard the saying of the
 God, which had cried against the altar in Bethel, that he put
the altar, saying, Lay hold on him. And his hand,
ried up, so that he could not pull it
again to him.
ent, and the ashes poured out from the altar,
f God had given by the word of

o the man of God, Intreat now
 the LORD thy God, and pray for me, that my hand may be
man of God besought the LORD, and the
g's hand was restored him again, and became as it was before.
aid unto the man of God, Come home with me, and
ee a reward.
id unto the king, If thou wilt give me half
, neither will I eat bread nor
r in this place: 13:9 For so was it charged me by the word
 no bread, nor drink water, nor turn again by
10 So he went another way, and returned not by the way that he came
3:11 Now there dwelt an old prophet in Bethel; and his sons came and
he works that the man of God had done that day in
oken unto the king, them they told
o their father.
said unto them, What way went he? For his sons
t, which came from Judah.
said unto his sons, Saddle me the ass. So they saddled
reon, 13:14 And went after the man of God,
he said unto him, Art thou the
 that camest from Judah? And he said, I am.
e with me, and eat bread.
said, I may not return with thee, nor go in with thee:
 drink water with thee in this place:
17 For it was said to me by the word of the LORD, Thou shalt eat no
 water there, nor turn again to go by the way that thou
to him, I am a prophet also as thou art; and an angel
the LORD, saying, Bring him back with
e into thine house, that he may eat bread and drink water. But he

at bread in his house, and

t the table, that the word of
me unto the prophet that brought him back: 13:21 And he
hat came from Judah, saying, Thus saith the
the mouth of the LORD, and hast
the commandment which the LORD thy God commanded thee, 13:22
ast eaten bread and drunk water in the place, of
, Eat no bread, and drink no water;
arcase shall not come unto the sepulchre of thy fathers.
s, after he had eaten bread, and after he had
s, to wit, for the prophet whom
ought back.
 a lion met him by the way, and slew him:
the ass stood by it, the lion
by the carcase.
passed by, and saw the carcase cast in the way,
e: and they came and told it in the
where the old prophet dwelt.
when the prophet that brought him back from the way heard
he man of God, who was disobedient unto the
th delivered him unto the lion,
h torn him, and slain him, according to the word of the LORD,
im.
ing, Saddle me the ass. And they
him.
rcase cast in the way, and the ass
e lion standing by the carcase: the lion had not eaten the
s.
rcase of the man of God, and laid
 the ass, and brought it back: and the old prophet came to the
o bury him.
se in his own grave; and they mourned over
d it came to pass, after he
m, that he spake to his sons, saying, When I am dead,
 wherein the man of God is buried; lay my
ing which he cried by the
D against the altar in Bethel, and against all the
are in the cities of Samaria, shall
y come to pass.
Jeroboam returned not from his evil way, but
 priests of the high places:
uld, he consecrated him, and he became one of the priests
:34 And this thing became sin unto the house of Jeroboam, even to
o destroy it from off the face of the earth.
Jeroboam fell sick.
aid to his wife, Arise, I pray thee, and disguise
o be the wife of Jeroboam; and get
o Shiloh: behold, there is Ahijah the prophet, which told me
over this people.
ee ten loaves, and cracknels, and a cruse of
ee what shall become of the
4 And Jeroboam's wife did so, and arose, and went to Shiloh, and
of Ahijah. But Ahijah could not see; for his eyes

d, the wife of Jeroboam
hing of thee for her son; for he is sick: thus and
r it shall be, when she cometh in,
he shall feign herself to be another woman.
 the sound of her feet, as she
 the door, that he said, Come in, thou wife of Jeroboam; why
to be another? for I am sent to thee with heavy
 Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Forasmuch
le, and made thee prince over my
srael, 14:8 And rent the kingdom away from the house of David,
d yet thou hast not been as my servant David, who
lowed me with all his heart, to do
nly which was right in mine eyes; 14:9 But hast done evil above
e thee: for thou hast gone and made thee other
me to anger, and hast cast me
back: 14:10 Therefore, behold, I will bring evil upon the
ll cut off from Jeroboam him that pisseth
 and left in Israel, and will
he remnant of the house of Jeroboam, as a man taketh away
.
he city shall the dogs eat; and
dieth in the field shall the fowls of the air eat: for the
14:12 Arise thou therefore, get thee to thine own house: and when thy
to the city, the child shall die.
 And all Israel shall mourn for him, and bury him: for he only of
me to the grave, because in him there is found some
of Israel in the house of Jeroboam.
14 Moreover the LORD shall raise him up a king over Israel, who
ouse of Jeroboam that day: but what? even now.
ael, as a reed is shaken in the
d he shall root up Israel out of this good land, which he
d shall scatter them beyond the river,
cause they have made their groves, provoking the LORD to anger.
l give Israel up because of the sins of Jeroboam, who
to sin.
, and departed, and came to Tirzah: and
hen she came to the threshold of the door, the child died; 14:18 And
m; and all Israel mourned for him, according to the word
e by the hand of his servant Ahijah the
rophet.
of Jeroboam, how he warred, and how he
igned, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the
l.
igned were two and twenty years:
lept with his fathers, and Nadab his son reigned in his stead.
 the son of Solomon reigned in Judah. Rehoboam was
began to reign, and he reigned
years in Jerusalem, the city which the LORD did choose out
ael, to put his name there. And his mother's
2 And Judah did evil in the sight of the LORD, and they provoked
th their sins which they had committed, above all
4:23 For they also built them high places, and images, and groves, on
ll, and under every green tree.
nd there were also sodomites in the land: and they did
tions of the nations which the LORD cast
out before the children of Israel.
5 And it came to pass in the fifth year of king Rehoboam, that
t came up against Jerusalem: 14:26 And he took
he LORD, and the treasures of the
house; he even took away all: and he took away all the shields
n had made.
e in their stead brasen shields, and
itted them unto the hands of the chief of the guard, which kept
g's house.
e king went into the house of the LORD,
hat the guard bare them, and brought them back into the guard
 the rest of the acts of Rehoboam, and all that he did, are
 book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
boam and Jeroboam all their days.
 And Rehoboam slept with his fathers, and was buried with his
f David. And his mother's name was Naamah an
 in his stead.
th year of king Jeroboam the son of Nebat
years reigned he in Jerusalem. and his mother's name was
bishalom.
 sins of his father, which he had done
fore him: and his heart was not perfect with the LORD his God, as
d his father.
id's sake did the LORD his God give him a
r him, and to establish
ecause David did that which was right in the eyes of
 from any thing that he commanded him
 the days of his life, save only in the matter of Uriah the
ere was war between Rehoboam and Jeroboam all the days of
 rest of the acts of Abijam, and all that he did, are they
of the chronicles of the kings of Judah? And
oam.
hers; and they buried him in the
David: and Asa his son reigned in his stead.
roboam king of Israel reigned Asa
dah.
ned he in Jerusalem. And his
e was Maachah, the daughter of Abishalom.
in the eyes of the LORD, as did
 father.
omites out of the land, and removed all
he idols that his fathers had made.
13 And also Maachah his mother, even her he removed from being
ad made an idol in a grove; and Asa destroyed her
idron.
ot removed: nevertheless Asa's heart
perfect with the LORD all his days.
15 And he brought in the things which his father had dedicated, and
h himself had dedicated, into the house of the LORD,

d Baasha king of Israel all

against Judah, and built
ight not suffer any to go out or come in to Asa king
ok all the silver and the gold that were left in the
LORD, and the treasures of the king's
se, and delivered them into the hand of his servants: and king Asa
hadad, the son of Tabrimon, the son of Hezion, king of
s, saying, 15:19 There is a league between
hy father: behold, I have sent
a present of silver and gold; come and break thy league with
 that he may depart from me.
enhadad hearkened unto king Asa, and sent the captains of
ainst the cities of Israel, and smote Ijon,
inneroth, with all the land of

heard thereof, that he left off
of Ramah, and dwelt in Tirzah.
en king Asa made a proclamation throughout all Judah; none was
ook away the stones of Ramah, and the timber
 and king Asa built with them
jamin, and Mizpah.
l the acts of Asa, and all his might, and all that
built, are they not written in the
f the chronicles of the kings of Judah? Nevertheless in the time
was diseased in his feet.
 slept with his fathers, and was buried with his fathers
ather: and Jehoshaphat his son reigned in
Jeroboam began to reign over Israel in the
igned over Israel two years.
he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way
is sin wherewith he made Israel to sin.

e house of Issachar,
m; and Baasha smote him at Gibbethon, which
and all Israel laid siege to

 of Judah did Baasha slay him,
d in his stead.
ss, when he reigned, that he smote all the
am any that breathed, until he
yed him, according unto the saying of the LORD, which he
h the Shilonite: 15:30 Because of the sins
e made Israel sin, by his
rewith he provoked the LORD God of Israel to anger.
s of Nadab, and all that he did, are they
 of the kings of Israel?
was war between Asa and Baasha king of Israel all
 year of Asa king of Judah began Baasha the son of
in Tirzah, twenty and four years.
 And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way
n his sin wherewith he made Israel to sin.
 Jehu the son of Hanani against
aying, 16:2 Forasmuch as I exalted thee out of the dust, and
my people Israel; and thou hast walked in the
ple Israel to sin, to provoke me
 with their sins; 16:3 Behold, I will take away the posterity
sterity of his house; and will make thy house
 Nebat.
n the city shall the dogs eat; and him
at dieth of his in the fields shall the fowls of the air eat.
f the acts of Baasha, and what he did, and his
ook of the chronicles of the kings
ael?  16:6 So Baasha slept with his fathers, and was buried in
 son reigned in his stead.
o by the hand of the prophet Jehu the son of Hanani came
st Baasha, and against his house, even for
 the LORD, in provoking him to
 the work of his hands, in being like the house of Jeroboam;
him.
of Asa king of Judah began Elah the
f Baasha to reign over Israel in Tirzah, two years.
aptain of half his chariots, conspired
ainst him, as he was in Tirzah, drinking himself drunk in the house
 of his house in Tirzah.
i went in and smote him, and killed him, in the twenty
 of Judah, and reigned in his stead.
:11 And it came to pass, when he began to reign, as soon as he sat
hat he slew all the house of Baasha: he left him not
l, neither of his kinsfolks, nor of his
riends.
l the house of Baasha, according to the
ord of the LORD, which he spake against Baasha by Jehu the prophet.
 the sins of Baasha, and the sins of Elah his son, by
ch they made Israel to sin, in provoking
the LORD God of Israel to anger with their vanities.
ts of Elah, and all that he did, are they
 of the kings of Israel?
nty and seventh year of Asa king of Judah did Zimri
 the people were encamped against
on, which belonged to the Philistines.
16:16 And the people that were encamped heard say, Zimri hath
lso slain the king: wherefore all Israel made
ver Israel that day in the camp.
And Omri went up from Gibbethon, and all Israel with him, and

saw that the city was taken,
 into the palace of the king's house, and burnt the king's
, and died.
 sinned in doing evil in the sight of the
and in his sin which he did,
el to sin.
ts of Zimri, and his treason that he
ght, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of the
:21 Then were the people of Israel divided into
wed Tibni the son of Ginath, to
king; and half followed Omri.
 the people that followed Omri prevailed against the people
 son of Ginath: so Tibni died, and Omri
eigned.
ear of Asa king of Judah began Omri to
ign over Israel, twelve years: six years reigned he in Tirzah.
t the hill Samaria of Shemer for two talents of
called the name of the city which
t, after the name of Shemer, owner of the hill, Samaria.
vil in the eyes of the LORD, and did worse
For he walked in all the way of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and
 he made Israel to sin, to provoke the LORD God of
ies.
Omri which he did, and his might
shewed, are they not written in the book of the chronicles of
 16:28 So Omri slept with his fathers, and was
reigned in his stead.
thirty and eighth year of Asa king of Judah began
r Israel: and Ahab the son of Omri
d over Israel in Samaria twenty and two years.
 evil in the sight of the LORD above
that were before him.
 to pass, as if it had been a light thing for him to
he son of Nebat, that he took to wife
ebel the daughter of Ethbaal king of the Zidonians, and went and
orshipped him.
n altar for Baal in the house of Baal, which
Ahab made a grove; and Ahab did more to provoke the LORD God
n all the kings of Israel that were before him.
thelite build Jericho: he laid the
tion thereof in Abiram his firstborn, and set up the gates
son Segub, according to the word of the LORD,
un.
as of the inhabitants of Gilead,
o Ahab, As the LORD God of Israel liveth, before whom I stand,
ew nor rain these years, but according to my word.
came unto him, saying, 17:3 Get thee
e, and turn thee eastward, and hide thyself by the brook Cherith,
rdan.
halt drink of the brook; and I have
nded the ravens to feed thee there.
5 So he went and did according unto the word of the LORD: for he
the brook Cherith, that is before Jordan.
nd flesh in the morning, and
esh in the evening; and he drank of the brook.
hile, that the brook dried up,
ere had been no rain in the land.
And the word of the LORD came unto him, saying, 17:9 Arise, get
which belongeth to Zidon, and dwell there: behold,
here to sustain thee.
 and went to Zarephath. And when he came to the gate
 woman was there gathering of sticks:
 he called to her, and said, Fetch me, I pray thee, a little water
t I may drink.
ng to fetch it, he called to her, and said,
d in thine hand.
 the LORD thy God liveth, I have not a cake, but
d a little oil in a cruse: and,
 am gathering two sticks, that I may go in and dress it for
may eat it, and die.
aid unto her, Fear not; go and do as thou hast said:
ake first, and bring it unto me, and
r make for thee and for thy son.
For thus saith the LORD God of Israel, The barrel of meal shall
shall the cruse of oil fail, until the day that the
h.
 to the saying of Elijah: and she,
, and her house, did eat many days.
16 And the barrel of meal wasted not, neither did the cruse of oil
to the word of the LORD, which he spake by Elijah.
r these things, that the son of the
, the mistress of the house, fell sick; and his sickness was so
s no breath left in him.
said unto Elijah, What have I to do with thee, O thou
o me to call my sin to remembrance, and
o slay my son?  17:19 And he said unto her, Give me thy son. And he
 her bosom, and carried him up into a loft, where he
wn bed.
D, and said, O LORD my God, hast thou
o brought evil upon the widow with whom I sojourn, by slaying her
e stretched himself upon the child three times, and
O LORD my God, I pray thee, let this
d's soul come into him again.
 the LORD heard the voice of Elijah; and the soul of the
 and he revived.
the child, and brought him down out of the
m unto his mother: and Elijah
thy son liveth.
d to Elijah, Now by this I know that thou art a
e LORD in thy mouth is truth.
it came to pass after many days, that the word of the LORD
ird year, saying, Go, shew thyself unto Ahab;

to Ahab. And there was a sore
amaria.
hich was the governor of his house.
Obadiah feared the LORD greatly: 18:4 For it was so, when Jezebel
ets of the LORD, that Obadiah took an hundred
cave, and fed them with bread and
  18:5 And Ahab said unto Obadiah, Go into the land, unto all
nd unto all brooks: peradventure we may find
ve, that we lose not all the
8:6 So they divided the land between them to pass throughout it: Ahab
by himself, and Obadiah went another way by himself.
he way, behold, Elijah met him: and he
ew him, and fell on his face, and said, Art thou that my lord
answered him, I am: go, tell thy lord, Behold,
 What have I sinned, that thou wouldest deliver thy
to slay me?  18:10 As the LORD thy God
veth, there is no nation or kingdom, whither my lord hath not sent
d when they said, He is not there; he took an oath of
they found thee not.
 sayest, Go, tell thy lord, Behold, Elijah is here.
ss, as soon as I am gone from thee, that
the Spirit of the LORD shall carry thee whither I know not; and so
tell Ahab, and he cannot find thee, he shall slay me:
RD from my youth.
 my lord what I did when Jezebel slew the
d men of the LORD's prophets
a cave, and fed them with bread and water?  18:14 And now
 lord, Behold, Elijah is here: and he shall
he LORD of hosts liveth, before whom I
and, I will surely shew myself unto him to day.
b, and told him: and Ahab went to
ijah.
hab saw Elijah, that Ahab said unto
Art thou he that troubleth Israel?  18:18 And he answered, I have
el; but thou, and thy father's house, in that ye have
the LORD, and thou hast followed Baalim.

me all Israel unto mount
prophets of Baal four hundred and fifty, and the
d, which eat at Jezebel's table.
So Ahab sent unto all the children of Israel, and gathered the
to mount Carmel.
unto all the people, and said, How long halt ye
e God, follow him: but if Baal,
ow him. And the people answered him not a word.
eople, I, even I only, remain a
f the LORD; but Baal's prophets are four hundred and fifty
herefore give us two bullocks; and let them choose one
cut it in pieces, and lay it on wood, and
ther bullock, and lay it on
 no fire under: 18:24 And call ye on the name of your
name of the LORD: and the God that
eth by fire, let him be God. And all the people answered and
n.
ets of Baal, Choose you one
ourselves, and dress it first; for ye are many; and call
but put no fire under.
ook the bullock which was given them, and they dressed
f Baal from morning even until noon,
ng, O Baal, hear us. But there was no voice, nor any that
 upon the altar which was made.
nd it came to pass at noon, that Elijah mocked them, and said,
 a god; either he is talking, or he is pursuing,
ture he sleepeth, and must be
18:28 And they cried aloud, and cut themselves after their manner with
ancets, till the blood gushed out upon them.
ay was past, and they prophesied
e time of the offering of the evening sacrifice, that there
any to answer, nor any that regarded.
8:30 And Elijah said unto all the people, Come near unto me. And all
e near unto him. And he repaired the altar of the LORD
31 And Elijah took twelve stones, according to the number of the
 of Jacob, unto whom the word of the LORD came,
8:32 And with the stones he built
r in the name of the LORD: and he made a trench about the
contain two measures of seed.
 he put the wood in order, and cut the bullock in pieces, and
 and said, Fill four barrels with water, and pour
 the wood.
 second time. And they did it the second
time.
. And they did it the third time.
 And the water ran round about the altar; and he filled the

of the offering of the evening
 that Elijah the prophet came near, and said, LORD God of
rael, let it be known this day that thou art
nt, and that I have done all
 at thy word.
ar me, that this people may know that thou
ned their heart back again.
the fire of the LORD fell, and consumed the burnt
stones, and the dust, and licked up
ater that was in the trench.
when all the people saw it, they fell on their faces: and
s the God; the LORD, he is the God.
40 And Elijah said unto them, Take the prophets of Baal; let not
. And they took them: and Elijah brought them down
em there.
ab, Get thee up, eat and drink; for there
 So Ahab went up to eat and to drink. And Elijah went up to the
he cast himself down upon the earth, and put his
said to his servant, Go up now, look
rd the sea. And he went up, and looked, and said, There is
 again seven times.
o pass at the seventh time, that he said, Behold,
of the sea, like a man's hand. And he
d, Go up, say unto Ahab, Prepare thy chariot, and get thee down
thee not.
the mean while, that the heaven was black
at rain. And Ahab rode, and
el.
on Elijah; and he girded up his
d ran before Ahab to the entrance of Jezreel.
 Elijah had done, and withal how he
lain all the prophets with the sword.
9:2 Then Jezebel sent a messenger unto Elijah, saying, So let the
d more also, if I make not thy life as the life of
his time.
 arose, and went for his life, and came
o Beersheba, which belongeth to Judah, and left his servant there.
mself went a day's journey into the wilderness, and came
er tree: and he requested for himself that
w, O LORD, take away my life;
t better than my fathers.
e lay and slept under a juniper tree, behold, then an
nto him, Arise and eat.
ked, and, behold, there was a cake baken on the coals,
head. And he did eat and drink, and laid
him down again.
he LORD came again the second time, and touched
se the journey is too great for
19:8 And he arose, and did eat and drink, and went in the strength of
ty days and forty nights unto Horeb the mount of God.
to a cave, and lodged there; and, behold,
said unto him, What doest
ah?  19:10 And he said, I have been very jealous for
 children of Israel have forsaken thy
enant, thrown down thine altars, and slain thy prophets with the
 I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it
forth, and stand upon the mount before the LORD.
 and a great and strong wind rent the
ntains, and brake in pieces the rocks before the LORD; but the LORD
wind: and after the wind an earthquake; but the LORD
12 And after the earthquake a fire; but
he LORD was not in the fire: and after the fire a still small voice.
 was so, when Elijah heard it, that he wrapped his face in
, and stood in the entering in of the cave.
m, and said, What doest thou
?  19:14 And he said, I have been very jealous for the
he children of Israel have forsaken thy
ovenant, thrown down thine altars, and slain thy prophets with the
en I only, am left; and they seek my life, to take it
aid unto him, Go, return on thy way to the
mest, anoint Hazael to be king
: 19:16 And Jehu the son of Nimshi shalt thou anoint to be
isha the son of Shaphat of Abelmeholah shalt

him that escapeth the sword of
ll Jehu slay: and him that escapeth from the sword of Jehu
:18 Yet I have left me seven thousand in Israel, all the knees which
 unto Baal, and every mouth which hath not kissed him.
e, and found Elisha the son of Shaphat, who
fore him, and he with the
ijah passed by him, and cast his mantle upon him.
 ran after Elijah, and said, Let me, I
ay thee, kiss my father and my mother, and then I will follow thee.
o him, Go back again: for what have I done to thee?
 him, and took a yoke of oxen, and slew
hem, and boiled their flesh with the instruments of the oxen, and
ple, and they did eat. Then he arose, and went after
m.
gathered all his host together:
 were thirty and two kings with him, and horses, and
esieged Samaria, and warred against it.

of Israel into the city, and
m, Thus saith Benhadad, 20:3 Thy silver and thy gold is
y children, even the goodliest, are mine.
d said, My lord, O king,
 saying, I am thine, and all that I have.
 said, Thus speaketh Benhadad,
though I have sent unto thee, saying, Thou shalt deliver me
d, and thy wives, and thy children; 20:6 Yet I
orrow about this time, and they
rch thine house, and the houses of thy servants; and it shall
s pleasant in thine eyes, they shall put it in
7 Then the king of Israel called all the elders of the land, and
 you, and see how this man seeketh mischief: for he
for my children, and for my silver, and
or my gold; and I denied him not.
And all the elders and all the people said unto him, Hearken not
ent.
ssengers of Benhadad, Tell my lord
ng, All that thou didst send for to thy servant at the first I
ing I may not do. And the messengers departed, and
 And Benhadad sent unto him, and said, The gods do so unto me,
e dust of Samaria shall suffice for handfuls for
20:11 And the king of Israel answered and said, Tell him, Let not him
on his harness boast himself as he that putteth it off.
, when Ben-hadad heard this message, as he
vilions, that he said unto his
Set yourselves in array. And they set themselves in array
3 And, behold, there came a prophet unto Ahab king of Israel,
e LORD, Hast thou seen all this great multitude?
ne hand this day; and thou shalt
t I am the LORD.
y whom? And he said, Thus saith the LORD, Even
he provinces. Then he said, Who
er the battle? And he answered, Thou.
0:15 Then he numbered the young men of the princes of the provinces,
two hundred and thirty two: and after them he numbered
 children of Israel, being seven thousand.
enhadad was drinking himself
 pavilions, he and the kings, the thirty and two kings
d the young men of the princes of the provinces went out
ut, and they told him, saying, There are men
aid, Whether they be come out for peace, take them
ut for war, take them alive.
hese young men of the princes of the provinces came out of
hich followed them.
 every one his man: and the Syrians fled; and
 king of Syria escaped on an
he horsemen.
el went out, and smote the horses and
riots, and slew the Syrians with a great slaughter.
 the king of Israel, and said unto him,
o, strengthen thyself, and mark, and see what thou doest: for at the
year the king of Syria will come up against thee.
ing of Syria said unto him, Their gods
e gods of the hills; therefore they were stronger than we; but let
 them in the plain, and surely we shall be stronger
 thing, Take the kings away, every man out of his
rooms: 20:25 And number thee an army,
e the army that thou hast lost, horse for horse, and chariot for
ll fight against them in the plain, and surely we
he hearkened unto their voice, and
.
rn of the year, that Benhadad
e Syrians, and went up to Aphek, to fight against Israel.
of Israel were numbered, and were all present,
ren of Israel pitched before them
o little flocks of kids; but the Syrians filled the country.
 a man of God, and spake unto the king of Israel,
cause the Syrians have said, The LORD
God of the hills, but he is not God of the valleys, therefore will
is great multitude into thine hand, and ye shall know
And they pitched one over against the other seven days. And so
seventh day the battle was joined: and the
n hundred thousand footmen in

e city; and there a wall fell
 and seven thousand of the men that were left. And Benhadad
 city, into an inner chamber.
 his servants said unto him, Behold now, we have heard that
of Israel are merciful kings: let us, I pray
ropes upon our heads, and go out
ing of Israel: peradventure he will save thy life.
 on their loins, and put ropes on their
eads, and came to the king of Israel, and said, Thy servant Benhadad
thee, let me live. And he said, Is he yet alive? he is
 men did diligently observe whether any thing would come
catch it: and they said, Thy brother
adad. Then he said, Go ye, bring him. Then Benhadad came forth to
d him to come up into the chariot.
4 And Ben-hadad said unto him, The cities, which my father took
will restore; and thou shalt make streets for thee
n Samaria. Then said Ahab, I will send
ee away with this covenant. So he made a covenant with him, and sent
0:35 And a certain man of the sons of the prophets said unto his
ord of the LORD, Smite me, I pray thee. And the man
Then said he unto him, Because thou hast not obeyed the voice of
as soon as thou art departed from me, a lion shall
was departed from him, a lion found him, and slew
er man, and said, Smite me, I pray thee. And
he wounded him.
parted, and waited for the king by the way, and
is face.
y, he cried unto the king: and he said,
hy servant went out into the midst of the battle; and, behold, a man
and brought a man unto me, and said, Keep this man: if
then shall thy life be for his life, or
lse thou shalt pay a talent of silver.
20:40 And as thy servant was busy here and there, he was gone. And the
el said unto him, So shall thy judgment be; thyself hast
e hasted, and took the ashes away from his face; and the
im that he was of the prophets.
nd he said unto him, Thus saith the LORD, Because thou hast let
a man whom I appointed to utter destruction,
fe, and thy people for his
43 And the king of Israel went to his house heavy and displeased,
ia.
e things, that Naboth the
a vineyard, which was in Jezreel, hard by the palace of
:2 And Ahab spake unto Naboth, saying, Give me thy vineyard, that I
 a garden of herbs, because it is near unto my house:
 better vineyard than it; or, if it seem
good to thee, I will give thee the worth of it in money.
Ahab, The LORD forbid it me, that I should
thee.
 heavy and displeased because of the
 which Naboth the Jezreelite had spoken to him: for he had said, I
ee the inheritance of my fathers. And he laid him down
y his face, and would eat no bread.
5 But Jezebel his wife came to him, and said unto him, Why is thy
at thou eatest no bread?  21:6 And he said unto her,
e Jezreelite, and said unto him, Give me
thy vineyard for money; or else, if it please thee, I will give thee
rd for it: and he answered, I will not give thee my
is wife said unto him, Dost thou now govern the
read, and let thine heart be merry:
l give thee the vineyard of Naboth the Jezreelite.
hab's name, and sealed them with his
, and sent the letters unto the elders and to the nobles that were
lling with Naboth.
n the letters, saying, Proclaim a fast, and set
:10 And set two men, sons of
re him, to bear witness against him, saying, Thou didst
 And then carry him out, and stone him,
hat he may die.
s city, even the elders and the nobles who were
 Jezebel had sent unto them, and as
s written in the letters which she had sent unto them.
st, and set Naboth on high among the people.
ldren of Belial, and sat before
the men of Belial witnessed against him, even against Naboth,
e people, saying, Naboth did blaspheme God and
h out of the city, and stoned him
ones, that he died.
t to Jezebel, saying, Naboth is stoned, and is
when Jezebel heard that Naboth was stoned,
 Arise, take possession of the
f Naboth the Jezreelite, which he refused to give thee for
 alive, but dead.
pass, when Ahab heard that Naboth was dead, that
eyard of Naboth the Jezreelite, to
ossession of it.
the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying,
g of Israel, which is in Samaria:
 he is in the vineyard of Naboth, whither he is gone down to
nd thou shalt speak unto him, saying, Thus saith the LORD, Hast
so taken possession? And thou shalt speak unto him,
 the place where dogs licked the blood
 Naboth shall dogs lick thy blood, even thine.
t thou found me, O mine enemy? And
wered, I have found thee: because thou hast sold thyself to work
of the LORD.
 evil upon thee, and will take away thy
osterity, and will cut off from Ahab him that pisseth against the
t is shut up and left in Israel, 21:22 And will make
Jeroboam the son of Nebat, and like the
ouse of Baasha the son of Ahijah, for the provocation wherewith thou
me to anger, and made Israel to sin.
:23 And of Jezebel also spake the LORD, saying, The dogs shall eat
all of Jezreel.
 Ahab in the city the dogs shall eat; and him
ls of the air eat.
none like unto Ahab, which did sell himself to
LORD, whom Jezebel his wife

owing idols, according to all
id the Amorites, whom the LORD cast out before the children
 it came to pass, when Ahab heard those words, that he rent
ckcloth upon his flesh, and fasted, and lay in
 And the word of the LORD came to Elijah the Tishbite, saying,
 Ahab humbleth himself before me? because he
 bring the evil in his days: but
on's days will I bring the evil upon his house.
rs without war between Syria and

ear, that Jehoshaphat the king
ame down to the king of Israel.
d the king of Israel said unto his servants, Know ye that
 and we be still, and take it not out of the
e said unto Jehoshaphat, Wilt
h me to battle to Ramothgilead? And Jehoshaphat said to the
 thou art, my people as thy people, my horses
t said unto the king of Israel, Enquire, I pray
y.
d the prophets together, about
ed men, and said unto them, Shall I go against Ramothgilead
orbear? And they said, Go up; for the LORD
ng.
 not here a prophet of the LORD
that we might enquire of him?  22:8 And the king of Israel
here is yet one man, Micaiah the son of Imlah,
but I hate him; for he doth not
good concerning me, but evil. And Jehoshaphat said, Let not
9 Then the king of Israel called an officer, and said, Hasten
n of Imlah.
l and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah sat
ach on his throne, having put on their robes, in a void place in the
e gate of Samaria; and all the prophets prophesied
ah the son of Chenaanah made him horns of iron: and he
ith these shalt thou push the Syrians,
til thou have consumed them.
all the prophets prophesied so, saying, Go up to
 LORD shall deliver it into the
nd.
ne to call Micaiah spake unto him,
, Behold now, the words of the prophets declare good unto the
let thy word, I pray thee, be like the word of
 good.
ORD liveth, what the LORD saith unto
that will I speak.
the king. And the king said unto him, Micaiah,
battle, or shall we forbear? And
red him, Go, and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into

any times shall I adjure thee
ell me nothing but that which is true in the name of the
I saw all Israel scattered upon the hills,
he LORD said, These have no
hem return every man to his house in peace.
o Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell
e would prophesy no good concerning me, but evil?  22:19
refore the word of the LORD: I saw the LORD
 of heaven standing by him on
and and on his left.
 said, Who shall persuade Ahab, that he may go up
 said on this manner, and another
 that manner.
h a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and
the LORD said unto him, Wherewith? And he said, I will go
ing spirit in the mouth of all his prophets.
nd prevail also: go forth, and
22:23 Now therefore, behold, the LORD hath put a lying spirit in the
hese thy prophets, and the LORD hath spoken evil
kiah the son of Chenaanah went near, and smote Micaiah
h way went the Spirit of the LORD from me
id, Behold, thou shalt see in
hen thou shalt go into an inner chamber to hide thyself.
rael said, Take Micaiah, and carry him back
 to Joash the king's son; 22:27
Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and feed
iction and with water of affliction, until I
id, If thou return at all in peace, the LORD hath
arken, O people, every one of you.
9 So the king of Israel and Jehoshaphat the king of Judah went up

Jehoshaphat, I will disguise
enter into the battle; but put thou on thy robes. And the
himself, and went into the battle.
1 But the king of Syria commanded his thirty and two captains that
s chariots, saying, Fight neither with small nor
Israel.
 the captains of the chariots saw
phat, that they said, Surely it is the king of Israel. And they
ht against him: and Jehoshaphat cried out.
ptains of the chariots perceived
was not the king of Israel, that they turned back from
 certain man drew a bow at a venture, and smote the king of
ts of the harness: wherefore he said unto the
d, and carry me out of the host;
 wounded.
d that day: and the king was stayed up in
 at even: and the blood ran
und into the midst of the chariot.
6 And there went a proclamation throughout the host about the
, saying, Every man to his city, and every man to
king died, and was brought to Samaria; and they buried
8 And one washed the chariot in the pool of Samaria; and the dogs
od; and they washed his armour; according unto the

, and all that he did, and the
e which he made, and all the cities that he built, are they
 of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?
d Ahaziah his son reigned in

an to reign over Judah in the
 of Ahab king of Israel.
hat was thirty and five years old when he began to
 five years in Jerusalem. And his
s name was Azubah the daughter of Shilhi.
Asa his father; he turned not
it, doing that which was right in the eyes of the LORD:
s were not taken away; for the people
ered and burnt incense yet in the high places.
ith the king of Israel.
est of the acts of Jehoshaphat, and his might that he
e they not written in the book of the
onicles of the kings of Judah?  22:46 And the remnant of the
ned in the days of his father Asa, he took out
 no king in Edom: a deputy was king.
:48 Jehoshaphat made ships of Tharshish to go to Ophir for gold: but
 for the ships were broken at Eziongeber.
 unto Jehoshaphat, Let my
h thy servants in the ships. But Jehoshaphat would not.
pt with his fathers, and was buried with his
r: and Jehoram his son reigned
ad.
 to reign over Israel in Samaria
nteenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned two
:52 And he did evil in the sight of the LORD, and walked in the way
and in the way of his mother, and in the way of
 Israel to sin: 22:53 For he served
 and worshipped him, and provoked to anger the LORD God of
 that his father had done.
cond Book of the Kings

Then Moab rebelled against Israel after the death of Ahab.
own through a lattice in his upper chamber that
e sent messengers, and said unto
, enquire of Baalzebub the god of Ekron whether I shall

jah the Tishbite, Arise, go
e messengers of the king of Samaria, and say unto them,
not a God in Israel, that ye go to enquire
therefore thus saith the LORD,
 not come down from that bed on which thou art gone up, but
lijah departed.
gers turned back unto him, he said unto them,
they said unto him, There came a
o meet us, and said unto us, Go, turn again unto the king that
to him, Thus saith the LORD, Is it not because
hou sendest to enquire of
od of Ekron? therefore thou shalt not come down from
e up, but shalt surely die.
said unto them, What manner of man was he which came up to
hese words?  1:8 And they answered him, He was
 of leather about his loins. And
 It is Elijah the Tishbite.
e king sent unto him a captain of fifty with his fifty. And
 behold, he sat on the top of an hill. And he
king hath said, Come down.
jah answered and said to the captain of fifty, If I be a
come down from heaven, and consume thee and
from heaven, and consumed him and his fifty.
ther captain of fifty with his
And he answered and said unto him, O man of God, thus hath the king
 quickly.
said unto them, If I be a man of God, let
hee and thy fifty. And the
me down from heaven, and consumed him and his fifty.
tain of the third fifty with his fifty.
nd the third captain of fifty went up, and came and fell on his knees
, and besought him, and said unto him, O man of God, I
the life of these fifty thy servants, be
precious in thy sight.
re came fire down from heaven, and burnt up the two
with their fifties: therefore let my
 now be precious in thy sight.
 the angel of the LORD said unto Elijah, Go down with him: be
d he arose, and went down with him unto the king.
 saith the LORD, Forasmuch as thou hast
ent messengers to enquire of Baalzebub the god of Ekron, is it not
 no God in Israel to enquire of his word? therefore
at bed on which thou art gone up, but
lt surely die.
g to the word of the LORD which Elijah had
ead in the second year of Jehoram the son
had no son.
ts of Ahaziah which he did, are they not
written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?  2:1 And
ass, when the LORD would take up Elijah into heaven by a
t with Elisha from Gilgal.
ah said unto Elisha, Tarry here, I pray thee; for the LORD
And Elisha said unto him, As the LORD liveth,
ave thee. So they went down to

e at Bethel came forth to
d unto him, Knowest thou that the LORD will take away
ay? And he said, Yea, I know it; hold ye
your peace.
m, Elisha, tarry here, I pray thee; for the
id, As the LORD liveth, and as
iveth, I will not leave thee. So they came to Jericho.
ophets that were at Jericho came to Elisha,
e LORD will take away thy
 head to day? And he answered, Yea, I know it; hold ye
h said unto him, Tarry, I pray thee, here; for the LORD
 he said, As the LORD liveth, and as thy
soul liveth, I will not leave thee. And they two went on.
e sons of the prophets went, and stood to view
an.
 wrapped it together, and smote the
s, and they were divided hither and thither, so that they two
nd.
were gone over, that Elijah said
sha, Ask what I shall do for thee, before I be taken away from
d, I pray thee, let a double portion of thy spirit
 Thou hast asked a hard thing: nevertheless, if thou
ee, it shall be so unto thee; but if
 it shall not be so.
o pass, as they still went on, and talked, that,
f fire, and horses of fire, and
em both asunder; and Elijah went up by a whirlwind into
saw it, and he cried, My father, my father, the
 thereof. And he saw him no more:
took hold of his own clothes, and rent them in two pieces.
he mantle of Elijah that fell from him, and went
dan; 2:14 And he took the mantle of
h that fell from him, and smote the waters, and said, Where is
ah? and when he also had smitten the waters, they
isha went over.
of the prophets which were to view at Jericho
jah doth rest on Elisha. And they
 meet him, and bowed themselves to the ground before him.
 him, Behold now, there be with thy servants
 thee, and seek thy master: lest
ture the Spirit of the LORD hath taken him up, and cast him
into some valley. And he said, Ye shall not
ill he was ashamed, he said, Send. They
ent therefore fifty men; and they sought three days, but found him
 when they came again to him, (for he tarried at Jericho,) he
 not say unto you, Go not?  2:19 And the men of
I pray thee, the situation of this
s pleasant, as my lord seeth: but the water is naught, and the
20 And he said, Bring me a new cruse, and put salt therein. And they
him.
ring of the waters, and cast the
there, and said, Thus saith the LORD, I have healed these
e from thence any more death or barren land.
this day, according to the saying
ha which he spake.
from thence unto Bethel: and as he was going up by
 children out of the city, and mocked
, and said unto him, Go up, thou bald head; go up, thou bald head.
rned back, and looked on them, and cursed them in the
ame forth two she bears out of the wood,
and tare forty and two children of them.

rmel, and from thence he
ria.
gan to reign over Israel in Samaria
ighteenth year of Jehoshaphat king of Judah, and reigned twelve
e wrought evil in the sight of the LORD; but not like his
er: for he put away the image of Baal that
 he cleaved unto the sins of Jeroboam the son of
e departed not therefrom.
 king of Moab was a sheepmaster, and rendered unto the
ousand lambs, and an hundred thousand
s, with the wool.
ss, when Ahab was dead, that the king of Moab

a the same time, and numbered

t the king of Judah, saying, The
Moab hath rebelled against me: wilt thou go with me against
said, I will go up: I am as thou art, my people
 horses.
ll we go up? And he answered, The way
ough the wilderness of Edom.
 king of Israel went, and the king of Judah, and the king of
 a compass of seven days' journey: and there was
 cattle that followed them.
e king of Israel said, Alas! that the LORD hath called
to deliver them into the hand of Moab!
11 But Jehoshaphat said, Is there not here a prophet of the LORD,
re of the LORD by him? And one of the king of
Here is Elisha the son of
poured water on the hands of Elijah.
12 And Jehoshaphat said, The word of the LORD is with him. So the
d Jehoshaphat and the king of Edom went down to him.
e king of Israel, What have I to do with
thee?  get thee to the prophets of thy father, and to the prophets of

y: for the LORD hath called
ings together, to deliver them into the hand of Moab.
e LORD of hosts liveth, before whom I
nd, surely, were it not that I regard the presence of Jehoshaphat
, I would not look toward thee, nor see thee.
nd it came to pass, when the
yed, that the hand of the LORD came upon him.
RD, Make this valley full of
3:17 For thus saith the LORD, Ye shall not see wind, neither shall ye
 that valley shall be filled with water, that ye may
e, and your beasts.
t a light thing in the sight of the LORD: he will
ur hand.
fenced city, and every choice city, and
hall fell every good tree, and stop all wells of water, and mar every
 land with stones.
pass in the morning, when the meat offering was
ater by the way of Edom, and the
was filled with water.
l the Moabites heard that the kings were come up to
ed all that were able to put on armour,
nd upward, and stood in the border.
2 And they rose up early in the morning, and the sun shone upon the
Moabites saw the water on the other side as red as
is blood: the kings are surely slain,
 they have smitten one another: now therefore, Moab, to the spoil.
they came to the camp of Israel, the Israelites rose up
that they fled before them: but they went
ir country.
 cities, and on every good piece of land
cast every man his stone, and filled it; and they stopped all the
nd felled all the good trees: only in Kirharaseth
beit the slingers went about it, and
e it.
w that the battle was too sore for
e took with him seven hundred men that drew swords, to break
king of Edom: but they could not.
Then he took his eldest son that should have reigned in his
for a burnt offering upon the wall. And there
 and they departed from him, and
 to their own land.
 a certain woman of the wives of the sons of the
servant my husband is dead; and thou
est that thy servant did fear the LORD: and the creditor is come
y two sons to be bondmen.
a said unto her, What shall I do for thee? tell me, what
d she said, Thine handmaid hath not any
hing in the house, save a pot of oil.
:3 Then he said, Go, borrow thee vessels abroad of all thy
essels; borrow not a few.
thou art come in, thou shalt shut the door upon thee and
our out into all those vessels, and thou
shalt set aside that which is full.
 So she went from him, and shut the door upon her and upon her
e vessels to her; and she poured out.
:6 And it came to pass, when the vessels were full, that she said
ng me yet a vessel. And he said unto her, There is
tayed.
an of God. And he said, Go, sell the
 and pay thy debt, and live thou and thy children of the rest.
 a day, that Elisha passed to Shunem, where was a
him to eat bread. And so it was, that
oft as he passed by, he turned in thither to eat bread.
 husband, Behold now, I perceive that this is
us continually.
le chamber, I pray thee, on the wall; and let
le, and a stool, and a
t shall be, when he cometh to us, that he shall turn
l on a day, that he came thither, and he turned into

all this Shunammite. And when
ed her, she stood before him.
he said unto him, Say now unto her, Behold, thou hast been
this care; what is to be done for thee?
ouldest thou be spoken for to the king, or to the captain of the
ered, I dwell among mine own people.
14 And he said, What then is to be done for her? And Gehazi
th no child, and her husband is old.
15 And he said, Call her. And when he had called her, she stood in
6 And he said, About this season, according to the time of life,
 a son. And she said, Nay, my lord, thou man of God,
.
e a son at that season that
id unto her, according to the time of life.
 fell on a day, that he went out
ather to the reapers.
unto his father, My head, my head. And he said to a

ght him to his mother, he sat
s till noon, and then died.
e went up, and laid him on the bed of the man of God, and
nd went out.
er husband, and said, Send me, I pray thee,
ses, that I may run to the man
d come again.
re wilt thou go to him to day? it is neither
t shall be well.
an ass, and said to her servant, Drive, and go
, except I bid thee.
nd came unto the man of God to mount Carmel. And it
od saw her afar off, that he said to
zi his servant, Behold, yonder is that Shunammite: 4:26 Run now, I
et her, and say unto her, Is it well with thee? is it
well with the child? And she answered, It
n of God to the hill, she
he feet: but Gehazi came near to thrust her away. And
alone; for her soul is vexed within her:
and the LORD hath hid it from me, and hath not told me.
 desire a son of my lord? did I not say, Do
ehazi, Gird up thy loins, and
ff in thine hand, and go thy way: if thou meet any man,
salute thee, answer him not again: and lay
4:30 And the mother of the child said, As the LORD liveth, and as thy
I will not leave thee. And he arose, and followed her.
before them, and laid the staff upon the
face of the child; but there was neither voice, nor hearing. Wherefore
n to meet him, and told him, saying, The child is not
ha was come into the house, behold, the child was
:33 He went in therefore, and shut the door upon them twain, and
RD.
he child, and put his mouth upon
h, and his eyes upon his eyes, and his hands upon his hands:
upon the child; and the flesh of the child waxed
d walked in the house to and fro; and went
the child sneezed seven times,
ild opened his eyes.
 Gehazi, and said, Call this Shunammite. So he
 unto him, he said, Take up thy
:37 Then she went in, and fell at his feet, and bowed herself to the
ok up her son, and went out.
lisha came again to Gilgal: and there was a dearth in the
 prophets were sitting before him: and he
ot, and seethe pottage for
e prophets.
the field to gather herbs, and found a wild
his lap full, and came and
o the pot of pottage: for they knew them not.
 to eat. And it came to pass, as
e eating of the pottage, that they cried out, and said, O thou
 death in the pot. And they could not eat thereof.
eal. And he cast it into the pot; and he
said, Pour out for the people, that they may eat. And there was no

lisha, and brought the man of
f the firstfruits, twenty loaves of barley, and full ears
of. And he said, Give unto the people, that
said, What, should I set this before an hundred
e, that they may eat: for thus
LORD, They shall eat, and shall leave thereof.
 they did eat, and left thereof,
g to the word of the LORD.
an, captain of the host of the king of Syria, was a great
honourable, because by him the LORD had given
 mighty man in valour, but he was
.
ompanies, and had brought away
t of the land of Israel a little maid; and she waited on
she said unto her mistress, Would God my lord were with the
ria! for he would recover him of his leprosy.
ord, saying, Thus and thus said the
that is of the land of Israel.
the king of Syria said, Go to, go, and I will send a letter
. And he departed, and took with him ten
talents of silver, and six thousand pieces of gold, and ten changes of
5:6 And he brought the letter to the king of Israel, saying, Now when
s come unto thee, behold, I have therewith sent Naaman my
u mayest recover him of his leprosy.
7 And it came to pass, when the king of Israel had read the letter,
s clothes, and said, Am I God, to kill and to make
nto me to recover a man of his
herefore consider, I pray you, and see how he seeketh a
And it was so, when Elisha the man of God had heard that the king
t his clothes, that he sent to the king, saying,
es? let him come now to me, and he
know that there is a prophet in Israel.

th his chariot, and stood at
the house of Elisha.
nt a messenger unto him, saying, Go and wash in
hall come again to thee, and thou
e clean.
 went away, and said, Behold, I thought,
He will surely come out to me, and stand, and call on the name of the
 and strike his hand over the place, and recover the
nd Pharpar, rivers of Damascus, better than all
h in them, and be clean? So he
 went away in a rage.
ants came near, and spake unto him, and said, My
e do some great thing, wouldest thou
have done it? how much rather then, when he saith to thee, Wash,
4 Then went he down, and dipped himself seven times
ing of the man of God: and his flesh
 again like unto the flesh of a little child, and he was clean.
ned to the man of God, he and all his company, and
he said, Behold, now I know that there
 no God in all the earth, but in Israel: now therefore, I pray thee,
g of thy servant.
the LORD liveth, before whom I stand, I will
 it; but he refused.
id, Shall there not then, I pray thee, be given to
 earth? for thy servant will
ffer neither burnt offering nor sacrifice unto other gods,
18 In this thing the LORD pardon thy servant, that when my master
use of Rimmon to worship there, and he leaneth on my
house of Rimmon: when I bow down myself
n the house of Rimmon, the LORD pardon thy servant in this thing.
d unto him, Go in peace. So he departed from him a
the servant of Elisha the man of God, said, Behold,
is Syrian, in not receiving at his
that which he brought: but, as the LORD liveth, I will run after
what of him.
ter Naaman. And when Naaman saw him running
riot to meet him, and said, Is
 5:22 And he said, All is well. My master hath sent me,
ere be come to me from mount Ephraim two
young men of the sons of the prophets: give them, I pray thee, a
and two changes of garments.
aaman said, Be content, take two talents. And he urged him,
f silver in two bags, with two changes of
ervants; and they bare them

ook them from their hand, and
em in the house: and he let the men go, and they departed.
nd stood before his master. And Elisha said unto
nd he said, Thy servant went no

e heart with thee, when the man
ain from his chariot to meet thee? Is it a time to receive
rments, and oliveyards, and vineyards, and
idservants?  5:27 The leprosy
f Naaman shall cleave unto thee, and unto thy seed for
is presence a leper as white as snow.
:1 And the sons of the prophets said unto Elisha, Behold now, the
ell with thee is too strait for us.
 Let us go, we pray thee, unto Jordan, and take thence every man a
 make us a place there, where we may dwell. And he
said, Be content, I pray thee, and go with thy servants.
.
ey came to Jordan, they cut down

e head fell into the water:
 and said, Alas, master! for it was borrowed.
fell it? And he shewed him the
And he cut down a stick, and cast it in thither; and the iron did
efore said he, Take it up to thee. And he put out his hand,
n the king of Syria warred against Israel, and took counsel
ng, In such and such a place shall be my camp.
he king of Israel, saying, Beware
ou pass not such a place; for thither the Syrians are come
ng of Israel sent to the place which the man of God
 saved himself there, not once nor

f Syria was sore troubled for
 and he called his servants, and said unto them, Will ye
 for the king of Israel?  6:12 And one of
 but Elisha, the prophet that
l, telleth the king of Israel the words that thou speakest
13 And he said, Go and spy where he is, that I may send and fetch
s told him, saying, Behold, he is in Dothan.
s, and chariots, and a great host:
ey came by night, and compassed the city about.
man of God was risen early, and gone
h, behold, an host compassed the city both with horses and
t said unto him, Alas, my master! how shall we
 for they that be with us are more
hey that be with them.
prayed, and said, LORD, I pray thee, open his eyes,
pened the eyes of the young man; and he
aw: and, behold, the mountain was full of horses and chariots of fire
lisha.
him, Elisha prayed unto the LORD, and
d, Smite this people, I pray thee, with blindness. And he smote
 according to the word of Elisha.
And Elisha said unto them, This is not the way, neither is this
, and I will bring you to the man whom ye seek. But
 And it came to pass, when they were come into Samaria, that
n the eyes of these men, that they may see. And
y saw; and, behold, they were in
t of Samaria.
el said unto Elisha, when he saw them, My
 them?  6:22 And he answered,
not smite them: wouldest thou smite those whom thou hast
rd and with thy bow? set bread and water
before them, that they may eat and drink, and go to their master.
pared great provision for them: and when they had eaten
y, and they went to their master. So the
bands of Syria came no more into the land of Israel.
er this, that Benhadad king of Syria
ered all his host, and went up, and besieged Samaria.
famine in Samaria: and, behold, they
eged it, until an ass's head was sold for fourscore pieces of
h part of a cab of dove's dung for five pieces of
f Israel was passing by upon the wall, there
my lord, O king.
he LORD do not help thee, whence shall I help
f the winepress?  6:28 And the
unto her, What aileth thee? And she answered, This woman
, that we may eat him to day, and we will
d my son, and did eat him: and I said unto her on the
we may eat him: and she hath hid her son.
 heard the words of the woman,
nt his clothes; and he passed by upon the wall, and the
 he had sackcloth within upon his flesh.

so to me, if the head of
f Shaphat shall stand on him this day.
6:32 But Elisha sat in his house, and the elders sat with him; and the
man from before him: but ere the messenger came to him, he
ye how this son of a murderer hath sent to
enger cometh, shut the door,
 fast at the door: is not the sound of his master's feet
e he yet talked with them, behold, the
ssenger came down unto him: and he said, Behold, this evil is of the
uld I wait for the LORD any longer?  7:1 Then Elisha
LORD; Thus saith the LORD, To morrow
t this time shall a measure of fine flour be sold for a shekel,
 barley for a shekel, in the gate of Samaria.
ing leaned answered the man of God,
aid, Behold, if the LORD would make windows in heaven, might this
 said, Behold, thou shalt see it with thine eyes, but
 And there were four leprous men at the entering in of the gate:
to another, Why sit we here until we die?  7:4 If we
ty, then the famine is in the city, and
e shall die there: and if we sit still here, we die also. Now
et us fall unto the host of the Syrians: if they
if they kill us, we shall but die.
And they rose up in the twilight, to go unto the camp of the
 were come to the uttermost part of the camp of
re.
of the Syrians to hear a noise of
s, and a noise of horses, even the noise of a great host: and
her, Lo, the king of Israel hath hired against us
e kings of the Egyptians, to come
.
the twilight, and left their
heir horses, and their asses, even the camp as it was, and
7:8 And when these lepers came to the uttermost part of the camp, they
e tent, and did eat and drink, and carried thence silver,
d went and hid it; and came again, and
tered into another tent, and carried thence also, and went and hid
they said one to another, We do not well: this day is a day
 hold our peace: if we tarry till the morning
s: now therefore come, that we
 tell the king's household.
y came and called unto the porter of the city: and they
to the camp of the Syrians, and, behold,
there was no man there, neither voice of man, but horses tied, and
the tents as they were.
led the porters; and they told it to the king's house
arose in the night, and said unto his servants, I
s have done to us. They know that we
ungry; therefore are they gone out of the camp to hide themselves
ing, When they come out of the city, we shall catch
ty.
ed and said, Let some take, I pray
five of the horses that remain, which are left in the city,
l the multitude of Israel that are left in it:
the multitude of the Israelites
consumed:) and let us send and see.
4 They took therefore two chariot horses; and the king sent after
yrians, saying, Go and see.
ey went after them unto Jordan: and, lo, all the way was
ls, which the Syrians had cast away in their
d told the king.
nt out, and spoiled the tents of the Syrians. So
or a shekel, and two measures of
or a shekel, according to the word of the LORD.
ord on whose hand he leaned to have
harge of the gate: and the people trode upon him in the gate, and
an of God had said, who spake when the king came down
o pass as the man of God had spoken to the king,
 a shekel, and a measure of fine
r a shekel, shall be to morrow about this time in the gate of
t lord answered the man of God, and said, Now,
ows in heaven, might such a thing
 he said, Behold, thou shalt see it with thine eyes, but shalt
7:20 And so it fell out unto him: for the people trode upon him in the
 died.
oman, whose son he had restored to
saying, Arise, and go thou and thine household, and sojourn
sojourn: for the LORD hath called for a famine;
d seven years.
 and did after the saying of the man of God:
ojourned in the land of the
even years.
the seven years' end, that the woman
rned out of the land of the Philistines: and she went forth to cry
r her house and for her land.
he king talked with Gehazi the servant of the man of God,
hee, all the great things that Elisha hath
was telling the king how he had
a dead body to life, that, behold, the woman, whose son he
ied to the king for her house and for her
his is the woman, and this is
om Elisha restored to life.
n the king asked the woman, she told him. So the king
officer, saying, Restore all that was
s, and all the fruits of the field since the day that she left the
 now.
and Benhadad the king of Syria was
and it was told him, saying, The man of God is come hither.
 unto Hazael, Take a present in thine hand, and
e of the LORD by him, saying, Shall
over of this disease?  8:9 So Hazael went to meet him, and took a
 even of every good thing of Damascus, forty camels'
ore him, and said, Thy son Benhadad king
of Syria hath sent me to thee, saying, Shall I recover of this
lisha said unto him, Go, say unto him, Thou mayest
ORD hath shewed me that he shall
ie.
 stedfastly, until he was ashamed:
e man of God wept.
, Why weepeth my lord? And he answered, Because I
nto the children of Israel: their
holds wilt thou set on fire, and their young men wilt thou slay
 wilt dash their children, and rip up their women
id, But what, is thy servant a dog, that he should
answered, The LORD hath shewed me that
ou shalt be king over Syria.
 departed from Elisha, and came to his master; who said to
 thee? And he answered, He told me that thou
it came to pass on the morrow, that he took a thick cloth,
and spread it on his face, so that he died:
6 And in the fifth year of Joram the son of Ahab king of Israel,
then king of Judah, Jehoram the son of Je hoshaphat

n he began to reign; and he
 years in Jerusalem.
 in the way of the kings of Israel, as did the house
hab was his wife: and he did evil in the
sight of the LORD.
uld not destroy Judah for David his servant's
alway a light, and to his
20 In his days Edom revolted from under the hand of Judah, and made
mselves.
r, and all the chariots with him: and he
rose by night, and smote the Edomites which compassed him about, and
f the chariots: and the people fled into their tents.
 under the hand of Judah unto this day.
hen Libnah revolted at the same time.
:23 And the rest of the acts of Joram, and all that he did, are they
 the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?  8:24
athers, and was buried with his fathers in
eigned in his stead.
h year of Joram the son of Ahab king of Israel did
of Judah begin to reign.
wenty years old was Ahaziah when he began to reign; and
salem. And his mother's name was Athaliah,
8:27 And he walked in the way of the house of Ahab, and did evil in
e LORD, as did the house of Ahab: for he was the son in

hab to the war against Hazael
ia in Ramothgilead; and the Syrians wounded Joram.
to be healed in Jezreel of the wounds
ch the Syrians had given him at Ramah, when he fought against
 And Ahaziah the son of Jehoram king of Judah
b in Jezreel, because he was
 And Elisha the prophet called one of the children of the prophets,
im, Gird up thy loins, and take this box of oil in
ad: 9:2 And when thou comest thither,
k out there Jehu the son of Jehoshaphat the son of Nimshi, and go
arise up from among his brethren, and carry him to an
the box of oil, and pour it on his head,
and say, Thus saith the LORD, I have anointed thee king over Israel.
door, and flee, and tarry not.
he young man, even the young man the prophet, went to
 he came, behold, the captains of the host were sitting;
and to thee, O captain. And Jehu said, Unto
O captain.
nto the house; and he poured the oil on
is head, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, I have
 king over the people of the LORD, even over Israel.
 house of Ahab thy master, that I may
nge the blood of my servants the prophets, and the blood of all the
 LORD, at the hand of Jezebel.
the whole house of Ahab shall perish: and I will cut off from
 against the wall, and him that is shut up and
the house of Ahab like the house
oam the son of Nebat, and like the house of Baasha the son of
dogs shall eat Jezebel in the portion of Jezreel,
er. And he opened the door, and fled.
:11 Then Jehu came forth to the servants of his lord: and one said
 well? wherefore came this mad fellow to thee? And he
an, and his communication.
y said, It is false; tell us now. And he said, Thus and
, Thus saith the LORD, I have anointed thee
ted, and took every man his garment, and put it
 and blew with trumpets, saying,
king.
at the son of Nimshi conspired
ram. (Now Joram had kept Ramothgilead, he and all Israel,
 Syria.
d to be healed in Jezreel of the wounds
hich the Syrians had given him, when he fought with Hazael king of
u said, If it be your minds, then let none go forth
o to tell it in Jezreel.
ode in a chariot, and went to Jezreel; for Joram lay
Judah was come down to see Joram.
And there stood a watchman on the tower in Jezreel, and he spied
u as he came, and said, I see a company. And Joram
 to meet them, and let him say, Is it
ce?  9:18 So there went one on horseback to meet him, and said,
, Is it peace? And Jehu said, What hast thou to do
 And the watchman told, saying, The
nger came to them, but he cometh not again.
seback, which came to them, and
s saith the king, Is it peace? And Jehu answered, What hast
turn thee behind me.
man told, saying, He came even unto them, and cometh
like the driving of Jehu the son of
i; for he driveth furiously.
oram said, Make ready. And his chariot was made ready. And
 Ahaziah king of Judah went out, each in his
u, and met him in the portion of
he Jezreelite.
, when Joram saw Jehu, that he said, Is it
, so long as the whoredoms of
Jezebel and her witchcrafts are so many?  9:23 And Joram
, and said to Ahaziah, There is treachery, O
ith his full strength, and smote Jehoram
between his arms, and the arrow went out at his heart, and he sunk
iot.
captain, Take up, and cast him in
tion of the field of Naboth the Jezreelite: for remember how
rode together after Ahab his father, the LORD
y I have seen yesterday the blood
th, and the blood of his sons, saith the LORD; and I will
, saith the LORD. Now therefore take and cast
g to the word of the LORD.
n Ahaziah the king of Judah saw this, he fled by the way
ehu followed after him, and said, Smite him
 the going up to Gur, which is

.
a chariot to Jerusalem, and
 his sepulchre with his fathers in the city of David.
ar of Joram the son of Ahab began Ahaziah
u was come to Jezreel, Jezebel heard of it; and she
 head, and looked out at a window.
 And as Jehu entered in at the gate, she said, Had Zimri peace,
?  9:32 And he lifted up his face to the window,
 And there looked out to him two or
 eunuchs.
own. So they threw her down: and some of
her blood was sprinkled on the wall, and on the horses: and he trode
.
eat and drink, and said, Go, see
 cursed woman, and bury her: for she is a king's daughter.
bury her: but they found no more of her than the
 of her hands.
 again, and told him. And he said, This is the
his servant Elijah the Tishbite,
In the portion of Jezreel shall dogs eat the flesh of Jezebel:
 of Jezebel shall be as dung upon the face of the
so that they shall not say, This is
el.
amaria. And Jehu wrote letters, and
to Samaria, unto the rulers of Jezreel, to the elders, and to
Ahab's children, saying, 10:2 Now as soon as this
 master's sons are with you, and
e with you chariots and horses, a fenced city also, and
the best and meetest of your master's sons,
 fight for your master's house.
t they were exceedingly afraid, and said, Behold, two kings
ow then shall we stand?  10:5 And he that was
the city, the elders also, and
rs up of the children, sent to Jehu, saying, We are thy
hat thou shalt bid us; we will not make any
ne eyes.
e second time to them, saying, If ye be
ine, and if ye will hearken unto my voice, take ye the heads of the
's sons, and come to me to Jezreel by to morrow this
ng seventy persons, were with the great
en of the city, which brought them up.
10:7 And it came to pass, when the letter came to them, that they took
ons, and slew seventy persons, and put their heads in
 Jezreel.
er, and told him, saying, They have
ht the heads of the king's sons. And he said, Lay ye them in two
ing in of the gate until the morning.
0:9 And it came to pass in the morning, that he went out, and stood,
l the people, Ye be righteous: behold, I conspired
 but who slew all these?  10:10 Know
that there shall fall unto the earth nothing of the word of the
D spake concerning the house of Ahab: for the LORD
 his servant Elijah.
 all that remained of the house of Ahab in Jezreel,
kinsfolks, and his priests, until he
 him none remaining.
 and departed, and came to Samaria. And as he was at
 10:13 Jehu met with the brethren of
iah king of Judah, and said, Who are ye? And they answered, We are
Ahaziah; and we go down to salute the children of the
queen.
ve. And they took them alive, and slew
em at the pit of the shearing house, even two and forty men; neither
 them.
hence, he lighted on Jehonadab the son
 Rechab coming to meet him: and he saluted him, and said to him, Is
ht, as my heart is with thy heart? And Jehonadab
 thine hand. And he gave him his
d he took him up to him into the chariot.
e my zeal for the LORD. So they
ride in his chariot.
came to Samaria, he slew all that remained unto Ahab
yed him, according to the saying of the
ORD, which he spake to Elijah.
d Jehu gathered all the people together, and said unto them,
tle; but Jehu shall serve him much.
19 Now therefore call unto me all the prophets of Baal, all his
is priests; let none be wanting: for I have a great
ver shall be wanting, he shall not
But Jehu did it in subtilty, to the intent that he might destroy
 Baal.
solemn assembly for Baal. And they
imed it.
l Israel: and all the worshippers of
 came, so that there was not a man left that came not. And they
 of Baal; and the house of Baal was full from one
aid unto him that was over the vestry, Bring forth
s of Baal. And he brought them forth
ments.
ab the son of Rechab, into the house
aal, and said unto the worshippers of Baal, Search, and look that
h you none of the servants of the LORD, but the
And when they went in to offer sacrifices and burnt offerings,
core men without, and said, If any of the men whom
scape, he that letteth him go, his
hall be for the life of him.
it came to pass, as soon as he had made an end of offering
 Jehu said to the guard and to the captains,
rth. And they smote them with
 the sword; and the guard and the captains cast them out,
he house of Baal.
t forth the images out of the house of Baal, and
ke down the image of Baal, and brake down the house
house unto this day.
stroyed Baal out of Israel.
it from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made
d not from after them, to wit, the golden
 in Dan.
ehu, Because thou hast done well in
ting that which is right in mine eyes, and hast done unto the
ng to all that was in mine heart, thy children of
n the throne of Israel.
took no heed to walk in the law of the LORD God of
e departed not from the sins of
 which made Israel to sin.
se days the LORD began to cut Israel short: and Hazael
 of Israel; 10:33 From Jordan eastward,
ll the land of Gilead, the Gadites, and the Reubenites, and the
oer, which is by the river Arnon, even Gilead and
the acts of Jehu, and all that he did, and all
he book of the chronicles of the
 Israel?  10:35 And Jehu slept with his fathers: and they
d Jehoahaz his son reigned in his stead.

r Israel in Samaria was twenty
years.
r of Ahaziah saw that her son was
he arose and destroyed all the seed royal.
ng Joram, sister of Ahaziah,
he son of Ahaziah, and stole him from among the king's
hey hid him, even him and his nurse, in
he bedchamber from Athaliah, so that he was not slain.
id in the house of the LORD six years. And
4 And the seventh year Jehoiada sent and fetched the rulers over
 captains and the guard, and brought them to him
de a covenant with them, and took an
 of them in the house of the LORD, and shewed them the king's son.
mmanded them, saying, This is the thing that ye shall
enter in on the sabbath shall even be
pers of the watch of the king's house; 11:6 And a third part shall
f Sur; and a third part at the gate behind the guard:
 the house, that it be not broken down.

th on the sabbath, even they
he watch of the house of the LORD about the king.
ing round about, every man with his
ns in his hand: and he that cometh within the ranges, let him be
ith the king as he goeth out and as he cometh in.
hundreds did according to all things
 Jehoiada the priest commanded: and they took every man his men
n on the sabbath, with them that should go out on
 the priest.
over hundreds did the priest give king
vid's spears and shields, that were in the temple of the LORD.
d stood, every man with his weapons in his hand,
ht corner of the temple to the left
r of the temple, along by the altar and the temple.
e king's son, and put the crown upon him,
 him king, and anointed him;
pped their hands, and said, God save the king.
noise of the guard and of the
 came to the people into the temple of the LORD.
d, the king stood by a pillar, as the
ner was, and the princes and the trumpeters by the king, and all
land rejoiced, and blew with trumpets: and Athaliah
eason, Treason.
priest commanded the captains of the hundreds,
nto them, Have her forth without
es: and him that followeth her kill with the sword. For the
r not be slain in the house of the LORD.

e went by the way by the which
 came into the king's house: and there was she slain.
ovenant between the LORD and the king and
s people; between the king
eople.
land went into the house of Baal, and
ke it down; his altars and his images brake they in pieces
tan the priest of Baal before the altars. And
e house of the LORD.
the rulers over hundreds, and the captains, and the
e land; and they brought down the king
om the house of the LORD, and came by the way of the gate of the
s house. And he sat on the throne of the kings.
and rejoiced, and the city was in
and they slew Athaliah with the sword beside the king's house.
old was Jehoash when he began to reign.

began to reign; and forty
e in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Zibiah of
did that which was right in the sight of the LORD all
 priest instructed him.
gh places were not taken away: the people still
 high places.
the priests, All the money of the dedicated
f the LORD, even the money of
hat passeth the account, the money that every man is set
 cometh into any man's heart to bring into
sts take it to them, every man
uaintance: and let them repair the breaches of the house,
all be found.
in the three and twentieth year of king
ehoash the priests had not repaired the breaches of the house.
oash called for Jehoiada the priest, and the other
 repair ye not the breaches of the
 now therefore receive no more money of your acquaintance, but
reaches of the house.
sts consented to receive no more money of the people,
s of the house.
riest took a chest, and bored a hole in the lid
 on the right side as one cometh
 house of the LORD: and the priests that kept the door put
at was brought into the house of the LORD.
t there was much money in the
 the king's scribe and the high priest came up, and they
he money that was found in the house of the
 being told, into the hands of them that
did the work, that had the oversight of the house of the LORD: and
 to the carpenters and builders, that wrought upon the
 to masons, and hewers of stone, and to
uy timber and hewed stone to repair the breaches of the house of the
all that was laid out for the house to repair it.
de for the house of the LORD bowls of
ver, snuffers, basons, trumpets, any vessels of gold, or vessels of
money that was brought into the house of the LORD:
workmen, and repaired therewith the
 of the LORD.
ned not with the men, into whose hand they
rkmen: for they dealt
6 The trespass money and sin money was not brought into the house
as the priests'.
 of Syria went up, and fought against Gath, and
 go up to Jerusalem.
king of Judah took all the hallowed things that
ah, his fathers, kings of Judah,
cated, and his own hallowed things, and all the gold that was
s of the house of the LORD, and in the king's
Syria: and he went away from

 and all that he did, are they
n in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
, and made a conspiracy, and slew Joash in
Silla.
imeath, and Jehozabad the son of
his servants, smote him, and he died; and they buried him with
ity of David: and Amaziah his son reigned in his
entieth year of Joash the son of Ahaziah king
an to reign over Israel in
eigned seventeen years.
 that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, and
e son of Nebat, which made Israel to
 he departed not therefrom.
e anger of the LORD was kindled against Israel, and he
 of Hazael king of Syria, and into the
nd of Benhadad the son of Hazael, all their days.
LORD, and the LORD hearkened unto him:
r he saw the oppression of Israel, because the king of Syria
5 (And the LORD gave Israel a saviour, so that they went out from
 the Syrians: and the children of Israel dwelt in
:6 Nevertheless they departed not from the sins of the house of
Israel sin, but walked therein: and there remained
7 Neither did he leave of the people
ehoahaz but fifty horsemen, and ten chariots, and ten thousand
g of Syria had destroyed them, and had made them
8 Now the rest of the acts of Jehoahaz, and all that he did, and
y not written in the book of the chronicles of the
haz slept with his fathers; and they
ed him in Samaria: and Joash his son reigned in his stead.
d seventh year of Joash king of Judah began
er Israel in Samaria, and
 years.
 evil in the sight of the LORD; he
ed not from all the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made
walked therein.
he acts of Joash, and all that he did, and his
aziah king of Judah, are they not
 in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?  13:13
his fathers; and Jeroboam sat upon his throne:
 the kings of Israel.
was fallen sick of his sickness whereof he died. And
down unto him, and wept over his face,
d said, O my father, my father, the chariot of Israel, and the

and arrows. And he took unto
arrows.
f Israel, Put thine hand upon the bow.
d he put his hand upon it: and Elisha put his hands upon the king's
 And he said, Open the window eastward. And he opened it. Then
And he shot. And he said, The arrow of the LORD's
iverance from Syria: for thou shalt
 the Syrians in Aphek, till thou have consumed them.
arrows. And he took them. And he said unto
d. And he smote thrice, and
:19 And the man of God was wroth with him, and said, Thou shouldest
ve or six times; then hadst thou smitten Syria till
 now thou shalt smite Syria but thrice.

m. And the bands of the
the land at the coming in of the year.
13:21 And it came to pass, as they were burying a man, that, behold,
and of men; and they cast the man into the sepulchre of
s let down, and touched the bones of
ha, he revived, and stood up on his feet.
d Israel all the days of
23 And the LORD was gracious unto them, and had compassion on them,
 unto them, because of his covenant with Abraham,
estroy them, neither cast he them
s presence as yet.
 of Syria died; and Benhadad his son reigned in
 son of Jehoahaz took again out of the hand of
s, which he had taken out of the
Jehoahaz his father by war. Three times did Joash beat him,
s of Israel.
 Joash son of Jehoahaz king of Israel
gned Amaziah the son of Joash king of Judah.
d when he began to reign, and
nty and nine years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was

 the sight of the LORD, yet not
d his father: he did according to all things as Joash his
it the high places were not taken away: as yet the people
ncense on the high places.
came to pass, as soon as the kingdom was confirmed in his
rvants which had slain the king his father.
s he slew not: according unto
is written in the book of the law of Moses, wherein the
 fathers shall not be put to death for the
th for the fathers; but every
e put to death for his own sin.
 slew of Edom in the valley of salt ten thousand, and took
 the name of it Joktheel unto this day.

ash, the son of Jehoahaz son
g of Israel, saying, Come, let us look one another in the
 the king of Israel sent to Amaziah king of Judah,
Lebanon sent to the cedar that was in
anon, saying, Give thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed
 that was in Lebanon, and trode down the thistle.
Edom, and thine heart hath lifted thee
: glory of this, and tarry at home: for why shouldest thou meddle to
 thou shouldest fall, even thou, and Judah with thee?
ear. Therefore Jehoash king of Israel
t up; and he and Amaziah king of Judah looked one another in the
h, which belongeth to Judah.
Judah was put to the worse before Israel; and they fled

aziah king of Judah, the son
he son of Ahaziah, at Bethshemesh, and came to Jerusalem,
f Jerusalem from the gate of Ephraim unto the
14:14 And he took all the gold and silver, and all the vessels that
he house of the LORD, and in the treasures of the
eturned to Samaria.
of the acts of Jehoash which he did, and his might,
king of Judah, are they not written in
e book of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?  14:16 And Jehoash
fathers, and was buried in Samaria with the kings of
eigned in his stead.
the son of Joash king of Judah lived after the death
g of Israel fifteen years.
e rest of the acts of Amaziah, are they not written in the
f the kings of Judah?  14:19 Now they made a
nd he fled to Lachish; but they
r him to Lachish, and slew him there.
4:20 And they brought him on horses: and he was buried at Jerusalem
s in the city of David.
he people of Judah took Azariah, which was sixteen
tead of his father Amaziah.
ilt Elath, and restored it to Judah, after that the king

e son of Joash king of Judah
 son of Joash king of Israel began to reign in Samaria,
ears.
vil in the sight of the LORD: he
 not from all the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who made
25 He restored the coast of Israel from the entering of Hamath unto
plain, according to the word of the LORD God of Israel,
of his servant Jonah, the son of Amittai,
14:26 For the LORD saw the affliction of Israel, that it was very
 was not any shut up, nor any left, nor any helper
D said not that he would blot out the name of Israel
d them by the hand of Jeroboam the son
 Joash.
of Jeroboam, and all that he did, and
 might, how he warred, and how he recovered Damascus, and Hamath,
 Judah, for Israel, are they not written in the book
 of Israel?  14:29 And Jeroboam slept
h his fathers, even with the kings of Israel; and Zachariah his son
stead.
ear of Jeroboam king of Israel began
iah son of Amaziah king of Judah to reign.
began to reign, and he reigned
fty years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Jecholiah
nd he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD,
father Amaziah had done; 15:4 Save that the
e sacrificed and burnt incense
he high places.
 the king, so that he was a leper unto the day
 house. And Jotham the king's son
r the house, judging the people of the land.
riah, and all that he did, are
ritten in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
ith his fathers; and they buried him with his
ham his son reigned in his stead.
In the thirty and eighth year of Azariah king of Judah did
oboam reign over Israel in Samaria six months.
l in the sight of the LORD, as his
s had done: he departed not from the sins of Jeroboam the son of
rael to sin.
of Jabesh conspired against him, and smote
 reigned in his stead.
st of the acts of Zachariah, behold, they are written
 of the kings of Israel.
 the word of the LORD which he spake unto Jehu, saying,
hrone of Israel unto the fourth generation.
m the son of Jabesh began to reign in the nine and
 Judah; and he reigned a full month in
maria.
i went up from Tirzah, and came to
a, and smote Shallum the son of Jabesh in Samaria, and slew him,
 stead.
of Shallum, and his conspiracy which he
ade, behold, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the

all that were therein, and the
reof from Tirzah: because they opened not to him, therefore
e women therein that were with child he ripped
th year of Azariah king of Judah began
nahem the son of Gadi to reign over Israel, and reigned ten years in
:18 And he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD: he
s days from the sins of Jeroboam the son of Nebat,
 And Pul the king of Assyria came against the land: and Menahem
 talents of silver, that his hand might be with him
and.
y of Israel, even of all the mighty
f wealth, of each man fifty shekels of silver, to give to the
he king of Assyria turned back, and stayed not
rest of the acts of Menahem, and all that he did, are
of the chronicles of the kings of Israel?
 and Pekahiah his son reigned
d.
h king of Judah Pekahiah the son
em began to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned two
d that which was evil in the sight of the LORD: he
roboam the son of Nebat, who made
to sin.
liah, a captain of his, conspired
 him, and smote him in Samaria, in the palace of the king's
rieh, and with him fifty men of the Gileadites:
is room.
 of Pekahiah, and all that he did,
, they are written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of
n the two and fiftieth year of Azariah king of Judah Pekah the
n to reign over Israel in Samaria, and reigned
at which was evil in the sight of the LORD: he
am the son of Nebat, who made
in.
Israel came Tiglathpileser king of
a, and took Ijon, and Abelbethmaachah, and Janoah, and Kedesh,
d, and Galilee, all the land of Naphtali, and
5:30 And Hoshea the son of Elah made a conspiracy against Pekah the
, and smote him, and slew him, and reigned in his
otham the son of Uzziah.
rest of the acts of Pekah, and all that he did, behold,
k of the chronicles of the kings of Israel.
 son of Remaliah king of Israel
ham the son of Uzziah king of Judah to reign.
 he when he began to reign, and he
d sixteen years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Jerusha,
dok.
ght in the sight of the LORD: he did
rding to all that his father Uzziah had done.
not removed: the people sacrificed
rned incense still in the high places. He built the higher gate
 LORD.
f Jotham, and all that he did, are
ot written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
 the LORD began to send against Judah Rezin the
 Remaliah.
his fathers, and was buried with his
ers in the city of David his father: and Ahaz his son reigned in
 In the seventeenth year of Pekah the son of Remaliah Ahaz the son
f Judah began to reign.
rs old was Ahaz when he began to reign, and reigned
 did not that which was right in the
t of the LORD his God, like David his father.
e kings of Israel, yea, and made
to pass through the fire, according to the abominations of the
RD cast out from before the children of Israel.
incense in the high places, and on
lls, and under every green tree.
hen Rezin king of Syria and Pekah son of Remaliah king of Israel
em to war: and they besieged Ahaz, but could not
 Rezin king of Syria recovered Elath to Syria, and
he Syrians came to Elath, and dwelt
 unto this day.
ngers to Tiglathpileser king of Assyria,
saying, I am thy servant and thy son: come up, and save me out of the
ing of Syria, and out of the hand of the king of Israel,

that was found in the house of
and in the treasures of the king's house, and sent it for a
Assyria.
earkened unto him: for the king of
a went up against Damascus, and took it, and carried the people
r, and slew Rezin.
went to Damascus to meet Tiglathpileser king of
at Damascus: and king Ahaz sent to
 the priest the fashion of the altar, and the pattern of it,
orkmanship thereof.
e priest built an altar according to all that king
Urijah the priest made it against king
az came from Damascus.
he king was come from Damascus, the king saw the
the altar, and offered thereon.
nd he burnt his burnt offering and his meat offering, and
, and sprinkled the blood of his peace
ferings, upon the altar.
rought also the brasen altar, which was before the LORD,
house, from between the altar and the house
de of the altar.
mmanded Urijah the priest, saying, Upon the
ring, and the evening meat
the king's burnt sacrifice, and his meat offering, with
he people of the land, and their meat
ering, and their drink offerings; and sprinkle upon it all the
ffering, and all the blood of the sacrifice: and
o enquire by.
 priest, according to all that king Ahaz
commanded.
the borders of the bases, and removed the
a from off the brasen oxen
r it, and put it upon the pavement of stones.
h that they had built in the house,
he king's entry without, turned he from the house of the LORD for
ia.
haz which he did, are they not
 the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?  16:20
athers, and was buried with his fathers in
reigned in his stead.
th year of Ahaz king of Judah began Hoshea the son of
 Israel nine years.
t which was evil in the sight of the LORD, but not
 before him.
halmaneser king of Assyria; and Hoshea
came his servant, and gave him presents.

iracy in Hoshea: for he had
rs to So king of Egypt, and brought no present to the
ne year by year: therefore the king of
syria shut him up, and bound him in prison.
 throughout all the land, and
Samaria, and besieged it three years.
7:6 In the ninth year of Hoshea the king of Assyria took Samaria, and
l away into Assyria, and placed them in Halah and in
nd in the cities of the Medes.
 so it was, that the children of Israel had sinned against the
h had brought them up out of the land of Egypt,
 of Egypt, and had feared other
8 And walked in the statutes of the heathen, whom the LORD
 children of Israel, and of the kings of
Israel, which they had made.
he children of Israel did secretly those things that were
D their God, and they built them high places
 the watchmen to the fenced
0 And they set them up images and groves in every high hill, and
tree: 17:11 And there they burnt incense in all the
 whom the LORD carried away before
and wrought wicked things to provoke the LORD to anger: 17:12
, whereof the LORD had said unto them, Ye shall
 LORD testified against Israel, and against Judah, by all
the seers, saying, Turn ye from your evil
tutes, according to all the
ommanded your fathers, and which I sent to you by my
4 Notwithstanding they would not hear, but hardened their necks,
f their fathers, that did not believe in the LORD
cted his statutes, and his covenant that he made
onies which he testified against
d they followed vanity, and became vain, and went after the
 about them, concerning whom the LORD had
e them.
mandments of the LORD their God, and
 them molten images, even two calves, and made a grove, and
 of heaven, and served Baal.
they caused their sons and their daughters to pass through
ation and enchantments, and sold themselves to
 provoke him to anger.
the LORD was very angry with Israel, and removed them
one left but the tribe of Judah only.
7:19 Also Judah kept not the commandments of the LORD their God, but
statutes of Israel which they made.
20 And the LORD rejected all the seed of Israel, and afflicted
them into the hand of spoilers, until he had cast
or he rent Israel from the house of David; and they made
king: and Jeroboam drave Israel from
owing the LORD, and made them sin a great sin.
alked in all the sins of Jeroboam
e did; they departed not from them; 17:23 Until the LORD
sight, as he had said by all his servants
out of their own land to
s day.
ought men from Babylon, and from
and from Ava, and from Hamath, and from Sepharvaim, and placed
f Samaria instead of the children of Israel: and
in the cities thereof.
was at the beginning of their dwelling there, that
ore the LORD sent lions among them,
 slew some of them.
y spake to the king of Assyria, saying, The nations
aced in the cities of Samaria, know not
he manner of the God of the land: therefore he hath sent lions among
old, they slay them, because they know not the manner of
:27 Then the king of Assyria commanded, saying, Carry thither one of
om ye brought from thence; and let them go and dwell
the manner of the God of the land.
8 Then one of the priests whom they had carried away from Samaria
 Bethel, and taught them how they should fear the
on made gods of their own, and put them in the
Samaritans had made, every nation
r cities wherein they dwelt.
the men of Babylon made Succothbenoth, and the men of Cuth
 of Hamath made Ashima, 17:31 And the Avites
vites burnt their children in
ammelech and Anammelech, the gods of Sepharvaim.
nd made unto themselves of the lowest
them priests of the high places, which sacrificed for them in the
h places.
nd served their own gods, after the
r of the nations whom they carried away from thence.
after the former manners: they fear not
he LORD, neither do they after their statutes, or after their
the law and commandment which the LORD commanded
ed Israel; 17:35 With whom the LORD
ade a covenant, and charged them, saying, Ye shall not fear other
rselves to them, nor serve them, nor sacrifice to
ught you up out of the land of Egypt
 great power and a stretched out arm, him shall ye fear, and him
and to him shall ye do sacrifice.
 And the statutes, and the ordinances, and the law, and the
rote for you, ye shall observe to do for
evermore; and ye shall not fear other gods.
de with you ye shall not forget;
shall ye fear other gods.
 LORD your God ye shall fear; and he shall deliver you
enemies.
rken, but they did after their former
ner.
LORD, and served their graven
h their children, and their children's children: as did
nto this day.
in the third year of Hoshea son of Elah king
az king of Judah began to reign.
wenty and five years old was he when he began to reign; and he
ine years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was

 the sight of the LORD,
that David his father did.
ved the high places, and brake the images, and cut down
eces the brasen serpent that Moses had
de: for unto those days the children of Israel did burn incense to
d it Nehushtan.
LORD God of Israel; so that after him was none
h, nor any that were before him.
or he clave to the LORD, and departed not from following him,
ents, which the LORD commanded Moses.
8:7 And the LORD was with him; and he prospered whithersoever he went
 rebelled against the king of Assyria, and served him
listines, even unto Gaza, and the borders
o the fenced city.
pass in the fourth year of king Hezekiah, which
of Elah king of Israel, that
king of Assyria came up against Samaria, and besieged it.
 three years they took it: even in the sixth
 year of Hoshea king of Israel,
as taken.
 did carry away Israel unto Assyria, and
put them in Halah and in Habor by the river of Gozan, and in the
s: 18:12 Because they obeyed not the voice of the
his covenant, and all that Moses the
ant of the LORD commanded, and would not hear them, nor do them.
 fourteenth year of king Hezekiah did Sennacherib king
ll the fenced cities of Judah, and took
hem.
ent to the king of Assyria to
ying, I have offended; return from me: that which thou
nd the king of Assyria appointed unto
ekiah king of Judah three hundred talents of silver and thirty
18:15 And Hezekiah gave him all the silver that was found in the house
 and in the treasures of the king's house.
f the gold from the doors of the
f the LORD, and from the pillars which Hezekiah king of Judah
e it to the king of Assyria.
the king of Assyria sent Tartan and Rabsaris and Rabshakeh
ekiah with a great host against Jerusalem. And
And when they were come up, they
 stood by the conduit of the upper pool, which is in the
eld.
the king, there came out to them
the son of Hilkiah, which was over the household, and Shebna
he son of Asaph the recorder.
 Rabshakeh said unto them, Speak ye now to Hezekiah, Thus
 king of Assyria, What confidence is this
, (but they are but vain
ounsel and strength for the war. Now on whom dost thou
gainst me?  18:21 Now, behold, thou
est upon the staff of this bruised reed, even upon Egypt, on
t will go into his hand, and pierce it: so is
rust on him.
e, We trust in the LORD our God: is not that
 Hezekiah hath taken away, and
to Judah and Jerusalem, Ye shall worship before this altar
 therefore, I pray thee, give pledges to my
liver thee two thousand horses,
e able on thy part to set riders upon them.
e face of one captain of the
master's servants, and put thy trust on Egypt for chariots
 Am I now come up without the LORD against
 to me, Go up against this
roy it.
 of Hilkiah, and Shebna, and Joah, unto
abshakeh, Speak, I pray thee, to thy servants in the Syrian language;
tand it: and talk not with us in the Jews' language in
are on the wall.
id unto them, Hath my master sent me to thy
ds? hath he not sent me to the
sit on the wall, that they may eat their own dung, and drink
u?  18:28 Then Rabshakeh stood and cried with a
nd spake, saying, Hear the word of
eat king, the king of Assyria: 18:29 Thus saith the king, Let
you: for he shall not be able to deliver you out
ekiah make you trust in the LORD,
 The LORD will surely deliver us, and this city shall not be
d of the king of Assyria.
 not to Hezekiah: for thus saith the king of Assyria,
a present, and come out to me, and then
at ye every man of his own vine, and every one of his fig tree, and
one the waters of his cistern: 18:32 Until I come and
your own land, a land of corn and wine, a
l olive and of honey, that ye
nd not die: and hearken not unto Hezekiah, when he
 will deliver us.
 gods of the nations delivered at all his land
ia?  18:34 Where are the gods of
and of Arpad? where are the gods of Sepharvaim, Hena, and
 Samaria out of mine hand?  18:35 Who are
 that have delivered their
 mine hand, that the LORD should deliver Jerusalem out
 people held their peace, and answered him
as, saying, Answer him not.
came Eliakim the son of Hilkiah, which was over the
e, and Joah the son of Asaph the
, to Hezekiah with their clothes rent, and told him the words
 And it came to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent
vered himself with sackcloth, and went into the
ent Eliakim, which was over the household, and Shebna the
 the priests, covered with sackcloth, to
Isaiah the prophet the son of Amoz.
3 And they said unto him, Thus saith Hezekiah, This day is a day of
 rebuke, and blasphemy; for the children are come to
rength to bring forth.
he LORD thy God will hear all the words of Rabshakeh,
master hath sent to reproach the living
od; and will reprove the words which the LORD thy God hath heard:
 thy prayer for the remnant that are left.
came to Isaiah.
to them, Thus shall ye say to your master, Thus
e words which thou hast heard, with
 the servants of the king of Assyria have blasphemed me.
 a blast upon him, and he shall hear a rumour,
d I will cause him to fall by the
n his own land.
ned, and found the king of Assyria warring
 was departed from Lachish.
en he heard say of Tirhakah king of Ethiopia, Behold, he is
st thee: he sent messengers again unto
zekiah, saying, 19:10 Thus shall ye speak to Hezekiah king of Judah,
t thy God in whom thou trustest deceive thee, saying,
red into the hand of the king of Assyria.
kings of Assyria have done to
by destroying them utterly: and shalt thou be delivered?
 nations delivered them which my fathers
have destroyed; as Gozan, and Haran, and Rezeph, and the children of
e in Thelasar?  19:13 Where is the king of Hamath, and
ing of the city of Sepharvaim, of Hena,
nd Ivah?  19:14 And Hezekiah received the letter of the hand of the
 read it: and Hezekiah went up into the house of the
 LORD.
 the LORD, and said, O LORD God of
, which dwellest between the cherubims, thou art the God, even
he kingdoms of the earth; thou hast made heaven
thine ear, and hear: open, LORD, thine eyes, and
erib, which hath sent him to
 living God.
e kings of Assyria have destroyed the
ions and their lands, 19:18 And have cast their gods into the fire:
o gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and stone:
them.
od, I beseech thee, save thou us out
is hand, that all the kingdoms of the earth may know that thou art
en thou only.
 of Amoz sent to Hezekiah, saying, Thus saith
ou hast prayed to me against
king of Assyria I have heard.
s is the word that the LORD hath spoken concerning him; The
Zion hath despised thee, and laughed thee to
shaken her head at thee.
t thou reproached and blasphemed? and against whom hast
 lifted up thine eyes on high? even against
 messengers thou hast reproached the LORD, and hast said,
chariots I am come up to the height of the
will cut down the tall cedar
f, and the choice fir trees thereof: and I will enter into
ers, and into the forest of his Carmel.

ers, and with the sole of my
dried up all the rivers of besieged places.
w I have done it, and of ancient
at I have formed it? now have I brought it to pass, that thou
aste fenced cities into ruinous heaps.
19:26 Therefore their inhabitants were of small power, they were
unded; they were as the grass of the field, and as
the house tops, and as corn blasted
e it be grown up.
abode, and thy going out, and thy coming in, and
use thy rage against me and thy tumult is come up into mine
put my hook in thy nose, and my bridle in thy
e way by which thou camest.
his shall be a sign unto thee, Ye shall eat this year such
lves, and in the second year that which
pringeth of the same; and in the third year sow ye, and reap, and
and eat the fruits thereof.
he remnant that is escaped of the house of Judah shall yet
, and bear fruit upward.
of Jerusalem shall go forth a remnant, and they that
zeal of the LORD of hosts shall do this.

erning the king of Assyria, He
come into this city, nor shoot an arrow there, nor come
cast a bank against it.
y that he came, by the same shall he return, and shall
th the LORD.
is city, to save it, for mine own sake, and
nd it came to pass that night, that the angel of the LORD went
e camp of the Assyrians an hundred fourscore and
 early in the morning, behold, they
all dead corpses.
king of Assyria departed, and went and returned,
 it came to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of
melech and Sharezer his sons smote him with
nd of Armenia. And Esarhaddon
gned in his stead.
as Hezekiah sick unto death. And the prophet
d said unto him, Thus saith the
 thine house in order; for thou shalt die, and not live.
face to the wall, and prayed unto the LORD,
member now how I have walked
in truth and with a perfect heart, and have done that
nd Hezekiah wept sore.
 to pass, afore Isaiah was gone out into the middle
D came to him, saying, 20:5 Turn again,
nd tell Hezekiah the captain of my people, Thus saith the LORD, the
y father, I have heard thy prayer, I have seen thy
 on the third day thou shalt go up
he house of the LORD.
dd unto thy days fifteen years; and I will deliver
nd of the king of Assyria; and I will
end this city for mine own sake, and for my servant David's sake.
 said, Take a lump of figs. And they took and laid it
.
hat shall be the sign that the
heal me, and that I shall go up into the house of the LORD
 Isaiah said, This sign shalt thou have of the
g that he hath spoken: shall the
o forward ten degrees, or go back ten degrees?  20:10 And
a light thing for the shadow to go down ten
 backward ten degrees.
 the prophet cried unto the LORD: and he brought the
y which it had gone down in the dial of
haz.
, the son of Baladan, king of
nt letters and a present unto Hezekiah: for he had heard
k.
em, and shewed them all the house
precious things, the silver, and the gold, and the spices, and
t, and all the house of his armour, and all that
was nothing in his house, nor in all
dominion, that Hezekiah shewed them not.

king Hezekiah, and said unto
id these men? and from whence came they unto thee? And
 from a far country, even from Babylon.

 thine house? And Hezekiah
the things that are in mine house have they seen: there
es that I have not shewed them.
nd Isaiah said unto Hezekiah, Hear the word of the LORD.
ome, that all that is in thine house, and that
ore unto this day, shall be
Babylon: nothing shall be left, saith the LORD.
issue from thee, which thou shalt
shall they take away; and they shall be eunuchs in the palace
n.
, Good is the word of the LORD
 hast spoken. And he said, Is it not good, if peace and
 And the rest of the acts of Hezekiah, and
nd a conduit, and brought
city, are they not written in the book of the
:21 And Hezekiah slept with his
and Manasseh his son reigned in his stead.
n he began to reign, and reigned
d five years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was
that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, after
, whom the LORD cast out before the
ren of Israel.
in the high places which Hezekiah his father
 for Baal, and made a grove, as
king of Israel; and worshipped all the host of heaven, and
 he built altars in the house of the LORD, of which the LORD
l I put my name.
rs for all the host of heaven in the two courts
nd he made his son pass through the fire, and observed times,
, and dealt with familiar spirits and wizards: he
ght of the LORD, to provoke him to

grove that he had made in the
hich the LORD said to David, and to Solomon his son, In
m, which I have chosen out of all tribes of
:8 Neither will I make the feet
 move any more out of the land which I gave their fathers;
e to do according to all that I have commanded
hat my servant Moses commanded
1:9 But they hearkened not: and Manasseh seduced them to do more evil
nations whom the LORD destroyed before the children of
D spake by his servants the prophets, saying, 21:11
hath done these abominations, and hath
ne wickedly above all that the Amorites did, which were before him,
udah also to sin with his idols: 21:12 Therefore thus
 Behold, I am bringing such evil upon
usalem and Judah, that whosoever heareth of it, both his ears shall
3 And I will stretch over Jerusalem the line of Samaria, and the
se of Ahab: and I will wipe Jerusalem as a man
g it upside down.
ake the remnant of mine inheritance, and deliver
s; and they shall become a prey and
il to all their enemies; 21:15 Because they have done that which
ht, and have provoked me to anger, since the day
ypt, even unto this day.
 Manasseh shed innocent blood very much, till he had
to another; beside his sin wherewith he
ade Judah to sin, in doing that which was evil in the sight of the
ow the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and all that he did, and
d, are they not written in the book of the
 And Manasseh slept with his
 was buried in the garden of his own house, in the garden
 reigned in his stead.
wenty and two years old when he began to reign, and he
em. And his mother's name was
h, the daughter of Haruz of Jotbah.
20 And he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, as his
did.
 that his father walked in, and
e idols that his father served, and worshipped them: 21:22
God of his fathers, and walked not in the way
s of Amon conspired against him, and slew the
he people of the land slew all them that had conspired
eople of the land made Josiah his son king
he acts of Amon which he did, are they not
 the kings of Judah?  21:26
ried in his sepulchre in the garden of Uzza: and Josiah
d.
 he began to reign, and he reigned
 and one years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was Jedidah,
iah of Boscath.
ich was right in the sight of the LORD, and
er, and turned not aside to the
d or to the left.
ass in the eighteenth year of king Josiah, that
aliah, the son of Meshullam, the
to the house of the LORD, saying, 22:4 Go up to Hilkiah the
y sum the silver which is brought into the
the door have gathered of the
5 And let them deliver it into the hand of the doers of the
rsight of the house of the LORD: and let them
h is in the house of the LORD, to
the breaches of the house, 22:6 Unto carpenters, and builders,
uy timber and hewn stone to repair the house.
 made with them of the money that
ivered into their hand, because they dealt faithfully.
priest said unto Shaphan the scribe, I have
of the LORD. And Hilkiah gave
 Shaphan, and he read it.
han the scribe came to the king, and brought the king
vants have gathered the money that was
und in the house, and have delivered it into the hand of them that
t have the oversight of the house of the LORD.
d the king, saying, Hilkiah the
th delivered me a book. And Shaphan read it before the king.
 pass, when the king had heard the words of the
lothes.
lkiah the priest, and Ahikam the son of
haphan, and Achbor the son of Michaiah, and Shaphan the scribe, and
nt of the king's, saying, 22:13 Go ye, enquire of the
le, and for all Judah, concerning the
ds of this book that is found: for great is the wrath of the LORD
gainst us, because our fathers have not hearkened
o according unto all that which is
n concerning us.
riest, and Ahikam, and Achbor, and Shaphan, and
etess, the wife of Shallum the son
vah, the son of Harhas, keeper of the wardrobe; (now she dwelt
college;) and they communed with her.
2:15 And she said unto them, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Tell
ent you to me, 22:16 Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will
, and upon the inhabitants thereof, even all
f Judah hath read: 22:17 Because
e forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other gods, that
to anger with all the works of their hands;
inst this place, and shall not
d.
 sent you to enquire of the LORD,
all ye say to him, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, As
hou hast heard; 22:19 Because thine heart
 before the LORD, when thou
 I spake against this place, and against the inhabitants
become a desolation and a curse, and hast
lso have heard thee, saith
2:20 Behold therefore, I will gather thee unto thy fathers, and thou
red into thy grave in peace; and thine eyes shall not
 bring upon this place. And they brought
the king word again.
sent, and they gathered unto him all the elders of
And the king went up into the house of the LORD, and all the men
he inhabitants of Jerusalem with him, and the
e people, both small and great:
ad in their ears all the words of the book of the covenant
ouse of the LORD.
od by a pillar, and made a covenant before the
 keep his commandments and his
s and his statutes with all their heart and all their soul,
 this covenant that were written in this book.
nant.
ah the high priest, and the priests
e second order, and the keepers of the door, to bring forth out
e LORD all the vessels that were made for Baal, and
host of heaven: and he burned them
t Jerusalem in the fields of Kidron, and carried the ashes of
23:5 And he put down the idolatrous priests, whom the kings of Judah
o burn incense in the high places in the cities of
bout Jerusalem; them also that burned
ense unto Baal, to the sun, and to the moon, and to the planets,
t of heaven.
e grove from the house of the LORD, without
urned it at the brook Kidron,
 it small to powder, and cast the powder thereof upon the
 the people.
 houses of the sodomites, that were by the
hangings for the grove.
ught all the priests out of the cities of Judah, and
the priests had burned incense, from
 to Beersheba, and brake down the high places of the gates that
g in of the gate of Joshua the governor of the
d at the gate of the city.
eless the priests of the high places came not up to the
lem, but they did eat of the unleavened
read among their brethren.
 defiled Topheth, which is in the valley of the children
ht make his son or his daughter to pass
hrough the fire to Molech.
 took away the horses that the kings of Judah had given to
 in of the house of the LORD, by the chamber
 was in the suburbs, and burned
ots of the sun with fire.
 altars that were on the top of the upper chamber of
 had made, and the altars which Manasseh
had made in the two courts of the house of the LORD, did the king beat
ake them down from thence, and cast the dust of them into
3 And the high places that were before Jerusalem, which were on
he mount of corruption, which Solomon the king of
the abomination of the Zidonians, and
 Chemosh the abomination of the Moabites, and for Milcom the
ldren of Ammon, did the king defile.
:14 And he brake in pieces the images, and cut down the groves, and
aces with the bones of men.
ver the altar that was at Bethel, and the high place which
t, who made Israel to sin, had made, both that
wn, and burned the high place, and
d it small to powder, and burned the grove.
e spied the sepulchres that were
 the mount, and sent, and took the bones out of the
n the altar, and polluted it, according
o the word of the LORD which the man of God proclaimed, who

 that I see? And the men of the
 him, It is the sepulchre of the man of God, which came from
these things that thou hast done against the
 Let him alone; let no man move his bones. So they
nes of the prophet that came out of
ia.
e high places that were in the
Samaria, which the kings of Israel had made to provoke the
ok away, and did to them according to all the
3:20 And he slew all the priests of the high places that were there
, and burned men's bones upon them, and returned to
g commanded all the people, saying, Keep the passover
 is written in the book of this covenant.
a passover from the days of the
at judged Israel, nor in all the days of the kings of Israel,
udah; 23:23 But in the eighteenth year of king
lden to the LORD in Jerusalem.
reover the workers with familiar spirits, and the wizards, and
idols, and all the abominations that were spied in
em, did Josiah put away, that he might
rform the words of the law which were written in the book that
ound in the house of the LORD.
d like unto him was there no king before him, that turned to
heart, and with all his soul, and with all his
oses; neither after him arose
ike him.
 turned not from the fierceness of his
eat wrath, wherewith his anger was kindled against Judah, because of
ations that Manasseh had provoked him withal.
ove Judah also out of my sight, as
 removed Israel, and will cast off this city Jerusalem which I
 house of which I said, My name shall be there.
 Josiah, and all that he did, are
t written in the book of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
araohnechoh king of Egypt went up against the king
s: and king Josiah went against him;
he slew him at Megiddo, when he had seen him.
in a chariot dead from Megiddo, and
ht him to Jerusalem, and buried him in his own sepulchre. And the
d took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and anointed him,
r's stead.
d three years old when he began to reign;
 And his mother's name was
aughter of Jeremiah of Libnah.
d he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD,
thers had done.
 put him in bands at Riblah in the land of
alem; and put the land to a
 hundred talents of silver, and a talent of gold.
iakim the son of Josiah king in the
of Josiah his father, and turned his name to Jehoiakim, and took
 he came to Egypt, and died there.
5 And Jehoiakim gave the silver and the gold to Pharaoh; but he
ive the money according to the commandment of
e gold of the people of the land,
y one according to his taxation, to give it unto Pharaohnechoh.
as twenty and five years old when he began to reign;
 Jerusalem. And his mother's name was
udah, the daughter of Pedaiah of Rumah.

he sight of the LORD,
at his fathers had done.
ys Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came up, and Jehoiakim
ears: then he turned and rebelled against
m bands of the Chaldees, and bands of
 Syrians, and bands of the Moabites, and bands of the children of
hem against Judah to destroy it, according to the
by his servants the prophets.
ly at the commandment of the LORD came this upon Judah, to
ight, for the sins of Manasseh, according to
 innocent blood that he shed:
ed Jerusalem with innocent blood; which the LORD would not
rest of the acts of Jehoiakim, and all that he did, are
k of the chronicles of the kings of Judah?
: and Jehoiachin his son
tead.
ot again any more out of his land:
e king of Babylon had taken from the river of Egypt unto the
at pertained to the king of Egypt.
 Jehoiachin was eighteen years old when he began to reign, and he
lem three months. And his mother's name was Nehushta,
erusalem.
s evil in the sight of the LORD,
g to all that his father had done.
0 At that time the servants of Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came
alem, and the city was besieged.
And Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon came against the city, and
ege it.
f Judah went out to the king of
he, and his mother, and his servants, and his princes, and
ng of Babylon took him in the eighth year of
 thence all the treasures of the house of the
 house, and cut in pieces all the
 of gold which Solomon king of Israel had made in the temple of
RD had said.
all Jerusalem, and all the princes, and all
sand captives, and all the
smiths: none remained, save the poorest sort of the
d he carried away Jehoiachin to Babylon, and the king's
s, and his officers, and the mighty of the
om Jerusalem to Babylon.
the men of might, even seven thousand, and craftsmen and
t were strong and apt for war, even them the
ylon.
e Mattaniah his father's brother king
his stead, and changed his name to Zedekiah.
ars old when he began to reign,
igned eleven years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was
 Jeremiah of Libnah.
hat which was evil in the sight of the LORD,
ne.
LORD it came to pass in Jerusalem
ah, until he had cast them out from his presence, that Zedekiah
e king of Babylon.
pass in the ninth year of his reign, in the tenth
nth, that Nebuchadnezzar king of
came, he, and all his host, against Jerusalem, and pitched
lt forts against it round about.
nd the city was besieged unto the eleventh year of king
e ninth day of the fourth month the famine prevailed in
bread for the people of the land.
And the city was broken up, and all the men of war fled by night
gate between two walls, which is by the king's
st the city round about:) and the
nt the way toward the plain.
he army of the Chaldees pursued after the king, and overtook
ericho: and all his army were scattered from
d brought him up to the king of Babylon
o Riblah; and they gave judgment upon him.
h before his eyes, and put out
f Zedekiah, and bound him with fetters of brass, and carried
8 And in the fifth month, on the seventh day of the month, which is
year of king Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, came
, a servant of the king of Babylon,
Jerusalem: 25:9 And he burnt the house of the LORD, and the
he houses of Jerusalem, and every great man's
d all the army of the Chaldees, that were with the captain of
 the walls of Jerusalem round about.
:11 Now the rest of the people that were left in the city, and the
ell away to the king of Babylon, with the remnant of
 the captain of the guard carry away.
5:12 But the captain of the guard left of the door of the poor of the
nedressers and husbandmen.
e pillars of brass that were in the house of the LORD, and
n sea that was in the house of the LORD, did
ied the brass of them to
4 And the pots, and the shovels, and the snuffers, and the spoons,
els of brass wherewith they ministered, took they
and the bowls, and such things as were of
the captain of the guard took
:16 The two pillars, one sea, and the bases which Solomon had made
 the LORD; the brass of all these vessels was without
f the one pillar was eighteen cubits, and the
eight of the chapiter three
he wreathen work, and pomegranates upon the chapiter
 like unto these had the second pillar
th wreathen work.
 of the guard took Seraiah the chief priest, and
he three keepers of the door: 25:19
ut of the city he took an officer that was set over the men of
 them that were in the king's presence, which were
ipal scribe of the host, which
he people of the land, and threescore men of the people of
 in the city: 25:20 And Nebuzaradan captain of
em to the king of Babylon to
1 And the king of Babylon smote them, and slew them at
. So Judah was carried away out of their
land.
remained in the land of Judah, whom
hadnezzar king of Babylon had left, even over them he made
am, the son of Shaphan, ruler.
d when all the captains of the armies, they and their men,
abylon had made Gedaliah governor, there came
he son of Nethaniah, and Johanan
of Careah, and Seraiah the son of Tanhumeth the Netophathite,
 of a Maachathite, they and their men.
25:24 And Gedaliah sware to them, and to their men, and said unto
 be the servants of the Chaldees: dwell in the land,
 and it shall be well with you.
ut it came to pass in the seventh month, that Ishmael the son
 of Elishama, of the seed royal, came, and ten
at he died, and the Jews and the
 that were with him at Mizpah.
d all the people, both small and great, and the captains of
came to Egypt: for they were afraid of the
n the seven and thirtieth year of the
tivity of Jehoiachin king of Judah, in the twelfth month, on the
h day of the month, that Evilmerodach king of
reign did lift up the head of
king of Judah out of prison; 25:28 And he spake kindly to
bove the throne of the kings that were with
rison garments: and he did eat
inually before him all the days of his life.
ual allowance given him of the
ily rate for every day, all the days of his life.
onicles
enan, Mahalaleel, Jered, 1:3 Henoch,
uselah, Lamech, 1:4 Noah, Shem, Ham, and Japheth.
 and Magog, and Madai, and Javan, and
al, and Meshech, and Tiras.
 sons of Gomer; Ashchenaz, and Riphath, and Togarmah.
Elishah, and Tarshish, Kittim, and Dodanim.
m, Put, and Canaan.
 Cush; Seba, and Havilah, and Sabta, and Raamah,
ah; Sheba, and Dedan.
at Nimrod: he began to be mighty upon the earth.
d Anamim, and Lehabim, and Naphtuhim,
2 And Pathrusim, and Casluhim, (of whom came the Philistines,) and
:13 And Canaan begat Zidon his firstborn, and Heth, 1:14 The Jebusite
 Amorite, and the Girgashite, 1:15 And the Hivite, and
1:16 And the Arvadite, and the Zemarite,
and the Hamathite.
m; Elam, and Asshur, and Arphaxad, and Lud, and
and Meshech.
elah, and Shelah begat Eber.
nto Eber were born two sons: the name of the one was Peleg;
 earth was divided: and his brother's name was
odad, and Sheleph, and Hazarmaveth, and
erah, 1:21 Hadoram also, and Uzal, and Diklah, 1:22 And Ebal, and
a, 1:23 And Ophir, and Havilah, and Jobab. All these
24 Shem, Arphaxad, Shelah, 1:25 Eber, Peleg, Reu, 1:26 Serug, Nahor,
ram; the same is Abraham.
 of Abraham; Isaac, and Ishmael.
hese are their generations: The firstborn of Ishmael, Nebaioth;
eel, and Mibsam, 1:30 Mishma, and Dumah, Massa,
h, and Kedemah. These are the sons
mael.
aham's concubine: she bare Zimran,
kshan, and Medan, and Midian, and Ishbak, and Shuah. And the
, and Dedan.
n; Ephah, and Epher, and Henoch, and Abida,
eturah.
he sons of Isaac; Esau and Israel.
 The sons of Esau; Eliphaz, Reuel, and Jeush, and Jaalam, and
ns of Eliphaz; Teman, and Omar, Zephi, and Gatam, Kenaz,
1:37 The sons of Reuel; Nahath, Zerah, Shammah, and Mizzah.
Seir; Lotan, and Shobal, and Zibeon, and Anah,

am: and Timna was Lotan's
 The sons of Shobal; Alian, and Manahath, and Ebal, Shephi, and
ns of Zibeon; Aiah, and Anah.
sons of Anah; Dishon. And the sons of Dishon; Amram, and
eran.
d Zavan, and Jakan. The sons of
z, and Aran.
gs that reigned in the land of Edom before
rael; Bela the son of Beor:
of his city was Dinhabah.
 Bela was dead, Jobab the son of Zerah of Bozrah reigned
when Jobab was dead, Husham of the land of the Temanites
:46 And when Husham was dead, Hadad the son of Bedad, which smote
ld of Moab, reigned in his stead: and the name of his
hen Hadad was dead, Samlah of Masrekah reigned in his stead.
 was dead, Shaul of Rehoboth by the river reigned
aul was dead, Baalhanan the son of Achbor reigned in
alhanan was dead, Hadad reigned in his stead: and the
 his wife's name was Mehetabel, the
ter of Matred, the daughter of Mezahab.

om were; duke Timnah, duke
theth, 1:52 Duke Aholibamah, duke Elah, duke Pinon, 1:53
ke Mibzar, 1:54 Duke Magdiel, duke Iram.
These are the dukes of Edom.
are the sons of Israel; Reuben, Simeon, Levi, and Judah,
 Dan, Joseph, and Benjamin, Naphtali, Gad,
 and Onan, and Shelah: which three were born
anaanitess. And Er, the
h, was evil in the sight of the LORD; and he slew
r in law bore him Pharez and Zerah. All the
s of Pharez; Hezron, and Hamul.
 the sons of Zerah; Zimri, and Ethan, and Heman, and Calcol,
 in all.
ar, the troubler of Israel, who
sed in the thing accursed.
sons of Ethan; Azariah.
so of Hezron, that were born unto him; Jerahmeel, and
d Ram begat Amminadab; and Amminadab begat Nahshon, prince of
; 2:11 And Nahshon begat Salma, and Salma begat
 Obed begat Jesse, 2:13 And Jesse
is firstborn Eliab, and Abinadab the second, and Shimma the
he fourth, Raddai the fifth, 2:15 Ozem the
ters were Zeruiah, and
ons of Zeruiah; Abishai, and Joab, and Asahel,
a: and the father of Amasa was Jether the
Hezron begat children of Azubah his wife,
r, and Shobab, and Ardon.
 Azubah was dead, Caleb took unto him Ephrath, which bare
begat Uri, and Uri begat Bezaleel.
 And afterward Hezron went in to the daughter of Machir the father
he married when he was threescore years old; and she
gub begat Jair, who had three and twenty cities in the land
he took Geshur, and Aram, with the towns of Jair, from them,
owns thereof, even threescore cities. All these
father of Gilead.
ezron was dead in Calebephratah, then Abiah
 of Tekoa.
el the firstborn of Hezron were, Ram the
firstborn, and Bunah, and Oren, and Ozem, and Ahijah.
ther wife, whose name was Atarah; she was
of Ram the firstborn of Jerahmeel were, Maaz, and
sons of Onam were, Shammai, and Jada. And the sons of

 was Abihail, and she bare him
 Molid.
ed, and Appaim: but Seled died without
ildren.
hi. And the sons of Ishi; Sheshan. And
e children of Sheshan; Ahlai.
the sons of Jada the brother of Shammai; Jether, and
out children.
than; Peleth, and Zaza. These were the sons
o sons, but daughters. And Sheshan had a
servant, an Egyptian, whose name was Jarha.
 Jarha his servant to wife; and
him Attai.
 and Nathan begat Zabad, 2:37 And Zabad
egat Ephlal, and Ephlal begat Obed, 2:38 And Obed begat Jehu, and
h, 2:39 And Azariah begat Helez, and Helez begat
samai, and Sisamai begat Shallum,
d Shallum begat Jekamiah, and Jekamiah begat Elishama.
 the brother of Jerahmeel were, Mesha his
and the sons of Mareshah the
bron.
h, and Tappuah, and Rekem, and Shema.
:44 And Shema begat Raham, the father of Jorkoam: and Rekem begat
And the son of Shammai was Maon: and Maon was the father of
hah, Caleb's concubine, bare Haran, and Moza, and Gazez:
2:47 And the sons of Jahdai; Regem, and Jotham, and Gesham, and Pelet,
nd Shaaph.
ine, bare Sheber, and Tirhanah.
e bare also Shaaph the father of Madmannah, Sheva the father of
father of Gibea: and the daughter of Caleb was
f Caleb the son of Hur, the firstborn of
Ephratah; Shobal the father of Kirjathjearim.
 Hareph the father of Bethgader.
nd Shobal the father of Kirjathjearim had sons; Haroeh, and half
s.
im; the Ithrites, and the Puhites,
e Shumathites, and the Mishraites; of them came the Zareathites,
s, 2:54 The sons of Salma; Bethlehem, and the
Joab, and half of the
orites.
ribes which dwelt at Jabez; the
s, the Shimeathites, and Suchathites. These are the Kenites
e father of the house of Rechab.
w these were the sons of David, which were born unto him in
mnon, of Ahinoam the Jezreelitess; the second
:2 The third, Absalom the son of
the daughter of Talmai king of Geshur: the fourth, Adonijah
 The fifth, Shephatiah of Abital: the sixth,
e six were born unto him in Hebron; and there he reigned seven
: and in Jerusalem he reigned thirty and three
to him in Jerusalem; Shimea, and Shobab, and
 the daughter of Ammiel: 3:6
and Elishama, and Eliphelet, 3:7 And Nogah, and Nepheg,
a, and Eliada, and Eliphelet, nine.
 These were all the sons of David, beside the sons of the
ir sister.
ehoboam, Abia his son, Asa his son,
haphat his son, 3:11 Joram his son, Ahaziah his son, Joash his
s son, Azariah his son, Jotham his son, 3:13 Ahaz
eh his son, 3:14 Amon his son, Josiah
 son.
 the firstborn Johanan, the second
kim, the third Zedekiah, the fourth Shallum.
niah his son, Zedekiah his son.
d the sons of Jeconiah; Assir, Salathiel his son, 3:18
 and Shenazar, Jecamiah, Hoshama, and
abiah.
e, Zerubbabel, and Shimei: and the
f Zerubbabel; Meshullam, and Hananiah, and Shelomith their
h, and Ohel, and Berechiah, and Hasadiah,
f Hananiah; Pelatiah, and Jesaiah: the sons of
s of Obadiah, the sons of
3:22 And the sons of Shechaniah; Shemaiah: and the sons of Shemaiah;
geal, and Bariah, and Neariah, and Shaphat, six.
ioenai, and Hezekiah, and Azrikam,

daiah, and Eliashib, and
ub, and Johanan, and Dalaiah, and Anani, seven.
zron, and Carmi, and Hur, and Shobal.
:2 And Reaiah the son of Shobal begat Jahath; and Jahath begat
hese are the families of the Zorathites.

; Jezreel, and Ishma, and
 name of their sister was Hazelelponi: 4:4 And Penuel
 the father of Hushah. These are the sons
ther of Bethlehem.
ther of Tekoa had two wives, Helah and Naarah.
d Hepher, and Temeni, and

 the sons of Helah were, Zereth, and Jezoar, and Ethnan.
and Zobebah, and the families of Aharhel the
e honourable than his brethren: and his mother
se I bare him with sorrow.
ez called on the God of Israel, saying, Oh that thou
enlarge my coast, and that thine hand
ht be with me, and that thou wouldest keep me from evil, that it
 And God granted him that which he requested.
h begat Mehir, which was the father
hton.
and Paseah, and Tehinnah the father
nahash. These are the men of Rechah.
13 And the sons of Kenaz; Othniel, and Seraiah: and the sons of

aiah begat Joab, the father of
 of Charashim; for they were craftsmen.

hunneh; Iru, Elah, and Naam:
 of Elah, even Kenaz.
 of Jehaleleel; Ziph, and Ziphah, Tiria, and Asareel.
ere, Jether, and Mered, and Epher, and
lon: and she bare Miriam, and Shammai, and Ishbah the father of
nd his wife Jehudijah bare Jered the father of Gedor, and Heber
, and Jekuthiel the father of Zanoah. And these are
r of Pharaoh, which Mered took.
d the sons of his wife Hodiah the sister of Naham, the father
, and Eshtemoa the Maachathite.
d the sons of Shimon were, Amnon, and Rinnah, Benhanan, and
of Ishi were, Zoheth, and Benzoheth.
21 The sons of Shelah the son of Judah were, Er the father of Lecah,
 father of Mareshah, and the families of the house of
 of the house of Ashbea, 4:22 And Jokim,
and the men of Chozeba, and Joash, and Saraph, who had the dominion in
shubilehem. And these are ancient things.
that dwelt among plants and
 they dwelt with the king for his work.

 Jamin, Jarib, Zerah, and
llum his son, Mibsam his son, Mishma his son.
 his son, Zacchur his son, Shimei
.
six daughters: but his brethren
any children, neither did all their family multiply, like to

Moladah, and Hazarshual, 4:29
ah, and at Ezem, and at Tolad, 4:30 And at Bethuel, and at
:31 And at Bethmarcaboth, and Hazarsusim, and
were their cities unto the reign
.
nd Ain, Rimmon, and Tochen, and
ve cities: 4:33 And all their villages that were round about
Baal. These were their habitations, and their
Jamlech, and Joshah, the son of Amaziah, 4:35
h, the son of Seraiah, the son of
4:36 And Elioenai, and Jaakobah, and Jeshohaiah, and Asaiah,
l, and Benaiah, 4:37 And Ziza the son of Shiphi,
ah, the son of Shimri, the son of
h; 4:38 These mentioned by their names were princes in their
e of their fathers increased greatly.
:39 And they went to the entrance of Gedor, even unto the east side
to seek pasture for their flocks.
And they found fat pasture and good, and the land was wide, and
e; for they of Ham had dwelt there of old.
 the days of Hezekiah king of
smote their tents, and the habitations that were found
terly unto this day, and dwelt in their
ooms: because there was pasture there for their flocks.
en of the sons of Simeon, five hundred men,
ptains Pelatiah, and Neariah,
h, and Uzziel, the sons of Ishi.
nd they smote the rest of the Amalekites that were escaped, and
is day.
firstborn of Israel, (for he was the
tborn; but forasmuch as he defiled his father's bed, his
the sons of Joseph the son of Israel: and
 the birthright.
d above his brethren, and of him came the chief
h's:) 5:3 The sons, I say, of
firstborn of Israel were, Hanoch, and Pallu, Hezron, and
Joel; Shemaiah his son, Gog his son, Shimei his son,
on, Baal his son, 5:6 Beerah his son,
m Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria carried away captive: he was
ites.
ilies, when the genealogy of their
tions was reckoned, were the chief, Jeiel, and Zechariah, 5:8
zaz, the son of Shema, the son of Joel, who dwelt
meon: 5:9 And eastward he inhabited
the entering in of the wilderness from the river Euphrates:
re multiplied in the land of Gilead.
10 And in the days of Saul they made war with the Hagarites, who
: and they dwelt in their tents throughout all the
 the children of Gad dwelt over against them, in the land of
12 Joel the chief, and Shapham the next, and
 And their brethren of the house of their fathers were, Michael,
 Sheba, and Jorai, and Jachan, and Zia, and Heber,
ldren of Abihail the son of Huri, the son of
Michael, the son of Jeshishai,
 Jahdo, the son of Buz; 5:15 Ahi the son of Abdiel, the son
ouse of their fathers.
elt in Gilead in Bashan, and in her towns, and in all
heir borders.
ned by genealogies in the days of Jotham king
 king of Israel.
n, and the Gadites, and half the tribe of
r buckler and sword, and to
w, and skilful in war, were four and forty thousand seven
hat went out to the war.
made war with the Hagarites, with Jetur, and Nephish,
ere helped against them, and the Hagarites were
that were with them: for they cried
d in the battle, and he was intreated of them; because they put

of their camels fifty thousand,
eep two hundred and fifty thousand, and of asses two
d thousand.
ny slain, because the war was of God. And
ivity.
f tribe of Manasseh dwelt in the land:
ey increased from Bashan unto Baalhermon and Senir, and unto mount
And these were the heads of the house of their fathers, even
liel, and Azriel, and Jeremiah, and Hodaviah,
mous men, and heads of the house
 fathers.
ainst the God of their fathers, and went
a whoring after the gods of the people of the land, whom God destroyed

the spirit of Pul king of
e spirit of Tilgathpilneser king of Assyria, and he
benites, and the Gadites, and the half
ibe of Manasseh, and brought them unto Halah, and Habor, and Hara,
 Gozan, unto this day.
Levi; Gershon, Kohath, and Merari.
And the sons of Kohath; Amram, Izhar, and Hebron, and Uzziel.
n of Amram; Aaron, and Moses, and Miriam. The sons
 Eleazar, and Ithamar.
t Phinehas, Phinehas begat Abishua, 6:5 And Abishua
zi, 6:6 And Uzzi begat Zerahiah, and
hiah begat Meraioth, 6:7 Meraioth begat Amariah, and Amariah begat
Ahitub begat Zadok, and Zadok begat Ahimaaz, 6:9 And
riah begat Johanan, 6:10 And Johanan
t Azariah, (he it is that executed the priest's office in the
uilt in Jerusalem:) 6:11 And Azariah begat
And Ahitub begat Zadok, and
hallum, 6:13 And Shallum begat Hilkiah, and Hilkiah begat
 begat Seraiah, and Seraiah begat Jehozadak,
, when the LORD carried away
rusalem by the hand of Nebuchadnezzar.
6:16 The sons of Levi; Gershom, Kohath, and Merari.
f the sons of Gershom; Libni, and Shimei.
, and Izhar, and Hebron, and
:19 The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. And these are the families
 according to their fathers.
rshom; Libni his son, Jahath his son, Zimmah his son, 6:21
on, Zerah his son, Jeaterai his son.
22 The sons of Kohath; Amminadab his son, Korah his son, Assir his
h his son, and Ebiasaph his son, and Assir his son,
son, Uzziah his son, and Shaul his son.

 Ahimoth.
 of Elkanah; Zophai his son, and Nahath
is son, 6:27 Eliab his son, Jeroham his son, Elkanah his son.
f Samuel; the firstborn Vashni, and Abiah.
his son, Shimei his son, Uzza
30 Shimea his son, Haggiah his son, Asaiah his son.
David set over the service of song in the
 rest.
the dwelling place of the tabernacle
he congregation with singing, until Solomon had built the house of
salem: and then they waited on their office according
hese are they that waited with their children. Of the sons
 a singer, the son of Joel, the son of
emuel, 6:34 The son of Elkanah, the son of Jeroham, the son of
ah, 6:35 The son of Zuph, the son of Elkanah, the
 6:36 The son of Elkanah, the son of
, the son of Azariah, the son of Zephaniah, 6:37 The son of
r, the son of Ebiasaph, the son of Korah, 6:38
 the son of Levi, the son of
:39 And his brother Asaph, who stood on his right hand, even Asaph
hiah, the son of Shimea, 6:40 The son of Michael, the
alchiah, 6:41 The son of Ethni, the son
f Zerah, the son of Adaiah, 6:42 The son of Ethan, the son of Zimmah,
imei, 6:43 The son of Jahath, the son of Gershom, the son
r brethren the sons of Merari stood on the left hand:
on of Abdi, the son of Malluch, 6:45 The
son of Hashabiah, the son of Amaziah, the son of Hilkiah, 6:46 The son
 son of Bani, the son of Shamer, 6:47 The son of Mahli,
f Merari, the son of Levi.
rethren also the Levites were appointed unto all manner of
e of the house of God.
nd his sons offered upon the altar of the burnt
se, and were appointed for all the
f the place most holy, and to make an atonement for Israel,
oses the servant of God had commanded.
6:50 And these are the sons of Aaron; Eleazar his son, Phinehas his
s son, 6:51 Bukki his son, Uzzi his son, Zerahiah his
mariah his son, Ahitub his son, 6:53
k his son, Ahimaaz his son.
ese are their dwelling places throughout their castles in
 of Aaron, of the families of the Kohathites:
hey gave them Hebron in the land of Judah, and the suburbs

e villages thereof, they gave
e son of Jephunneh.
s of Aaron they gave the cities of Judah, namely,
ibnah with her suburbs, and Jattir,
shtemoa, with their suburbs, 6:58 And Hilen with her suburbs,
s, 6:59 And Ashan with her suburbs, and
ethshemesh with her suburbs: 6:60 And out of the tribe of Benjamin;
uburbs, and Alemeth with her suburbs, and Anathoth with
es throughout their families were thirteen
ath, which were left of the family of
t tribe, were cities given out of the half tribe, namely, out of
Manasseh, by lot, ten cities.
to the sons of Gershom throughout their families out of the
out of the tribe of Asher, and out of the tribe
f Manasseh in Bashan, thirteen

y lot, throughout their
the tribe of Reuben, and out of the tribe of Gad, and
twelve cities.
 Israel gave to the Levites these cities with
by lot out of the tribe of the children of Judah,
ren of Simeon, and out of the tribe
e children of Benjamin, these cities, which are called by their
the residue of the families of the sons of Kohath had cities
 the tribe of Ephraim.
ve unto them, of the cities of refuge, Shechem in
hey gave also Gezer with her suburbs,
8 And Jokmeam with her suburbs, and Bethhoron with her suburbs,
th her suburbs, and Gathrimmon with her suburbs:
Manasseh; Aner with her suburbs, and
am with her suburbs, for the family of the remnant of the sons of
nto the sons of Gershom were given out of the family of the half
 Golan in Bashan with her suburbs, and Ashtaroth
the tribe of Issachar; Kedesh with
burbs, Daberath with her suburbs, 6:73 And Ramoth with her
er suburbs: 6:74 And out of the tribe of
Asher; Mashal with her suburbs, and Abdon with her suburbs, 6:75 And
 suburbs, and Rehob with her suburbs: 6:76 And out of
 in Galilee with her suburbs, and Hammon
with her suburbs, and Kirjathaim with her suburbs.
dren of Merari were given out of the
e of Zebulun, Rimmon with her suburbs, Tabor with her suburbs:
r side Jordan by Jericho, on the east side of
ibe of Reuben, Bezer in the
th her suburbs, and Jahzah with her suburbs, 6:79
nd Mephaath with her suburbs: 6:80
t of the tribe of Gad; Ramoth in Gilead with her suburbs, and
urbs, 6:81 And Heshbon with her suburbs, and
 sons of Issachar were, Tola, and Puah, Jashub, and
ons of Tola; Uzzi, and Rephaiah, and Jeriel, and Jahmai,
eads of their father's house, to wit, of
Tola: they were valiant men of might in their generations; whose
days of David two and twenty thousand and six
 Izrahiah: and the sons of Izrahiah; Michael,
all of them chief men.
m, by their generations, after the house of their
or war, six and thirty thousand men:
they had many wives and sons.
heir brethren among all the families of Issachar were valiant
d in all by their genealogies fourscore and seven
amin; Bela, and Becher, and Jediael, three.
Uzzi, and Uzziel, and Jerimoth,
five; heads of the house of their fathers, mighty men of
by their genealogies twenty and two thousand
ns of Becher; Zemira, and Joash, and Eliezer, and
 and Abiah, and Anathoth, and
l these are the sons of Becher.
 the number of them, after their genealogy by their
 of their fathers, mighty men of
was twenty thousand and two hundred.
10 The sons also of Jediael; Bilhan: and the sons of Bilhan; Jeush,
nd Ehud, and Chenaanah, and Zethan, and Tharshish, and
 the sons of Jediael, by the heads of their fathers,
enteen thousand and two hundred
 fit to go out for war and battle.
 Shuppim also, and Huppim, the children of Ir, and Hushim, the
3 The sons of Naphtali; Jahziel, and Guni, and Jezer, and Shallum,
ah.
 whom she bare: (but his concubine
amitess bare Machir the father of Gilead: 7:15 And Machir took
f Huppim and Shuppim, whose sister's name was
was Zelophehad: and Zelophehad
ers.
r bare a son, and she called his
esh; and the name of his brother was Sheresh; and his sons
7:17 And the sons of Ulam; Bedan. These were the sons of Gilead, the
 the son of Manasseh.
er Hammoleketh bare Ishod, and Abiezer, and Mahalah.
h were, Ahian, and Shechem, and Likhi, and
Shuthelah, and Bered his son, and Tahath
his son, and Eladah his son, and Tahath his son, 7:21 And Zabad his
lah his son, and Ezer, and Elead, whom the men of Gath
slew, because they came down to take away
ather mourned many days, and his brethren came
went in to his wife, she conceived, and bare a son,
because it went evil with his house.
24 (And his daughter was Sherah, who built Bethhoron the nether, and
 Uzzensherah.)  7:25 And Rephah was his son, also
ahan his son.
hud his son, Elishama his son.
 his son, Jehoshuah his son.
heir possessions and habitations were, Bethel and the towns
aaran, and westward Gezer, with the towns
of, unto Gaza and the towns
 And by the borders of the children of Manasseh,
nd her towns, Megiddo and her towns,
and her towns. In these dwelt the children of Joseph the son of
 sons of Asher; Imnah, and Isuah, and Ishuai, and Beriah, and

Malchiel, who is the father of

er, and Hotham, and Shua their

 Bimhal, and Ashvath. These
ren of Japhlet.
amer; Ahi, and Rohgah, Jehubbah, and Aram.
; Zophah, and Imna, and Shelesh,
.
rnepher, and Shual, and Beri, and
7:37 Bezer, and Hod, and Shamma, and Shilshah, and Ithran, and
he sons of Jether; Jephunneh, and Pispah, and Ara.
h, and Haniel, and Rezia.
e were the children of Asher, heads of their father's
of valour, chief of the princes. And the
number throughout the genealogy of them that were apt to the war and
twenty and six thousand men.
njamin begat Bela his firstborn, Ashbel the second, and
 the fourth, and Rapha the fifth.
nd the sons of Bela were, Addar, and Gera, and Abihud, 8:4 And
 and Ahoah, 8:5 And Gera, and Shephuphan, and
of Ehud: these are the heads of the fathers
moved them to Manahath: 8:7 And
nd Ahiah, and Gera, he removed them, and begat Uzza, and
im begat children in the country of Moab, after he had
aara were his wives.
f Hodesh his wife, Jobab, and Zibia, and Mesha, and
chia, and Mirma. These were his sons,
ds of the fathers.
e begat Abitub, and Elpaal.
ns of Elpaal; Eber, and Misham, and Shamed, who built Ono,
thereof: 8:13 Beriah also, and Shema, who were
nts of Aijalon, who drove away the
tants of Gath: 8:14 And Ahio, Shashak, and Jeremoth, 8:15 And
nd Ader, 8:16 And Michael, and Ispah, and Joha,
ah, and Meshullam, and Hezeki, and
 8:18 Ishmerai also, and Jezliah, and Jobab, the sons of Elpaal;
d Zichri, and Zabdi, 8:20 And Elienai, and Zilthai,
 Beraiah, and Shimrath, the sons of
i; 8:22 And Ishpan, and Heber, and Eliel, 8:23 And Abdon, and
24 And Hananiah, and Elam, and Antothijah, 8:25
 of Shashak; 8:26 And Shamsherai,
hariah, and Athaliah, 8:27 And Jaresiah, and Eliah, and Zichri,
.
 by their generations, chief men.
 dwelt in Jerusalem.
 dwelt the father of Gibeon; whose wife's name was
son Abdon, and Zur, and Kish, and
nd Nadab, 8:31 And Gedor, and Ahio, and Zacher.
nd these also dwelt with their
n Jerusalem, over against them.
d Ner begat Kish, and Kish begat Saul, and Saul begat Jonathan,
 Abinadab, and Eshbaal.
n of Jonathan was Meribbaal; and Meribbaal begat Micah.
h were, Pithon, and Melech, and Tarea, and
nd Jehoadah begat Alemeth, and
and Zimri; and Zimri begat Moza, 8:37 And Moza begat Binea:
sah his son, Azel his son: 8:38 And Azel had
am, Bocheru, and Ishmael, and
nd Obadiah, and Hanan. All these were the sons of Azel.
k his brother were, Ulam his firstborn,
ehush the second, and Eliphelet the third.
men of valour, archers, and had
, and sons' sons, an hundred and fifty. All these are of the
:1 So all Israel were reckoned by genealogies; and, behold, they were
e book of the kings of Israel and Judah, who were carried
 transgression.
itants that dwelt in their possessions in their
iests, Levites, and the Nethinims.
And in Jerusalem dwelt of the children of Judah, and of the
nd of the children of Ephraim, and Manasseh;
of Omri, the son of Imri, the
, of the children of Pharez the son of Judah.
he firstborn, and his sons.
the sons of Zerah; Jeuel, and their brethren, six hundred
 the sons of Benjamin; Sallu the son of Meshullam, the son
Hasenuah, 9:8 And Ibneiah the son of Jeroham,
Michri, and Meshullam the son of
iah, the son of Reuel, the son of Ibnijah; 9:9 And their
ir generations, nine hundred and fifty and
hers in the house of their
10 And of the priests; Jedaiah, and Jehoiarib, and Jachin, 9:11 And
 of Hilkiah, the son of Meshullam, the son of Zadok,
f Ahitub, the ruler of the house of God;
9:12 And Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of Pashur, the son of
asiai the son of Adiel, the son of Jahzerah, the son
llemith, the son of Immer; 9:13 And
 brethren, heads of the house of their fathers, a thousand and
reescore; very able men for the work of the
d of the Levites; Shemaiah the son of Hasshub, the son of
biah, of the sons of Merari; 9:15 And
bakkar, Heresh, and Galal, and Mattaniah the son of Micah, the son
on of Asaph; 9:16 And Obadiah the son of Shemaiah, the
uthun, and Berechiah the son of Asa, the
son of Elkanah, that dwelt in the villages of the Netophathites.
ters were, Shallum, and Akkub, and Talmon, and Ahiman,
was the chief; 9:18 Who hitherto waited in
ers in the companies of the
evi.
the son of Ebiasaph, the son of
d his brethren, of the house of his father, the Korahites,
e service, keepers of the gates of the
bernacle: and their fathers, being over the host of the LORD, were
ntry.
zar was the ruler over them in time
 and the LORD was with him.
chariah the son of Meshelemiah was porter of the door of
regation.
sen to be porters in the gates were two
undred and twelve. These were reckoned by their genealogy in their
avid and Samuel the seer did ordain in their set
children had the oversight of the gates of the
 of the tabernacle, by wards.
our quarters were the porters, toward the east, west, north,
 their brethren, which were in their villages, were to come
ime to time with them.
evites, the four chief porters, were in their set
s and treasuries of the house of God.
:27 And they lodged round about the house of God, because the charge
 and the opening thereof every morning pertained to
em had the charge of the ministering vessels,
t by tale.
appointed to oversee the vessels, and all
 fine flour, and the wine,
nd the frankincense, and the spices.
30 And some of the sons of the priests made the ointment of the
 Mattithiah, one of the Levites, who was the firstborn of
 the set office over the things that were
eir brethren, of the sons of the Kohathites, were
 every sabbath.
singers, chief of the fathers of the Levites,
ee: for they were employed in
ay and night.
of the Levites were chief throughout their

ibeon, Jehiel, whose wife's
hah: 9:36 And his firstborn son Abdon, then Zur, and
adab.
hariah, and Mikloth.
egat Shimeam. And they also dwelt with their
eir brethren.
and Kish begat Saul; and Saul begat Jonathan,
baal.
Meribbaal: and Meribbaal begat Micah.
:41 And the sons of Micah were, Pithon, and Melech, and Tahrea, and
nd Ahaz begat Jarah; and Jarah begat Alemeth, and Azmaveth, and
gat Moza; 9:43 And Moza begat Binea; and Rephaiah
s son.
e names are these, Azrikam, Bocheru,
Ishmael, and Sheariah, and Obadiah, and Hanan: these were the sons
 Now the Philistines fought against Israel; and the men of Israel
the Philistines, and fell down slain in mount Gilboa.
llowed hard after Saul, and after his sons;
Abinadab, and Malchishua, the
l.
t Saul, and the archers hit him,
as wounded of the archers.
id Saul to his armourbearer, Draw thy sword, and thrust me
these uncircumcised come and abuse me. But his
ore afraid. So Saul took a sword,
l upon it.
er saw that Saul was dead, he fell
se on the sword, and died.
 died, and his three sons, and all his house died
e men of Israel that were in the valley saw that
ons were dead, then they forsook
ties, and fled: and the Philistines came and dwelt in them.
ass on the morrow, when the Philistines came to
ul and his sons fallen in mount

y took his head, and his
 into the land of the Philistines round about, to
nd to the people.
s armour in the house of their gods, and fastened

ll that the Philistines had
 10:12 They arose, all the valiant men, and took away the
ies of his sons, and brought them to Jabesh,
n Jabesh, and fasted seven days.
So Saul died for his transgression which he committed against
t the word of the LORD, which he kept not, and
had a familiar spirit, to enquire
10:14 And enquired not of the LORD: therefore he slew him, and
nto David the son of Jesse.
ll Israel gathered themselves to David unto Hebron, saying,
 and thy flesh.
me past, even when Saul was king, thou wast he
srael: and the LORD thy God said
e, Thou shalt feed my people Israel, and thou shalt be ruler

Israel to the king to Hebron;
ade a covenant with them in Hebron before the LORD; and
er Israel, according to the word of the
ORD by Samuel.
srael went to Jerusalem, which is Jebus; where
of the land.
f Jebus said to David, Thou shalt not come
le of Zion, which is the city

he Jebusites first shall be
tain. So Joab the son of Zeruiah went first up, and was
elt in the castle; therefore they called it the city
 the city round about, even from Millo round about:
he city.
d greater: for the LORD of hosts was
 him.
 the mighty men whom David had, who
gthened themselves with him in his kingdom, and with all Israel,
according to the word of the LORD concerning Israel.
 of the mighty men whom David had;
eam, an Hachmonite, the chief of the captains: he lifted up his
 hundred slain by him at one time.
2 And after him was Eleazar the son of Dodo, the Ahohite, who was
mighties.
sdammim, and there the Philistines were
athered together to battle, where was a parcel of ground full of
ople fled from before the Philistines.
11:14 And they set themselves in the midst of that parcel, and
ew the Philistines; and the LORD saved them by a
ree of the thirty captains went down to the rock to David,
; and the host of the Philistines encamped in
avid was then in the hold, and the Philistines' garrison
11:17 And David longed, and said, Oh that one would give me drink of
he well of Bethlehem, that is at the gate!  11:18 And
ost of the Philistines, and drew water
t of the well of Bethlehem, that was by the gate, and took it, and
vid: but David would not drink of it, but poured it
aid, My God forbid it me, that I should do this thing:
hese men that have put their lives in
pardy? for with the jeopardy of their lives they brought it.
 drink it.
 mightiest.
er of Joab, he was chief of the three: for
ed, he slew them, and had a
e three.
e honourable than the two; for he was
ir captain: howbeit he attained not to the first three.
Jehoiada, the son of a valiant man of
zeel, who had done many acts; he slew two lionlike men of Moab:
nd slew a lion in a pit in a snowy day.

reat stature, five cubits
e Egyptian's hand was a spear like a weaver's beam; and
staff, and plucked the spear out of the
gyptian's hand, and slew him with his own spear.
he son of Jehoiada, and had the name
g the three mighties.
was honourable among the thirty, but attained not to
 him over his guard.
iant men of the armies were, Asahel the brother of
 Bethlehem, 11:27 Shammoth the
Helez the Pelonite, 11:28 Ira the son of Ikkesh the Tekoite,
 11:29 Sibbecai the Hushathite, Ilai the
Ahohite, 11:30 Maharai the Netophathite, Heled the son of Baanah the
11:31 Ithai the son of Ribai of Gibeah, that pertained
 Benaiah the Pirathonite, 11:32 Hurai of
the brooks of Gaash, Abiel the Arbathite, 11:33 Azmaveth the
e Shaalbonite, 11:34 The sons of Hashem the
 Hararite, 11:35 Ahiam the son
he Hararite, Eliphal the son of Ur, 11:36 Hepher the
ite, 11:37 Hezro the Carmelite, Naarai
e son of Ezbai, 11:38 Joel the brother of Nathan, Mibhar the son of
Zelek the Ammonite, Naharai the Berothite, the
iah, 11:40 Ira the Ithrite, Gareb
rite, 11:41 Uriah the Hittite, Zabad the son of Ahlai, 11:42
 the Reubenite, a captain of the Reubenites, and
on of Maachah, and Joshaphat the
, 11:44 Uzzia the Ashterathite, Shama and Jehiel the sons of
1:45 Jediael the son of Shimri, and Joha his
ahavite, and Jeribai, and
sons of Elnaam, and Ithmah the Moabite, 11:47 Eliel,
aite.
 to David to Ziklag, while he yet
mself close because of Saul the son of Kish: and they were
lpers of the war.
with bows, and could use both the right hand and
oting arrows out of a bow, even of
 brethren of Benjamin.
as Ahiezer, then Joash, the sons of Shemaah the
the sons of Azmaveth; and Berachah,
ehu the Antothite.
 Gibeonite, a mighty man among the thirty, and
ahaziel, and Johanan, and Josabad
erathite, 12:5 Eluzai, and Jerimoth, and Bealiah, and
 Haruphite, 12:6 Elkanah, and Jesiah, and
orhites, 12:7 And Joelah, and
he sons of Jeroham of Gedor.
f the Gadites there separated themselves unto David into the
 men of might, and men of war fit for the
ler, whose faces were like
ions, and were as swift as the roes upon the mountains;
h the second, Eliab the third, 12:10
mannah the fourth, Jeremiah the fifth, 12:11 Attai the sixth,
:12 Johanan the eighth, Elzabad the ninth, 12:13
eleventh.
of Gad, captains of the host: one of the
least was over an hundred, and the greatest over a thousand.
 that went over Jordan in the first month, when it
 they put to flight all them of the
ys, both toward the east, and toward the west.
en of Benjamin and Judah to the hold
 David.
t them, and answered and said unto
If ye be come peaceably unto me to help me, mine heart shall be
if ye be come to betray me to mine enemies, seeing
 the God of our fathers look thereon,
 rebuke it.
upon Amasai, who was chief of the captains,
n thy side, thou son of Jesse:
ce be unto thee, and peace be to thine helpers; for thy God
avid received them, and made them captains of the band.
 of Manasseh to David, when he came with the
t they helped them not: for the
the Philistines upon advisement sent him away, saying, He
aul to the jeopardy of our heads.
 As he went to Ziklag, there fell to him of Manasseh, Adnah, and
el, and Michael, and Jozabad, and Elihu, and
t were of Manasseh.
ed David against the band of the rovers: for they
d were captains in the host.
at that time day by day there came to David to help him,
 like the host of God.
are the numbers of the bands that were ready armed to
 Hebron, to turn the kingdom of Saul to
im, according to the word of the LORD.
12:24 The children of Judah that bare shield and spear were six
hundred, ready armed to the war.
Of the children of Simeon, mighty men of valour for the war,
 hundred.
 four thousand and six hundred.
nd Jehoiada was the leader of the Aaronites, and with him were
even hundred; 12:28 And Zadok, a young man mighty
use twenty and two captains.
of the children of Benjamin, the kindred of Saul, three
greatest part of them had kept the ward of
hildren of Ephraim twenty thousand and eight
throughout the house of their

ighteen thousand, which were
 name, to come and make David king.
32 And of the children of Issachar, which were men that had
mes, to know what Israel ought to do; the heads
heir brethren were at their

 battle, expert in war, with
nts of war, fifty thousand, which could keep rank: they

s, and with them with shield
irty and seven thousand.
he Danites expert in war twenty and eight thousand and
 Asher, such as went forth to battle, expert in war, forty
n the other side of Jordan, of the Reubenites, and the
be of Manasseh, with all manner of
ments of war for the battle, an hundred and twenty thousand.
of war, that could keep rank, came with a perfect
ng over all Israel: and all the rest
 of Israel were of one heart to make David king.
avid three days, eating and drinking:
 their brethren had prepared for them.
12:40 Moreover they that were nigh them, even unto Issachar and
i, brought bread on asses, and on camels, and on
, cakes of figs, and bunches of
and wine, and oil, and oxen, and sheep abundantly: for there
13:1 And David consulted with the captains of thousands and hundreds,
y leader.
the congregation of Israel, If it seem
od unto you, and that it be of the LORD our God, let us send abroad
en every where, that are left in all the land of
priests and Levites which are in
ties and suburbs, that they may gather themselves unto us:
ain the ark of our God to us: for we enquired
4 And all the congregation said that they would do so: for the
he eyes of all the people.
d gathered all Israel together, from Shihor of Egypt even
th, to bring the ark of God from
earim.
Israel, to Baalah, that is, to
rim, which belonged to Judah, to bring up thence the ark of
leth between the cherubims, whose name is
e ark of God in a new cart out of the house of
e cart.
layed before God with all their might,
d with singing, and with harps, and with psalteries, and with
mbals, and with trumpets.
 they came unto the threshingfloor of Chidon, Uzza put
rk; for the oxen stumbled.
e anger of the LORD was kindled against Uzza, and he smote
hand to the ark: and there he died before God.
cause the LORD had made a breach
a: wherefore that place is called Perezuzza to this day.
id of God that day, saying, How shall I bring
David brought not the ark home to
 to the city of David, but carried it aside into the house of

 the family of Obededom in his
e months. And the LORD blessed the house of Obededom, and
Now Hiram king of Tyre sent messengers to David, and timber of
and carpenters, to build him an house.
14:2 And David perceived that the LORD had confirmed him king over
kingdom was lifted up on high, because of his people
 more wives at Jerusalem: and David begat more sons
e are the names of his children which he had in
han, and Solomon, 14:5 And Ibhar,
shua, and Elpalet, 14:6 And Nogah, and Nepheg, and Japhia, 14:7
eeliada, and Eliphalet.
he Philistines heard that David was anointed king over
nes went up to seek David. And David heard
9 And the Philistines came and spread themselves in the valley of
 And David enquired of God, saying, Shall I go up against the
 thou deliver them into mine hand? And the LORD
liver them into thine hand.
ey came up to Baalperazim; and David smote them there. Then
oken in upon mine enemies by mine hand like the
 they called the name of that place
erazim.
eir gods there, David gave a
 and they were burned with fire.
And the Philistines yet again spread themselves abroad in the
efore David enquired again of God; and God said unto him, Go
n away from them, and come upon them over
it shall be, when thou shalt hear a sound of going in the
s, that then thou shalt go out to battle: for
e the host of the Philistines.
vid therefore did as God commanded him: and they smote the
from Gibeon even to Gazer.
e fame of David went out into all lands; and the LORD
all nations.
uses in the city of David, and prepared a
 it a tent.
ought to carry the ark of God but the
ites: for them hath the LORD chosen to carry the ark of God, and to
im for ever.
l Israel together to Jerusalem, to bring up
ch he had prepared for it.
id assembled the children of Aaron, and the Levites: 15:5
iel the chief, and his brethren an hundred
Asaiah the chief, and his
ndred and twenty: 15:7 Of the sons of Gershom; Joel the
undred and thirty: 15:8 Of the sons of
izaphan; Shemaiah the chief, and his brethren two hundred: 15:9 Of
on; Eliel the chief, and his brethren fourscore: 15:10
adab the chief, and his brethren an
ed and twelve.
or Zadok and Abiathar the priests, and for the
, Shemaiah, and Eliel, and
12 And said unto them, Ye are the chief of the fathers
rselves, both ye and your brethren, that
ye may bring up the ark of the LORD God of Israel unto the place that
ed for it.
not at the first, the LORD our God made a
t after the due order.
ests and the Levites sanctified themselves to bring up
srael.
vites bare the ark of God upon their
lders with the staves thereon, as Moses commanded according to the
.
 the Levites to appoint their
 be the singers with instruments of musick, psalteries and
ing, by lifting up the voice with joy.
15:17 So the Levites appointed Heman the son of Joel; and of his
e son of Berechiah; and of the sons of Merari their
aiah; 15:18 And with them their
of the second degree, Zechariah, Ben, and Jaaziel, and
 Unni, Eliab, and Benaiah, and Maaseiah,
and Mattithiah, and Elipheleh, and Mikneiah, and Obededom, and Jeiel,

 Ethan, were appointed to sound
als of brass; 15:20 And Zechariah, and Aziel, and
, and Eliab, and Maaseiah, and
ith psalteries on Alamoth; 15:21 And Mattithiah, and
bededom, and Jeiel, and Azaziah, with
ps on the Sheminith to excel.
 Chenaniah, chief of the Levites, was for song: he instructed
se he was skilful.
and Elkanah were doorkeepers for the ark.
nd Nethaneel, and Amasai, and
and Benaiah, and Eliezer, the priests, did blow with the
 God: and Obededom and Jehiah were
epers for the ark.
the elders of Israel, and the captains over
the covenant of the LORD out of
 of Obededom with joy.
e to pass, when God helped the Levites that bare the
D, that they offered seven bullocks and
even rams.
with a robe of fine linen, and all the
vites that bare the ark, and the singers, and Chenaniah the master
 the singers: David also had upon him an ephod of
rought up the ark of the covenant of the LORD
cornet, and with trumpets, and
ls, making a noise with psalteries and harps.
rk of the covenant of the LORD came
e city of David, that Michal, the daughter of Saul looking out at
 David dancing and playing: and she despised him in
ght the ark of God, and set it in the midst of the
it: and they offered burnt sacrifices
 peace offerings before God.
hen David had made an end of offering the burnt offerings
he blessed the people in the name of the
LORD.
 Israel, both man and woman, to every
 a loaf of bread, and a good piece of flesh, and a flagon of wine.
pointed certain of the Levites to minister before the
d, and to thank and praise the LORD God
f Israel: 16:5 Asaph the chief, and next to him Zechariah, Jeiel, and
and Jehiel, and Mattithiah, and Eliab, and Benaiah, and
alteries and with harps; but Asaph made a
 Jahaziel the priests with
nually before the ark of the covenant of God.
ed first this psalm to thank the
o the hand of Asaph and his brethren.
6:8 Give thanks unto the LORD, call upon his name, make known his
eople.
unto him, talk ye of all his wondrous
ks.
t the heart of them rejoice that
 LORD.
ngth, seek his face continually.
Remember his marvellous works that he hath done, his wonders,
his mouth; 16:13 O ye seed of Israel his servant,
ones.
 judgments are in all the earth.
Be ye mindful always of his covenant; the word which he
erations; 16:16 Even of the covenant which
to Isaac; 16:17 And hath
me to Jacob for a law, and to Israel for an
o thee will I give the land of
e lot of your inheritance; 16:19 When ye were but few, even
 it.
on to nation, and from one kingdom
ther people; 16:21 He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he
their sakes, 16:22 Saying, Touch not mine anointed,
16:23 Sing unto the LORD, all the earth; shew forth from day to day

en; his marvellous works among
s.
atly to be praised: he also is to
ed above all gods.
ds of the people are idols: but the LORD made the
r are in his presence; strength and gladness are
he LORD, ye kindreds of the people, give unto the
 Give unto the LORD the glory due unto his name: bring an
 him: worship the LORD in the beauty of
oliness.
 earth: the world also shall be stable,
hat it be not moved.
ens be glad, and let the earth rejoice: and let men
 reigneth.
the fulness thereof: let the fields
ce, and all that is therein.
 shall the trees of the wood sing out at the presence of the
h to judge the earth.
ks unto the LORD; for he is good; for his mercy
 ye, Save us, O God of our salvation, and gather us
he heathen, that we may give thanks to
y holy name, and glory in thy praise.
6:36 Blessed be the LORD God of Israel for ever and ever. And all the
Amen, and praised the LORD.
 left there before the ark of the covenant of the LORD
inister before the ark continually, as
ery day's work required: 16:38 And Obededom with their brethren,
ht; Obededom also the son of Jeduthun and Hosah to
priest, and his brethren the priests,
ore the tabernacle of the LORD in the high place that was at
 burnt offerings unto the LORD upon the altar of
ning and evening, and to do
all that is written in the law of the LORD, which he
th them Heman and Jeduthun, and the rest
that were chosen, who were expressed by name, to give thanks to the
is mercy endureth for ever; 16:42 And with them Heman
d cymbals for those that should make a
und, and with musical instruments of God. And the sons of Jeduthun

an to his house: and David
ess his house.
, as David sat in his house, that David said
an house of cedars, but the ark
venant of the LORD remaineth under curtains.
 all that is in thine heart; for
ith thee.
same night, that the word of God came to
Nathan, saying, 17:4 Go and tell David my servant, Thus saith the
not build me an house to dwell in: 17:5 For I have
day that I brought up Israel unto this
y; but have gone from tent to tent, and from one tabernacle to
resoever I have walked with all Israel, spake I a word to any
el, whom I commanded to feed my people, saying,
f cedars?  17:7 Now therefore thus
thou say unto my servant David, Thus saith the LORD of hosts, I
sheepcote, even from following the sheep, that thou
le Israel: 17:8 And I have been with
 whithersoever thou hast walked, and have cut off all thine
e, and have made thee a name like the name of

people Israel, and will plant
hey shall dwell in their place, and shall be moved no more;
ren of wickedness waste them any more, as at
e that I commanded judges to be
eople Israel. Moreover I will subdue all thine enemies.
t the LORD will build thee an house.
:11 And it shall come to pass, when thy days be expired that thou
h thy fathers, that I will raise up thy seed after
; and I will establish his kingdom.
12 He shall build me an house, and I will stablish his throne for
will be his father, and he shall be my son: and I will not
him, as I took it from him that was before
e house and in my kingdom for
is throne shall be established for evermore.
and according to all this vision,
Nathan speak unto David.
d the king came and sat before the LORD, and said, Who
s mine house, that thou hast brought me
itherto?  17:17 And yet this was a small thing in thine eyes, O God;
also spoken of thy servant's house for a great while to
according to the estate of a man of high
degree, O LORD God.
d speak more to thee for the honour of thy servant?

d according to thine own
 done all this greatness, in making known all these
there is none like thee, neither is there any God beside
t we have heard with our ears.
d what one nation in the earth is like thy people Israel, whom
o be his own people, to make thee a name of
out nations from before thy
hou hast redeemed out of Egypt?  17:22 For thy people
own people for ever; and thou, LORD,
mest their God.
RD, let the thing that thou hast spoken
oncerning thy servant and concerning his house be established for
hou hast said.
ablished, that thy name may be magnified for
 God of Israel, even a God to
 let the house of David thy servant be established before
O my God, hast told thy servant that thou wilt build
rvant hath found in his heart to pray
ore thee.
 God, and hast promised this goodness
o thy servant: 17:27 Now therefore let it please thee to bless the
vant, that it may be before thee for ever: for thou
be blessed for ever.
s it came to pass, that David smote the Philistines,
h and her towns out of the hand of the
ilistines.
the Moabites became David's servants, and
darezer king of Zobah unto Hamath, as he went
 Euphrates.
m a thousand chariots, and seven thousand
vid also houghed all the
but reserved of them an hundred chariots.
ame to help Hadarezer king of
d slew of the Syrians two and twenty thousand men.
in Syriadamascus; and the Syrians became
David's servants, and brought gifts. Thus the LORD preserved David
 went.
of gold that were on the servants of
rezer, and brought them to Jerusalem.
8:8 Likewise from Tibhath, and from Chun, cities of Hadarezer,
uch brass, wherewith Solomon made the brasen sea,
of brass.
ath heard how David had smitten all the
ost of Hadarezer king of Zobah; 18:10 He sent Hadoram his son to king
uire of his welfare, and to congratulate him, because he
er, and smitten him; (for Hadarezer had war
essels of gold and silver and
8:11 Them also king David dedicated unto the LORD, with the silver
t he brought from all these nations; from Edom, and
n of Ammon, and from the Philistines,
 from Amalek.
e son of Zeruiah slew of the Edomites in the
8:13 And he put garrisons in Edom; and all the Edomites became
us the LORD preserved David whithersoever he went.
l Israel, and executed judgment and
ce among all his people.
 the son of Zeruiah was over the host; and Jehoshaphat

 Abimelech the son of Abiathar,
priests; and Shavsha was scribe; 18:17 And Benaiah the son of
 Cherethites and the Pelethites; and the sons of

t Nahash the king of the
n died, and his son reigned in his stead.
ss unto Hanun the son of
his father shewed kindness to me. And David sent
ng his father. So the servants of
ame into the land of the children of Ammon to Hanun, to comfort
e princes of the children of Ammon said to Hanun, Thinkest
our thy father, that he hath sent comforters
unto thee for to search, and to
, and to spy out the land?  19:4 Wherefore Hanun took David's
them, and cut off their garments in the midst
 away.
d told David how the men were served.
 he sent to meet them: for the men were greatly ashamed. And the
t Jericho until your beards be grown, and then
n of Ammon saw that they had made themselves
n of Ammon sent a thousand
ver to hire them chariots and horsemen out of
 and out of Zobah.
hirty and two thousand chariots, and the king of
nd pitched before Medeba. And the
n of Ammon gathered themselves together from their cities, and
9:8 And when David heard of it, he sent Joab, and all the host of the

 and put the battle in array
ate of the city: and the kings that were come were by
9:10 Now when Joab saw that the battle was set against him before and
ose out of all the choice of Israel, and put them in
19:11 And the rest of the people he delivered unto the hand of Abishai
 and they set themselves in array against the children of
id, If the Syrians be too strong for me, then thou
en of Ammon be too strong for thee,
I will help thee.
age, and let us behave ourselves valiantly for
r God: and let the LORD do that
good in his sight.
e people that were with him drew nigh before the
fled before him.
ldren of Ammon saw that the Syrians were fled,
s brother, and entered into the
n Joab came to Jerusalem.
n the Syrians saw that they were put to the worse before
rs, and drew forth the Syrians that were
beyond the river: and Shophach the captain of the host of Hadarezer
m.
gathered all Israel, and passed
an, and came upon them, and set the battle in array against
 put the battle in array against the Syrians,
e Syrians fled before Israel; and David slew of the
h fought in chariots, and forty
footmen, and killed Shophach the captain of the host.
 of Hadarezer saw that they were put to the
th David, and became his
r would the Syrians help the children of Ammon any
s, that after the year was expired, at the time
ed forth the power of the army, and
d the country of the children of Ammon, and came and besieged
ried at Jerusalem. And Joab smote Rabbah, and
the crown of their king from off his head, and
and there were precious stones in
 it was set upon David's head: and he brought also exceeding
city.
e that were in it, and cut them with
, and with harrows of iron, and with axes. Even so dealt David
of the children of Ammon. And David and all the
:4 And it came to pass after this, that there arose war at Gezer
es; at which time Sibbechai the Hushathite slew
 the giant: and they were subdued.
 And there was war again with the Philistines; and Elhanan the son
mi the brother of Goliath the Gittite, whose spear

h, where was a man of great
e fingers and toes were four and twenty, six on each
 he also was the son of the giant.
 But when he defied Israel, Jonathan the son of Shimea David's

th; and they fell by the hand
nd by the hand of his servants.
d Satan stood up against Israel, and provoked David to number
avid said to Joab and to the rulers of the people, Go,
 even to Dan; and bring the number of them
oab answered, The LORD make his people an hundred times so
t, my lord the king, are they not all my
lord's servants?  why then doth my lord require this thing? why will
of trespass to Israel?  21:4 Nevertheless the king's
herefore Joab departed, and went
ut all Israel, and came to Jerusalem.
1:5 And Joab gave the sum of the number of the people unto David. And
srael were a thousand thousand and an hundred thousand
ah was four hundred threescore and ten
ousand men that drew sword.
vi and Benjamin counted he not among them: for the king's
ab.
is thing; therefore he smote
1:8 And David said unto God, I have sinned greatly, because I have
 but now, I beseech thee, do away the iniquity of thy
 foolishly.
o Gad, David's seer, saying, 21:10 Go and
I offer thee three things:
e of them, that I may do it unto thee.
21:11 So Gad came to David, and said unto him, Thus saith the LORD,
12 Either three years' famine; or three months to be
le that the sword of thine enemies
keth thee; or else three days the sword of the LORD, even the
nd, and the angel of the LORD destroying
throughout all the coasts of Israel. Now therefore advise thyself what
 bring again to him that sent me.
 And David said unto Gad, I am in a great strait: let me fall now
the LORD; for very great are his mercies: but let me

 Israel: and there fell of
 thousand men.
gel unto Jerusalem to destroy it: and as he
 repented him of the evil, and
e angel that destroyed, It is enough, stay now thine hand.
D stood by the threshingfloor of Ornan the
is eyes, and saw the angel of the LORD
and between the earth and the heaven, having a drawn sword in his
t over Jerusalem. Then David and the elders of
h, fell upon their faces.
id said unto God, Is it not I that commanded the people
s that have sinned and done evil indeed;
but as for these sheep, what have they done? let thine hand, I pray
 God, be on me, and on my father's house; but not on
e plagued.
LORD commanded Gad to say to David, that
David should go up, and set up an altar unto the LORD in the
n the Jebusite.
 at the saying of Gad, which he spake in the
urned back, and saw the angel; and his four sons with
 was threshing wheat.
d came to Ornan, Ornan looked and saw David, and went
d bowed himself to David with his face to
rnan, Grant me the place of this
gfloor, that I may build an altar therein unto the LORD: thou
 the full price: that the plague may be stayed
said unto David, Take it to thee, and let my lord the
 his eyes: lo, I give thee the oxen also
for burnt offerings, and the threshing instruments for wood, and the
meat offering; I give it all.
 king David said to Ornan, Nay; but I will verily buy it for
will not take that which is thine for the LORD,
ost.
he place six hundred shekels of gold
eight.
ltar unto the LORD, and offered burnt
erings and peace offerings, and called upon the LORD; and he
en by fire upon the altar of burnt offering.
el; and he put up his sword again
e sheath thereof.
en David saw that the LORD had answered him in
site, then he sacrificed there.
or the tabernacle of the LORD, which Moses made in the
 the burnt offering, were at that season
in the high place at Gibeon.
David could not go before it to enquire of God: for he was
ord of the angel of the LORD.
 David said, This is the house of the LORD God, and this is
offering for Israel.
manded to gather together the strangers that were in
 masons to hew wrought stones to build
e house of God.
 iron in abundance for the nails for the doors
and brass in abundance without
:4 Also cedar trees in abundance: for the Zidonians and they
edar wood to David.
, Solomon my son is young and tender, and the house
ORD must be exceeding magnifical, of
 and of glory throughout all countries: I will therefore now make
t. So David prepared abundantly before his death.
 his son, and charged him to build an
se for the LORD God of Israel.
 David said to Solomon, My son, as for me, it was in my mind
 the name of the LORD my God: 22:8 But the word
u hast shed blood abundantly, and
de great wars: thou shalt not build an house unto my name,
uch blood upon the earth in my sight.
2:9 Behold, a son shall be born to thee, who shall be a man of rest;
e him rest from all his enemies round about: for his
ill give peace and quietness unto Israel
in his days.
use for my name; and he shall be my son, and
lish the throne of his kingdom
l for ever.
 be with thee; and prosper thou, and build
h said of thee.
e thee wisdom and understanding, and give thee
mayest keep the law of the LORD

takest heed to fulfil the
dgments which the LORD charged Moses with concerning
 courage; dread not, nor be dismayed.
2:14 Now, behold, in my trouble I have prepared for the house of the
d thousand talents of gold, and a thousand thousand
 and iron without weight; for it is in
undance: timber also and stone have I prepared; and thou mayest add
15 Moreover there are workmen with thee in abundance, hewers and
nd timber, and all manner of cunning men for every
gold, the silver, and the brass, and the iron, there is
 and be doing, and the LORD be with thee.
ces of Israel to help Solomon
ying, 22:18 Is not the LORD your God with you? and hath he
ery side? for he hath given the inhabitants of
d is subdued before the LORD, and
his people.
d your soul to seek the LORD your God;
ise therefore, and build ye the sanctuary of the LORD God, to bring
covenant of the LORD, and the holy vessels of God, into
lt to the name of the LORD.
n David was old and full of days, he made Solomon his son
 And he gathered together all the princes of Israel, with the
es.
from the age of thirty years and
and their number by their polls, man by man, was thirty and
 Of which, twenty and four thousand were to set forward the work
e LORD; and six thousand were officers and judges:
 porters; and four thousand praised
ORD with the instruments which I made, said David, to praise
 David divided them into courses among the sons of Levi,
nd Merari.
, Laadan, and Shimei.
Laadan; the chief was Jehiel, and Zetham, and Joel,
ei; Shelomith, and Haziel, and Haran, three.
 Laadan.
ere, Jahath, Zina, and Jeush, and


 the second: but Jeush and
 many sons; therefore they were in one reckoning,
.
r, Hebron, and Uzziel, four.
sons of Amram; Aaron and Moses: and Aaron was separated,
e most holy things, he and his sons for
ver, to burn incense before the LORD, to minister unto him, and to
e for ever.
the man of God, his sons were named of the
s were, Gershom, and Eliezer.
the sons of Gershom, Shebuel was the chief.
ehabiah the chief. And Eliezer
ther sons; but the sons of Rehabiah were very many.
helomith the chief.
f Hebron; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second,
e fourth.
Micah the first and Jesiah the second.
23:21 The sons of Merari; Mahli, and Mushi. The sons of Mahli;

 but daughters: and their
ns of Kish took them.
 Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jeremoth, three.
fter the house of their fathers;
 chief of the fathers, as they were counted by number of names
 did the work for the service of the house of the
s and upward.
 LORD God of Israel hath given rest unto his
em for ever: 23:26 And also unto
tes; they shall no more carry the tabernacle, nor any vessels
 thereof.
f David the Levites were numbered from
enty years old and above: 23:28 Because their office was to wait on
on for the service of the house of the LORD, in the
d in the purifying of all holy things,
d the work of the service of the house of God; 23:29 Both for the
r the fine flour for meat offering, and for the
h is baked in the pan, and for that
 is fried, and for all manner of measure and size; 23:30 And to
 to thank and praise the LORD, and likewise at
acrifices unto the LORD in the
in the new moons, and on the set feasts, by number,
d unto them, continually before the
 23:32 And that they should keep the charge of the tabernacle of
and the charge of the holy place, and the charge of
n, in the service of the house of the
D.
the sons of Aaron. The sons of
ab, and Abihu, Eleazar, and Ithamar.
:2 But Nadab and Abihu died before their father, and had no
azar and Ithamar executed the priest's office.
oth Zadok of the sons of Eleazar,
melech of the sons of Ithamar, according to their offices in
 And there were more chief men found of the sons of Eleazar than
amar, and thus were they divided. Among the sons of
f men of the house of their fathers,
eight among the sons of Ithamar according to the house of their
us were they divided by lot, one sort with another; for the
ary, and governors of the house of God, were of
s of Ithamar.
 of Nethaneel the scribe, one of the Levites,
rinces, and Zadok the priest, and
ch the son of Abiathar, and before the chief of the fathers of
tes: one principal household being taken for

iarib, the second to Jedaiah,
ird to Harim, the fourth to Seorim, 24:9 The fifth to
in, 24:10 The seventh to Hakkoz, the
th to Abijah, 24:11 The ninth to Jeshuah, the tenth to Shecaniah,
h to Eliashib, the twelfth to Jakim, 24:13 The
 to Jeshebeab, 24:14 The fifteenth
gah, the sixteenth to Immer, 24:15 The seventeenth to Hezir, the
es, 24:16 The nineteenth to Pethahiah, the twentieth
d twentieth to Jachin, the two and
eth to Gamul, 24:18 The three and twentieth to Delaiah, the four
aaziah.
of them in their service to come into
 house of the LORD, according to their manner, under Aaron their
D God of Israel had commanded him.
0 And the rest of the sons of Levi were these: Of the sons of
e sons of Shubael; Jehdeiah.
erning Rehabiah: of the sons of Rehabiah, the first was
harites; Shelomoth: of the sons of Shelomoth; Jahath.
n; Jeriah the first, Amariah the second,
Jahaziel the third, Jekameam the fourth.

the sons of Michah; Shamir.
rother of Michah was Isshiah: of the sons of Isshiah;
of Merari were Mahli and Mushi: the sons of Jaaziah;
ari by Jaaziah; Beno, and Shoham, and Zaccur, and
zar, who had no sons.
Kish: the son of Kish was Jerahmeel.
:30 The sons also of Mushi; Mahli, and Eder, and Jerimoth. These
he Levites after the house of their fathers.
against their brethren the sons of
in the presence of David the king, and Zadok, and Ahimelech, and
athers of the priests and Levites, even the
unger brethren.
 the captains of the host separated to the
an, and of Jeduthun, who
with harps, with psalteries, and with cymbals: and the
ing to their service was: 25:2 Of the sons
iah, and Asarelah, the sons of
r the hands of Asaph, which prophesied according to the
Of Jeduthun: the sons of Jeduthun; Gedaliah, and Zeri, and
 Mattithiah, six, under the hands of their
arp, to give thanks and to
D.
kkiah, Mattaniah, Uzziel, Shebuel,
rimoth, Hananiah, Hanani, Eliathah, Giddalti, and Romamtiezer,
hi, Hothir, and Mahazioth: 25:5 All these were the
 the words of God, to lift up the
nd God gave to Heman fourteen sons and three daughters.
 the hands of their father for song in the
ies, and harps, for the
use of God, according to the king's order to Asaph,
 the number of them, with their brethren that were instructed
ORD, even all that were cunning, was two hundred
hey cast lots, ward against ward, as well the small as the
e scholar.
forth for Asaph to Joseph: the second to
Gedaliah, who with his brethren and sons were twelve: 25:10 The third
, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 25:11 The
and his brethren, were twelve: 25:12 The
fifth to Nethaniah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 25:13
 Bukkiah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve:
lah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were
 his sons, and his brethren,
 25:16 The ninth to Mattaniah, he, his sons, and his
he tenth to Shimei, he, his sons, and
 brethren, were twelve: 25:18 The eleventh to Azareel, he, his
en, were twelve: 25:19 The twelfth to Hashabiah,
re twelve: 25:20 The thirteenth to
l, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve: 25:21 The
 he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve:
his sons, and his brethren, were
25:23 The sixteenth to Hananiah, he, his sons, and his
 The seventeenth to Joshbekashah, he, his
5 The eighteenth to Hanani,
 and his brethren, were twelve: 25:26 The nineteenth to
 his brethren, were twelve: 25:27 The
ntieth to Eliathah, he, his sons, and his brethren, were twelve:
twentieth to Hothir, he, his sons, and his brethren,
 twentieth to Giddalti, he, his sons,
 his brethren, were twelve: 25:30 The three and twentieth to
s, and his brethren, were twelve: 25:31 The four
his sons, and his brethren, were

rters: Of the Korhites was
e son of Kore, of the sons of Asaph.
:2 And the sons of Meshelemiah were, Zechariah the firstborn,
ebadiah the third, Jathniel the fourth, 26:3 Elam
lioenai the seventh.
sons of Obededom were, Shemaiah the firstborn,
, and Sacar the fourth, and
 fifth.
 the seventh, Peulthai the eighth: for
d blessed him.
his son were sons born, that ruled throughout
ere mighty men of valour.
 of Shemaiah; Othni, and Rephael, and Obed, Elzabad,
, Elihu, and Semachiah.
of the sons of Obededom: they and their sons and their
gth for the service, were threescore and
two of Obededom.
ad sons and brethren, strong men, eighteen.
Merari, had sons; Simri the
hough he was not the firstborn, yet his father made him
he second, Tebaliah the third, Zechariah
the fourth: all the sons and brethren of Hosah were thirteen.
ere the divisions of the porters, even among the
t another, to minister in the house
e LORD.
ll the small as the great, according to
he house of their fathers, for every gate.
lemiah. Then for Zechariah his
e counsellor, they cast lots; and his lot came out
southward; and to his sons the house of Asuppim.
ot came forth westward, with the gate
llecheth, by the causeway of the going up, ward against ward.
 six Levites, northward four a day, southward four
d two.
t the causeway, and two at Parbar.
9 These are the divisions of the porters among the sons of Kore,
 of Merari.
hijah was over the treasures of the house
icated things.
sons of Laadan; the sons of the Gershonite
e Gershonite, were Jehieli.
ons of Jehieli; Zetham, and Joel his brother, which were
house of the LORD.
es, and the Izharites, the Hebronites, and the
n of Gershom, the son of Moses,
 of the treasures.
en by Eliezer; Rehabiah his son, and Jeshaiah his
i his son, and Shelomith his son.
 Which Shelomith and his brethren were over all the treasures of
gs, which David the king, and the chief fathers, the
ndreds, and the captains of the host,
 dedicated.
 in battles did they dedicate to maintain
hat Samuel the seer, and Saul the son of Kish, and
he son of Zeruiah, had dedicated; and
soever had dedicated any thing, it was under the hand of Shelomith,
hren.
 and his sons were for the outward
ss over Israel, for officers and judges.

nd his brethren, men of
d and seven hundred, were officers among them of
d in all the business of the LORD,
 the service of the king.
he Hebronites was Jerijah the chief, even among the
nerations of his fathers. In the
 year of the reign of David they were sought for, and there
ighty men of valour at Jazer of Gilead.

re two thousand and seven
athers, whom king David made rulers over the
tribe of Manasseh, for every
ining to God, and affairs of the king.
27:1 Now the children of Israel after their number, to wit, the chief
aptains of thousands and hundreds, and their officers
atter of the courses, which came in and
ent out month by month throughout all the months of the year, of
twenty and four thousand.
 first course for the first month was Jashobeam the son
se were twenty and four thousand.
Of the children of Perez was the chief of all the captains of the
t month.
e second month was Dodai an Ahohite, and
of his course was Mikloth also the ruler: in his course likewise were
ur thousand.
the host for the third month was Benaiah the
n his course were twenty and
d.
ighty among the thirty, and above
rty: and in his course was Ammizabad his son.
rth month was Asahel the brother of
 and Zebadiah his son after him: and in his course were twenty

th was Shamhuth the Izrahite:
course were twenty and four thousand.
7:9 The sixth captain for the sixth month was Ira the son of Ikkesh
d in his course were twenty and four thousand.
seventh month was Helez the
the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty
The eighth captain for the eighth month was Sibbecai the
s: and in his course were twenty and four
the ninth month was Abiezer the
e, of the Benjamites: and in his course were twenty and four
 tenth captain for the tenth month was Maharai the
nd in his course were twenty and four
usand.
he eleventh month was Benaiah the
nite, of the children of Ephraim: and in his course were twenty

th month was Heldai the
Othniel: and in his course were twenty and four
 the tribes of Israel: the ruler of the
eubenites was Eliezer the son of Zichri: of the Simeonites,
aachah: 27:17 Of the Levites, Hashabiah the son
 27:18 Of Judah, Elihu, one of the
en of David: of Issachar, Omri the son of Michael: 27:19 Of
on of Obadiah: of Naphtali, Jerimoth the son of
hraim, Hoshea the son of Azaziah:
half tribe of Manasseh, Joel the son of Pedaiah: 27:21 Of the
h in Gilead, Iddo the son of Zechariah: of
2 Of Dan, Azareel the son of
se were the princes of the tribes of Israel.
of them from twenty years old and
because the LORD had said he would increase Israel like to the
.
o number, but he finished not,
ere fell wrath for it against Israel; neither was the number
the chronicles of king David.
 over the king's treasures was Azmaveth the son of Adiel: and
in the fields, in the cities, and in the
villages, and in the castles, was Jehonathan the son of Uzziah: 27:26
 that did the work of the field for tillage of the ground
b: 27:27 And over the vineyards was Shimei
vineyards for the wine cellars
the Shiphmite: 27:28 And over the olive trees and the
he low plains was Baalhanan the Gederite:
:29 And over the herds that
 was Shitrai the Sharonite: and over the herds that were
 the son of Adlai: 27:30 Over the camels
also was Obil the Ishmaelite: and over the asses was Jehdeiah the
1 And over the flocks was Jaziz the Hagerite. All
tance which was king David's.
o Jonathan David's uncle was a counsellor, a wise man, and a
 son of Hachmoni was with the king's sons: 27:33
sellor: and Hushai the Archite was
ng's companion: 27:34 And after Ahithophel was Jehoiada the son
athar: and the general of the king's army was Joab.
the princes of Israel, the princes of the
 that ministered to the king
nd the captains over the thousands, and captains over the
s over all the substance and possession of
cers, and with the mighty men,
ll the valiant men, unto Jerusalem.
2 Then David the king stood up upon his feet, and said, Hear me, my
y people: As for me, I had in mine heart to build an
he covenant of the LORD, and for the
stool of our God, and had made ready for the building: 28:3 But
hou shalt not build an house for my name, because
hast shed blood.
God of Israel chose me before all the house of
 ever: for he hath chosen Judah to
 ruler; and of the house of Judah, the house of my father; and
 father he liked me to make me king over all
the LORD hath given me many
h chosen Solomon my son to sit upon the throne of the
el.
hy son, he shall build my house and
urts: for I have chosen him to be my son, and I will be his
r I will establish his kingdom for ever, if he be constant
d my judgments, as at this day.
w therefore in the sight of all Israel the congregation of the
ience of our God, keep and seek for all the
 ye may possess this good land,
 it for an inheritance for your children after you for ever.
on my son, know thou the God of thy father, and
with a willing mind: for the LORD
th all hearts, and understandeth all the imaginations of the
 him, he will be found of thee; but if thou
ever.
 hath chosen thee to build an house
he sanctuary: be strong, and do it.
11 Then David gave to Solomon his son the pattern of the porch, and
hereof, and of the treasuries thereof, and of the upper
e inner parlours thereof, and of the place
 of all that he had by the
 courts of the house of the LORD, and of all the
uries of the house of God, and of
asuries of the dedicated things: 28:13 Also for the courses of
Levites, and for all the work of the service of
the vessels of service in the house
e LORD.
 for things of gold, for all
of all manner of service; silver also for all instruments
all instruments of every kind of service:
s of gold, and for their
y weight for every candlestick, and for the lamps
 of silver by weight, both for the
stick, and also for the lamps thereof, according to the use of

 tables of shewbread, for
d likewise silver for the tables of silver: 28:17 Also
, and the bowls, and the cups: and for the
 every bason; and likewise
ht for every bason of silver: 28:18 And for the altar of
ight; and gold for the pattern of the
riot of the cherubims, that spread out their wings, and covered the
nant of the LORD.
David, the LORD made me understand in writing by
ks of this pattern.
d to Solomon his son, Be strong and of good
smayed: for the LORD God, even
ll be with thee; he will not fail thee, nor forsake thee,
all the work for the service of the house of
urses of the priests and the Levites, even
ice of the house of God: and
be with thee for all manner of workmanship every willing
r of service: also the princes and all the
.
unto all the congregation,
, whom alone God hath chosen, is yet young and tender,
he palace is not for man, but for the LORD
l my might for the house of my God the
ld for things to be made of gold, and the silver for things of
s for things of brass, the iron for things of
yx stones, and stones to be set,
ng stones, and of divers colours, and all manner of precious
nes in abundance.
e I have set my affection to the house of my God,
f gold and silver, which I have given
the house of my God, over and above all that I have prepared for

 of the gold of Ophir, and
 talents of refined silver, to overlay the walls of the
d for things of gold, and the silver for
things of silver, and for all manner of work to be made by the hands
 And who then is willing to consecrate his service this
en the chief of the fathers and princes of
 thousands and of hundreds,
rs of the king's work, offered willingly, 29:7 And gave
e of God of gold five thousand talents and
ousand talents, and of brass
usand talents, and one hundred thousand talents of iron.
precious stones were found gave them to the
he hand of Jehiel the
 Then the people rejoiced, for that they offered willingly,
art they offered willingly to the LORD: and
 joy.
 LORD before all the congregation:
vid said, Blessed be thou, LORD God of Israel our father, for
11 Thine, O LORD is the greatness, and the power, and the glory,
nd the majesty: for all that is in the heaven and in
he kingdom, O LORD, and thou art exalted
as head above all.
d honour come of thee, and thou reignest over all;
ight; and in thine hand it is to make
at, and to give strength unto all.
3 Now therefore, our God, we thank thee, and praise thy glorious
 who am I, and what is my people, that we should be able to
r this sort? for all things come of thee, and
9:15 For we are strangers before thee, and sojourners, as were all
 days on the earth are as a shadow, and there is none
God, all this store that we have prepared to build
e cometh of thine hand, and is all
own.
ou triest the heart, and hast
 uprightness. As for me, in the uprightness of mine heart I
all these things: and now have I seen with joy
to offer willingly unto thee.
ORD God of Abraham, Isaac, and of Israel, our fathers, keep
agination of the thoughts of the heart of thy
thee: 29:19 And give unto Solomon
a perfect heart, to keep thy commandments, thy testimonies, and
o do all these things, and to build the palace, for
.
egation, Now bless the LORD your
And all the congregation blessed the LORD God of their fathers, and
r heads, and worshipped the LORD, and the king.
ces unto the LORD, and offered burnt
rings unto the LORD, on the morrow after that day, even a thousand
sand rams, and a thousand lambs, with their drink
dance for all Israel: 29:22 And did
nd drink before the LORD on that day with great gladness. And
 son of David king the second time, and anointed
governor, and Zadok to be priest.
 Then Solomon sat on the throne of the LORD as king instead of
d prospered; and all Israel obeyed him.

 men, and all the sons
avid, submitted themselves unto Solomon the king.
lomon exceedingly in the sight of all
ael, and bestowed upon him such royal majesty as had not been on
m in Israel.
f Jesse reigned over all Israel.
And the time that he reigned over Israel was forty years; seven
 Hebron, and thirty and three years reigned he in
n a good old age, full of days, riches, and honour:
his stead.
the king, first and last, behold, they are
and in the book of Nathan the
d in the book of Gad the seer, 29:30 With all his reign and
s that went over him, and over Israel, and over


 strengthened in his kingdom, and
D his God was with him, and magnified him exceedingly.
o all Israel, to the captains of thousands
to every governor in all
f of the fathers.
ll the congregation with him, went to the high
was the tabernacle of the
 God, which Moses the servant of the LORD had made in
e ark of God had David brought up from Kirjathjearim to the
repared for it: for he had pitched a tent for
brasen altar, that Bezaleel the son of Uri, the son
 the tabernacle of the LORD: and
and the congregation sought unto it.
6 And Solomon went up thither to the brasen altar before the LORD,
 tabernacle of the congregation, and offered a

omon, and said unto him, Ask
 give thee.
od, Thou hast shewed great mercy unto David
 his stead.
y promise unto David my father be
shed: for thou hast made me king over a people like the dust of
ude.
dge, that I may go out and come in
 this people: for who can judge this thy people, that is so
id to Solomon, Because this was in thine heart,
lth, or honour, nor the life of
mies, neither yet hast asked long life; but hast asked wisdom
self, that thou mayest judge my people, over whom
m and knowledge is granted unto thee;
 I will give thee riches, and wealth, and honour, such as none of
d that have been before thee, neither shall there any
1:13 Then Solomon came from his journey to the high place that was at
usalem, from before the tabernacle of the congregation,

rsemen: and he had a thousand
ndred chariots, and twelve thousand horsemen, which he
, and with the king at Jerusalem.
And the king made silver and gold at Jerusalem as plenteous as
ees made he as the sycomore trees that are in the
olomon had horses brought out of Egypt, and linen yarn: the
ed the linen yarn at a price.
they fetched up, and brought forth out of Egypt a chariot for
f silver, and an horse for an hundred and fifty:
 all the kings of the Hittites, and
he kings of Syria, by their means.
And Solomon determined to build an house for the name of the LORD,
 his kingdom.
threescore and ten thousand men to bear
urdens, and fourscore thousand to hew in the mountain, and three
undred to oversee them.
 sent to Huram the king of Tyre, saying, As thou didst
nd didst send him cedars to build him an
house to dwell therein, even so deal with me.
 name of the LORD my God, to
to him, and to burn before him sweet incense, and for the
for the burnt offerings morning and evening,
 and on the solemn feasts of the
 God. This is an ordinance for ever to Israel.
 great: for great is our God above
ds.
 house, seeing the heaven and
eavens cannot contain him? who am I then, that I should
ly to burn sacrifice before him?  2:7 Send
n gold, and in silver, and in
in iron, and in purple, and crimson, and blue, and that can
 cunning men that are with me in Judah and in
rovide.
ir trees, and algum trees, out of
: for I know that thy servants can skill to cut timber in
servants shall be with thy servants, 2:9 Even
r the house which I am about to
ll be wonderful great.
, I will give to thy servants, the hewers that cut
 of beaten wheat, and twenty thousand
sures of barley, and twenty thousand baths of wine, and twenty
l.
wered in writing, which he sent to
n, Because the LORD hath loved his people, he hath made thee
2 Huram said moreover, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, that made
h, who hath given to David the king a wise son, endued
ing, that might build an house for the
RD, and an house for his kingdom.
And now I have sent a cunning man, endued with understanding, of
 2:14 The son of a woman of the daughters of Dan,
 skilful to work in gold, and in
in brass, in iron, in stone, and in timber, in purple, in
and in crimson; also to grave any manner of
hich shall be put to him, with
g men, and with the cunning men of my lord David thy father.
he wheat, and the barley, the oil, and the wine,
him send unto his servants: 2:16 And
ill cut wood out of Lebanon, as much as thou shalt need: and we
ee in floats by sea to Joppa; and thou shalt carry
Solomon numbered all the strangers that were in the land of
ring wherewith David his father had numbered
nd fifty thousand and three
six hundred.
 and ten thousand of them to be bearers of
wers in the mountain, and
and six hundred overseers to set the people a work.
ld the house of the LORD at Jerusalem in
mount Moriah, where the Lord appeared unto David his father, in the
d had prepared in the threshingfloor of Ornan the
build in the second day of the second month, in
3 Now these are the things wherein Solomon was instructed for the
ouse of God. The length by cubits after the first
d the breadth twenty cubits.
e porch that was in the front of the house, the length of it
readth of the house, twenty cubits, and the
e overlaid it within with pure
:5 And the greater house he cieled with fir tree, which he overlaid
 and set thereon palm trees and chains.

ous stones for beauty: and
old of Parvaim.
e house, the beams, the posts, and the walls
old; and graved cherubims on the

 length whereof was according
dth of the house, twenty cubits, and the breadth thereof
laid it with fine gold, amounting to six
hundred talents.
the nails was fifty shekels of gold. And he

 two cherubims of image work,
d them with gold.
 the cherubims were twenty cubits long: one wing
 reaching to the wall of the house:
he other wing was likewise five cubits, reaching to the wing of

s five cubits, reaching to the
e house: and the other wing was five cubits also, joining to
cherub.
ms spread themselves forth twenty
 and they stood on their feet, and their faces were inward.
vail of blue, and purple, and crimson, and fine
n.
wo pillars of thirty and five
, and the chapiter that was on the top of each of them was
 he made chains, as in the oracle, and put them on the heads
de an hundred pomegranates, and put them on the
e pillars before the temple, one on the right
called the name of that on the
 Jachin, and the name of that on the left Boaz.
brass, twenty cubits the length
and twenty cubits the breadth thereof, and ten cubits the
so he made a molten sea of ten cubits from brim to brim, round
 cubits the height thereof; and a line of thirty

 oxen, which did compass it
ten in a cubit, compassing the sea round about. Two rows
 was cast.
n, three looking toward the north, and
ree looking toward the west, and three looking toward the south, and
toward the east: and the sea was set above upon them,
re inward.
was an handbreadth, and the brim of it
ke the work of the brim of a cup, with flowers of lilies; and it
three thousand baths.
ten lavers, and put five on the right hand, and five
such things as they offered for the
 offering they washed in them; but the sea was for the priests to
nd he made ten candlesticks of gold according to their form, and
mple, five on the right hand, and five on the left.
and placed them in the temple, five on
e right side, and five on the left. And he made an hundred basons of
urthermore he made the court of the priests, and the great court,
 court, and overlaid the doors of them with brass.
 right side of the east end, over
 the south.
s, and the shovels, and the basons. And
uram finished the work that he was to make for king Solomon for the
:12 To wit, the two pillars, and the pommels, and the
op of the two pillars, and the two
s to cover the two pommels of the chapiters which were on the
:13 And four hundred pomegranates on the two
ach wreath, to cover the two
he chapiters which were upon the pillars.
e he upon the bases; 4:15 One
elve oxen under it.
 and the shovels, and the fleshhooks, and all their
er make to king Solomon for the house
the LORD of bright brass.
lain of Jordan did the king cast them, in the clay ground
athah.
 vessels in great abundance: for the
ht of the brass could not be found out.

t were for the house of God,
ltar also, and the tables whereon the shewbread was set;
icks with their lamps, that they should burn
 pure gold; 4:21 And the
 lamps, and the tongs, made he of gold, and that
s, and the basons, and the spoons,
e censers, of pure gold: and the entry of the house, the inner
e most holy place, and the doors of the house of
hus all the work that Solomon made for the house of the LORD was
mon brought in all the things that David his father
and the gold, and all the instruments,
t he among the treasures of the house of God.
rs of Israel, and all the heads of
ibes, the chief of the fathers of the children of Israel, unto
up the ark of the covenant of the LORD out of the
5:3 Wherefore all the men of Israel assembled themselves unto the king
 which was in the seventh month.
d all the elders of Israel came; and the Levites took up the
rought up the ark, and the tabernacle of the
 that were in the tabernacle,
he priests and the Levites bring up.
6 Also king Solomon, and all the congregation of Israel that were
m before the ark, sacrificed sheep and oxen, which
or multitude.
ht in the ark of the covenant of the LORD
e, into the most holy place,
he wings of the cherubims: 5:8 For the cherubims spread
place of the ark, and the cherubims covered

ark, that the ends of the
n from the ark before the oracle; but they were not
nto this day.
 the ark save the two tables which Moses put
 covenant with the children of
en they came out of Egypt.
came to pass, when the priests were come out of the holy
s that were present were sanctified, and did
 Levites which were the singers,
hem of Asaph, of Heman, of Jeduthun, with their sons and their
yed in white linen, having cymbals and psalteries
of the altar, and with them an
d twenty priests sounding with trumpets:) 5:13 It came even
ers and singers were as one, to make one sound
 the LORD; and when they lifted up
voice with the trumpets and cymbals and instruments of musick,
, saying, For he is good; for his mercy endureth
filled with a cloud, even the house
e LORD; 5:14 So that the priests could not stand to minister by
: for the glory of the LORD had filled the house of
The LORD hath said that he would dwell in the
lt an house of habitation for thee, and a place for
nd the king turned his face, and blessed the whole congregation
the congregation of Israel stood.
nd he said, Blessed be the LORD God of Israel, who hath with his
at which he spake with his mouth to my father David,
 I brought forth my people out of the
d of Egypt I chose no city among all the tribes of Israel to build
t my name might be there; neither chose I any man to
el: 6:6 But I have chosen Jerusalem,
 my name might be there; and have chosen David to be over my
Now it was in the heart of David my father to build an house for
RD God of Israel.
 to David my father, Forasmuch as it was in thine
me, thou didst well in that it was in
ne heart: 6:9 Notwithstanding thou shalt not build the house; but
ll come forth out of thy loins, he shall build the
ORD therefore hath performed his word that he hath spoken:
 room of David my father, and am set on the
 and have built the house for
 the LORD God of Israel.
 have I put the ark, wherein is the covenant of the
ldren of Israel.
re the altar of the LORD in the presence of all
ead forth his hands: 6:13 For
 made a brasen scaffold of five cubits long, and five
s high, and had set it in the midst of
e court: and upon it he stood, and kneeled down upon his knees
egation of Israel, and spread forth his hands
RD God of Israel, there is no God like thee in the
keepest covenant, and shewest mercy
thy servants, that walk before thee with all their hearts: 6:15
t with thy servant David my father that which thou
ith thy mouth, and hast fulfilled it
 thine hand, as it is this day.
w therefore, O LORD God of Israel, keep with thy servant David
 thou hast promised him, saying, There shall not
 upon the throne of Israel; yet so
hy children take heed to their way to walk in my law, as thou
.
let thy word be verified, which
 spoken unto thy servant David.
t will God in very deed dwell with men on the earth? behold,
of heavens cannot contain thee; how much less
Have respect therefore to the
hy servant, and to his supplication, O LORD my God, to
 prayer which thy servant prayeth before
thee: 6:20 That thine eyes may be open upon this house day and night,
e whereof thou hast said that thou wouldest put thy name
 prayer which thy servant prayeth toward
this place.
 the supplications of thy servant, and of
toward this place: hear thou
lling place, even from heaven; and when thou hearest,
 against his neighbour, and an oath be laid upon him
h come before thine altar in this house;
6:23 Then hear thou from heaven, and do, and judge thy servants, by
icked, by recompensing his way upon his own head; and
by giving him according to his
ess.
ut to the worse before the enemy,
 they have sinned against thee; and shall return and confess
 make supplication before thee in this house;
 and forgive the sin of thy
, and bring them again unto the land which thou gavest to
.
there is no rain, because they
d against thee; yet if they pray toward this place, and
from their sin, when thou dost afflict
em; 6:27 Then hear thou from heaven, and forgive the sin of thy
y people Israel, when thou hast taught them the
 and send rain upon thy land, which
hast given unto thy people for an inheritance.
d, if there be pestilence, if there
asting, or mildew, locusts, or caterpillers; if their enemies
ities of their land; whatsoever sore or
hatsoever sickness there be: 6:29 Then what prayer or what
l be made of any man, or of all thy people
n sore and his own grief, and
d forth his hands in this house: 6:30 Then hear thou from
, and forgive, and render unto every man
according unto all his ways, whose heart thou knowest; (for thou only
earts of the children of men:) 6:31 That they may fear
o long as they live in the land which thou
r concerning the stranger, which is not of thy people
r country for thy great name's sake, and
thy mighty hand, and thy stretched out arm; if they come and pray in
33 Then hear thou from the heavens, even from thy
to all that the stranger calleth to
for; that all people of the earth may know thy name, and fear
ple Israel, and may know that this house which I

t their enemies by the way that
t send them, and they pray unto thee toward this city which
he house which I have built for thy name; 6:35
r prayer and their supplication,
tain their cause.
nst thee, (for there is no man which sinneth
 deliver them over before their
and they carry them away captives unto a land far off or
hink themselves in the land whither they are
o thee in the land of their
ying, We have sinned, we have done amiss, and have dealt
urn to thee with all their heart and with
vity, whither they have
ives, and pray toward their land, which thou gavest
the city which thou hast chosen, and
rd the house which I have built for thy name: 6:39 Then hear thou
 even from thy dwelling place, their prayer and their
heir cause, and forgive thy people which
have sinned against thee.
God, let, I beseech thee, thine eyes be open, and let
 prayer that is made in this place.
1 Now therefore arise, O LORD God, into thy resting place, thou,
 strength: let thy priests, O LORD God, be clothed
ts rejoice in goodness.
, turn not away the face of thine anointed: remember
nt.
d of praying, the fire came down
ven, and consumed the burnt offering and the sacrifices; and
filled the house.
ould not enter into the house of the LORD,
 the LORD's house.
 children of Israel saw how the fire came down,
house, they bowed themselves with
aces to the ground upon the pavement, and worshipped, and
 For he is good; for his mercy endureth for
people offered sacrifices before the
.
ice of twenty and two thousand
an hundred and twenty thousand sheep: so the king and all
house of God.
d on their offices: the Levites also with
David the king had made to
D, because his mercy endureth for ever, when David
he priests sounded trumpets before
and all Israel stood.
mon hallowed the middle of the court that was before
re he offered burnt offerings, and the
t of the peace offerings, because the brasen altar which Solomon had
ble to receive the burnt offerings, and the meat
o at the same time Solomon kept the feast seven days, and all
ry great congregation, from the entering in of
:9 And in the eighth day they made a solemn assembly: for they kept
of the altar seven days, and the feast seven days.
tieth day of the seventh month he sent
e people away into their tents, glad and merry in heart for the
ORD had shewed unto David, and to Solomon, and to
olomon finished the house of the LORD, and the king's
 Solomon's heart to make in the house of
the LORD, and in his own house, he prosperously effected.
red to Solomon by night, and said unto him, I
n this place to myself for an
crifice.
there be no rain, or if I command the
usts to devour the land, or if I send pestilence among my people;
, which are called by my name, shall humble
 and turn from their wicked
ll I hear from heaven, and will forgive their sin, and
5 Now mine eyes shall be open, and mine ears attent unto the prayer
 this place.
 and sanctified this house, that my name may
ine heart shall be there
7:17 And as for thee, if thou wilt walk before me, as David thy father
do according to all that I have commanded thee, and shalt
y judgments; 7:18 Then will I stablish the
ve covenanted with David thy
ng, There shall not fail thee a man to be ruler in Israel.
ay, and forsake my statutes and my commandments,
hall go and serve other gods, and
 them; 7:20 Then will I pluck them up by the roots out of my
n them; and this house, which I have sanctified
sight, and will make it to be a
nd a byword among all nations.
 this house, which is high, shall be an astonishment to every
t; so that he shall say, Why hath the LORD done
house?  7:22 And it shall be
cause they forsook the LORD God of their fathers, which
he land of Egypt, and laid hold on other
gods, and worshipped them, and served them: therefore hath he brought
 upon them.
the end of twenty years, wherein Solomon
had built the house of the LORD, and his own house, 8:2 That the
 had restored to Solomon, Solomon built them, and
dwell there.
mathzobah, and prevailed against it.
4 And he built Tadmor in the wilderness, and all the store cities,
n Hamath.
he upper, and Bethhoron the nether,
d cities, with walls, gates, and bars; 8:6 And Baalath, and all
at Solomon had, and all the chariot cities, and the
 that Solomon desired to build in
em, and in Lebanon, and throughout all the land of his
the people that were left of the Hittites, and the
d the Hivites, and the Jebusites,
ere not of Israel, 8:8 But of their children, who were left
 whom the children of Israel consumed not, them
il this day.
 Israel did Solomon make no servants for his
ief of his captains, and
chariots and horsemen.
ere the chief of king Solomon's officers, even two
e over the people.
ught up the daughter of Pharaoh out of the city of
 built for her: for he said, My wife
l not dwell in the house of David king of Israel, because the
eunto the ark of the LORD hath come.
12 Then Solomon offered burnt offerings unto the LORD on the altar
ch he had built before the porch, 8:13 Even after a
g according to the commandment of
on the sabbaths, and on the new moons, and on the solemn
 year, even in the feast of unleavened
ead, and in the feast of weeks, and in the feast of tabernacles.
inted, according to the order of David his father, the
eir service, and the Levites to their
rges, to praise and minister before the priests, as the duty of
 the porters also by their courses at every gate:
ommanded.
om the commandment of the king unto the
riests and Levites concerning any matter, or concerning the
all the work of Solomon was prepared unto the day of the
 the LORD, and until it was finished. So the
17 Then went Solomon to Eziongeber, and to Eloth, at the sea side in
om.
s of his servants ships, and
t had knowledge of the sea; and they went with the
d took thence four hundred and fifty
nts of gold, and brought them to king Solomon.
ard of the fame of Solomon, she came
rove Solomon with hard questions at Jerusalem, with a very great
s that bare spices, and gold in abundance, and
me to Solomon, she communed with
ll that was in her heart.
on told her all her questions: and there was nothing hid
 her not.
ba had seen the wisdom of Solomon, and
e house that he had built, 9:4 And the meat of his table, and the
rvants, and the attendance of his ministers, and
, and their apparel; and his ascent
ich he went up into the house of the LORD; there was no more
And she said to the king, It was a true report which I heard in
ine acts, and of thy wisdom: 9:6 Howbeit I believed
and mine eyes had seen it: and, behold,
he one half of the greatness of thy wisdom was not told me: for thou
fame that I heard.
n, and happy are these thy servants, which stand
thy wisdom.
 God, which delighted in thee to set thee
y God: because thy God loved
stablish them for ever, therefore made he thee king over
ustice.
ndred and twenty talents of gold, and
spices great abundance, and precious stones: neither was there any
e queen of Sheba gave king Solomon.
0 And the servants also of Huram, and the servants of Solomon,
rom Ophir, brought algum trees and precious
e algum trees terraces to the house of the
s and psalteries for singers:
ere none such seen before in the land of Judah.
 queen of Sheba all her desire,
r she asked, beside that which she had brought unto the king.
nt away to her own land, she and her servants.
ame to Solomon in one year was six
d and threescore and six talents of gold; 9:14 Beside that which
nts brought. And all the kings of Arabia and
and silver to Solomon.
lomon made two hundred targets of beaten gold: six
ent to one target.
ed shields made he of beaten gold: three hundred
. And the king put them in the house
he forest of Lebanon.
 king made a great throne of ivory, and overlaid it
re were six steps to the throne, with a footstool of gold,
he throne, and stays on each side of the
sitting place, and two lions standing by the stays: 9:19 And twelve
re on the one side and on the other upon the six steps.
 in any kingdom.
ing vessels of king Solomon were of gold, and
orest of Lebanon were of pure
were of silver; it was not any thing accounted of in the
or the king's ships went to Tarshish with the servants of Huram:
once came the ships of Tarshish bringing gold, and
cocks.
 the kings of the earth in riches and
dom.
h sought the presence of Solomon, to
 his wisdom, that God had put in his heart.
resent, vessels of silver, and
 gold, and raiment, harness, and spices, horses, and mules,

 for horses and chariots, and
sand horsemen; whom he bestowed in the chariot cities, and
em.
ngs from the river even unto the
the Philistines, and to the border of Egypt.
usalem as stones, and cedar trees
 as the sycomore trees that are in the low plains in abundance.
ught unto Solomon horses out of Egypt, and out of all
f the acts of Solomon, first and last, are they not
he prophet, and in the prophecy of
 the Shilonite, and in the visions of Iddo the seer against
at?  9:30 And Solomon reigned in Jerusalem over
 Solomon slept with his fathers, and he was buried in the city
 and Rehoboam his son reigned in his stead.
r to Shechem were all Israel come
 him king.
en Jeroboam the son of Nebat, who was in
Egypt, whither he fled from the presence of Solomon the king, heard
am returned out of Egypt.
 sent and called him. So Jeroboam and all Israel came and
, 10:4 Thy father made our yoke grievous: now
vous servitude of thy father, and
vy yoke that he put upon us, and we will serve thee.
Come again unto me after three days. And
the people departed.
boam took counsel with the old men that had stood
e yet lived, saying, What counsel
 me to return answer to this people?  10:7 And they spake unto
 be kind to this people, and please them, and
e thy servants for ever.
rsook the counsel which the old men gave him, and took
hat were brought up with him, that stood
before him.
 What advice give ye that we may return
nswer to this people, which have spoken to me, saying, Ease somewhat
thy father did put upon us?  10:10 And the young men
spake unto him, saying, Thus shalt thou
nswer the people that spake unto thee, saying, Thy father made our
make thou it somewhat lighter for us; thus shalt thou
er shall be thicker than my father's
s.
avy yoke upon you, I will put more
r yoke: my father chastised you with whips, but I will chastise

ame to Rehoboam on the third
king bade, saying, Come again to me on the third day.
 them roughly; and king Rehoboam forsook
the counsel of the old men, 10:14 And answered them after the advice
en, saying, My father made your yoke heavy, but I will
ised you with whips, but I will chastise
you with scorpions.
earkened not unto the people: for the cause was of
 his word, which he spake by the hand
Ahijah the Shilonite to Jeroboam the son of Nebat.
that the king would not hearken unto
, the people answered the king, saying, What portion have we in
 none inheritance in the son of Jesse: every man to
David, see to thine own house. So all
ael went to their tents.
or the children of Israel that dwelt in the cities of
them.
oram that was over the tribute; and
hildren of Israel stoned him with stones, that he died. But king
d to get him up to his chariot, to flee to
against the house of David unto this day.
salem, he gathered of the house
and Benjamin an hundred and fourscore thousand chosen men,
fight against Israel, that he might bring the
t the word of the LORD came to Shemaiah the man of God, saying,
oboam the son of Solomon, king of Judah, and to all
aying, 11:4 Thus saith the LORD, Ye
 not go up, nor fight against your brethren: return every man to
s thing is done of me. And they obeyed the words of
ng against Jeroboam.
dwelt in Jerusalem, and built cities for defence in
thlehem, and Etam, and Tekoa, 11:7 And Bethzur,
th, and Mareshah, and Ziph, 11:9
aim, and Lachish, and Azekah, 11:10 And Zorah, and Aijalon,
n Judah and in Benjamin fenced cities.
11:11 And he fortified the strong holds, and put captains in them, and
tual, and of oil and wine.
 every several city he put shields and spears, and made
ng Judah and Benjamin on his side.
3 And the priests and the Levites that were in all Israel resorted
l their coasts.
eft their suburbs and their possession, and
am and his sons had cast them
ecuting the priest's office unto the LORD: 11:15 And he
e high places, and for the devils, and for
nd after them out of all the tribes of Israel such as set their
LORD God of Israel came to Jerusalem, to sacrifice
rs.
dom of Judah, and made Rehoboam the
f Solomon strong, three years: for three years they walked in the
Solomon.
halath the daughter of Jerimoth the son
f David to wife, and Abihail the daughter of Eliab the son of Jesse;
re him children; Jeush, and Shamariah, and Zaham.
chah the daughter of Absalom; which
him Abijah, and Attai, and Ziza, and Shelomith.
the daughter of Absalom above all his
es and his concubines: (for he took eighteen wives, and threescore
begat twenty and eight sons, and threescore
ijah the son of Maachah the
ruler among his brethren: for he thought to make him
sely, and dispersed of all his children
hroughout all the countries of Judah and Benjamin, unto every fenced
ave them victual in abundance. And he desired many
ss, when Rehoboam had established the kingdom,
sook the law of the LORD, and all
with him.
t in the fifth year of king Rehoboam
hak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, because they had
the LORD, 12:3 With twelve hundred chariots, and
the people were without number that
with him out of Egypt; the Lubims, the Sukkiims, and the
 took the fenced cities which pertained to Judah, and came
en came Shemaiah the prophet to Rehoboam, and to the princes of
thered together to Jerusalem because of Shishak,
 LORD, Ye have forsaken me, and
 have I also left you in the hand of Shishak.
l and the king humbled themselves;
ey said, The LORD is righteous.
d when the LORD saw that they humbled themselves, the word of
aiah, saying, They have humbled themselves;
I will grant them some
y wrath shall not be poured out upon Jerusalem by
rtheless they shall be his servants; that they may know my
 of the kingdoms of the countries.
 So Shishak king of Egypt came up against Jerusalem, and took away
 the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the
ied away also the shields of gold
olomon had made.
 king Rehoboam made shields of brass, and
of the guard, that kept the
he king's house.
g entered into the house of the LORD, the guard
them again into the guard chamber.
2 And when he humbled himself, the wrath of the LORD turned from
 not destroy him altogether: and also in Judah
ehoboam strengthened himself in Jerusalem, and reigned:
rty years old when he began to reign, and
the city which the LORD had
 all the tribes of Israel, to put his name there. And his
an Ammonitess.
ecause he prepared not his heart to seek the
m, first and last, are they not written
n the book of Shemaiah the prophet, and of Iddo the seer concerning
d there were wars between Rehoboam and Jeroboam
slept with his fathers, and was buried in the city
gned in his stead.
teenth year of king Jeroboam began Abijah to reign
hree years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was
of Gibeah. And there was war between
ah and Jeroboam.
e battle in array with an army of valiant men of
osen men: Jeroboam also set the
 array against him with eight hundred thousand chosen men,
ur.
 Zemaraim, which is in mount
 said, Hear me, thou Jeroboam, and all Israel; 13:5 Ought
ORD God of Israel gave the kingdom over
srael to David for ever, even to him and to his sons by a covenant of
et Jeroboam the son of Nebat, the servant of Solomon the
 and hath rebelled against his lord.
:7 And there are gathered unto him vain men, the children of Belial,
gthened themselves against Rehoboam the son of Solomon,
 tenderhearted, and could not withstand
hem.
 the kingdom of the LORD in the hand
he sons of David; and ye be a great multitude, and there are with
s, which Jeroboam made you for gods.
:9 Have ye not cast out the priests of the LORD, the sons of Aaron,
, and have made you priests after the manner of the
 whosoever cometh to consecrate himself
ith a young bullock and seven rams, the same may be a priest of them
ds.
r God, and we have not forsaken
the priests, which minister unto the LORD, are the sons of
ait upon their business: 13:11 And they burn
evening burnt sacrifices and
e: the shewbread also set they in order upon the pure
 gold with the lamps thereof, to burn
ry evening: for we keep the charge of the LORD our God; but ye have

s for our captain, and his
ounding trumpets to cry alarm against you. O children of
st the LORD God of your fathers; for ye
hall not prosper.
used an ambushment to come about behind them: so
bushment was behind them.
n Judah looked back, behold, the battle was before and
the LORD, and the priests sounded with the
 gave a shout: and as the men of Judah
outed, it came to pass, that God smote Jeroboam and all Israel
dah.
led before Judah: and God delivered
into their hand.
is people slew them with a great slaughter: so
 hundred thousand chosen men.
s the children of Israel were brought under at that time, and
 prevailed, because they relied upon the LORD God
ijah pursued after Jeroboam, and took cities from him,
f, and Jeshanah with the towns thereof,
nd Ephraim with the towns thereof.
0 Neither did Jeroboam recover strength again in the days of
truck him, and he died.
h waxed mighty, and married fourteen wives, and begat
een daughters.
e acts of Abijah, and his ways, and his
ayings, are written in the story of the prophet Iddo.
is fathers, and they buried him in the city
s stead. In his days the land
en years.
as good and right in the eyes of the LORD
 of the strange gods, and the
, and brake down the images, and cut down the groves: 14:4
eek the LORD God of their fathers, and to do
lso he took away out of all the cities of Judah the high places
 the kingdom was quiet before him.
 And he built fenced cities in Judah: for the land had rest, and
hose years; because the LORD had given him rest.
h, Let us build these cities, and make
out them walls, and towers, gates, and bars, while the land is yet
se we have sought the LORD our God, we have sought
n every side. So they built and
.
bare targets and spears, out of
ee hundred thousand; and out of Benjamin, that bare shields
red and fourscore thousand: all these were
came out against them Zerah the Ethiopian with an host
three hundred chariots; and came unto
eshah.
him, and they set the battle in array
the valley of Zephathah at Mareshah.
:11 And Asa cried unto the LORD his God, and said, LORD, it is
 help, whether with many, or with them that have
 for we rest on thee, and in thy
go against this multitude. O LORD, thou art our God; let no
e.
ns before Asa, and before Judah;
Ethiopians fled.
people that were with him pursued them unto
wn, that they could not recover
s; for they were destroyed before the LORD, and before his
way very much spoil.
te all the cities round about Gerar; for the fear of
hey spoiled all the cities; for there
 exceeding much spoil in them.
ey smote also the tents of cattle, and carried away sheep and
and returned to Jerusalem.
 Spirit of God came upon Azariah the son of Oded: 15:2 And
 and said unto him, Hear ye me, Asa, and all
ou, while ye be with him; and if
him, he will be found of you; but if ye forsake him, he will
ow for a long season Israel hath been without the true God, and
priest, and without law.
they in their trouble did turn unto the LORD God of
found of them.
there was no peace to him that went out, nor
ns were upon all the inhabitants
ountries.
 of nation, and city of city: for God did
e strong therefore, and let not your hands be weak: for your
.
and the prophecy of Oded the
took courage, and put away the abominable idols out of all
njamin, and out of the cities which he had
e altar of the LORD, that was
porch of the LORD.
 all Judah and Benjamin, and the strangers with
nd out of Simeon: for they fell to
t of Israel in abundance, when they saw that the LORD his God
0 So they gathered themselves together at Jerusalem in the third
eenth year of the reign of Asa.
nd they offered unto the LORD the same time, of the spoil which
even hundred oxen and seven thousand sheep.
t to seek the LORD God of their
ith all their heart and with all their soul; 15:13 That
e LORD God of Israel should be put to
th, whether small or great, whether man or woman.
ORD with a loud voice, and with
 and with trumpets, and with cornets.
5:15 And all Judah rejoiced at the oath: for they had sworn with all
nd sought him with their whole desire; and he was found
them rest round about.
oncerning Maachah the mother of Asa the king, he
use she had made an idol in a grove:
Asa cut down her idol, and stamped it, and burnt it at the brook
ut the high places were not taken away out of Israel:
 was perfect all his days.
 brought into the house of God the things that his father
e himself had dedicated, silver, and gold,
ore war unto the five and thirtieth year of
d thirtieth year of the reign of Asa Baasha king of
nd built Ramah, to the intent that he
ht let none go out or come in to Asa king of Judah.
ver and gold out of the treasures of the
house of the LORD and of the king's house, and sent to Benhadad king
 dwelt at Damascus, saying, 16:3 There is a league
s between my father and thy father:
d, I have sent thee silver and gold; go, break thy league with
l, that he may depart from me.
 Benhadad hearkened unto king Asa, and sent the captains of
cities of Israel; and they smote Ijon, and Dan,
ies of Naphtali.
ss, when Baasha heard it, that he left off
e.
h; and they carried away the
mah, and the timber thereof, wherewith Baasha was
Geba and Mizpah.
Hanani the seer came to Asa king of Judah, and
ied on the king of Syria, and not
on the LORD thy God, therefore is the host of the king of Syria
e hand.
d the Lubims a huge host, with very
chariots and horsemen? yet, because thou didst rely on the LORD,
into thine hand.
he LORD run to and fro throughout the whole
half of them whose heart is
d him. Herein thou hast done foolishly: therefore from
ars.
seer, and put him in a prison house;
he was in a rage with him because of this thing. And Asa oppressed
le the same time.
e acts of Asa, first and last, lo, they are
ah and Israel.
rty and ninth year of his reign was diseased
eeding great: yet in his disease
t not to the LORD, but to the physicians.
nd died in the one and fortieth
is reign.
his own sepulchres, which he had made for
m in the bed which was filled
odours and divers kinds of spices prepared by the
a very great burning for him.
Jehoshaphat his son reigned in his stead, and strengthened

nced cities of Judah, and set
n the land of Judah, and in the cities of Ephraim, which

 because he walked in the first
is father David, and sought not unto Baalim; 17:4 But sought
 father, and walked in his commandments, and not
5 Therefore the LORD stablished the kingdom in his hand; and all
ehoshaphat presents; and he had riches and honour in
rt was lifted up in the ways of the LORD: moreover he
 groves out of Judah.
third year of his reign he sent to his princes, even
d to Zechariah, and to Nethaneel, and to
Michaiah, to teach in the cities of Judah.
en Shemaiah, and Nethaniah, and
 and Asahel, and Shemiramoth, and Jehonathan, and Adonijah,
nijah, Levites; and with them Elishama and
t in Judah, and had the book of the law of the LORD
ghout all the cities of Judah, and
 the people.
LORD fell upon all the kingdoms of the lands
hey made no war against
7:11 Also some of the Philistines brought Jehoshaphat presents, and
 and the Arabians brought him flocks, seven thousand
ven thousand and seven hundred he goats.

ingly; and he built in Judah
 cities of store.
 business in the cities of Judah: and the men of
 Jerusalem.
bers of them according to the house of
eir fathers: Of Judah, the captains of thousands; Adnah the chief,
hty men of valour three hundred thousand.
 captain, and with him two
urscore thousand.
s Amasiah the son of Zichri, who willingly
him two hundred thousand
lour.
ighty man of valour, and with him
en with bow and shield two hundred thousand.
d with him an hundred and
and ready prepared for the war.
hese waited on the king, beside those whom the king put in the
hout all Judah.
d riches and honour in abundance, and joined
certain years he went down to Ahab to Samaria. And Ahab
im in abundance, and for the people that he
p with him to Ramothgilead.
ab king of Israel said unto Jehoshaphat king of Judah, Wilt
thgilead? And he answered him, I am as thou
e will be with thee in the war.
d Jehoshaphat said unto the king of Israel, Enquire, I pray
e LORD to day.
of Israel gathered together of prophets four
 we go to Ramothgilead to
l I forbear? And they said, Go up; for God will deliver

ere a prophet of the LORD
e might enquire of him?  18:7 And the king of Israel
s yet one man, by whom we may enquire of
the LORD: but I hate him; for he never prophesied good unto me, but
e same is Micaiah the son of Imla. And Jehoshaphat

ne of his officers, and said,
ly Micaiah the son of Imla.
e king of Israel and Jehoshaphat king of Judah sat either
othed in their robes, and they sat in a void
f Samaria; and all the prophets
d before them.
on of Chenaanah had made him horns of iron,
se thou shalt push Syria until
nsumed.
hesied so, saying, Go up to
 and prosper: for the LORD shall deliver it into the hand
 the messenger that went to call Micaiah spake to him,
 the prophets declare good to the king
th one assent; let thy word therefore, I pray thee, be like one of
ak thou good.
s the LORD liveth, even what my God saith,
was come to the king, the king said unto him,
to battle, or shall I forbear?
d, Go ye up, and prosper, and they shall be delivered into
the king said to him, How many times shall I adjure thee
the truth to me in the name of the LORD?
18:16 Then he said, I did see all Israel scattered upon the mountains,
t have no shepherd: and the LORD said, These have no
ore every man to his house in peace.
:17 And the king of Israel said to Jehoshaphat, Did I not tell thee
ot prophesy good unto me, but evil?  18:18 Again he
f the LORD; I saw the LORD sitting upon
is throne, and all the host of heaven standing on his right hand and

e Ahab king of Israel, that he
and fall at Ramothgilead? And one spake saying after this
g after that manner.
ame out a spirit, and stood before the LORD, and
ORD said unto him, Wherewith?  18:21
he said, I will go out, and be a lying spirit in the mouth of all
 the Lord said, Thou shalt entice him, and thou shalt
even so.
he LORD hath put a lying spirit in the
uth of these thy prophets, and the LORD hath spoken evil against
n Zedekiah the son of Chenaanah came near, and smote Micaiah
id, Which way went the Spirit of the LORD from
caiah said, Behold, thou shalt see
t day when thou shalt go into an inner chamber to hide thyself.
ng of Israel said, Take ye Micaiah, and carry him
city, and to Joash the king's son;
And say, Thus saith the king, Put this fellow in the prison, and
d of affliction and with water of affliction, until
 Micaiah said, If thou certainly return in peace, then hath
me. And he said, Hearken, all ye people.

hat the king of Judah went up
lead.
 unto Jehoshaphat, I will disguise
, and I will go to the battle; but put thou on thy robes. So the
guised himself; and they went to the battle.
anded the captains of the chariots
ere with him, saying, Fight ye not with small or great, save
Israel.
 the captains of the chariots saw
phat, that they said, It is the king of Israel. Therefore they
to fight: but Jehoshaphat cried out, and the LORD
 depart from him.
pass, that, when the captains of the chariots
 Israel, they turned back again
uing him.
a bow at a venture, and smote the king of
 therefore he said to his
rn thine hand, that thou mayest carry me out of the
4 And the battle increased that day: howbeit the king of Israel
n his chariot against the Syrians until the even:
ng down he died.
he king of Judah returned to his house in peace
son of Hanani the seer went out to meet him, and
t thou help the ungodly, and love
at hate the LORD? therefore is wrath upon thee from before the
heless there are good things found in thee, in that thou
 out of the land, and hast prepared thine
t dwelt at Jerusalem: and he went out again through
unt Ephraim, and brought them back unto
he LORD God of their fathers.
he set judges in the land throughout all the fenced cities of
19:6 And said to the judges, Take heed what ye
r the LORD, who is with you in the
nt.
the LORD be upon you; take heed and
: for there is no iniquity with the LORD our God, nor respect of
g of gifts.
did Jehoshaphat set of the Levites, and of
hers of Israel, for the
ORD, and for controversies, when they returned to
 them, saying, Thus shall ye do in the fear of the
fect heart.
 shall come to you of your brethren that
dwell in your cities, between blood and blood, between law and
s and judgments, ye shall even warn them that they
nd so wrath come upon you, and upon
brethren: this do, and ye shall not trespass.
f priest is over you in all matters
e LORD; and Zebadiah the son of Ishmael, the ruler of the house
he king's matters: also the Levites shall be
, and the LORD shall be with the

t the children of Moab, and
of Ammon, and with them other beside the Ammonites, came
tle.
d Jehoshaphat, saying, There cometh
at multitude against thee from beyond the sea on this side Syria;
 be in Hazazontamar, which is Engedi.
0:3 And Jehoshaphat feared, and set himself to seek the LORD, and
 throughout all Judah.
athered themselves together, to ask help of the LORD:
 Judah they came to seek the LORD.
 And Jehoshaphat stood in the congregation of Judah and Jerusalem,
the LORD, before the new court, 20:6 And said, O LORD
hou God in heaven? and rulest not thou
er all the kingdoms of the heathen? and in thine hand is there not
 so that none is able to withstand thee?  20:7 Art not
e out the inhabitants of this land before
eed of Abraham thy friend for
 And they dwelt therein, and have built thee a sanctuary
ng, 20:9 If, when evil cometh upon us, as
mine, we stand before this
thy presence, (for thy name is in this house,) and cry
 then thou wilt hear and help.
d now, behold, the children of Ammon and Moab and mount Seir,
t let Israel invade, when they came out of the
them, and destroyed them not;
d, I say, how they reward us, to come to cast us out of thy
hast given us to inherit.
od, wilt thou not judge them? for we have no might
cometh against us; neither know we
o do: but our eyes are upon thee.
 And all Judah stood before the LORD, with their little ones,
r children.
e son of Zechariah, the son of Benaiah, the
evite of the sons of Asaph,
it of the LORD in the midst of the congregation; 20:15
 Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem,
and thou king Jehoshaphat, Thus saith the LORD unto you, Be not afraid
 by reason of this great multitude; for the battle is not
6 To morrow go ye down against them: behold, they come up by the
ye shall find them at the end of the brook, before
17 Ye shall not need to fight in this battle: set yourselves, stand
ee the salvation of the LORD with you, O Judah and
ayed; to morrow go out against them:
the LORD will be with you.
hoshaphat bowed his head with his face to the ground: and
ants of Jerusalem fell before the LORD,
orshipping the LORD.
tes, of the children of the Kohathites, and of the
up to praise the LORD God of Israel
a loud voice on high.
se early in the morning, and went forth into the
ent forth, Jehoshaphat stood and
ar me, O Judah, and ye inhabitants of Jerusalem; Believe in
hall ye be established; believe his prophets,
n he had consulted with the people, he appointed singers
ould praise the beauty of holiness, as they
raise the LORD; for his mercy
r ever.
ng and to praise, the LORD set
s against the children of Ammon, Moab, and mount Seir, which
h; and they were smitten.
 children of Ammon and Moab stood up against the
 to slay and destroy them: and when
had made an end of the inhabitants of Seir, every one helped to

h tower in the wilderness,
to the multitude, and, behold, they were dead bodies
escaped.
 his people came to take away the spoil
f them, they found among them in abundance both riches with the dead
ecious jewels, which they stripped off for themselves,
way: and they were three days in gathering
nd on the fourth day they assembled themselves in the valley of
 they blessed the LORD: therefore the name of the
 of Berachah, unto this day.
 they returned, every man of Judah and Jerusalem, and
of them, to go again to Jerusalem with
y; for the LORD had made them to rejoice over their enemies.
to Jerusalem with psalteries and harps and
20:29 And the fear of God was on all the kingdoms of those countries,
 heard that the LORD fought against the enemies of
 Jehoshaphat was quiet: for his God gave him rest
phat reigned over Judah: he was thirty and five years
nd he reigned twenty and five years in
rusalem.
ah the daughter of Shilhi.
 walked in the way of Asa his father, and departed not
s right in the sight of the LORD.
 Howbeit the high places were not taken away: for as yet the
d their hearts unto the God of their fathers.
ehoshaphat, first and last, behold,
are written in the book of Jehu the son of Hanani, who is
the kings of Israel.
is did Jehoshaphat king of Judah join himself with
very wickedly: 20:36 And he joined
f with him to make ships to go to Tarshish: and they made the

f Mareshah prophesied against
, saying, Because thou hast joined thyself with Ahaziah,
orks. And the ships were broken, that they
 Now Jehoshaphat slept with his fathers, and was buried with his
y of David. And Jehoram his son reigned in his
he sons of Jehoshaphat, Azariah, and Jehiel,
l, and Shephatiah: all these
s of Jehoshaphat king of Israel.
nd their father gave them great gifts of silver, and of gold,
s, with fenced cities in Judah: but the kingdom
the firstborn.
s risen up to the kingdom of his father, he
brethren with the sword, and
of the princes of Israel.
was thirty and two years old when he began to reign, and
Jerusalem.
y of the kings of Israel, like as did the
 Ahab to wife: and he wrought
was evil in the eyes of the LORD.
Howbeit the LORD would not destroy the house of David, because of
 he had made with David, and as he promised to give a
for ever.
 revolted from under the dominion of
h, and made themselves a king.
n Jehoram went forth with his princes, and all his chariots
p by night, and smote the Edomites which
compassed him in, and the captains of the chariots.
d from under the hand of Judah unto this
day.
lt from under his hand; because he
rsaken the LORD God of his fathers.
11 Moreover he made high places in the mountains of Judah and
s of Jerusalem to commit fornication, and
re came a writing to him from Elijah the prophet, saying,
f David thy father, Because thou hast not
her, nor in the ways of Asa
, 21:13 But hast walked in the way of the kings of
the inhabitants of Jerusalem to go a
ing, like to the whoredoms of the house of Ahab, and also hast
f thy father's house, which were better than
ague will the LORD smite thy
thy children, and thy wives, and all thy goods: 21:15 And
kness by disease of thy bowels, until thy
 day by day.
irred up against Jehoram the spirit of the
ere near the Ethiopians: 21:17
ame up into Judah, and brake into it, and carried away all
ound in the king's house, and his sons also,
 a son left him, save Jehoahaz,
est of his sons.
is the LORD smote him in his bowels with an
 to pass, that in process of time, after the end of
by reason of his sickness: so he died
sore diseases. And his people made no burning for him, like the
ers.
 he when he began to reign, and he
d in Jerusalem eight years, and departed without being desired.
 him in the city of David, but not in the
inhabitants of Jerusalem made Ahaziah his youngest son
and of men that came with the Arabians to
ziah the son of Jehoram king
gned.
Ahaziah when he began to reign, and
igned one year in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was Athaliah
ri.
the house of Ahab: for his mother
 counsellor to do wickedly.
ore he did evil in the sight of the LORD like the house of
counsellors after the death of his father to
o after their counsel, and went with Jehoram the son
against Hazael king of Syria at
ead: and the Syrians smote Joram.
And he returned to be healed in Jezreel because of the wounds
at Ramah, when he fought with Hazael king of
king of Judah went down to see
e son of Ahab at Jezreel, because he was sick.
h was of God by coming to Joram: for
 he was come, he went out with Jehoram against Jehu the son of
D had anointed to cut off the house of Ahab.
 Jehu was executing judgment upon
se of Ahab, and found the princes of Judah, and the sons of the
, that ministered to Ahaziah, he slew them.
caught him, (for he was hid in
and brought him to Jehu: and when they had slain him, they
d they, he is the son of Jehoshaphat, who
e house of Ahaziah had no
till the kingdom.
ah the mother of Ahaziah saw that her son was
 seed royal of the house of
11 But Jehoshabeath, the daughter of the king, took Joash the son
tole him from among the king's sons that were slain,
 bedchamber. So Jehoshabeath, the
r of king Jehoram, the wife of Jehoiada the priest, (for she
iah,) hid him from Athaliah, so that she slew
m hid in the house of God six years: and
Athaliah reigned over the land.
d in the seventh year Jehoiada strengthened himself, and took
eds, Azariah the son of Jeroham, and Ishmael the
son of Obed, and Maaseiah the son of
ah, and Elishaphat the son of Zichri, into covenant with him.
about in Judah, and gathered the Levites out of all
ief of the fathers of Israel, and they
me to Jerusalem.
egation made a covenant with the king in the
ehold, the king's son shall
 LORD hath said of the sons of David.
3:4 This is the thing that ye shall do; A third part of you entering
, of the priests and of the Levites, shall be porters of
d part shall be at the king's house; and a
: and all the people shall be
ts of the house of the LORD.
et none come into the house of the LORD, save the priests,
f the Levites; they shall go in, for they are
he watch of the LORD.
tes shall compass the king round about, every man
 whosoever else cometh into the
 shall be put to death: but be ye with the king when he
h out.
h did according to all things that
da the priest had commanded, and took every man his men that
 sabbath, with them that were to go out on the
missed not the courses.
ehoiada the priest delivered to the captains of
shields, that had been king
h were in the house of God.
e set all the people, every man having his weapon in his
of the temple to the left side of the
ple, along by the altar and the temple, by the king round about.
brought out the king's son, and put upon him the
 and made him king. And Jehoiada and
sons anointed him, and said, God save the king.
 noise of the people running and
 the king, she came to the people into the house of the LORD:
 and, behold, the king stood at his pillar at the
the trumpets by the king: and all the
ple of the land rejoiced, and sounded with trumpets, also the
nts of musick, and such as taught to sing praise.
nd said, Treason, Treason.
ehoiada the priest brought out the captains of hundreds
, and said unto them, Have her forth of the
m be slain with the sword. For
 said, Slay her not in the house of the LORD.
d when she was come to the entering
e horse gate by the king's house, they slew her there.
covenant between him, and between all the
hould be the LORD's people.
all the people went to the house of Baal, and brake it
nd his images in pieces, and slew Mattan
the priest of Baal before the altars.
3:18 Also Jehoiada appointed the offices of the house of the LORD by
e priests the Levites, whom David had distributed in the
r the burnt offerings of the LORD, as it is
cing and with singing, as it
 by David.
 at the gates of the house of the LORD,
hat none which was unclean in any thing should enter in.
ptains of hundreds, and the nobles, and the
ople of the land, and brought
ng from the house of the LORD: and they came through the
house, and set the king upon the throne of
 of the land rejoiced: and the city was quiet,
ith the sword.
rs old when he began to reign, and he reigned
s name also was Zibiah of
4:2 And Joash did that which was right in the sight of the LORD all
oiada the priest.
k for him two wives; and he begat sons and
fter this, that Joash was minded to repair
thered together the priests and the Levites, and said to
es of Judah, and gather of all Israel money
ar to year, and see that ye
tter. Howbeit the Levites hastened it not.
the chief, and said unto him,
ou not required of the Levites to bring in out of Judah and
llection, according to the commandment of Moses
 congregation of Israel, for the
le of witness?  24:7 For the sons of Athaliah, that wicked
 house of God; and also all the dedicated
bestow upon Baalim.
g's commandment they made a chest, and set it
he LORD.
ion through Judah and Jerusalem, to
 in to the LORD the collection that Moses the servant of God laid
e wilderness.
 and all the people rejoiced, and brought in,
ad made an end.
ss, that at what time the chest was brought
he Levites, and when they saw
was much money, the king's scribe and the high priest's
e chest, and took it, and carried it to his
and gathered money in
 And the king and Jehoiada gave it to such as did the work of the
use of the LORD, and hired masons and carpenters to
nd also such as wrought iron and brass
 mend the house of the LORD.
he workmen wrought, and the work was perfected by them, and
od in his state, and strengthened it.
4:14 And when they had finished it, they brought the rest of the
ing and Jehoiada, whereof were made vessels for the
 to minister, and to offer withal, and
oons, and vessels of gold and silver. And they offered burnt
 of the LORD continually all the days of
Jehoiada.
 and was full of days when he died; an
ndred and thirty years old was he when he died.
city of David among the kings,
 had done good in Israel, both toward God, and toward his
 the death of Jehoiada came the princes of Judah, and
hen the king hearkened unto them.
 And they left the house of the LORD God of their fathers, and
ols: and wrath came upon Judah and Jerusalem for
he sent prophets to them, to bring them again unto the LORD;
inst them: but they would not give ear.

hariah the son of Jehoiada
ich stood above the people, and said unto them, Thus
he commandments of the LORD, that ye
ot prosper? because ye have forsaken the LORD, he hath also
And they conspired against him, and stoned him with stones at
e king in the court of the house of the LORD.
d not the kindness which Jehoiada
her had done to him, but slew his son. And when he died, he
n it, and require it.
 to pass at the end of the year, that the host of
ey came to Judah and Jerusalem, and
oyed all the princes of the people from among the people, and
 them unto the king of Damascus.
For the army of the Syrians came with a small company of men,
d a very great host into their hand, because they
r fathers. So they executed judgment
nst Joash.
arted from him, (for they left him in
at diseases,) his own servants conspired against him for the blood
ehoiada the priest, and slew him on his bed, and he
e city of David, but they buried him
in the sepulchres of the kings.
nd these are they that conspired against him; Zabad the son of
ss, and Jehozabad the son of Shimrith a Moabitess.
 and the greatness of the burdens laid
on him, and the repairing of the house of God, behold, they are
y of the book of the kings. And Amaziah his son
ah was twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and
nine years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, but not
art.
 kingdom was established to him,
slew his servants that had killed the king his father.
 children, but did as it is written in the
 commanded, saying, The
 die for the children, neither shall the children die
n shall die for his own sin.
ver Amaziah gathered Judah together, and made them captains
tains over hundreds, according to the houses of
 and Benjamin: and he numbered them
twenty years old and above, and found them three hundred thousand
to go forth to war, that could handle spear and
ndred thousand mighty men of valour out of

m, saying, O king, let not the
rael go with thee; for the LORD is not with Israel, to wit,
f Ephraim.
 it; be strong for the battle: God shall
make thee fall before the enemy: for God hath power to help, and to
5:9 And Amaziah said to the man of God, But what shall we do for the
s which I have given to the army of Israel? And the man
s able to give thee much more than this.

t, the army that was come to
phraim, to go home again: wherefore their anger was
and they returned home in great anger.
25:11 And Amaziah strengthened himself, and led forth his people, and
alley of salt, and smote of the children of Seir ten
en thousand left alive did the children of Judah
em unto the top of the rock, and
m down from the top of the rock, that they all were broken in
the soldiers of the army which Amaziah sent back, that they
to battle, fell upon the cities of Judah, from
te three thousand of them, and
spoil.
 that Amaziah was come from the
 of the Edomites, that he brought the gods of the children of
 to be his gods, and bowed down himself before

as kindled against Amaziah, and
nto him a prophet, which said unto him, Why hast thou sought
people, which could not deliver their own people
ame to pass, as he talked with him,
the king said unto him, Art thou made of the king's counsel?
 thou be smitten? Then the prophet forbare, and
ed to destroy thee, because thou
e this, and hast not hearkened unto my counsel.
took advice, and sent to Joash, the
f Jehoahaz, the son of Jehu, king of Israel, saying, Come, let us
n the face.
ael sent to Amaziah king of Judah, saying,
the cedar that was in Lebanon,
ve thy daughter to my son to wife: and there passed by a
anon, and trode down the thistle.
 Thou sayest, Lo, thou hast smitten the Edomites; and thine heart
o boast: abide now at home; why shouldest thou meddle
ldest fall, even thou, and Judah with
e?  25:20 But Amaziah would not hear; for it came of God, that he
m into the hand of their enemies, because they sought
:21 So Joash the king of Israel went up; and they saw one another in
 he and Amaziah king of Judah, at Bethshemesh, which
nd Judah was put to the worse before Israel, and they fled

Amaziah king of Judah, the son
the son of Jehoahaz, at Bethshemesh, and brought him to
he wall of Jerusalem from the gate of
raim to the corner gate, four hundred cubits.
the silver, and all the vessels
 found in the house of God with Obededom, and the treasures
e hostages also, and returned to Samaria.
 of Judah lived after the death
son of Jehoahaz king of Israel fifteen years.
maziah, first and last, behold, are
not written in the book of the kings of Judah and Israel?  25:27
 that Amaziah did turn away from following the LORD
him in Jerusalem; and he fled to
 but they sent to Lachish after him, and slew him there.
im upon horses, and buried him with his
athers in the city of Judah.
all the people of Judah took Uzziah, who was sixteen years
n the room of his father Amaziah.
He built Eloth, and restored it to Judah, after that the king
s.
en he began to reign, and he
y and two years in Jerusalem. His mother's name also was
26:4 And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD,
t his father Amaziah did.
ought God in the days of Zechariah, who had understanding
d as long as he sought the LORD, God made him
 and warred against the Philistines, and brake
of Jabneh, and the wall of Ashdod,
ilt cities about Ashdod, and among the Philistines.
st the Philistines, and against the
ans that dwelt in Gurbaal, and the Mehunims.
 Uzziah: and his name spread
to the entering in of Egypt; for he strengthened himself
ver Uzziah built towers in Jerusalem at the corner gate, and
d at the turning of the wall, and fortified
the desert, and digged many wells: for
 had much cattle, both in the low country, and in the plains:
vine dressers in the mountains, and in Carmel:
eover Uzziah had an host of fighting men, that went out to
to the number of their account by the hand of
er, under the hand of Hananiah,
e king's captains.
er of the chief of the fathers of the mighty men
x hundred.
as an army, three hundred thousand and
ven thousand and five hundred, that made war with mighty power, to
ainst the enemy.
red for them throughout all the host shields,
ns, and bows, and slings to cast

 invented by cunning men, to be
wers and upon the bulwarks, to shoot arrows and great stones
e spread far abroad; for he was marvellously helped, till
ut when he was strong, his heart was lifted up to his
sed against the LORD his God, and went
to the temple of the LORD to burn incense upon the altar of incense.
ariah the priest went in after him, and with him fourscore
t were valiant men: 26:18 And they withstood
 appertaineth not unto thee,
urn incense unto the LORD, but to the priests the sons of
ed to burn incense: go out of the sanctuary;
l it be for thine honour from
d.
 a censer in his hand to burn
d while he was wroth with the priests, the leprosy even
ore the priests in the house of the LORD,
nd Azariah the chief priest, and all the priests, looked upon
was leprous in his forehead, and they thrust him
ed also to go out, because the LORD
mitten him.
as a leper unto the day of his death, and
for he was cut off from the
LORD: and Jotham his son was over the king's house,

ah, first and last, did Isaiah
t, the son of Amoz, write.
iah slept with his fathers, and they buried him with his
e burial which belonged to the kings; for
son reigned in his stead.
as twenty and five years old when he began to reign, and
n Jerusalem. His mother's name also was
erushah, the daughter of Zadok.
d he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD,
ather Uzziah did: howbeit he entered not
into the temple of the LORD. And the people did yet corruptly.
high gate of the house of the LORD, and on the wall
 Moreover he built cities in the mountains of Judah, and in the
stles and towers.
ith the king of the Ammonites, and prevailed
n gave him the same year an
ts of silver, and ten thousand measures of wheat, and ten
ch did the children of Ammon pay unto him,
27:6 So Jotham became mighty, because he prepared his ways before the

m, and all his wars, and his
ey are written in the book of the kings of Israel and
d twenty years old when he began to reign, and

 and they buried him in the
: and Ahaz his son reigned in his stead.

egan to reign, and he reigned
rs in Jerusalem: but he did not that which was right in the
 David his father: 28:2 For he walked in the
also molten images for Baalim.
eover he burnt incense in the valley of the son of Hinnom, and
n the fire, after the abominations of the heathen
 the children of Israel.
iced also and burnt incense in the high places, and on
reen tree.
God delivered him into the hand of the
ng of Syria; and they smote him, and carried away a great multitude
s, and brought them to Damascus. And he was also
g of Israel, who smote him with a
laughter.
aliah slew in Judah an hundred and twenty
nt men; because they had
D God of their fathers.
, a mighty man of Ephraim, slew Maaseiah the king's
f the house, and Elkanah that was next
 the king.
ael carried away captive of their brethren
aughters, and took also away
rom them, and brought the spoil to Samaria.
ere, whose name was Oded: and he
 before the host that came to Samaria, and said unto them,
 God of your fathers was wroth with Judah, he
nd ye have slain them in a rage
heth up unto heaven.
urpose to keep under the children of Judah and
unto you: but are there not with
n with you, sins against the LORD your God?  28:11 Now hear me
er the captives again, which ye have taken captive
 wrath of the LORD is upon you.
hen certain of the heads of the children of Ephraim, Azariah
rechiah the son of Meshillemoth, and Jehizkiah
n of Hadlai, stood up against them
ame from the war, 28:13 And said unto them, Ye shall not bring
er: for whereas we have offended against the LORD
 our sins and to our trespass: for
espass is great, and there is fierce wrath against Israel.
 left the captives and the spoil before the
:15 And the men which were expressed by name rose up, and took the
th the spoil clothed all that were naked among them,
m, and gave them to eat and to drink,
 anointed them, and carried all the feeble of them upon asses, and
Jericho, the city of palm trees, to their brethren:

nto the kings of Assyria to
28:17 For again the Edomites had come and smitten Judah, and carried

 the cities of the low country,
e south of Judah, and had taken Bethshemesh, and Ajalon, and
ith the villages thereof, and Timnah with the
villages thereof: and they dwelt

ause of Ahaz king of Israel;
Judah naked, and transgressed sore against the LORD.
ng of Assyria came unto him, and
ed him, but strengthened him not.
 For Ahaz took away a portion out of the house of the LORD, and
 the king, and of the princes, and gave it unto the
him not.
istress did he trespass yet more against
the LORD: this is that king Ahaz.
 For he sacrificed unto the gods of Damascus, which smote him:
 the gods of the kings of Syria help them,
 they may help me. But they
 of him, and of all Israel.
haz gathered together the vessels of the house of God, and
s of the house of God, and shut up the doors
him altars in every corner of

h he made high places to burn
o other gods, and provoked to anger the LORD God of his
est of his acts and of all his ways, first and last,
e book of the kings of Judah and Israel.

nd they buried him in the
erusalem: but they brought him not into the sepulchres
Hezekiah his son reigned in his stead.
29:1 Hezekiah began to reign when he was five and twenty years old,
nine and twenty years in Jerusalem. And his mother's
of Zechariah.
h was right in the sight of the LORD,
ording to all that David his father had done.
ign, in the first month, opened the
 of the house of the LORD, and repaired them.
and the Levites, and gathered them
er into the east street, 29:5 And said unto them, Hear me, ye
 yourselves, and sanctify the house of the LORD
h the filthiness out of the holy

d done that which was evil in
 the LORD our God, and have forsaken him, and have turned
 habitation of the LORD, and turned their
 doors of the porch, and put out the
s, and have not burned incense nor offered burnt offerings in the
he God of Israel.
ath of the LORD was upon Judah and Jerusalem, and
, to astonishment, and to hissing, as
see with your eyes.
athers have fallen by the sword, and our sons and
n captivity for this.
n mine heart to make a covenant with the LORD God of
may turn away from us.
e not now negligent: for the LORD hath chosen you to
, and that ye should minister unto him,
nd burn incense.
 arose, Mahath the son of Amasai, and Joel the
ohathites: and of the sons of
h the son of Abdi, and Azariah the son of Jehalelel: and of
he son of Zimmah, and Eden the son of Joah:
mri, and Jeiel: and of the sons
 Zechariah, and Mattaniah: 29:14 And of the sons of Heman;
of the sons of Jeduthun; Shemaiah, and Uzziel.
hren, and sanctified themselves, and
, according to the commandment of the king, by the words of the
e house of the LORD.
sts went into the inner part of the house of the
ut all the uncleanness that they
 the temple of the LORD into the court of the house of the
ok it, to carry it out abroad into the brook
 first day of the first month to sanctify,
they to the porch of the LORD:
nctified the house of the LORD in eight days; and in the
 month they made an end.
y went in to Hezekiah the king, and said, We have
D, and the altar of burnt offering,
all the vessels thereof, and the shewbread table, with all the
29:19 Moreover all the vessels, which king Ahaz in his reign did cast
ransgression, have we prepared and sanctified, and,
ar of the LORD.
 king rose early, and gathered the rulers of
the LORD.
bullocks, and seven rams, and seven
, and seven he goats, for a sin offering for the kingdom, and for
d for Judah. And he commanded the priests the sons of
tar of the LORD.
he bullocks, and the priests received the blood,
ewise, when they had killed the
y sprinkled the blood upon the altar: they killed also the
d the blood upon the altar.
hey brought forth the he goats for the sin offering before
ation; and they laid their hands upon them:
they made reconciliation with
 upon the altar, to make an atonement for all Israel: for
he burnt offering and the sin offering should
he set the Levites in the house of the LORD with cymbals,
 harps, according to the commandment of
avid, and of Gad the king's seer, and Nathan the prophet: for so was
t of the LORD by his prophets.
d the Levites stood with the instruments of David, and the
s.
r the burnt offering upon the
nd when the burnt offering began, the song of the LORD began also
, and with the instruments ordained by David king of
ongregation worshipped, and the singers sang, and
his continued until the burnt
s finished.
e an end of offering, the king and all that
 and worshipped.
h the king and the princes commanded the Levites
the words of David, and of Asaph the
. And they sang praises with gladness, and they bowed their heads

ow ye have consecrated
e LORD, come near and bring sacrifices and thank
RD. And the congregation brought in
fices and thank offerings; and as many as were of a free heart
29:32 And the number of the burnt offerings, which the congregation
reescore and ten bullocks, an hundred rams, and two
or a burnt offering to the LORD.
And the consecrated things were six hundred oxen and three
 But the priests were too few, so that they could not flay all
 wherefore their brethren the Levites did help
ntil the other priests had
mselves: for the Levites were more upright in heart to
 priests.
rings were in abundance, with the fat of
the peace offerings, and the drink offerings for every burnt offering.
ce of the house of the LORD was set in order.
l the people, that God had prepared
eople: for the thing was done suddenly.

Judah, and wrote letters also
and Manasseh, that they should come to the house of the
the passover unto the LORD God of Israel.
d his princes, and all the
n Jerusalem, to keep the passover in the second month.
ep it at that time, because the priests had
 neither had the people
es together to Jerusalem.
thing pleased the king and all the congregation.
e to make proclamation throughout all
ael, from Beersheba even to Dan, that they should come to keep the
e LORD God of Israel at Jerusalem: for they had not
sort as it was written.
ts went with the letters from the king and his princes
dah, and according to the commandment of
the king, saying, Ye children of Israel, turn again unto the LORD God
saac, and Israel, and he will return to the remnant of
 the hand of the kings of Assyria.
 And be not ye like your fathers, and like your brethren, which
the LORD God of their fathers, who therefore gave

r fathers were, but yield
 the LORD, and enter into his sanctuary, which he hath
ve the LORD your God, that the fierceness
0:9 For if ye turn again unto the LORD, your brethren and your
compassion before them that lead them captive, so
his land: for the LORD your God is
us and merciful, and will not turn away his face from you, if ye

ity through the country of
nasseh even unto Zebulun: but they laughed them to
 Nevertheless divers of Asher and Manasseh and of Zebulun humbled
ame to Jerusalem.
he hand of God was to give them one heart to do
the princes, by the word of the
30:13 And there assembled at Jerusalem much people to keep the feast
bread in the second month, a very great congregation.
ok away the altars that were in Jerusalem,
 away, and cast them into the
n.
on the fourteenth day of the
: and the priests and the Levites were ashamed, and
ght in the burnt offerings into the
 of the LORD.
heir place after their manner, according to
iests sprinkled the blood,
eived of the hand of the Levites.
 For there were many in the congregation that were not
vites had the charge of the killing of the
an, to sanctify them unto the
:18 For a multitude of the people, even many of Ephraim, and
d Zebulun, had not cleansed themselves, yet did
n it was written. But Hezekiah
 them, saying, The good LORD pardon every one 30:19 That
k God, the LORD God of his fathers, though
fication of the sanctuary.
e LORD hearkened to Hezekiah, and healed the people.
rael that were present at Jerusalem kept
the feast of unleavened bread seven days with great gladness: and the
he priests praised the LORD day by day, singing with loud
.
unto all the Levites that taught
 knowledge of the LORD: and they did eat throughout the feast
peace offerings, and making confession to the
nd the whole assembly took counsel to keep other seven days:
ven days with gladness.
iah king of Judah did give to the congregation a
nd sheep; and the princes gave to
gregation a thousand bullocks and ten thousand sheep: and a
 sanctified themselves.
he congregation of Judah, with the priests and the
n that came out of Israel, and the
ers that came out of the land of Israel, and that dwelt in
6 So there was great joy in Jerusalem: for since the time of
id king of Israel there was not the like in
e Levites arose and blessed the people: and
 came up to his holy dwelling
 unto heaven.
s finished, all Israel that were present went
 the images in pieces, and cut
roves, and threw down the high places and the altars out of
 in Ephraim also and Manasseh, until they had
the children of Israel returned,
n to his possession, into their own cities.
es of the priests and the Levites
heir courses, every man according to his service, the priests
 offerings and for peace offerings, to minister,
in the gates of the tents of the

 of his substance for the
, to wit, for the morning and evening burnt offerings,
the sabbaths, and for the new moons, and
for the set feasts, as it is written in the law of the LORD.
manded the people that dwelt in Jerusalem to give
e Levites, that they might be
in the law of the LORD.
n as the commandment came abroad, the children of
irstfruits of corn, wine, and oil,
ney, and of all the increase of the field; and the tithe of all
 in abundantly.
 children of Israel and Judah, that dwelt in
 in the tithe of oxen and sheep,
tithe of holy things which were consecrated unto the LORD
by heaps.
began to lay the foundation of the heaps,

ame and saw the heaps, they
ORD, and his people Israel.
ezekiah questioned with the priests and the Levites
And Azariah the chief priest of the house of Zadok answered him,
e people began to bring the offerings into the house
h to eat, and have left plenty: for the
ORD hath blessed his people; and that which is left is this great
hen Hezekiah commanded to prepare chambers in the house of the
red them, 31:12 And brought in the offerings and
s faithfully: over which Cononiah
ite was ruler, and Shimei his brother was the next.
, and Nahath, and Asahel, and Jerimoth,
nd Jozabad, and Eliel, and Ismachiah, and Mahath, and Benaiah, were
 the hand of Cononiah and Shimei his brother, at the
ng, and Azariah the ruler of the house
 God.
he Levite, the porter toward the
s over the freewill offerings of God, to distribute the
the most holy things.
m were Eden, and Miniamin, and Jeshua, and Shemaiah,
 cities of the priests, in their set
ce, to give to their brethren by courses, as well to the great as
16 Beside their genealogy of males, from three years
y one that entereth into the house of
 LORD, his daily portion for their service in their charges
ses; 31:17 Both to the genealogy of the priests
the Levites from twenty years old
ard, in their charges by their courses; 31:18 And to the
tle ones, their wives, and their sons, and
ation: for in their set office
ified themselves in holiness: 31:19 Also of the sons of
re in the fields of the suburbs of their
cities, in every several city, the men that were expressed by name, to
s to all the males among the priests, and to all that were
among the Levites.
ezekiah throughout all Judah, and wrought that
efore the LORD his God.
ery work that he began in the service of the house of
he commandments, to seek his God, he did
it with all his heart, and prospered.
2:1 After these things, and the establishment thereof, Sennacherib
came, and entered into Judah, and encamped against the
o win them for himself.
ezekiah saw that Sennacherib was come, and that he was
rusalem, 32:3 He took counsel with his
inces and his mighty men to stop the waters of the fountains which
 city: and they did help him.
here was gathered much people together, who stopped all the
k that ran through the midst of the land,
ome, and find much water?
rengthened himself, and built up all the wall that was
the towers, and another wall without, and
made darts and shields in
2:6 And he set captains of war over the people, and gathered them
n the street of the gate of the city, and spake
e strong and courageous, be not
r dismayed for the king of Assyria, nor for all the multitude
 there be more with us than with him: 32:8 With
 is the LORD our God to help us,
ight our battles. And the people rested themselves upon the
of Judah.
ib king of Assyria send his servants to
erusalem, (but he himself laid siege against Lachish, and all his
unto Hezekiah king of Judah, and unto all Judah that
10 Thus saith Sennacherib king of
, Whereon do ye trust, that ye abide in the siege in Jerusalem?
kiah persuade you to give over yourselves to die by
he LORD our God shall deliver us out of
he hand of the king of Assyria?  32:12 Hath not the same Hezekiah
gh places and his altars, and commanded Judah and
ip before one altar, and burn incense
n it?  32:13 Know ye not what I and my fathers have done unto all
er lands? were the gods of the nations of those lands
r lands out of mine hand?  32:14 Who was
there among all the gods of those nations that my fathers utterly
ould deliver his people out of mine hand, that your
ou out of mine hand?  32:15 Now
 let not Hezekiah deceive you, nor persuade you on this
 him: for no god of any nation or kingdom
e hand, and out of the hand
: how much less shall your God deliver you out of mine
s spake yet more against the LORD God, and
e wrote also letters to rail on the LORD God of Israel, and to
aying, As the gods of the nations of other lands
t of mine hand, so shall not the God
ezekiah deliver his people out of mine hand.
ice in the Jews' speech unto the
f Jerusalem that were on the wall, to affright them, and to
 might take the city.
ake against the God of Jerusalem, as against the gods
hich were the work of the hands of man.

g, and the prophet Isaiah the
, prayed and cried to heaven.
 the LORD sent an angel, which cut off all the mighty men of
s and captains in the camp of the king of
e to his own land. And when
nto the house of his god, they that came forth of his own
h the sword.
Hezekiah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem
Assyria, and from the hand of
and guided them on every side.
d many brought gifts unto the LORD to Jerusalem, and presents
udah: so that he was magnified in the sight of
24 In those days Hezekiah was sick to the death, and prayed unto
pake unto him, and he gave him a sign.
32:25 But Hezekiah rendered not again according to the benefit done
is heart was lifted up: therefore there was wrath upon
salem.
umbled himself for the pride of his
, both he and the inhabitants of Jerusalem, so that the wrath of
upon them in the days of Hezekiah.
7 And Hezekiah had exceeding much riches and honour: and he made
 for silver, and for gold, and for precious stones,
, and for all manner of pleasant
32:28 Storehouses also for the increase of corn, and wine, and
all manner of beasts, and cotes for flocks.
, and possessions of flocks and
abundance: for God had given him substance very much.
so stopped the upper watercourse of Gihon,
 side of the city of David.
prospered in all his works.
it in the business of the ambassadors of the princes of
to enquire of the wonder that was done in
he might know all that was in

iah, and his goodness, behold,
ritten in the vision of Isaiah the prophet, the son of Amoz,
 kings of Judah and Israel.
ezekiah slept with his fathers, and they buried him in the
es of the sons of David: and all Judah and the
our at his death. And Manasseh his
igned in his stead.
welve years old when he began to reign, and he
salem: 33:2 But did that which was
n the sight of the LORD, like unto the abominations of the
ad cast out before the children of Israel.
s which Hezekiah his father had
wn, and he reared up altars for Baalim, and made groves, and
t of heaven, and served them.
 he built altars in the house of the LORD, whereof the LORD
shall my name be for ever.
built altars for all the host of heaven in the two courts

s through the fire in the valley
on of Hinnom: also he observed times, and used enchantments,
nd dealt with a familiar spirit, and with
t of the LORD, to provoke him

 which he had made, in the
of which God had said to David and to Solomon his son,
lem, which I have chosen before all the
ribes of Israel, will I put my name for ever: 33:8 Neither will I any
he foot of Israel from out of the land which I have
that they will take heed to do all that
 have commanded them, according to the whole law and the statutes and
s by the hand of Moses.
h made Judah and the inhabitants of Jerusalem to err,
hen, whom the LORD had destroyed before
he children of Israel.
RD spake to Manasseh, and to his people: but they
fore the LORD brought upon them the captains of the host of
ich took Manasseh among the thorns, and bound
Babylon.
ction, he besought the LORD his God, and
humbled himself greatly before the God of his fathers, 33:13 And
nd he was intreated of him, and heard his
rusalem into his kingdom.
new that the LORD he was God.
 after this he built a wall without the city of David, on the
n the valley, even to the entering in at the fish
and raised it up a very great height,
 put captains of war in all the fenced cities of Judah.
e strange gods, and the idol out of the house
he had built in the mount of the
 the LORD, and in Jerusalem, and cast them out of the city.
 the altar of the LORD, and sacrificed thereon
 and commanded Judah to serve the
d of Israel.
ple did sacrifice still in the high places,
:18 Now the rest of the acts of Manasseh, and his prayer unto his
s of the seers that spake to him in the name of the
y are written in the book of the kings
 Israel.
 God was intreated of him, and all his
ns, and his trespass, and the places wherein he built high places,
s and graven images, before he was humbled: behold,
ngs of the seers.
pt with his fathers, and they buried him in his
 in his stead.
wenty years old when he began to reign, and
2 But he did that which was evil in the sight of the LORD, as did
er: for Amon sacrificed unto all the carved images
de, and served them; 33:23 And humbled
t himself before the LORD, as Manasseh his father had humbled
spassed more and more.
rvants conspired against him, and slew him in his own
e of the land slew all them that had conspired
 the land made Josiah his son king
 stead.
 when he began to reign, and he reigned
n Jerusalem one and thirty years.
And he did that which was right in the sight of the LORD, and
 David his father, and declined neither to the
 For in the eighth year of his reign, while he was yet young, he
r the God of David his father: and in the twelfth
Jerusalem from the high places, and
roves, and the carved images, and the molten images.
 altars of Baalim in his presence; and the
 cut down; and the groves, and
 images, and the molten images, he brake in pieces, and made
wed it upon the graves of them that had
acrificed unto them.
the bones of the priests upon their altars, and
:6 And so did he in the cities of Manasseh, and Ephraim, and Simeon,
tali, with their mattocks round about.
34:7 And when he had broken down the altars and the groves, and had
en images into powder, and cut down all the idols
, he returned to Jerusalem.
 the eighteenth year of his reign, when he had purged the
ent Shaphan the son of Azaliah, and Maaseiah
 son of Joahaz the recorder, to
e house of the LORD his God.
hen they came to Hilkiah the high priest, they delivered the
 into the house of God, which the Levites that
and of Manasseh and Ephraim, and
he remnant of Israel, and of all Judah and Benjamin; and they
.
the workmen that had the
 house of the LORD, and they gave it to the workmen
e LORD, to repair and amend the house:
:11 Even to the artificers and builders gave they it, to buy hewn
 for couplings, and to floor the houses which the
34:12 And the men did the work faithfully: and the overseers of them
d Obadiah, the Levites, of the sons of Merari; and
sons of the Kohathites, to set it
; and other of the Levites, all that could skill of instruments
 Also they were over the bearers of burdens, and were overseers
 the work in any manner of service: and of the
cers, and porters.
brought out the money that was brought into the
st found a book of the law of the
ven by Moses.
d and said to Shaphan the scribe, I have
found the book of the law in the house of the LORD. And Hilkiah
to Shaphan.
he book to the king, and brought the king
mitted to thy servants, they
:17 And they have gathered together the money that was found in the
RD, and have delivered it into the hand of the
rkmen.
ld the king, saying, Hilkiah the
ath given me a book. And Shaphan read it before the king.
ss, when the king had heard the words of the
0 And the king commanded Hilkiah, and Ahikam the son of Shaphan,
of Micah, and Shaphan the scribe, and Asaiah a
 Go, enquire of the LORD for me,
them that are left in Israel and in Judah, concerning the
 found: for great is the wrath of the LORD
fathers have not kept the word
D, to do after all that is written in this book.
 the king had appointed, went to
he prophetess, the wife of Shallum the son of Tikvath, the son
 the wardrobe; (now she dwelt in Jerusalem in the
o that effect.
hem, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel, Tell
Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I
 evil upon this place, and upon the inhabitants thereof,
re written in the book which they have read
 they have forsaken me, and
ncense unto other gods, that they might provoke me to
heir hands; therefore my wrath shall be
oured out upon this place, and shall not be quenched.
f Judah, who sent you to enquire of the
ORD, so shall ye say unto him, Thus saith the LORD God of Israel
ds which thou hast heard; 34:27 Because thine heart
le thyself before God, when thou
 his words against this place, and against the inhabitants
hyself before me, and didst rend thy clothes,
 thee also, saith the LORD.
d, I will gather thee to thy fathers, and thou shalt be
ace, neither shall thine eyes see all the
nd upon the inhabitants of
hey brought the king word again.
Then the king sent and gathered together all the elders of Judah
34:30 And the king went up into the house of the LORD, and all the men
d the inhabitants of Jerusalem, and the priests, and the
e, great and small: and he read in their
ears all the words of the book of the covenant that was found in the
ORD.
ace, and made a covenant before the
 to walk after the LORD, and to keep his commandments, and his
 statutes, with all his heart, and with all his
ovenant which are written in this

t in Jerusalem and Benjamin to
t. And the inhabitants of Jerusalem did according to the
f their fathers.
away all the abominations out of all the
countries that pertained to the children of Israel, and made all that
in Israel to serve, even to serve the LORD their God. And
d not from following the LORD, the God of
pt a passover unto the LORD in Jerusalem: and
eenth day of the first month.
he set the priests in their charges, and encouraged them to
e of the LORD, 35:3 And said unto the Levites
ly unto the LORD, Put the holy
 house which Solomon the son of David king of Israel did
urden upon your shoulders: serve now the
LORD your God, and his people Israel, 35:4 And prepare yourselves by
your fathers, after your courses, according to the
 and according to the writing of
his son.
ce according to the divisions of the
lies of the fathers of your brethren the people, and after the
lies of the Levites.
assover, and sanctify yourselves, and prepare your
ding to the word of the LORD by the
of Moses.
eople, of the flock, lambs and kids, all
for the passover offerings, for all that were present, to the number
sand, and three thousand bullocks: these were of the
his princes gave willingly unto the people, to the priests,
kiah and Zechariah and Jehiel, rulers of the
r the passover offerings two
 six hundred small cattle and three hundred oxen.
h and Nethaneel, his brethren, and
iah and Jeiel and Jozabad, chief of the Levites, gave unto the
 offerings five thousand small cattle, and five
ce was prepared, and the priests stood in their
rses, according to the king's
.
nd the priests sprinkled the
heir hands, and the Levites flayed them.

gs, that they might give
 divisions of the families of the people, to offer
in the book of Moses. And so did they
h the oxen.
passover with fire according to the
ance: but the other holy offerings sod they in pots, and in
and divided them speedily among all the people.
dy for themselves, and for the
ecause the priests the sons of Aaron were busied in offering
 the fat until night; therefore the Levites
iests the sons of Aaron.
singers the sons of Asaph were in their place, according
d, and Asaph, and Heman, and Jeduthun the
ery gate; they might not
r service; for their brethren the Levites prepared for
rvice of the LORD was prepared the same day, to
nt offerings upon the altar of the
according to the commandment of king Josiah.
t were present kept the passover
time, and the feast of unleavened bread seven days.
er like to that kept in Israel from the
ays of Samuel the prophet; neither did all the kings of Israel keep
 as Josiah kept, and the priests, and the Levites, and
re present, and the inhabitants of
lem.
e reign of Josiah was this passover

prepared the temple, Necho king
came up to fight against Charchemish by Euphrates: and Josiah

saying, What have I to do with
 king of Judah? I come not against thee this day, but
 have war: for God commanded me to make
aste: forbear thee from meddling with God, who is with me, that he
.
urn his face from him, but
elf, that he might fight with him, and hearkened not
he mouth of God, and came to fight in
 valley of Megiddo.
rs shot at king Josiah; and the king said to his
ore wounded.
re took him out of that chariot, and put him
 they brought him to Jerusalem,
ed, and was buried in one of the sepulchres of his fathers.
alem mourned for Josiah.
miah lamented for Josiah: and all the singing men and
siah in their lamentations to this day,
nd made them an ordinance in Israel: and, behold, they are written in
ons.
Josiah, and his goodness, according
at which was written in the law of the LORD, 35:27 And his deeds,
ehold, they are written in the book of the kings of
the people of the land took Jehoahaz the son of Josiah, and
ther's stead in Jerusalem.
z was twenty and three years old when he began to reign,
s in Jerusalem.
ypt put him down at Jerusalem, and condemned
er and a talent of gold.
ing of Egypt made Eliakim his brother king over Judah
 name to Jehoiakim. And Necho took
az his brother, and carried him to Egypt.
s old when he began to reign,
ned eleven years in Jerusalem: and he did that which was
ORD his God.
ebuchadnezzar king of Babylon, and bound him

vessels of the house of the
on, and put them in his temple at Babylon.
akim, and his abominations which
and that which was found in him, behold, they are written in
of Israel and Judah: and Jehoiachin his son
n was eight years old when he began to reign, and he
ays in Jerusalem: and he did that which
as evil in the sight of the LORD.
 And when the year was expired, king Nebuchadnezzar sent, and
n, with the goodly vessels of the house of the
king over Judah and Jerusalem.
dekiah was one and twenty years old when he began to reign,
s in Jerusalem.
hich was evil in the sight of the LORD his God,
miah the prophet speaking from the
of the LORD.
 against king Nebuchadnezzar, who had made
eck, and hardened his heart
unto the LORD God of Israel.
over all the chief of the priests, and the people,
 the abominations of the heathen; and
luted the house of the LORD which he had hallowed in Jerusalem.
D God of their fathers sent to them by his
ng; because he had compassion
le, and on his dwelling place: 36:16 But they mocked the
pised his words, and misused his prophets,
t his people, till there was

 king of the Chaldees, who
ng men with the sword in the house of their sanctuary,
oung man or maiden, old man, or him that
stooped for age: he gave them all into his hand.
 house of God, great and small, and
reasures of the house of the LORD, and the treasures of the king,
s; all these he brought to Babylon.
19 And they burnt the house of God, and brake down the wall of
 all the palaces thereof with fire, and destroyed

 sword carried he away to
they were servants to him and his sons until the reign
:21 To fulfil the word of the LORD by the
oyed her sabbaths: for as
 desolate she kept sabbath, to fulfil threescore and
 first year of Cyrus king of Persia, that the word of
of Jeremiah might be accomplished, the
RD stirred up the spirit of Cyrus king of Persia, that he made a
ghout all his kingdom, and put it also in writing,
ing of Persia, All the kingdoms of the
rth hath the LORD God of heaven given me; and he hath charged me to
use in Jerusalem, which is in Judah. Who is there among
 LORD his God be with him, and let him go up.
t year of Cyrus king of Persia, that the word of
might be fulfilled, the LORD stirred
he spirit of Cyrus king of Persia, that he made a proclamation
ingdom, and put it also in writing, saying, 1:2
e LORD God of heaven hath given me
e kingdoms of the earth; and he hath charged me to build him an
 which is in Judah.
ong you of all his people? his God be with him, and
ch is in Judah, and build the house of
e LORD God of Israel, (he is the God,) which is in Jerusalem.
emaineth in any place where he sojourneth, let the
ilver, and with gold, and with goods,
 with beasts, beside the freewill offering for the house of God
m.
thers of Judah and Benjamin, and
sts, and the Levites, with all them whose spirit God had
the house of the LORD which is in Jerusalem.
m strengthened their hands with
f silver, with gold, with goods, and with beasts, and with
all that was willingly offered.
o Cyrus the king brought forth the vessels of the house of the
nezzar had brought forth out of Jerusalem, and had
s; 1:8 Even those did Cyrus king of
a bring forth by the hand of Mithredath the treasurer, and
bazzar, the prince of Judah.
is is the number of them: thirty chargers of gold, a
ine and twenty knives, 1:10 Thirty
 of gold, silver basons of a second sort four hundred and ten,
thousand.
and of silver were five thousand and four
up with them of the captivity
rought up from Babylon unto Jerusalem.
2:1 Now these are the children of the province that went up out of the
f those which had been carried away, whom Nebuchadnezzar
rried away unto Babylon, and came again unto
s city; 2:2 Which came with
eshua, Nehemiah, Seraiah, Reelaiah, Mordecai, Bilshan,
h. The number of the men of the people of
housand an hundred seventy
4 The children of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two.
Arah, seven hundred seventy and five.
:6 The children of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab,
ht hundred and twelve.
 of Elam, a thousand two hundred fifty and four.
hundred forty and five.
n of Zaccai, seven hundred and threescore.
 forty and two.
bai, six hundred twenty and three.
 The children of Azgad, a thousand two hundred twenty and two.
of Adonikam, six hundred sixty and six.

 fifty and six.
in, four hundred fifty and four.
he children of Ater of Hezekiah, ninety and eight.
ree hundred twenty and three.
children of Jorah, an hundred and twelve.
d twenty and three.
f Gibbar, ninety and five.
ldren of Bethlehem, an hundred twenty and three.
and six.
undred twenty and eight.
ren of Azmaveth, forty and two.
e children of Kirjatharim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven
e.
 six hundred twenty and one.
en of Michmas, an hundred twenty and two.
red twenty and three.
 of Nebo, fifty and two.
ren of Magbish, an hundred fifty and six.
thousand two hundred fifty and
:32 The children of Harim, three hundred and twenty.
did, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and
ve.
 hundred forty and five.
ren of Senaah, three thousand and six hundred and
children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua,
7 The children of Immer, a thousand fifty and two.
 thousand two hundred forty and seven.
2:39 The children of Harim, a thousand and seventeen.
ren of Jeshua and Kadmiel, of the children
he singers: the children of Asaph, an hundred twenty and eight.
 of the porters: the children of Shallum, the
mon, the children of Akkub, the
of Hatita, the children of Shobai, in all an hundred thirty
ethinims: the children of Ziha, the children of Hasupha, the
2:44 The children of Keros, the children of
children of Lebanah, the
bah, the children of Akkub, 2:46 The children of
e children of Hanan, 2:47 The
 Giddel, the children of Gahar, the children of Reaiah,
 the children of Nekoda, the children of
Gazzam, 2:49 The children of Uzza, the children of Paseah, the
:50 The children of Asnah, the children of
The children of Bakbuk, the
akupha, the children of Harhur, 2:52 The children of
a, the children of Harsha, 2:53 The
ren of Barkos, the children of Sisera, the children of Thamah,
 Neziah, the children of Hatipha.
The children of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the
h, the children of Peruda, 2:56 The children of
 children of Giddel, 2:57 The
 Shephatiah, the children of Hattil, the children of
ren of Ami.
 the children of Solomon's servants, were
 these were they which went up from Telmelah, Telharsa,
ut they could not shew their father's
se, and their seed, whether they were of Israel: 2:60 The children
children of Tobiah, the children of Nekoda, six
of the children of the priests: the children of Habaiah, the
hildren of Barzillai; which took a wife of the
, and was called after their name:
hese sought their register among those that were reckoned by
re not found: therefore were they, as polluted,
d the Tirshatha said unto them, that they should not eat of the
ill there stood up a priest with Urim and with
ion together was forty and two thousand three
heir servants and their maids, of
ere were seven thousand three hundred thirty and seven: and
wo hundred singing men and singing women.
irty and six; their mules, two
rty and five; 2:67 Their camels, four hundred thirty and
usand seven hundred and twenty.
d some of the chief of the fathers, when they came to the house
s at Jerusalem, offered freely for the house of God
 They gave after their ability unto the
reasure of the work threescore and one thousand drams of gold, and
und of silver, and one hundred priests' garments.
vites, and some of the people, and the
ngers, and the porters, and the Nethinims, dwelt in their cities,
 their cities.
 month was come, and the children of Israel
 themselves together as one man
lem.
f Jozadak, and his brethren the
and Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel, and his brethren, and
 God of Israel, to offer burnt offerings
thereon, as it is written in the law of Moses the man of God.
e altar upon his bases; for fear was upon them
ries: and they offered burnt
ereon unto the LORD, even burnt offerings morning and
o the feast of tabernacles, as it is written, and
 by number, according to the custom,
he duty of every day required; 3:5 And afterward offered the
ng, both of the new moons, and of all the set
ted, and of every one that
red a freewill offering unto the LORD.
3:6 From the first day of the seventh month began they to offer burnt
o the LORD. But the foundation of the temple of the LORD
hey gave money also unto the masons, and to the carpenters; and
d oil, unto them of Zidon, and to them of Tyre, to
o the sea of Joppa, according to the
t that they had of Cyrus king of Persia.

ng unto the house of God at
 the second month, began Zerubbabel the son of Shealtiel,
adak, and the remnant of their brethren the
hat were come out of the
erusalem; and appointed the Levites, from twenty years
rd the work of the house of the LORD.
:9 Then stood Jeshua with his sons and his brethren, Kadmiel and his
 of Judah, together, to set forward the workmen in the
nadad, with their sons and their brethren
s laid the foundation of the temple of the
rel with trumpets, and the
ns of Asaph with cymbals, to praise the LORD, after the
Israel.
course in praising and giving thanks
 the LORD; because he is good, for his mercy endureth for ever
d all the people shouted with a great shout, when they praised the
e foundation of the house of the LORD was laid.
Levites and chief of the fathers, who
e ancient men, that had seen the first house, when the foundation
 laid before their eyes, wept with a loud voice; and
13 So that the people could not discern
he noise of the shout of joy from the noise of the weeping of the
eople shouted with a loud shout, and the noise was
the adversaries of Judah and Benjamin heard that the
ded the temple unto the LORD God of
l; 4:2 Then they came to Zerubbabel, and to the chief of the
 them, Let us build with you: for we seek your
nto him since the days of
 of Assur, which brought us up hither.
4:3 But Zerubbabel, and Jeshua, and the rest of the chief of the
 said unto them, Ye have nothing to do with us to
we ourselves together will build unto
 LORD God of Israel, as king Cyrus the king of Persia hath
n the people of the land weakened the hands of the people of
em in building, 4:5 And hired counsellors
 all the days of Cyrus king
en until the reign of Darius king of Persia.
n the beginning of his reign,
unto him an accusation against the inhabitants of Judah and
n the days of Artaxerxes wrote Bishlam, Mithredath, Tabeel,
ompanions, unto Artaxerxes king of Persia; and
n in the Syrian tongue, and
n the Syrian tongue.
cellor and Shimshai the scribe wrote a letter
ing in this sort: 4:9 Then wrote
e chancellor, and Shimshai the scribe, and the rest of their
es, the Apharsathchites, the Tarpelites, the
nians, the Susanchites, the
d the Elamites, 4:10 And the rest of the nations whom the
brought over, and set in the cities of
maria, and the rest that are on this side the river, and at such a
is is the copy of the letter that they sent unto him, even unto
; Thy servants the men on this side the river, and
own unto the king, that the Jews which came up from thee
lem, building the rebellious and the bad
city, and have set up the walls thereof, and joined the foundations.
nown now unto the king, that, if this city be builded, and
then will they not pay toll, tribute, and
venue of the kings.
 have maintenance from the king's palace, and it
g's dishonour, therefore have we
 certified the king; 4:15 That search may be made in the book
 fathers: so shalt thou find in the book of the
 a rebellious city, and hurtful
s and provinces, and that they have moved sedition within the
 which cause was this city destroyed.
:16 We certify the king that, if this city be builded again, and the
set up, by this means thou shalt have no portion on this
en sent the king an answer unto Rehum the chancellor, and to
nd to the rest of their companions that dwell in
the river, Peace, and at such a
4:18 The letter which ye sent unto us hath been plainly read before
 I commanded, and search hath been made, and it is found that
 hath made insurrection against kings, and that
de therein.
 kings also over Jerusalem, which have
led over all countries beyond the river; and toll, tribute, and
to them.
o cause these men to cease, and that
 city be not builded, until another commandment shall be given
e heed now that ye fail not to do this: why should damage grow
ings?  4:23 Now when the copy of king Artaxerxes'
 Shimshai the scribe, and their
s, they went up in haste to Jerusalem unto the Jews, and made
e and power.
of the house of God which is at Jerusalem.
 reign of Darius king of
hen the prophets, Haggai the prophet, and Zechariah the son of
o the Jews that were in Judah and Jerusalem in the
unto them.
the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua the son
of Jozadak, and began to build the house of God which is at Jerusalem:
m were the prophets of God helping them.

, governor on this side the
etharboznai and their companions, and said thus unto
o build this house, and to make up this
all?  5:4 Then said we unto them after this manner, What are the
hat make this building?  5:5 But the eye of their
ws, that they could not cause them to
se, till the matter came to Darius: and then they returned answer
ing this matter.
tter that Tatnai, governor on this side the
ions the Apharsachites, which
s side the river, sent unto Darius the king: 5:7 They sent
in was written thus; Unto Darius the king, all
ing, that we went into the province of
dea, to the house of the great God, which is builded with great
is laid in the walls, and this work goeth fast on,

 unto them thus, Who commanded
ld this house, and to make up these walls?  5:10 We asked
ify thee, that we might write the names of
5:11 And thus they returned us answer, saying, We are the servants of
aven and earth, and build the house that was builded
great king of Israel builded and set up.

oked the God of heaven unto
e them into the hand of Nebuchadnezzar the king of
oyed this house, and carried the
way into Babylon.
 year of Cyrus the king of Babylon the same king
house of God.
 of gold and silver of the house of God,
which Nebuchadnezzar took out of the temple that was in Jerusalem, and
 into the temple of Babylon, those did Cyrus the king take
ylon, and they were delivered unto one, whose
e governor; 5:15 And said unto
these vessels, go, carry them into the temple that is in
se of God be builded in his place.
 Then came the same Sheshbazzar, and laid the foundation of the
is in Jerusalem: and since that time even until now
et it is not finished.
re, if it seem good to the king, let there be search
use, which is there at Babylon, whether
t be so, that a decree was made of Cyrus the king to build this house
usalem, and let the king send his pleasure to us
n Darius the king made a decree, and search was made in the
re the treasures were laid up in Babylon.
 the palace that is in the
e Medes, a roll, and therein was a record thus written:
rus the king the same Cyrus the king made a
erusalem, Let the house be
lace where they offered sacrifices, and let the
d; the height thereof threescore
and the breadth thereof threescore cubits; 6:4 With three rows
 a row of new timber: and let the expenses be
d also let the golden and silver
of the house of God, which Nebuchadnezzar took forth out of
Jerusalem, and brought unto Babylon, be
estored, and brought again unto the temple which is at Jerusalem,
place, and place them in the house of God.
yond the river, Shetharboznai,
ompanions the Apharsachites, which are beyond the river, be
 Let the work of this house of God alone; let
rs of the Jews build this house
 his place.
e what ye shall do to the elders of these
d: that of the king's goods,
tribute beyond the river, forthwith expenses be given unto
not hindered.
ave need of, both young bullocks, and rams,
he God of heaven, wheat, salt,
oil, according to the appointment of the priests which are
given them day by day without fail: 6:10 That
vours unto the God of heaven, and
r the life of the king, and of his sons.

soever shall alter this word,
be pulled down from his house, and being set up, let him be
 his house be made a dunghill for this.

e to dwell there destroy all
ople, that shall put to their hand to alter and to destroy
is at Jerusalem. I Darius have made a decree;
en Tatnai, governor on this side the river, Shetharboznai, and
cording to that which Darius the king had sent, so
he elders of the Jews builded, and they prospered through
 the prophet and Zechariah the son of Iddo.
rding to the commandment of the
rael, and according to the commandment of Cyrus, and Darius,
 Persia.
ed on the third day of the month Adar,
ich was in the sixth year of the reign of Darius the king.
of Israel, the priests, and the Levites, and the
ity, kept the dedication of this
 God with joy.
dedication of this house of God an hundred
 lambs; and for a sin offering
rael, twelve he goats, according to the number of the tribes
 they set the priests in their divisions, and the Levites in
 service of God, which is at Jerusalem; as it is
:19 And the children of the captivity kept the passover upon the
the first month.
nd the Levites were purified together, all of
er for all the children of the
 and for their brethren the priests, and for themselves.
 Israel, which were come again out of
tivity, and all such as had separated themselves unto them from the
he heathen of the land, to seek the LORD God of Israel,
feast of unleavened bread seven days with
nd turned the heart of the
a unto them, to strengthen their hands in the work of
Israel.
the reign of Artaxerxes king of Persia,
zra the son of Seraiah, the son of Azariah, the son of Hilkiah, 7:2
lum, the son of Zadok, the son of Ahitub, 7:3 The son
h, the son of Meraioth, 7:4 The son of
rahiah, the son of Uzzi, the son of Bukki, 7:5 The son of Abishua,
has, the son of Eleazar, the son of Aaron the chief
rom Babylon; and he was a ready scribe
 the law of Moses, which the LORD God of Israel had given: and the
 all his request, according to the hand of the LORD
ere went up some of the children of Israel, and of the
d the singers, and the porters, and the
ethinims, unto Jerusalem, in the seventh year of Artaxerxes the king.
came to Jerusalem in the fifth month, which was in the

onth began he to go up from
on the first day of the fifth month came he to Jerusalem,
d of his God upon him.
d prepared his heart to seek the law of the LORD, and
ael statutes and judgments.
is is the copy of the letter that the king Artaxerxes gave
e scribe, even a scribe of the words of the
atutes to Israel.
 of kings, unto Ezra the priest, a scribe of the
peace, and at such a time.
a decree, that all they of the people of Israel, and of
 my realm, which are minded of their own
freewill to go up to Jerusalem, go with thee.
the king, and of his seven
o enquire concerning Judah and Jerusalem, according to
in thine hand; 7:15 And to carry the
er and gold, which the king and his counsellors have freely
 Israel, whose habitation is in Jerusalem, 7:16
ou canst find in all the province
lon, with the freewill offering of the people, and of the
ly for the house of their God which is in
dily with this money
s, with their meat offerings and their drink
ar of the house of your God
erusalem.
m good to thee, and to thy brethren, to
o with the rest of the silver and the gold, that do after the will of
7:19 The vessels also that are given thee for the service of the house
those deliver thou before the God of Jerusalem.
 needful for the house of thy God,
thou shalt have occasion to bestow, bestow it out of the king's
7:21 And I, even I Artaxerxes the king, do make a decree to all the
h are beyond the river, that whatsoever Ezra the
he God of heaven, shall require of
t be done speedily, 7:22 Unto an hundred talents of silver, and
res of wheat, and to an hundred baths of wine, and
salt without prescribing how much.
 Whatsoever is commanded by the God of heaven, let it be
use of the God of heaven: for why should
there be wrath against the realm of the king and his sons?  7:24 Also
u, that touching any of the priests and Levites, singers,
nisters of this house of God, it shall not be
stom, upon them.
fter the wisdom of thy God, that is in thine
h may judge all the people that
d the river, all such as know the laws of thy God; and teach
 not.
e law of thy God, and the law of the
, let judgment be executed speedily upon him, whether it be unto
hment, or to confiscation of goods, or to
 God of our fathers, which hath put such a
autify the house of the LORD
Jerusalem: 7:28 And hath extended mercy unto me before the
s, and before all the king's mighty princes.
the LORD my God was upon me, and
ed together out of Israel chief men to go up with me.
 of their fathers, and this is the
ogy of them that went up with me from Babylon, in the reign of

of the sons of Ithamar; Daniel:
ns of David; Hattush.
f Shechaniah, of the sons of Pharosh; Zechariah: and
alogy of the males an hundred and fifty.

 the son of Zerahiah, and with
ndred males.
iah; the son of Jahaziel, and with him three
 of Adin; Ebed the son of Jonathan, and with him
s of Elam; Jeshaiah the son of Athaliah, and with
the sons of Shephatiah; Zebadiah the son of Michael, and

n of Jehiel, and with him two
 eighteen males.
f Shelomith; the son of Josiphiah, and with him

the son of Bebai, and with
 eight males.
zgad; Johanan the son of Hakkatan, and with
nd of the last sons of Adonikam, whose names are these,
iah, and with them threescore males.
14 Of the sons also of Bigvai; Uthai, and Zabbud, and with them
:15 And I gathered them together to the river that runneth to Ahava;
e we in tents three days: and I viewed the people, and
 none of the sons of Levi.
nt I for Eliezer, for Ariel, for Shemaiah, and for
 Elnathan, and for Nathan, and for
iah, and for Meshullam, chief men; also for Joiarib, and for
standing.
mandment unto Iddo the chief at the place
d say unto Iddo, and to his
Nethinims, at the place Casiphia, that they should bring
house of our God.
hand of our God upon us they brought us a man of
i, the son of Levi, the son of
d Sherebiah, with his sons and his brethren, eighteen; 8:19
 him Jeshaiah of the sons of Merari, his
brethren and their sons, twenty; 8:20 Also of the Nethinims, whom
nces had appointed for the service of the Levites,
: all of them were expressed by name.
:21 Then I proclaimed a fast there, at the river of Ahava, that we
rselves before our God, to seek of him a right way for
 and for all our substance.
was ashamed to require of the king a band of soldiers and
st the enemy in the way: because we had
poken unto the king, saying, The hand of our God is upon all them for
k him; but his power and his wrath is against all them
 we fasted and besought our God for this: and he was intreated
I separated twelve of the chief of the priests, Sherebiah,
eir brethren with them, 8:25 And weighed unto
e vessels, even the offering of
 of our God, which the king, and his counsellors, and his
re present, had offered: 8:26 I even weighed
talents of silver, and silver
hundred talents, and of gold an hundred talents; 8:27 Also
f a thousand drams; and two vessels of fine
 said unto them, Ye are holy unto the LORD; the vessels are
er and the gold are a freewill offering unto
Watch ye, and keep them, until ye weigh them before the chief of
e Levites, and chief of the fathers of Israel, at
 house of the LORD.
iests and the Levites the weight of the silver, and
ring them to Jerusalem unto the house
our God.
 river of Ahava on the twelfth day of
 first month, to go unto Jerusalem: and the hand of our God was
ivered us from the hand of the enemy, and of such
2 And we came to Jerusalem, and abode there three days.
y was the silver and the gold and the vessels
e hand of Meremoth the son of
riest; and with him was Eleazar the son of Phinehas; and
son of Jeshua, and Noadiah the son of
nui, Levites; 8:34 By number and by weight of every one: and all
tten at that time.
en of those that had been carried away, which were
ed burnt offerings unto the God of
, twelve bullocks for all Israel, ninety and six rams, seventy
lve he goats for a sin offering: all this was a
36 And they delivered the king's commissions unto the king's
e governors on this side the river: and they
 God.
ne, the princes came to me, saying,
eople of Israel, and the priests, and the Levites, have not
om the people of the lands, doing according to
anites, the Hittites, the
 Jebusites, the Ammonites, the Moabites, the Egyptians,
r they have taken of their daughters for themselves, and for
e holy seed have mingled themselves with the
f the princes and rulers hath
in this trespass.
this thing, I rent my garment and my mantle, and
d of my beard, and sat down
9:4 Then were assembled unto me every one that trembled at the words
Israel, because of the transgression of those that had
 astonied until the evening sacrifice.
9:5 And at the evening sacrifice I arose up from my heaviness; and
arment and my mantle, I fell upon my knees, and spread
y God, 9:6 And said, O my God, I am
ed and blush to lift up my face to thee, my God: for our
ver our head, and our trespass is grown up
of our fathers have we been in a great trespass
es have we, our kings, and our
een delivered into the hand of the kings of the lands, to
and to a spoil, and to confusion of face, as
ittle space grace hath been shewed from the LORD
escape, and to give us a nail in his
 place, that our God may lighten our eyes, and give us a little
dage.
God hath not forsaken us in our
but hath extended mercy unto us in the sight of the kings of
eviving, to set up the house of our God, and to
 to give us a wall in Judah and in
lem.
l we say after this? for we have
 thy commandments, 9:11 Which thou hast commanded by thy
ing, The land, unto which ye go to possess
ss of the people of the lands,
 abominations, which have filled it from one end to another

ters unto their sons, neither
daughters unto your sons, nor seek their peace or their
y be strong, and eat the good of the land,
children for ever.
hat is come upon us for our evil deeds, and for
u our God hast punished us less
iniquities deserve, and hast given us such deliverance as
n break thy commandments, and join in
inity with the people of these abominations? wouldest not thou be
l thou hadst consumed us, so that there should be no
LORD God of Israel, thou art righteous:
or we remain yet escaped, as it is this day: behold, we are before
passes: for we cannot stand before thee because of
prayed, and when he had confessed, weeping and
e of God, there assembled unto him
 Israel a very great congregation of men and women and children:
t very sore.
n of Jehiel, one of the sons of Elam,
wered and said unto Ezra, We have trespassed against our God, and
e wives of the people of the land: yet now there is
thing.
 covenant with our God to put away all
e wives, and such as are born of them, according to the counsel of
those that tremble at the commandment of our God; and
he law.
ongeth unto thee: we also will be with
ee: be of good courage, and do it.
 Then arose Ezra, and made the chief priests, the Levites, and all
 that they should do according to this word. And they
 up from before the house of God, and went into the
liashib: and when he came thither, he
 eat no bread, nor drink water: for he mourned because of the
 that had been carried away.
hey made proclamation throughout Judah and Jerusalem unto
aptivity, that they should gather themselves
 whosoever would not come within
ys, according to the counsel of the princes and the elders,
d be forfeited, and himself separated from the
carried away.
Judah and Benjamin gathered themselves
gether unto Jerusalem within three days. It was the ninth month, on
ay of the month; and all the people sat in the street
g because of this matter, and for the
at rain.
d up, and said unto them, Ye have
essed, and have taken strange wives, to increase the trespass
ow therefore make confession unto the LORD God of your fathers,
: and separate yourselves from the people of the

d and said with a loud voice,
t said, so must we do.
ople are many, and it is a time of much rain, and we
 neither is this a work of one day or
: for we are many that have transgressed in this thing.
of all the congregation stand, and let all
ur cities come at appointed
th them the elders of every city, and the judges thereof,
 our God for this matter be turned from us.
 and Jahaziah the son of Tikvah
oyed about this matter: and Meshullam and Shabbethai the
16 And the children of the captivity did so. And Ezra the priest,
f of the fathers, after the house of their fathers,
 were separated, and sat down in the
t day of the tenth month to examine the matter.
ll the men that had taken strange
y the first day of the first month.
18 And among the sons of the priests there were found that had
 namely, of the sons of Jeshua the son of Jozadak,
Eliezer, and Jarib, and Gedaliah.
 And they gave their hands that they would put away their wives;
they offered a ram of the flock for their trespass.
r; Hanani, and Zebadiah.
he sons of Harim; Maaseiah, and Elijah, and Shemaiah,
:22 And of the sons of Pashur; Elioenai, Maaseiah, Ishmael,
 Elasah.
abad, and Shimei, and Kelaiah, (the same
is Kelita,) Pethahiah, Judah, and Eliezer.
nd of the porters; Shallum, and
d Uri.
 sons of Parosh; Ramiah, and Jeziah,
Malchiah, and Miamin, and Eleazar, and Malchijah, and Benaiah.
ons of Elam; Mattaniah, Zechariah, and Jehiel, and

, Eliashib, Mattaniah, and
Zabad, and Aziza.
o of Bebai; Jehohanan, Hananiah, Zabbai, and
ni; Meshullam, Malluch, and Adaiah, Jashub,
the sons of Pahathmoab; Adna, and Chelal, Benaiah,
nd Binnui, and Manasseh.
he sons of Harim; Eliezer, Ishijah, Malchiah, Shemaiah,
lluch, and Shemariah.
 of Hashum; Mattenai, Mattathah, Zabad, Eliphelet,

, and Uel, 10:35 Benaiah,
h, 10:36 Vaniah, Meremoth, Eliashib, 10:37 Mattaniah,
nd Bani, and Binnui, Shimei, 10:39 And
elemiah, and Nathan, and Adaiah, 10:40 Machnadebai, Shashai, Sharai,
 and Shelemiah, Shemariah, 10:42 Shallum, Amariah, and
 of Nebo; Jeiel, Mattithiah, Zabad, Zebina, Jadau,
these had taken strange wives: and some of them had wives by
.
he words of Nehemiah the son of Hachaliah. And it came to pass
, in the twentieth year, as I was in Shushan the
 brethren, came, he and certain men
dah; and I asked them concerning the Jews that had escaped, which
captivity, and concerning Jerusalem.
3 And they said unto me, The remnant that are left of the captivity
ovince are in great affliction and reproach: the wall
own, and the gates thereof are burned
h fire.
 heard these words, that I sat down and
ept, and mourned certain days, and fasted, and prayed before the God
 And said, I beseech thee, O LORD God of heaven, the
eepeth covenant and mercy for them that
ove him and observe his commandments: 1:6 Let thine ear now be
 eyes open, that thou mayest hear the prayer of
ee now, day and night, for the
f Israel thy servants, and confess the sins of the children
e sinned against thee: both I and my father's
lt very corruptly against thee, and have not kept the
s, nor the judgments, which thou
dst thy servant Moses.
beseech thee, the word that thou commandedst thy
gress, I will scatter you abroad
e nations: 1:9 But if ye turn unto me, and keep my
h there were of you cast out unto the
ermost part of the heaven, yet will I gather them from thence, and
unto the place that I have chosen to set my name
ervants and thy people, whom thou hast
deemed by thy great power, and by thy strong hand.
et now thine ear be attentive to the
er of thy servant, and to the prayer of thy servants, who desire
and prosper, I pray thee, thy servant this day, and
 this man. For I was the king's
.
Nisan, in the twentieth year of
s the king, that wine was before him: and I took up the wine,
king. Now I had not been beforetime sad in his
said unto me, Why is thy countenance sad,
 else but sorrow of heart.
y sore afraid, 2:3 And said unto the king, Let the king
ot my countenance be sad, when the city,
the place of my fathers' sepulchres, lieth waste, and the gates
d with fire?  2:4 Then the king said unto me, For
 prayed to the God of heaven.
 said unto the king, If it please the king, and if thy
 thy sight, that thou wouldest send me
to Judah, unto the city of my fathers' sepulchres, that I may build
the king said unto me, (the queen also sitting by him,) For
ney be? and when wilt thou return? So it
pleased the king to send me; and I set him a time.
ing, If it please the king, let letters
e given me to the governors beyond the river, that they may convey me
ome into Judah; 2:8 And a letter unto Asaph the keeper of
e may give me timber to make beams for the
 the house, and for the wall
 and for the house that I shall enter into. And the king
he good hand of my God upon me.
n I came to the governors beyond the river, and gave them the
he king had sent captains of the army and
the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the
ceedingly that there was come
ek the welfare of the children of Israel.
ere three days.
 night, I and some few men with me; neither
y heart to do at Jerusalem:
here any beast with me, save the beast that I rode upon.
ight by the gate of the valley, even before
and viewed the walls of
were broken down, and the gates thereof were consumed
t on to the gate of the fountain, and to the king's
r the beast that was under me to pass.
2:15 Then went I up in the night by the brook, and viewed the wall,
, and entered by the gate of the valley, and so
ew not whither I went, or what I did; neither
 to the priests, nor to the
o the rulers, nor to the rest that did the work.
ee the distress that we are in, how
alem lieth waste, and the gates thereof are burned with fire:
d up the wall of Jerusalem, that we be no more a
 of the hand of my God which was good upon me; as
 spoken unto me. And they said, Let
se up and build. So they strengthened their hands for this good
hen Sanballat the Horonite, and Tobiah the servant, the
abian, heard it, they laughed us to scorn,
thing that ye do? will ye
he king?  2:20 Then answered I them, and said unto
 prosper us; therefore we his servants
ll arise and build: but ye have no portion, nor right, nor memorial,

up with his brethren the
y builded the sheep gate; they sanctified it, and set
 the tower of Meah they sanctified it,
to the tower of Hananeel.
unto him builded the men of Jericho. And next to them
i.
f Hassenaah build, who also laid
s thereof, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof,

 the son of Urijah, the son of
ext unto them repaired Meshullam the son of Berechiah, the
next unto them repaired Zadok the son of
Baana.
tes repaired; but their nobles put not
eir necks to the work of their LORD.
6 Moreover the old gate repaired Jehoiada the son of Paseah, and
of Besodeiah; they laid the beams thereof, and set
cks thereof, and the bars thereof.
And next unto them repaired Melatiah the Gibeonite, and Jadon the
men of Gibeon, and of Mizpah, unto the throne of the
r.
e son of Harhaiah, of the
Next unto him also repaired Hananiah the son of one of the
ortified Jerusalem unto the broad wall.

the son of Hur, the ruler of
t of Jerusalem.
 repaired Jedaiah the son of Harumaph, even
im repaired Hattush the son of
.
Hashub the son of Pahathmoab,
e other piece, and the tower of the furnaces.
llum the son of Halohesh, the ruler
e half part of Jerusalem, he and his daughters.
un, and the inhabitants of Zanoah;
uilt it, and set up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and
 a thousand cubits on the wall unto the dung
ed Malchiah the son of Rechab, the ruler
of part of Bethhaccerem; he built it, and set up the doors thereof,
of, and the bars thereof.
gate of the fountain repaired Shallun the son of
pah; he built it, and covered it,
 up the doors thereof, the locks thereof, and the bars thereof,
 pool of Siloah by the king's garden, and unto the
y of David.
emiah the son of Azbuk, the ruler of the
half part of Bethzur, unto the place over against the sepulchres of
he pool that was made, and unto the house of the
 the Levites, Rehum the son of Bani. Next unto
 the half part of Keilah, in his

avai the son of Henadad, the
 half part of Keilah.
him repaired Ezer the son of Jeshua, the ruler of
t the going up to the armoury at the
ing of the wall.
the son of Zabbai earnestly repaired the other
unto the door of the house of
e high priest.
Meremoth the son of Urijah the son of Koz
 of Eliashib even to the end
 of Eliashib.
ed the priests, the men of the plain.
:23 After him repaired Benjamin and Hashub over against their house.
paired Azariah the son of Maaseiah the son of Ananiah by
im repaired Binnui the son of Henadad another piece, from
 the turning of the wall, even unto the
orner.
 against the turning of the wall, and
 tower which lieth out from the king's high house, that was by the
son. After him Pedaiah the son of Parosh.
hel, unto the place over
r gate toward the east, and the tower that lieth out.
s repaired another piece, over against the
e wall of Ophel.
rse gate repaired the priests, every one over
 repaired Zadok the son of Immer over against his
 Shemaiah the son of Shechaniah, the keeper of
aired Hananiah the son of Shelemiah, and Hanun the
ce. After him repaired Meshullam the
of Berechiah over against his chamber.
3:31 After him repaired Malchiah the goldsmith's son unto the place of
s, and of the merchants, over against the gate Miphkad,
corner.
f the corner unto the sheep gate
 the goldsmiths and the merchants.
But it came to pass, that when Sanballat heard that we builded the
th, and took great indignation, and mocked the Jews.
brethren and the army of Samaria, and
d, What do these feeble Jews? will they fortify themselves? will
ill they make an end in a day? will they revive the
rubbish which are burned?  4:3 Now
 the Ammonite was by him, and he said, Even that which they
he shall even break down their stone wall.
ed: and turn their reproach upon
n head, and give them for a prey in the land of captivity: 4:5
iniquity, and let not their sin be blotted out
oked thee to anger before the

ll was joined together unto
eof: for the people had a mind to work.

lat, and Tobiah, and the
e Ammonites, and the Ashdodites, heard that the walls
d that the breaches began to be stopped,
then they were very wroth, 4:8 And conspired all of them together to
ght against Jerusalem, and to hinder it.

 our God, and set a watch
y and night, because of them.
Judah said, The strength of the bearers of burdens is
bbish; so that we are not able to build
he wall.
 They shall not know, neither see, till
e come in the midst among them, and slay them, and cause the work to
 And it came to pass, that when the Jews which dwelt by them came,
s ten times, From all places whence ye shall return

s behind the wall, and on the
es, I even set the people after their families with their
 their bows.
e up, and said unto the nobles, and to the
e not ye afraid of them:
D, which is great and terrible, and fight for your
ughters, your wives, and your houses.
:15 And it came to pass, when our enemies heard that it was known
had brought their counsel to nought, that we returned
one unto his work.
pass from that time forth, that the half of my
e other half of them held both the
, the shields, and the bows, and the habergeons; and the rulers
 house of Judah.
d on the wall, and they that bare burdens, with
e of his hands wrought in the work,
ith the other hand held a weapon.
For the builders, every one had his sword girded by his side, and
e that sounded the trumpet was by me.
:19 And I said unto the nobles, and to the rulers, and to the rest of
he work is great and large, and we are separated upon the
r.
 the sound of the trumpet, resort
her unto us: our God shall fight for us.

f of them held the spears from
 of the morning till the stars appeared.

to the people, Let every one
vant lodge within Jerusalem, that in the night they may be
r on the day.
 brethren, nor my servants, nor the men of
put off our clothes, saving
e put them off for washing.
re was a great cry of the people and of their wives against
.
 sons, and our daughters, are
fore we take up corn for them, that we may eat, and live.
e that said, We have mortgaged our lands,
corn, because of the dearth.
were also that said, We have borrowed money for the king's
ur lands and vineyards.
 flesh is as the flesh of our brethren, our children as
 bring into bondage our sons and our
hters to be servants, and some of our daughters are brought unto
either is it in our power to redeem them; for other
s.
d their cry and these words.
 consulted with myself, and I rebuked the nobles, and the
m, Ye exact usury, every one of his brother.
m.
ur ability have redeemed our
 Jews, which were sold unto the heathen; and will ye even
all they be sold unto us? Then held they
their peace, and found nothing to answer.
 do: ought ye not to walk in
our God because of the reproach of the heathen our
y brethren, and my servants, might
of them money and corn: I pray you, let us leave off this usury.
pray you, to them, even this day, their lands, their
nd their houses, also the hundredth part
of the money, and of the corn, the wine, and the oil, that ye exact of
2 Then said they, We will restore them, and will require nothing of
e do as thou sayest. Then I called the priests, and
 should do according to this promise.
:13 Also I shook my lap, and said, So God shake out every man from
rom his labour, that performeth not this promise, even
mptied. And all the congregation said,
en, and praised the LORD. And the people did according to this
eover from the time that I was appointed to be their governor
 from the twentieth year even unto the two and
g, that is, twelve years, I and my
en have not eaten the bread of the governor.
ad been before me were chargeable
e people, and had taken of them bread and wine, beside forty
, even their servants bare rule over the people:
ear of God.
in the work of this wall, neither bought we
ered thither unto the work.
er there were at my table an hundred and fifty of the Jews
 that came unto us from among the heathen that
 was prepared for me daily was one ox and six
d for me, and once in ten days
ll sorts of wine: yet for all this required not I the bread
e the bondage was heavy upon this people.
ccording to all that I have
 people.
anballat, and Tobiah, and Geshem the
ian, and the rest of our enemies, heard that I had builded the
 was no breach left therein; (though at that time
he gates;) 6:2 That Sanballat and
sent unto me, saying, Come, let us meet together in some one of
 plain of Ono. But they thought to do me mischief.
 them, saying, I am doing a great work,
o that I cannot come down: why should the work cease, whilst I leave
own to you?  6:4 Yet they sent unto me four times after
hem after the same manner.
t Sanballat his servant unto me in like manner the fifth
n his hand; 6:6 Wherein was written, It is
aith it, that thou and the
rebel: for which cause thou buildest the wall, that thou
rding to these words.
 also appointed prophets to preach of thee at
 Judah: and now shall it be
he king according to these words. Come now therefore, and
her.
There are no such things done as
est, but thou feignest them out of thine own heart.
id, saying, Their hands shall be weakened
herefore, O God, strengthen
6:10 Afterward I came unto the house of Shemaiah the son of Delaiah
tabeel, who was shut up; and he said, Let us meet
hin the temple, and let us shut the
 of the temple: for they will come to slay thee; yea, in the
o slay thee.
ch a man as I flee? and who is there, that,
 to save his life? I will not
:12 And, lo, I perceived that God had not sent him; but that he
phecy against me: for Tobiah and Sanballat had
hired, that I should be afraid, and do so, and
 for an evil report, that they
oach me.
obiah and Sanballat according to these
eir works, and on the prophetess Noadiah, and the rest of the
have put me in fear.
as finished in the twenty and fifth day of the month

our enemies heard thereof, and
athen that were about us saw these things, they were much
es: for they perceived that this work was
hose days the nobles of Judah sent many letters unto
iah came unto them.
 many in Judah sworn unto him, because he was the
of Arah; and his son Johanan had
e daughter of Meshullam the son of Berechiah.
eds before me, and uttered my words
m. And Tobiah sent letters to put me in fear.
all was built, and I had set up the
, and the porters and the singers and the Levites were appointed,
y brother Hanani, and Hananiah the ruler of the
he was a faithful man, and feared
ve many.
not the gates of Jerusalem be opened
l the sun be hot; and while they stand by, let them shut the
nd appoint watches of the inhabitants of
Jerusalem, every one in his watch, and every one to be over against
:4 Now the city was large and great: but the people were few therein,
s were not builded.
into mine heart to gather together the nobles, and
 they might be reckoned by genealogy.
 I found a register of the genealogy of them which came up at the
written therein, 7:6 These are the children of the
e captivity, of those that had been
ed away, whom Nebuchadnezzar the king of Babylon had carried
o Jerusalem and to Judah, every one unto his
shua, Nehemiah, Azariah,
i, Mordecai, Bilshan, Mispereth, Bigvai, Nehum,
en of the people of Israel was
The children of Parosh, two thousand an hundred seventy and
n of Shephatiah, three hundred seventy and two.
ndred fifty and two.
of Pahathmoab, of the children of Jeshua and Joab,
nd eighteen.
 a thousand two hundred fifty and four.

 forty and five.
accai, seven hundred and threescore.
15 The children of Binnui, six hundred forty and eight.
i, six hundred twenty and eight.
he children of Azgad, two thousand three hundred twenty and two.
n of Adonikam, six hundred threescore and seven.
 thousand threescore and seven.
e children of Adin, six hundred fifty and five.
kiah, ninety and eight.
en of Hashum, three hundred twenty and eight.
undred twenty and four.
en of Hariph, an hundred and twelve.
25 The children of Gibeon, ninety and five.
h, an hundred fourscore and
7 The men of Anathoth, an hundred twenty and eight.
 forty and two.
jearim, Chephirah, and Beeroth, seven hundred
amah and Gaba, six hundred twenty and one.
d twenty and two.
l and Ai, an hundred twenty and three.
7:33 The men of the other Nebo, fifty and two.
m, a thousand two hundred fifty and

red and twenty.
richo, three hundred forty and five.
37 The children of Lod, Hadid, and Ono, seven hundred twenty and
hildren of Senaah, three thousand nine hundred and thirty.
children of Jedaiah, of the house of Jeshua,
0 The children of Immer, a thousand fifty and two.
 thousand two hundred forty and seven.
7:42 The children of Harim, a thousand and seventeen.
ren of Jeshua, of Kadmiel, and of the
ldren of Hodevah, seventy and four.
4 The singers: the children of Asaph, an hundred forty and eight.
s: the children of Shallum, the children of Ater, the
ren of Akkub, the children of Hatita, the
 eight.
n of Ziha, the children of Hashupha,
children of Tabbaoth, 7:47 The children of Keros, the children of
 of Padon, 7:48 The children of Lebana, the children
lmai, 7:49 The children of Hanan, the
ldren of Giddel, the children of Gahar, 7:50 The children of
f Rezin, the children of Nekoda, 7:51 The
 the children of Phaseah,
en of Besai, the children of Meunim, the children of
 of Bakbuk, the children of Hakupha, the
children of Harhur, 7:54 The children of Bazlith, the children of
ren of Harsha, 7:55 The children of Barkos, the
 Tamah, 7:56 The children of
children of Hatipha.
of Solomon's servants: the children of Sotai, the
en of Perida, 7:58 The children of
 the children of Darkon, the children of Giddel, 7:59 The
he children of Hattil, the children of
chereth of Zebaim, the children of Amon.

 of Solomon's servants, were
d ninety and two.
hey which went up also from Telmelah, Telharesha,
y could not shew their father's
r their seed, whether they were of Israel.
dren of Tobiah, the children of
ix hundred forty and two.
he priests: the children of Habaiah, the children of Koz,
, which took one of the daughters of
illai the Gileadite to wife, and was called after their name.
heir register among those that were reckoned by
erefore were they, as polluted, put
the priesthood.
said unto them, that they should not eat of the
up a priest with Urim and Thummim.
 The whole congregation together was forty and two thousand three
score, 7:67 Beside their manservants and their
en thousand three hundred thirty
n: and they had two hundred forty and five singing men and
heir horses, seven hundred thirty and six: their mules, two
 7:69 Their camels, four hundred thirty and
enty asses.
of the fathers gave unto the work. The
rshatha gave to the treasure a thousand drams of gold, fifty basons,
nd thirty priests' garments.
ome of the chief of the fathers gave to the treasure of the
ams of gold, and two thousand and two hundred
ch the rest of the people gave was twenty thousand
pound of silver, and threescore and
 priests' garments.
, and the Levites, and the porters, and the
e Nethinims, and all Israel,
ir cities; and when the seventh month came, the children
ties.
hemselves together as one man into
reet that was before the water gate; and they spake unto Ezra
he book of the law of Moses, which the LORD had
a the priest brought the law before the congregation both
 that could hear with understanding, upon the
3 And he read therein before the street that was before the water
ning until midday, before the men and the women, and
nd the ears of all the people were
ive unto the book of the law.
zra the scribe stood upon a pulpit of wood, which they had
d beside him stood Mattithiah, and Shema, and
Maaseiah, on his right hand; and
eft hand, Pedaiah, and Mishael, and Malchiah, and Hashum, and
, and Meshullam.
e book in the sight of all the people; (for he
he opened it, all the people stood
6 And Ezra blessed the LORD, the great God. And all the people
, with lifting up their hands: and they bowed
with their faces to the ground.
o Jeshua, and Bani, and Sherebiah, Jamin, Akkub, Shabbethai,
ita, Azariah, Jozabad, Hanan, Pelaiah, and the
tand the law: and the people stood
ir place.
in the law of God distinctly, and gave
e sense, and caused them to understand the reading.
e Tirshatha, and Ezra the priest the
be, and the Levites that taught the people, said unto all the
oly unto the LORD your God; mourn not, nor weep.
 heard the words of the law.
he said unto them, Go your way, eat the fat, and drink the
 unto them for whom nothing is prepared: for
r be ye sorry; for the joy of
 your strength.
lled all the people, saying, Hold your peace,
ieved.
ir way to eat, and to drink, and to
portions, and to make great mirth, because they had understood
declared unto them.
ond day were gathered together the chief of the
sts, and the Levites, unto Ezra the
e, even to understand the words of the law.
w which the LORD had commanded by
that the children of Israel should dwell in booths in the feast
h: 8:15 And that they should publish and proclaim
alem, saying, Go forth unto the
d fetch olive branches, and pine branches, and myrtle
and branches of thick trees, to make
hs, as it is written.
e went forth, and brought them, and made themselves
 of his house, and in their courts, and
n the courts of the house of God, and in the street of the water
treet of the gate of Ephraim.
all the congregation of them that were come again out of the
 and sat under the booths: for since the days of
y had not the children of Israel
 And there was very great gladness.
8 Also day by day, from the first day unto the last day, he read in
 law of God. And they kept the feast seven days; and on
 assembly, according unto the manner.
:1 Now in the twenty and fourth day of this month the children of
bled with fasting, and with sackclothes, and earth
f Israel separated themselves from all strangers,
s, and the iniquities of their

d read in the book of the law
 their God one fourth part of the day; and another fourth
worshipped the LORD their God.
 stood up upon the stairs, of the Levites, Jeshua, and Bani,
nni, Sherebiah, Bani, and Chenani, and cried
God.
Kadmiel, Bani, Hashabniah,
ijah, Shebaniah, and Pethahiah, said, Stand up and bless
 and ever: and blessed be thy glorious name,
d praise.
 alone; thou hast made heaven, the heaven
h, and all things that are
eas, and all that is therein, and thou preservest them
worshippeth thee.
 the God, who didst choose Abram, and broughtest
s, and gavest him the name of
8 And foundest his heart faithful before thee, and madest a
ve the land of the Canaanites, the Hittites,
the Jebusites, and the
ve it, I say, to his seed, and hast performed thy
9 And didst see the affliction of our
hers in Egypt, and heardest their cry by the Red sea; 9:10 And
onders upon Pharaoh, and on all his servants, and
r thou knewest that they dealt
ainst them. So didst thou get thee a name, as it is this
t divide the sea before them, so that they went
 dry land; and their persecutors
ewest into the deeps, as a stone into the mighty waters.
st them in the day by a cloudy pillar; and in
e them light in the way wherein
ld go.
mount Sinai, and spakest with them
eaven, and gavest them right judgments, and true laws, good
ts: 9:14 And madest known unto them thy holy
, statutes, and laws, by the
s thy servant: 9:15 And gavest them bread from heaven for
est forth water for them out of the rock for
 they should go in to possess
ich thou hadst sworn to give them.
 But they and our fathers dealt proudly, and hardened their necks,
t to thy commandments, 9:17 And refused to obey,
s that thou didst among them; but
d their necks, and in their rebellion appointed a captain to
e: but thou art a God ready to pardon, gracious
 great kindness, and forsookest

lten calf, and said, This is thy
 brought thee up out of Egypt, and had wrought great
 thy manifold mercies forsookest them
 in the wilderness: the pillar of the cloud departed not from them
them in the way; neither the pillar of fire by night,
ay wherein they should go.
vest also thy good spirit to instruct them, and
r mouth, and gavest them water for
thirst.
u sustain them in the wilderness, so
 they lacked nothing; their clothes waxed not old, and their feet
:22 Moreover thou gavest them kingdoms and nations, and didst divide
ers: so they possessed the land of Sihon, and the land
the land of Og king of Bashan.
ir children also multipliedst thou as the stars of heaven, and
 the land, concerning which thou hadst promised to
go in to possess it.
en went in and possessed the land, and thou
f the land, the Canaanites, and
em into their hands, with their kings, and the people of the
do with them as they would.
ey took strong cities, and a fat land, and possessed houses
s digged, vineyards, and oliveyards, and fruit
 and were filled, and became fat,
ighted themselves in thy great goodness.

 and rebelled against thee,
law behind their backs, and slew thy prophets which
them to thee, and they wrought great
ocations.
st them into the hand of their enemies,
ho vexed them: and in the time of their trouble, when they cried unto
ardest them from heaven; and according to thy manifold
iours, who saved them out of the hand of
their enemies.
rest, they did evil again before thee:
erefore leftest thou them in the land of their enemies, so that they
on over them: yet when they returned, and cried unto
heaven; and many times didst thou
 them according to thy mercies; 9:29 And testifiedst against
st bring them again unto thy law: yet they dealt
y commandments, but sinned against
dgments, (which if a man do, he shall live in them;) and
 hardened their neck, and would not hear.
them, and testifiedst against
 spirit in thy prophets: yet would they not give ear:
to the hand of the people of the lands.

sake thou didst not utterly
 nor forsake them; for thou art a gracious and merciful
 our God, the great, the mighty, and the terrible
cy, let not all the trouble seem
efore thee, that hath come upon us, on our kings, on our
s, and on our prophets, and on our fathers,
f the kings of Assyria unto
9:33 Howbeit thou art just in all that is brought upon us; for thou
, but we have done wickedly: 9:34 Neither have our
 nor our fathers, kept thy law, nor
ened unto thy commandments and thy testimonies, wherewith thou
t them.
hee in their kingdom, and in thy great
odness that thou gavest them, and in the large and fat land which
e them, neither turned they from their wicked works.
 this day, and for the land that thou
est unto our fathers to eat the fruit thereof and the good thereof,
servants in it: 9:37 And it yieldeth much increase unto
t over us because of our sins: also they
have dominion over our bodies, and over our cattle, at their pleasure,
n great distress.
ll this we make a sure covenant, and write it;
s, seal unto it.
aled were, Nehemiah, the Tirshatha, the son of
h, Azariah, Jeremiah, 10:3 Pashur,
h, Malchijah, 10:4 Hattush, Shebaniah, Malluch, 10:5 Harim,
 Daniel, Ginnethon, Baruch, 10:7 Meshullam,
Shemaiah: these were the
 And the Levites: both Jeshua the son of Azaniah, Binnui of the
dmiel; 10:10 And their brethren, Shebaniah,
Micha, Rehob, Hashabiah, 10:12
erebiah, Shebaniah, 10:13 Hodijah, Bani, Beninu.
arosh, Pahathmoab, Elam, Zatthu, Bani,
:15 Bunni, Azgad, Bebai, 10:16 Adonijah, Bigvai, Adin, 10:17 Ater,
 10:18 Hodijah, Hashum, Bezai, 10:19 Hariph, Anathoth,
llam, Hezir, 10:21 Meshezabeel, Zadok,
ddua, 10:22 Pelatiah, Hanan, Anaiah, 10:23 Hoshea, Hananiah, Hashub,
h, Pileha, Shobek, 10:25 Rehum, Hashabnah, Maaseiah,
 10:27 Malluch, Harim, Baanah.
d the rest of the people, the priests, the Levites, the
ethinims, and all they that had separated
nto the law of God, their
ns, and their daughters, every one having knowledge,
9 They clave to their brethren, their
les, and entered into a curse, and into an oath, to walk in God's
ven by Moses the servant of God, and to observe and
LORD our Lord, and his judgments and
statutes; 10:30 And that we would not give our daughters unto the
d, not take their daughters for our sons: 10:31 And
 ware or any victuals on the sabbath
to sell, that we would not buy it of them on the sabbath, or on
hat we would leave the seventh year, and the
we made ordinances for us, to charge ourselves yearly with
el for the service of the house of our God;
ntinual meat offering, and for
ual burnt offering, of the sabbaths, of the new moons, for
the holy things, and for the sin offerings to
 all the work of the house of our

sts, the Levites, and the
 wood offering, to bring it into the house of our God,
ers, at times appointed year by year, to
burn upon the altar of the LORD our God, as it is written in the law:
bring the firstfruits of our ground, and the firstfruits
 year by year, unto the house of the LORD:
d of our cattle, as it is
law, and the firstlings of our herds and of our flocks,
r God, unto the priests that minister in
the house of our God: 10:37 And that we should bring the firstfruits
and our offerings, and the fruit of all manner of trees,
he priests, to the chambers of the house of
nto the Levites, that the same
ght have the tithes in all the cities of our tillage.
n of Aaron shall be with the Levites, when
 shall bring up the tithe of
nto the house of our God, to the chambers, into the
e children of Israel and the children of Levi shall bring
 of the new wine, and the oil, unto the
hambers, where are the vessels of the sanctuary, and the priests that
 the porters, and the singers: and we will not forsake
1 And the rulers of the people dwelt at Jerusalem: the rest of the
 lots, to bring one of ten to dwell in Jerusalem the
well in other cities.
le blessed all the men, that willingly offered

nce that dwelt in Jerusalem:
ities of Judah dwelt every one in his possession in their
he priests, and the Levites, and the
inims, and the children of Solomon's servants.
n of the children of Judah, and of
ildren of Benjamin. Of the children of Judah; Athaiah the son of
 Zechariah, the son of Amariah, the son of
e children of Perez; 11:5 And
e son of Baruch, the son of Colhozeh, the son of Hazaiah,
n of Joiarib, the son of Zechariah, the son
ez that dwelt at Jerusalem were four hundred
1:7 And these are the sons of Benjamin; Sallu the son of Meshullam,
, the son of Pedaiah, the son of Kolaiah, the son of
he son of Jesaiah.
abbai, Sallai, nine hundred twenty and eight.
 their overseer: and Judah the son
uah was second over the city.
the priests: Jedaiah the son of Joiarib, Jachin.
, the son of Meshullam, the son of
 the son of Meraioth, the son of Ahitub, was the ruler of the
2 And their brethren that did the work of the house were eight
wo: and Adaiah the son of Jeroham, the son of
 Zechariah, the son of Pashur,
 Malchiah.
f of the fathers, two hundred forty and
wo: and Amashai the son of Azareel, the son of Ahasai, the son of
 son of Immer, 11:14 And their brethren, mighty men
d eight: and their overseer was
the son of one of the great men.
Also of the Levites: Shemaiah the son of Hashub, the son of
habiah, the son of Bunni; 11:16 And Shabbethai
ites, had the oversight of the
siness of the house of God.
attaniah the son of Micha, the son of Zabdi, the son of
 begin the thanksgiving in prayer: and
kbukiah the second among his brethren, and Abda the son of Shammua,
l, the son of Jeduthun.
evites in the holy city were two hundred fourscore and
porters, Akkub, Talmon, and their brethren that
enty and two.
Israel, of the priests, and the Levites, were
 in his inheritance.
inims dwelt in Ophel: and Ziha and Gispa were over
seer also of the Levites at Jerusalem was Uzzi the son
h, the son of Mattaniah, the son of Micha.
ver the business of the house
11:23 For it was the king's commandment concerning them, that a
uld be for the singers, due for every day.
beel, of the children of Zerah
 Judah, was at the king's hand in all matters concerning the
or the villages, with their fields, some of the children of
rba, and in the villages thereof, and at Dibon,
 Jekabzeel, and in the villages
11:26 And at Jeshua, and at Moladah, and at Bethphelet, 11:27
d at Beersheba, and in the villages thereof,
nd in the villages thereof,
Enrimmon, and at Zareah, and at Jarmuth, 11:30 Zanoah,
es, at Lachish, and the fields thereof, at
 they dwelt from Beersheba
y of Hinnom.
 Benjamin from Geba dwelt at Michmash, and

1:33 Hazor, Ramah, Gittaim,
Zeboim, Neballat, 11:35 Lod, and Ono, the valley of
Levites were divisions in Judah, and in Benjamin.
and the Levites that went up with
bel the son of Shealtiel, and Jeshua: Seraiah, Jeremiah, Ezra,
h, Hattush, 12:3 Shechaniah, Rehum, Meremoth, 12:4
min, Maadiah, Bilgah, 12:6 Shemaiah,
Joiarib, Jedaiah, 12:7 Sallu, Amok, Hilkiah, Jedaiah. These were
riests and of their brethren in the days of Jeshua.
shua, Binnui, Kadmiel, Sherebiah, Judah,
and Mattaniah, which was over the thanksgiving, he and his brethren.
kbukiah and Unni, their brethren, were over against them
nd Jeshua begat Joiakim, Joiakim also begat Eliashib, and
:11 And Joiada begat Jonathan, and Jonathan
of Joiakim were priests, the chief of the
, Hananiah; 12:13 Of Ezra,
Amariah, Jehohanan; 12:14 Of Melicu, Jonathan; of
, Adna; of Meraioth, Helkai; 12:16 Of
o, Zechariah; of Ginnethon, Meshullam; 12:17 Of Abijah, Zichri; of
diah, Piltai: 12:18 Of Bilgah, Shammua; of Shemaiah,
ib, Mattenai; of Jedaiah, Uzzi; 12:20 Of
Sallai, Kallai; of Amok, Eber; 12:21 Of Hilkiah, Hashabiah; of

ib, Joiada, and Johanan, and
 recorded chief of the fathers: also the priests, to the
n.
 the fathers, were written in the
 the chronicles, even until the days of Johanan the son of
he chief of the Levites: Hashabiah, Sherebiah, and Jeshua
their brethren over against them, to praise
mmandment of David the man of
ver against ward.
Bakbukiah, Obadiah, Meshullam, Talmon, Akkub,
thresholds of the gates.
re in the days of Joiakim the son of Jeshua, the son of
 Nehemiah the governor, and of Ezra the
riest, the scribe.
ication of the wall of Jerusalem they sought the
o bring them to Jerusalem, to keep
dication with gladness, both with thanksgivings, and with
alteries, and with harps.
 sons of the singers gathered themselves together, both
und about Jerusalem, and from the villages
 of Gilgal, and out of the
 and Azmaveth: for the singers had builded them villages
12:30 And the priests and the Levites purified themselves, and
 and the gates, and the wall.
n I brought up the princes of Judah upon the wall, and
s of them that gave thanks, whereof one
ent on the right hand upon the wall toward the dung gate: 12:32 And
 Hoshaiah, and half of the princes of Judah, 12:33 And
, 12:34 Judah, and Benjamin, and Shemaiah,
riests' sons with trumpets;
riah the son of Jonathan, the son of Shemaiah, the son of
haiah, the son of Zaccur, the son of Asaph:
zarael, Milalai, Gilalai, Maai,
, and Judah, Hanani, with the musical instruments of David
 the scribe before them.
he fountain gate, which was over against them, they went
ty of David, at the going up of the wall,
ater gate eastward.
 company of them that gave thanks went over against
 half of the people upon the wall, from
eyond the tower of the furnaces even unto the broad wall; 12:39 And
gate of Ephraim, and above the old gate, and above the
Hananeel, and the tower of Meah, even unto
the prison gate.
 companies of them that gave thanks in the house
 rulers with me: 12:41 And the
liakim, Maaseiah, Miniamin, Michaiah, Elioenai, Zechariah,
ets; 12:42 And Maaseiah, and Shemaiah, and
lchijah, and Elam, and Ezer.
ers sang loud, with Jezrahiah their overseer.
eat sacrifices, and rejoiced: for
 made them rejoice with great joy: the wives also and the
t the joy of Jerusalem was heard even afar
 appointed over the chambers for the
sures, for the offerings, for the firstfruits, and for the tithes,
hem out of the fields of the cities the portions of
ites: for Judah rejoiced for the
and for the Levites that waited.
And both the singers and the porters kept the ward of their God,
e purification, according to the commandment of
2:46 For in the days of David and Asaph of old there were chief of
 songs of praise and thanksgiving unto God.
erubbabel, and in the days of
ave the portions of the singers and the porters, every day
nctified holy things unto the Levites; and the
ldren of Aaron.
ead in the book of Moses in the audience of the
en, that the Ammonite and the
uld not come into the congregation of God for ever; 13:2
hildren of Israel with bread and with water,
 should curse them: howbeit our
d the curse into a blessing.
t came to pass, when they had heard the law, that they
e mixed multitude.
, Eliashib the priest, having the oversight of the
 was allied unto Tobiah: 13:5 And he
prepared for him a great chamber, where aforetime they laid the
 frankincense, and the vessels, and the tithes of
il, which was commanded to be given
e Levites, and the singers, and the porters; and the offerings of
3:6 But in all this time was not I at Jerusalem: for in the two and
of Artaxerxes king of Babylon came I unto the king, and
 I leave of the king: 13:7 And I came to
Jerusalem, and understood of the evil that Eliashib did for Tobiah, in
m a chamber in the courts of the house of God.
fore I cast forth all the household
 to Tobiah out of the chamber.
n I commanded, and they cleansed the chambers: and thither
els of the house of God, with the meat
fering and the frankincense.
I perceived that the portions of the Levites had not been
es and the singers, that did the work, were
hen contended I with the rulers, and said, Why is the house of
gathered them together, and set them in their
h the tithe of the corn and the new wine
and the oil unto the treasuries.
And I made treasurers over the treasuries, Shelemiah the priest,
be, and of the Levites, Pedaiah: and next to them
son of Mattaniah: for they were
aithful, and their office was to distribute unto their
me, O my God, concerning this, and wipe not out my good
the house of my God, and for the offices
thereof.
udah some treading wine presses on the
bbath, and bringing in sheaves, and lading asses; as also wine,
nd all manner of burdens, which they brought into
 I testified against them in the day
ein they sold victuals.
lt men of Tyre also therein, which brought fish, and
n the sabbath unto the children of
 and in Jerusalem.
ed with the nobles of Judah, and said unto them,
, and profane the sabbath day?
not your fathers thus, and did not our God bring all this
is city? yet ye bring more wrath upon Israel
 it came to pass, that when the gates of Jerusalem began to
ath, I commanded that the gates should be shut,
 opened till after the sabbath: and
of my servants set I at the gates, that there should no burden be
 sabbath day.
d sellers of all kind of ware lodged without
 I testified against them, and said unto them, Why lodge ye
o so again, I will lay hands on you. From that
sabbath.
tes that they should cleanse themselves,
and that they should come and keep the gates, to sanctify the sabbath
ber me, O my God, concerning this also, and spare me according to
thy mercy.
 I Jews that had married wives of Ashdod,
ildren spake half in the
, and could not speak in the Jews' language, but
people.
, and cursed them, and smote certain of
hem, and plucked off their hair, and made them swear by God, saying,
ive your daughters unto their sons, nor take their
 yourselves.
 of Israel sin by these things? yet among
who was beloved of his God,
him king over all Israel: nevertheless even him did

 do all this great evil, to
ainst our God in marrying strange wives?  13:28 And one
son of Eliashib the high priest, was son in
e I chased him from me.
them, O my God, because they have defiled the
riesthood, and of the Levites.
us cleansed I them from all strangers, and appointed the wards
he Levites, every one in his business; 13:31 And
pointed, and for the firstfruits.
r me, O my God, for good.
k of Esther
n the days of Ahasuerus, (this is Ahasuerus
iopia, over an hundred and
ty provinces:) 1:2 That in those days, when the king
 his kingdom, which was in Shushan the
lace, 1:3 In the third year of his reign, he made a feast unto all
his servants; the power of Persia and Media, the
s, being before him: 1:4 When he
he riches of his glorious kingdom and the honour of his
, even an hundred and fourscore days.
:5 And when these days were expired, the king made a feast unto all
 were present in Shushan the palace, both unto great
court of the garden of the king's
 1:6 Where were white, green, and blue, hangings, fastened with
 and purple to silver rings and pillars of marble:
, upon a pavement of red, and blue,
hite, and black, marble.
ave them drink in vessels of gold, (the vessels being
d royal wine in abundance, according to
he state of the king.
ing was according to the law; none did compel: for so
 the officers of his house, that they
uld do according to every man's pleasure.
for the women in the royal
longed to king Ahasuerus.
eventh day, when the heart of the king was merry with
iztha, Harbona, Bigtha, and Abagtha,
ar, and Carcas, the seven chamberlains that served in the presence
 king, 1:11 To bring Vashti the queen before the king
 the people and the princes her beauty:
or she was fair to look on.
e queen Vashti refused to come at the king's commandment by
fore was the king very wroth, and his anger
id to the wise men, which knew the times, (for so
that knew law and judgment: 1:14 And
next unto him was Carshena, Shethar, Admatha, Tarshish, Meres,
, the seven princes of Persia and Media, which saw
he first in the kingdom;) 1:15 What
 we do unto the queen Vashti according to law, because she hath
ommandment of the king Ahasuerus by the
hamberlains?  1:16 And Memucan answered before the king and the
 queen hath not done wrong to the king only, but
l the people that are in all the
s of the king Ahasuerus.
deed of the queen shall come abroad unto all women, so
r husbands in their eyes, when it shall be
ashti the queen to be brought
im, but she came not.
ll the ladies of Persia and Media say this day unto
ave heard of the deed of the queen.
shall there arise too much contempt and wrath.
ere go a royal commandment from him,
let it be written among the laws of the Persians and the Medes,
red, That Vashti come no more before king
l estate unto another that is
 she.
hich he shall make shall be published
oughout all his empire, (for it is great,) all the wives shall give
ds honour, both to great and small.
1 And the saying pleased the king and the princes; and the king did
e word of Memucan: 1:22 For he sent letters into all
ry province according to the writing
eof, and to every people after their language, that every man
is own house, and that it should be published
ople.
wrath of king Ahasuerus was appeased,
remembered Vashti, and what she had done, and what was decreed
Then said the king's servants that ministered unto him, Let there
gins sought for the king: 2:3 And let the king
s of his kingdom, that they may
gether all the fair young virgins unto Shushan the palace, to
n, unto the custody of Hege the king's
amberlain, keeper of the women; and let their things for
: 2:4 And let the maiden which pleaseth the
 the thing pleased the king; and he did so.
as a certain Jew, whose name was
, the son of Jair, the son of Shimei, the son of Kish, a
n carried away from Jerusalem with the
ptivity which had been carried away with Jeconiah king of Judah,
r the king of Babylon had carried away.

Esther, his uncle's daughter:
 neither father nor mother, and the maid was fair and
n her father and mother were dead, took
or his own daughter.
pass, when the king's commandment and his decree was
ere gathered together unto Shushan the
lace, to the custody of Hegai, that Esther was brought also unto the
to the custody of Hegai, keeper of the women.
 she obtained kindness of him; and
edily gave her her things for purification, with such things as
d seven maidens, which were meet to be given her,
referred her and her maids unto the
place of the house of the women.
sther had not shewed her people nor her kindred: for Mordecai
she should not shew it.
ai walked every day before the court of the women's
and what should become of her.
 when every maid's turn was come to go in to king Ahasuerus,
n twelve months, according to the manner of the
ir purifications accomplished, to
x months with oil of myrrh, and six months with sweet odours,
 for the purifying of the women;) 2:13 Then thus
hatsoever she desired was given her
 with her out of the house of the women unto the king's house.
g she went, and on the morrow she returned into the
he custody of Shaashgaz, the king's
erlain, which kept the concubines: she came in unto the king no
ng delighted in her, and that she were called by
 Esther, the daughter of Abihail the uncle of
aughter, was come to go in unto
 she required nothing but what Hegai the king's chamberlain,
n, appointed. And Esther obtained favour in the
her.
 Ahasuerus into his house royal in
nth month, which is the month Tebeth, in the seventh year of his
 the king loved Esther above all the women, and she obtained
s sight more than all the virgins; so that he
d made her queen instead of
18 Then the king made a great feast unto all his princes and his
her's feast; and he made a release to the provinces,
he state of the king.
 virgins were gathered together the second time, then
te.
kindred nor her people; as Mordecai
harged her: for Esther did the commandment of Mordecai, like as
t up with him.
e Mordecai sat in the king's gate, two of the
sh, of those which kept the door,
oth, and sought to lay hands on the king Ahasuerus.
to Mordecai, who told it unto Esther the
queen; and Esther certified the king thereof in Mordecai's name.
quisition was made of the matter, it was found out;
 on a tree: and it was written in the
k of the chronicles before the king.
1 After these things did king Ahasuerus promote Haman the son of
gite, and advanced him, and set his seat above all

ere in the king's gate, bowed,
nced Haman: for the king had so commanded concerning him.
or did him reverence.
's servants, which were in the king's gate, said unto
hou the king's commandment?  3:4 Now it
ame to pass, when they spake daily unto him, and he hearkened not
hey told Haman, to see whether Mordecai's matters
 that he was a Jew.
saw that Mordecai bowed not, nor did him reverence,

 Mordecai alone; for they had
the people of Mordecai: wherefore Haman sought to destroy
roughout the whole kingdom of Ahasuerus, even
 first month, that is, the month Nisan, in the twelfth year
 cast Pur, that is, the lot, before Haman from
 to the twelfth month, that is,
 Adar.
suerus, There is a certain people
ed abroad and dispersed among the people in all the provinces
heir laws are diverse from all people; neither
 it is not for the king's profit
r them.
it be written that they may be
 and I will pay ten thousand talents of silver to the hands
charge of the business, to bring it into the
g took his ring from his hand, and gave it unto Haman
gite, the Jews' enemy.
g said unto Haman, The silver is given to thee, the
 it seemeth good to thee.
e the king's scribes called on the thirteenth day of the
 written according to all that Haman had
commanded unto the king's lieutenants, and to the governors that were
ovince, and to the rulers of every people of every
g thereof, and to every people after
r language; in the name of king Ahasuerus was it written, and
s ring.
by posts into all the king's provinces,
o destroy, to kill, and to cause to perish, all Jews, both young and
ildren and women, in one day, even upon the thirteenth
ich is the month Adar, and to take the
oil of them for a prey.
f the writing for a commandment to be given in every
l people, that they should be ready
st that day.
eing hastened by the king's commandment, and
lace. And the king and Haman sat
drink; but the city Shushan was perplexed.
as done, Mordecai rent his
ut on sackcloth with ashes, and went out into the midst
 a loud and a bitter cry; 4:2 And came even
enter into the king's gate
ackcloth.
ithersoever the king's commandment and
s decree came, there was great mourning among the Jews, and fasting,
nd wailing; and many lay in sackcloth and ashes.
amberlains came and told it her. Then
 the queen exceedingly grieved; and she sent raiment to clothe
e away his sackcloth from him: but he received it
r Hatach, one of the king's chamberlains,
 and gave him a commandment
to know what it was, and why it was.
6 So Hatach went forth to Mordecai unto the street of the city,
e king's gate.
m of all that had happened unto him, and of
mised to pay to the king's
 the Jews, to destroy them.
 gave him the copy of the writing of the decree that was
y them, to shew it unto Esther, and to
clare it unto her, and to charge her that she should go in unto the
upplication unto him, and to make request before him
ach came and told Esther the words of Mordecai.
ch, and gave him commandment unto
i; 4:11 All the king's servants, and the people of the king's
hat whosoever, whether man or women, shall come
 who is not called, there is one
is to put him to death, except such to whom the king shall
tre, that he may live: but I have not been
irty days.
ai Esther's words.
ommanded to answer Esther, Think not with thyself
g's house, more than all the Jews.
 For if thou altogether holdest thy peace at this time, then shall
t and deliverance arise to the Jews from another
ouse shall be destroyed: and who
whether thou art come to the kingdom for such a time as this?
 them return Mordecai this answer, 4:16 Go,
resent in Shushan, and fast ye
d neither eat nor drink three days, night or day: I also and
ikewise; and so will I go in unto the king,
if I perish, I perish.
 went his way, and did according to all that Esther
t came to pass on the third day, that Esther put on her royal
 the inner court of the king's house, over
at upon his royal throne in
se, over against the gate of the house.

er the queen standing in the
she obtained favour in his sight: and the king held out to
e that was in his hand. So Esther drew near,

t thou, queen Esther? and
uest? it shall be even given thee to the half of the
wered, If it seem good unto the king, let the king
 banquet that I have prepared for him.
5:5 Then the king said, Cause Haman to make haste, that he may do as
id. So the king and Haman came to the banquet that
the king said unto Esther at the banquet of wine, What is thy
l be granted thee: and what is thy request? even
l be performed.
r, and said, My petition and my request is; 5:8
 of the king, and if it please the
o grant my petition, and to perform my request, let the king and
banquet that I shall prepare for them, and I will do
d.
oyful and with a glad heart: but
an saw Mordecai in the king's gate, that he stood not up, nor
 full of indignation against Mordecai.
5:10 Nevertheless Haman refrained himself: and when he came home, he
d for his friends, and Zeresh his wife.

his riches, and the multitude
dren, and all the things wherein the king had promoted him,
 him above the princes and servants of the
Esther the queen did let no man come in
ith the king unto the banquet that she had prepared but myself; and
invited unto her also with the king.
13 Yet all this availeth me nothing, so long as I see Mordecai the
he king's gate.
is wife and all his friends unto him, Let a
nd to morrow speak thou unto
t Mordecai may be hanged thereon: then go thou in merrily
nquet. And the thing pleased Haman; and he
 that night could not the king sleep, and he commanded to bring
 of the chronicles; and they were read before the
tten, that Mordecai had told of Bigthana and
, the keepers of the door, who
lay hand on the king Ahasuerus.
 the king said, What honour and dignity hath been done to
aid the king's servants that ministered unto

t? Now Haman was come into
urt of the king's house, to speak unto the king to hang
t he had prepared for him.
king's servants said unto him, Behold, Haman standeth in
id, Let him come in.
in. And the king said unto him, What shall be done
hteth to honour? Now Haman thought in
 heart, To whom would the king delight to do honour more than to
aman answered the king, For the man whom the king
 royal apparel be brought which the
useth to wear, and the horse that the king rideth upon, and the
s set upon his head: 6:9 And let this apparel and
 one of the king's most noble
at they may array the man withal whom the king delighteth
on horseback through the street of the city,
 be done to the man whom the
eth to honour.
to Haman, Make haste, and take the apparel and
 even so to Mordecai the Jew, that
h at the king's gate: let nothing fail of all that thou hast
ook Haman the apparel and the horse, and arrayed Mordecai,
back through the street of the city, and
proclaimed before him, Thus shall it be done unto the man whom the
to honour.
 to the king's gate. But Haman hasted to
his house mourning, and having his head covered.
ife and all his friends every thing
had befallen him. Then said his wise men and Zeresh his wife unto
be of the seed of the Jews, before whom thou hast
vail against him, but shalt surely
efore him.
 talking with him, came the king's
rlains, and hasted to bring Haman unto the banquet that Esther
 So the king and Haman came to banquet with Esther the queen.
id again unto Esther on the second day at the
, queen Esther? and it shall be
hee: and what is thy request? and it shall be performed, even
ngdom.
ed and said, If I have found favour in
y sight, O king, and if it please the king, let my life be given me
 and my people at my request: 7:4 For we are sold, I
, to be slain, and to perish. But if we
ad been sold for bondmen and bondwomen, I had held my tongue,
uld not countervail the king's damage.
7:5 Then the king Ahasuerus answered and said unto Esther the queen,
 where is he, that durst presume in his heart to do so?
versary and enemy is this wicked Haman.
hen Haman was afraid before the king and the queen.
 the banquet of wine in his wrath went
to the palace garden: and Haman stood up to make request for his
 queen; for he saw that there was evil determined
hen the king returned out of the palace garden into the place of
e; and Haman was fallen upon the bed whereon Esther
e force the queen also before me in the
ouse? As the word went out of king's mouth, they covered Haman's
arbonah, one of the chamberlains, said before the king,
fty cubits high, which Haman had made for
tandeth in the house of
ing said, Hang him thereon.
y hanged Haman on the gallows that he had prepared for
s wrath pacified.
he king Ahasuerus give the house of Haman the
d Mordecai came before the king;
er had told what he was unto her.
nd the king took off his ring, which he had taken from Haman, and
ecai. And Esther set Mordecai over the house of
again before the king, and fell down at his
t away the mischief of Haman
 and his device that he had devised against the Jews.
the golden sceptre toward Esther. So Esther
nd said, If it please the king,
have favour in his sight, and the thing seem right before the
ng in his eyes, let it be written to reverse the
f Hammedatha the Agagite, which he
to destroy the Jews which are in all the king's provinces: 8:6
 to see the evil that shall come unto my people?
truction of my kindred?  8:7 Then
g Ahasuerus said unto Esther the queen and to Mordecai the Jew,
n Esther the house of Haman, and him they have
laid his hand upon the Jews.
ye also for the Jews, as it liketh you, in the king's name,
ng's ring: for the writing which is written in
 king's ring, may no man reverse.
hen were the king's scribes called at that time in the third
nth Sivan, on the three and twentieth day
all that Mordecai commanded
, and to the lieutenants, and the deputies and rulers of
om India unto Ethiopia, an hundred twenty
according to the writing
o every people after their language, and to the Jews
d according to their language.
 he wrote in the king Ahasuerus' name, and sealed it with the
 letters by posts on horseback, and riders on
 8:11 Wherein the king granted
hich were in every city to gather themselves together, and
 to destroy, to slay and to cause to perish,
ce that would assault them, both
nes and women, and to take the spoil of them for a prey, 8:12
he provinces of king Ahasuerus, namely, upon the
h, which is the month Adar.
py of the writing for a commandment to be given in every
o all people, and that the Jews should be
es on their enemies.
that rode upon mules and camels went out, being
's commandment. And the decree was
at Shushan the palace.
i went out from the presence of the king in royal
th a great crown of gold, and with a
ent of fine linen and purple: and the city of Shushan rejoiced and
6 The Jews had light, and gladness, and joy, and honour.
ce, and in every city, whithersoever the
king's commandment and his decree came, the Jews had joy and gladness,
a good day. And many of the people of the land became
s fell upon them.
h month, that is, the month Adar, on the
thirteenth day of the same, when the king's commandment and his decree
 be put in execution, in the day that the enemies of the
ver them, (though it was turned to the
ntrary, that the Jews had rule over them that hated them;) 9:2 The
emselves together in their cities throughout all the
s, to lay hand on such as sought their
rt: and no man could withstand them; for the fear of them fell upon
9:3 And all the rulers of the provinces, and the lieutenants, and the
 officers of the king, helped the Jews; because the fear
.
g's house, and his fame went out
ut all the provinces: for this man Mordecai waxed greater and
the Jews smote all their enemies with the stroke of the
estruction, and did what they would unto
those that hated them.
an the palace the Jews slew and destroyed five hundred
, and Dalphon, and Aspatha, 9:8 And Poratha, and
ashta, and Arisai, and Aridai, and
tha, 9:10 The ten sons of Haman the son of Hammedatha, the enemy
they; but on the spoil laid they not their hand.
hose that were slain in Shushan the
e was brought before the king.
 the king said unto Esther the queen, The Jews have slain and
d men in Shushan the palace, and the ten sons of
rest of the king's provinces? now
 thy petition? and it shall be granted thee: or what is thy
 shall be done.
If it please the king, let it be granted to the
morrow also according unto this
ree, and let Haman's ten sons be hanged upon the gallows.
nded it so to be done: and the decree was given
 ten sons.
in Shushan gathered themselves together on
r, and slew three hundred men
 but on the prey they laid not their hand.
he king's provinces gathered
ogether, and stood for their lives, and had rest from
eir foes seventy and five thousand, but
hey laid not their hands on the prey, 9:17 On the thirteenth day of
 and on the fourteenth day of the same rested they, and
nd gladness.
e at Shushan assembled together on the
irteenth day thereof, and on the fourteenth thereof; and on the
e same they rested, and made it a day of feasting
he Jews of the villages, that dwelt in the unwalled
of the month Adar a day of gladness and
easting, and a good day, and of sending portions one to another.
i wrote these things, and sent letters unto all the
nces of the king Ahasuerus, both nigh
 far, 9:21 To stablish this among them, that they should keep the
 the month Adar, and the fifteenth day of the same,
n the Jews rested from their enemies,
 the month which was turned unto them from sorrow to joy, and from
good day: that they should make them days of feasting
ons one to another, and gifts to the
.
they had begun, and as Mordecai
en unto them; 9:24 Because Haman the son of Hammedatha, the
ll the Jews, had devised against the Jews to
s, the lot, to consume them, and
oy them; 9:25 But when Esther came before the king, he
s wicked device, which he devised against
, and that he and his sons
ed on the gallows.
called these days Purim after the name of Pur.
s letter, and of that which they had
 concerning this matter, and which had come unto them, 9:27 The
took upon them, and upon their seed, and upon all
em, so as it should not fail, that
ould keep these two days according to their writing, and
ed time every year; 9:28 And that these days
ut every generation, every
province, and every city; and that these days of Purim
he Jews, nor the memorial of them perish
from their seed.
ueen, the daughter of Abihail, and Mordecai the
onfirm this second letter of Purim.
0 And he sent the letters unto all the Jews, to the hundred twenty
ces of the kingdom of Ahasuerus, with words of peace
se days of Purim in their times
, according as Mordecai the Jew and Esther the queen had
 had decreed for themselves and for their
ir cry.
onfirmed these matters of Purim; and it
as written in the book.
ng Ahasuerus laid a tribute upon the land, and upon the
nd all the acts of his power and of his might, and the
 of Mordecai, whereunto the king advanced
the chronicles of the kings
Persia?  10:3 For Mordecai the Jew was next unto king
e Jews, and accepted of the multitude of
his brethren, seeking the wealth of his people, and speaking peace to

as a man in the land of Uz, whose name was Job; and that
t, and one that feared God, and eschewed evil.
even sons and three daughters.
substance also was seven thousand sheep, and three thousand
d yoke of oxen, and five hundred she asses, and
s man was the greatest of all the
the east.
sted in their houses, every one his day;
and sent and called for their three sisters to eat and to drink with
nd it was so, when the days of their feasting were gone about,
nctified them, and rose up early in the morning,
ing to the number of them all: for
id, It may be that my sons have sinned, and cursed God in their
b continually.
when the sons of God came to present
selves before the LORD, and Satan came also among them.
o Satan, Whence comest thou? Then Satan
nswered the LORD, and said, From going to and fro in the earth, and
 and down in it.
unto Satan, Hast thou considered my servant Job,
 earth, a perfect and an upright
 that feareth God, and escheweth evil?  1:9 Then Satan
 Doth Job fear God for nought?  1:10 Hast
ut his house, and about all
on every side? thou hast blessed the work of his hands,
sed in the land.
ne hand now, and touch all that he hath, and he
2 And the LORD said unto Satan, Behold, all that he hath is in thy
 himself put not forth thine hand. So Satan went forth
D.
ns and his daughters were eating
king wine in their eldest brother's house: 1:14 And there came
, and said, The oxen were plowing, and the asses
Sabeans fell upon them, and took
y; yea, they have slain the servants with the edge of the
ped alone to tell thee.
as yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The
heaven, and hath burned up the sheep, and
ly am escaped alone to tell
 While he was yet speaking, there came also another, and said, The
ut three bands, and fell upon the camels, and have
n the servants with the edge of the
; and I only am escaped alone to tell thee.
 came also another, and said, Thy
d thy daughters were eating and drinking wine in their eldest
 And, behold, there came a great wind from the
rs of the house, and it fell upon
ng men, and they are dead; and I only am escaped alone to tell
ob arose, and rent his mantle, and shaved his head, and
and worshipped, 1:21 And said, Naked came I
l I return thither: the LORD
e LORD hath taken away; blessed be the name of the LORD.
ned not, nor charged God foolishly.
 Again there was a day when the sons of God came to present
ORD, and Satan came also among them to present
the LORD said unto Satan, From whence comest thou? And Satan
 said, From going to and fro in the earth, and
:3 And the LORD said unto Satan, Hast thou considered my servant Job,
 none like him in the earth, a perfect and an upright
d escheweth evil? and still he holdeth
st his integrity, although thou movedst me against him, to destroy
e.
 said, Skin for skin, yea, all
 hath will he give for his life.
t put forth thine hand now, and touch his bone and his flesh,
e to thy face.
to Satan, Behold, he is in thine hand; but
h from the presence of the LORD, and smote Job
 foot unto his crown.
im a potsherd to scrape himself withal; and he sat
n said his wife unto him, Dost thou still retain thine
ie.
akest as one of the foolish women
h. What? shall we receive good at the hand of God, and shall we
n all this did not Job sin with his lips.
 of all this evil that was come
 they came every one from his own place; Eliphaz the
te, and Zophar the Naamathite: for they
ad made an appointment together to come to mourn with him and to
12 And when they lifted up their eyes afar off, and knew him not,
eir voice, and wept; and they rent every one his
eir heads toward heaven.
at down with him upon the ground seven days and seven
 unto him: for they saw that his grief
s very great.
 his mouth, and cursed his day.
 Job spake, and said, 3:3 Let the day perish wherein I was
hich it was said, There is a man child
nceived.
let not God regard it from above,
 let the light shine upon it.
arkness and the shadow of death stain it; let a cloud dwell
ess of the day terrify it.
hat night, let darkness seize upon it; let it not be
ar, let it not come into the number of
e months.
itary, let no joyful voice come therein.

, who are ready to raise up
g.
ereof be dark; let it look for
 have none; neither let it see the dawning of the day: 3:10
the doors of my mother's womb, nor hid sorrow
t from the womb? why did I not give up the ghost
2 Why did the knees prevent me? or
e breasts that I should suck?  3:13 For now should I have lain
, I should have slept: then had I been at rest,
the earth, which build desolate
r themselves; 3:15 Or with princes that had gold, who filled
er: 3:16 Or as an hidden untimely birth I had
light.
 troubling; and there the weary be at
t.
er; they hear not the voice of the
sor.
; and the servant is free from his
.
that is in misery, and life unto
er in soul; 3:21 Which long for death, but it cometh not; and
for hid treasures; 3:22 Which rejoice
eedingly, and are glad, when they can find the grave?  3:23 Why is
 man whose way is hid, and whom God hath hedged in?
re I eat, and my roarings are poured
like the waters.
ch I greatly feared is come upon me, and that
.
 I rest, neither was I quiet; yet
 came.
swered and said, 4:2 If we assay to
ne with thee, wilt thou be grieved? but who can withhold himself
3 Behold, thou hast instructed many, and thou hast
4:4 Thy words have upholden him that was falling, and thou hast
eble knees.
 thee, and thou faintest; it toucheth thee,
is thy fear, thy confidence, thy hope, and the
er, I pray thee, who ever
 innocent? or where were the righteous cut off?  4:8
 plow iniquity, and sow wickedness, reap
the same.
perish, and by the breath of his nostrils
 the lion, and the voice of the fierce lion, and
broken.
 lack of prey, and the stout lion's
s are scattered abroad.
g was secretly brought to me, and mine ear received a
oughts from the visions of the night, when deep sleep
e upon me, and trembling, which made all
my bones to shake.
assed before my face; the hair of my flesh stood
ld not discern the form thereof: an
 was before mine eyes, there was silence, and I heard a voice,
ortal man be more just than God? shall a man be
old, he put no trust in his
 his angels he charged with folly: 4:19 How much less in
of clay, whose foundation is in the dust,
They are destroyed from
g: they perish for ever without any regarding it.
which is in them go away? they die,
without wisdom.
be any that will answer thee; and to which of
rath killeth the foolish man, and
ayeth the silly one.
e foolish taking root: but suddenly I cursed his
e far from safety, and they are crushed in the
r them.
teth up, and taketh it even out of the
orns, and the robber swalloweth up their substance.
h not forth of the dust, neither doth
uble spring out of the ground; 5:7 Yet man is born unto trouble, as
upward.
unto God would I commit my cause: 5:9
ch doeth great things and unsearchable; marvellous things without
giveth rain upon the earth, and sendeth waters upon
igh those that be low; that those which
ourn may be exalted to safety.
disappointeth the devices of the crafty, so that their hands
nterprise.
heir own craftiness: and the counsel of
he froward is carried headlong.
ey meet with darkness in the day time, and grope in the noonday

d, from their mouth, and from
 the mighty.
, and iniquity stoppeth her mouth.
 Behold, happy is the man whom God correcteth: therefore despise
ening of the Almighty: 5:18 For he maketh sore, and
s hands make whole.
er thee in six troubles: yea, in seven there shall
amine he shall redeem thee from death: and in war from the
:21 Thou shalt be hid from the scourge of the tongue: neither shalt
of destruction when it cometh.
destruction and famine thou shalt laugh: neither shalt thou be
 of the earth.
n league with the stones of the field: and the
e with thee.
hat thy tabernacle shall be in peace; and
t not sin.
at thy seed shall be great, and thine
spring as the grass of the earth.
Thou shalt come to thy grave in a full age, like as a shock of
s season.
d it, so it is; hear it, and know thou it
 said, 6:2 Oh that my grief were throughly
ances together!  6:3 For now
heavier than the sand of the sea: therefore my words are
he arrows of the Almighty are within me, the poison whereof
the terrors of God do set themselves in array
bray when he hath grass? or loweth the ox over
nsavoury be eaten without salt? or
re any taste in the white of an egg?  6:7 The things that my
are as my sorrowful meat.
 might have my request; and that God would grant me the
 Even that it would please God to destroy
 cut me off!  6:10 Then
 comfort; yea, I would harden myself in sorrow: let
oncealed the words of the Holy One.
1 What is my strength, that I should hope? and what is mine end,
ong my life?  6:12 Is my strength the strength of
 6:13 Is not my help in me? and is
 driven quite from me?  6:14 To him that is afflicted pity
s friend; but he forsaketh the fear of the
 deceitfully as a brook, and as the stream
 blackish by reason of the
in the snow is hid: 6:17 What time they wax warm, they
 are consumed out of their place.
The paths of their way are turned aside; they go to nothing, and
e troops of Tema looked, the companies of Sheba waited for
confounded because they had hoped; they came thither,
 now ye are nothing; ye see my casting down, and are afraid.
g unto me? or, Give a reward for me of your
e enemy's hand? or, Redeem me
nd of the mighty?  6:24 Teach me, and I will hold my
tand wherein I have erred.
cible are right words! but what doth your arguing reprove?
prove words, and the speeches of one that is
a, ye overwhelm the fatherless,
g a pit for your friend.
fore be content, look upon me; for it is evident unto
 I pray you, let it not be iniquity; yea, return again, my

nnot my taste discern perverse
:1 Is there not an appointed time to man upon earth? are not
 days of an hireling?  7:2 As a servant
arnestly desireth the shadow, and as an hireling looketh for the
: 7:3 So am I made to possess months of vanity, and
to me.
 shall I arise, and the night be gone?
d I am full of tossings to and fro unto the dawning of the day.
lothed with worms and clods of dust; my skin is
6 My days are swifter than a weaver's shuttle, and are spent without
 remember that my life is wind: mine eye shall no more see good.
im that hath seen me shall see me no more: thine eyes

h away: so he that goeth down
e shall come up no more.
return no more to his house, neither shall his place
refore I will not refrain my mouth; I will speak in the
l complain in the bitterness of my soul.

ettest a watch over me?  7:13
 My bed shall comfort me, my couch shall ease my
 me with dreams, and terrifiest me
h visions: 7:15 So that my soul chooseth strangling, and death

ay: let me alone; for my days

magnify him? and that thou
thine heart upon him?  7:18 And that thou shouldest
y him every moment?  7:19 How long wilt
hou not depart from me, nor let me alone till I swallow down my
ve sinned; what shall I do unto thee, O thou
e as a mark against thee, so
burden to myself?  7:21 And why dost thou not pardon my
y my iniquity? for now shall I sleep in the
ning, but I shall not be.
ered Bildad the Shuhite, and said, 8:2 How long wilt thou
ow long shall the words of thy mouth be like
udgment? or doth the Almighty
tice?  8:4 If thy children have sinned against him, and he
their transgression; 8:5 If thou wouldest seek
ication to the Almighty; 8:6 If
 pure and upright; surely now he would awake for thee, and
hy righteousness prosperous.
 thy beginning was small, yet thy latter end should greatly
quire, I pray thee, of the former age, and prepare thyself
athers: 8:9 (For we are but of yesterday, and
arth are a shadow:) 8:10 Shall
each thee, and tell thee, and utter words out of their
ow up without mire? can the flag grow
hout water?  8:12 Whilst it is yet in his greenness, and not cut
 before any other herb.
 paths of all that forget God; and the hypocrite's hope
pe shall be cut off, and whose trust shall
 upon his house, but it shall not stand: he shall
dure.
and his branch shooteth forth in his
en.
e heap, and seeth the place of

en it shall deny him, saying,
seen thee.
 of his way, and out of the earth shall
thers grow.
ast away a perfect man, neither will he
elp the evil doers: 8:21 Till he fill thy mouth with laughing, and
joicing.
 be clothed with shame; and the dwelling
place of the wicked shall come to nought.
now it is so of a truth: but
an be just with God?  9:3 If he will contend with him, he
a thousand.
d mighty in strength: who hath hardened
imself against him, and hath prospered?  9:5 Which removeth the
 know not: which overturneth them in his anger.
f her place, and the pillars thereof
ble.
it riseth not; and sealeth up the

ns, and treadeth upon the waves
a.
d Pleiades, and the chambers of
.
nding out; yea, and wonders
r.
im not: he passeth on also, but I
e him not.
 who can hinder him? who will say unto
m, What doest thou?  9:13 If God will not withdraw his anger, the
stoop under him.
ll I answer him, and choose out my words to
ere righteous, yet would I not
t I would make supplication to my judge.

d me; yet would I not believe
 hearkened unto my voice.
reaketh me with a tempest, and multiplieth my wounds
 not suffer me to take my breath, but filleth me with
k of strength, lo, he is strong: and if of judgment, who
ad?  9:20 If I justify myself, mine own
outh shall condemn me: if I say, I am perfect, it shall also prove me
9:21 Though I were perfect, yet would I not know my soul: I would

d it, He destroyeth the perfect
icked.
y, he will laugh at the trial of the
cent.
hand of the wicked: he covereth the
 of the judges thereof; if not, where, and who is he?  9:25 Now
 than a post: they flee away, they see no good.
swift ships: as the eagle that
 the prey.
 my complaint, I will leave off my
ess, and comfort myself: 9:28 I am afraid of all my sorrows, I
not hold me innocent.
ed, why then labour I in vain?  9:30 If I wash myself
hands never so clean; 9:31 Yet shalt thou
hes shall abhor me.
a man, as I am, that I should answer him, and we

xt us, that might lay his hand
th.
 me, and let not his fear terrify
5 Then would I speak, and not fear him; but it is not so with
s weary of my life; I will leave my complaint upon
erness of my soul.
 God, Do not condemn me; shew me wherefore thou
ood unto thee that thou shouldest oppress, that thou
thine hands, and shine upon the counsel
f the wicked?  10:4 Hast thou eyes of flesh? or seest thou as man
thy days as the days of man? are thy years as man's
after mine iniquity, and searchest
my sin?  10:7 Thou knowest that I am not wicked; and there is
 out of thine hand.
ve made me and fashioned me together round about;
 Remember, I beseech thee, that thou hast made me as the clay; and
me into dust again?  10:10 Hast thou not poured me out
 cheese?  10:11 Thou hast clothed me with
ones and sinews.
d me life and favour, and thy visitation hath
se things hast thou hid in thine heart: I know that this
I sin, then thou markest me, and thou wilt not acquit me from
15 If I be wicked, woe unto me; and if I be righteous, yet will I
ad. I am full of confusion; therefore see thou mine
seth. Thou huntest me as a fierce lion:
nd again thou shewest thyself marvellous upon me.
es against me, and increasest thine
nation upon me; changes and war are against me.
ought me forth out of the womb? Oh
 had given up the ghost, and no eye had seen me!  10:19 I should
h I had not been; I should have been carried from
re not my days few? cease then, and let me alone, that I may
 10:21 Before I go whence I shall not return,
shadow of death; 10:22 A land of
, as darkness itself; and of the shadow of death, without any
light is as darkness.
d Zophar the Naamathite, and said, 11:2 Should not
ed? and should a man full of talk be
ified?  11:3 Should thy lies make men hold their peace? and when
l no man make thee ashamed?  11:4 For thou hast
 clean in thine eyes.
God would speak, and open his lips against thee; 11:6
he secrets of wisdom, that they are
e to that which is! Know therefore that God exacteth of thee less
ty deserveth.
ing find out God? canst thou find out the
high as heaven; what canst
r than hell; what canst thou know?  11:9 The measure
th, and broader than the sea.
he cut off, and shut up, or gather together, then who can
 knoweth vain men: he seeth wickedness also;
or vain men would be wise,
born like a wild ass's colt.
hou prepare thine heart, and stretch out thine hands toward
be in thine hand, put it far away, and let not

face without spot; yea, thou
dfast, and shalt not fear: 11:16 Because thou shalt forget
 it as waters that pass away: 11:17 And thine
: thou shalt shine forth, thou
s the morning.
secure, because there is hope; yea, thou shalt
thy rest in safety.
lt lie down, and none shall make thee afraid; yea,

fail, and they shall not
r hope shall be as the giving up of the ghost.
:2 No doubt but ye are the people,
sdom shall die with you.
e understanding as well as you; I am not inferior to
 things as these?  12:4 I am as one
d of his neighbour, who calleth upon God, and he answereth him:
n is laughed to scorn.
ready to slip with his feet is as a lamp despised in
ease.
rosper, and they that provoke God are
ure; into whose hand God bringeth abundantly.
ey shall teach thee; and the fowls
 air, and they shall tell thee: 12:8 Or speak to the earth, and
: and the fishes of the sea shall declare unto
 these that the hand of the LORD hath
ught this?  12:10 In whose hand is the soul of every living thing,
f all mankind.
ry words? and the mouth taste his meat?  12:12
ength of days understanding.
 him is wisdom and strength, he hath counsel and
 breaketh down, and it cannot be built again: he
e no opening.
eth the waters, and they dry up: also he
sendeth them out, and they overturn the earth.
dom: the deceived and the deceiver
s.
oiled, and maketh the judges
:18 He looseth the bond of kings, and girdeth their loins with a
e leadeth princes away spoiled, and overthroweth the mighty.
ay the speech of the trusty, and taketh away the
1 He poureth contempt upon princes, and weakeneth the strength of
:22 He discovereth deep things out of darkness, and bringeth out to
w of death.
ions, and destroyeth them: he enlargeth the

ef of the people of the
h them to wander in a wilderness where there is no
dark without light, and he maketh them to
ine eye hath seen all this, mine ear hath heard and
know, the same do I know also: I am not inferior unto
peak to the Almighty, and I desire to reason with
f lies, ye are all physicians of no value.
our peace! and it should be your

 to the pleadings of my lips.
 ye speak wickedly for God? and talk deceitfully for him?
erson? will ye contend for God?  13:9 Is it
as one man mocketh another, do
 him?  13:10 He will surely reprove you, if ye do secretly
 Shall not his excellency make you afraid? and his dread fall
 remembrances are like unto ashes, your bodies to
r peace, let me alone, that I may speak, and let come on
refore do I take my flesh in my teeth, and put my life in
he slay me, yet will I trust in him: but I

r an hypocrite shall not come

y declaration with your ears.
old now, I have ordered my cause; I know that I shall be
 he that will plead with me? for now, if I hold my tongue,
t.
: then will I not hide myself from

and let not thy dread make me
13:22 Then call thou, and I will answer: or let me speak, and answer
:23 How many are mine iniquities and sins? make me to know my
sin.
ce, and holdest me for thine enemy?
 Wilt thou break a leaf driven to and fro? and wilt thou pursue
3:26 For thou writest bitter things against me, and
ties of my youth.
 feet also in the stocks, and lookest narrowly
int upon the heels of my feet.
d he, as a rotten thing, consumeth, as a garment that is moth
at is born of a woman is of few days and full of trouble.
ke a flower, and is cut down: he fleeth also as
:3 And doth thou open thine eyes upon such an one, and bringest me
th thee?  14:4 Who can bring a clean thing out of an
ng his days are determined, the number of his months are with
nted his bounds that he cannot pass; 14:6 Turn
shall accomplish, as an hireling,
.
it be cut down, that it will
, and that the tender branch thereof will not cease.
 wax old in the earth, and the stock
eof die in the ground; 14:9 Yet through the scent of water it will
orth boughs like a plant.
 dieth, and wasteth away: yea, man giveth up the ghost,
the waters fail from the sea, and the flood
eth down, and riseth not: till
s be no more, they shall not awake, nor be raised out of
at thou wouldest hide me in the grave, that thou wouldest
 wrath be past, that thou wouldest appoint me
f a man die, shall he live again?
 days of my appointed time will I wait, till my change come.
l, and I will answer thee: thou wilt have a desire
4:16 For now thou numberest my steps: dost thou not watch over my
ansgression is sealed up in a bag, and thou sewest up
urely the mountains falling cometh to nought, and the rock
ace.
thou washest away the things which
ut of the dust of the earth; and thou destroyest the hope of
vailest for ever against him, and he passeth: thou
ndest him away.
honour, and he knoweth it not; and they are
f them.
all have pain, and his soul within him
all mourn.
he Temanite, and said, 15:2 Should a wise
lly with the east wind?  15:3
eason with unprofitable talk? or with speeches wherewith he
ea, thou castest off fear, and restrainest
 uttereth thine iniquity, and thou choosest the
 own mouth condemneth thee, and not I: yea, thine own lips

? or wast thou made before
:8 Hast thou heard the secret of God? and dost thou
:9 What knowest thou, that we know not?
hat understandest thou, which is not in us?  15:10 With us are both
and very aged men, much elder than thy father.
small with thee? is there any secret
g with thee?  15:12 Why doth thine heart carry thee away? and what
 at, 15:13 That thou turnest thy spirit against God,
of thy mouth?  15:14 What is man, that
 should be clean? and he which is born of a woman, that he should be
:15 Behold, he putteth no trust in his saints; yea, the
s sight.
 and filthy is man, which drinketh
ty like water?  15:17 I will shew thee, hear me; and that which
declare; 15:18 Which wise men have told from their
:19 Unto whom alone the earth was
and no stranger passed among them.
0 The wicked man travaileth with pain all his days, and the number
en to the oppressor.
ound is in his ears: in prosperity the destroyer
elieveth not that he shall return out of darkness, and he is
d.
 saying, Where is it? he knoweth
 day of darkness is ready at his hand.
15:24 Trouble and anguish shall make him afraid; they shall prevail
 a king ready to the battle.
he stretcheth out his hand against God, and strengtheneth
hty.
 his neck, upon the thick bosses of
ucklers: 15:27 Because he covereth his face with his fatness, and
 fat on his flanks.
th in desolate cities, and in houses which no man
come heaps.
 neither shall his substance continue,
ither shall he prolong the perfection thereof upon the earth.
depart out of darkness; the flame shall dry up his
is mouth shall he go away.
t him that is deceived trust in vanity: for vanity shall
2 It shall be accomplished before his time, and his branch shall
5:33 He shall shake off his unripe grape as the vine, and shall cast
 as the olive.
on of hypocrites shall be desolate, and fire
ry.
ring forth vanity, and their belly
eth deceit.
said, 16:2 I have heard many such things:
Shall vain words have an end? or what emboldeneth thee that thou
 also could speak as ye do: if your soul were in my
ords against you, and shake mine head
you.
th my mouth, and the moving of my
ould asswage your grief.
speak, my grief is not asswaged: and though I forbear,
ow he hath made me weary: thou hast made
desolate all my company.
hast filled me with wrinkles, which is a witness against
 up in me beareth witness to my face.
6:9 He teareth me in his wrath, who hateth me: he gnasheth upon me
mine enemy sharpeneth his eyes upon me.

mouth; they have smitten me
k reproachfully; they have gathered themselves together
th delivered me to the ungodly, and turned me over into

e asunder: he hath also taken
ck, and shaken me to pieces, and set me up for his mark.
s me round about, he cleaveth my reins
under, and doth not spare; he poureth out my gall upon the ground.
eth me with breach upon breach, he runneth upon me like
wed sackcloth upon my skin, and defiled my horn in the
ul with weeping, and on my eyelids is the shadow of
ice in mine hands: also my prayer is
.
d, and let my cry have no place.
Also now, behold, my witness is in heaven, and my record is on
iends scorn me: but mine eye poureth out tears unto God.
lead for a man with God, as a man pleadeth for
rs are come, then I shall go the
ce I shall not return.
s corrupt, my days are extinct, the graves are ready
mockers with me? and doth not mine eye continue in
n now, put me in a surety with thee;
is he that will strike hands with me?  17:4 For thou hast hid
rstanding: therefore shalt thou not exalt them.
 his friends, even the eyes of his
en shall fail.
o a byword of the people; and aforetime I was
 dim by reason of sorrow, and all my members are
hall be astonied at this, and the innocent shall
ite.
 on his way, and he that hath clean
 shall be stronger and stronger.
But as for you all, do ye return, and come now: for I cannot
g you.
ses are broken off, even the thoughts
my heart.
nto day: the light is short because of
rkness.
ine house: I have made my bed in the
ness.
Thou art my father: to the worm, Thou
 my mother, and my sister.
ere is now my hope? as for my hope, who shall see it?
he bars of the pit, when our rest
r is in the dust.
ldad the Shuhite, and said, 18:2 How long will it
ark, and afterwards we will speak.
 Wherefore are we counted as beasts, and reputed vile in your
th himself in his anger: shall the earth be
e removed out of his place?
 light of the wicked shall be put out, and the spark of

rnacle, and his candle shall
ith him.
 shall be straitened, and his own
 shall cast him down.
st into a net by his own feet, and he walketh upon a
ake him by the heel, and the robber shall prevail
s laid for him in the ground, and a trap for him in
 make him afraid on every side, and shall drive him
gth shall be hungerbitten, and destruction shall be
shall devour the strength of his skin: even the firstborn of
 strength.
e rooted out of his tabernacle, and it
all bring him to the king of terrors.
8:15 It shall dwell in his tabernacle, because it is none of his:
e scattered upon his habitation.
His roots shall be dried up beneath, and above shall his branch
7 His remembrance shall perish from the earth, and he shall have
eet.
t into darkness, and chased out of
rld.
r nephew among his people, nor any
ing in his dwellings.
ome after him shall be astonied at his day, as they
d.
of the wicked, and this is the
im that knoweth not God.
answered and said, 19:2 How long will ye vex my soul,
ords?  19:3 These ten times have ye
ached me: ye are not ashamed that ye make yourselves strange to
it indeed that I have erred, mine error remaineth with
 will magnify yourselves against me, and plead
w that God hath overthrown me, and
ompassed me with his net.
I cry out of wrong, but I am not heard: I cry aloud, but
9:8 He hath fenced up my way that I cannot pass, and he hath set
hs.
y, and taken the crown from my
9:10 He hath destroyed me on every side, and I am gone: and mine hope
ed like a tree.
led his wrath against me, and he counteth me
12 His troops come together, and raise up their way against me, and
out my tabernacle.
 brethren far from me, and mine acquaintance are
 My kinsfolk have failed, and my familiar friends have forgotten
that dwell in mine house, and my maids, count me for a
heir sight.
and he gave me no answer; I intreated him
nge to my wife, though I intreated for the
18 Yea, young children despised me; I arose, and they spake against
l my inward friends abhorred me: and they whom I loved are
:20 My bone cleaveth to my skin and to my flesh, and I am escaped
my teeth.
 pity upon me, O ye my friends; for the
and of God hath touched me.
o ye persecute me as God, and are not satisfied with my
rds were now written! oh that they were
rinted in a book!  19:24 That they were graven with an iron pen and
k for ever!  19:25 For I know that my redeemer liveth,
he latter day upon the earth: 19:26 And
hough after my skin worms destroy this body, yet in my flesh shall I
 Whom I shall see for myself, and mine eyes shall
y reins be consumed within me.
t ye should say, Why persecute we him, seeing the root of the
?  19:29 Be ye afraid of the sword: for wrath
, that ye may know there is a

, and said, 20:2 Therefore do
 cause me to answer, and for this I make haste.
 reproach, and the spirit of my
ding causeth me to answer.
 thou not this of old, since man was placed upon earth,
 the wicked is short, and the joy of the
hypocrite but for a moment?  20:6 Though his excellency mount up to
d his head reach unto the clouds; 20:7 Yet he shall
ng: they which have seen him shall say,
here is he?  20:8 He shall fly away as a dream, and shall not be
ll be chased away as a vision of the night.
 see him no more; neither shall
 any more behold him.
n shall seek to please the poor, and his hands shall
His bones are full of the sin of his youth, which shall lie down
st.
 his mouth, though he hide it under
ongue; 20:13 Though he spare it, and forsake it not; but keep it
outh: 20:14 Yet his meat in his bowels is turned, it
.
and he shall vomit them up again:
ll cast them out of his belly.
 shall suck the poison of asps: the viper's tongue shall slay
l not see the rivers, the floods, the brooks of honey and
ch he laboured for shall he restore, and shall not
s substance shall the restitution be,
 he shall not rejoice therein.
cause he hath oppressed and hath forsaken the poor; because he
 away an house which he builded not; 20:20 Surely
s belly, he shall not save of that
he desired.
is meat be left; therefore shall no man
ook for his goods.
 of his sufficiency he shall be in straits: every
n him.
is belly, God shall cast the fury of
wrath upon him, and shall rain it upon him while he is eating.
e from the iron weapon, and the bow of steel shall
is drawn, and cometh out of the body; yea, the glittering
all: terrors are upon him.
rkness shall be hid in his secret places: a fire not blown
all go ill with him that is left in his
abernacle.
l his iniquity; and the earth shall rise
up against him.
is house shall depart, and his goods shall flow
:29 This is the portion of a wicked man from God, and the heritage
im by God.
id, 21:2 Hear diligently my speech, and
et this be your consolations.
er me that I may speak; and after that I have spoken, mock
s my complaint to man? and if it were so, why should
:5 Mark me, and be astonished, and lay
ur hand upon your mouth.
 I remember I am afraid, and trembling taketh hold on my
o the wicked live, become old, yea, are mighty in
ished in their sight with them, and
 offspring before their eyes.
r houses are safe from fear, neither is the rod of God upon
ll gendereth, and faileth not; their cow calveth, and
1 They send forth their little ones like a flock, and their
2 They take the timbrel and harp, and rejoice at the sound of the
hey spend their days in wealth, and in a moment go down to the
efore they say unto God, Depart from us; for we desire not
s.
should serve him? and what profit
we have, if we pray unto him?  21:16 Lo, their good is not in
el of the wicked is far from me.
How oft is the candle of the wicked put out! and how oft cometh
pon them! God distributeth sorrows in his anger.
 the wind, and as chaff that the storm
rrieth away.
iquity for his children: he rewardeth him,
shall see his destruction, and he shall drink of the
1 For what pleasure hath he in his house after him, when the
s cut off in the midst?  21:22 Shall any teach
se that are high.
s full strength, being wholly at ease and quiet.
lk, and his bones are moistened with
ow.
erness of his soul, and never
 pleasure.
ike in the dust, and the worms shall cover
hts, and the devices which ye
imagine against me.
here is the house of the prince? and where are the
21:29 Have ye not asked them that go
he way? and do ye not know their tokens, 21:30 That the wicked is
ay of destruction? they shall be brought forth to the
all declare his way to his face? and who shall repay him
Yet shall he be brought to the grave, and
ods of the valley shall be sweet unto him, and every man
here are innumerable before him.
How then comfort ye me in vain, seeing in your answers there
22:1 Then Eliphaz the Temanite answered and
 God, as he that is wise may be
e unto himself?  22:3 Is it any pleasure to the Almighty,
or is it gain to him, that thou makest thy
 for fear of thee? will he
e into judgment?  22:5 Is not thy wickedness great? and
 22:6 For thou hast taken a pledge from thy
ked of their clothing.
ot given water to the weary to drink, and thou hast
y.
ad the earth; and the honourable
t in it.
y empty, and the arms of the fatherless
ave been broken.
 are round about thee, and sudden fear troubleth
 canst not see; and abundance of
over thee.
ht of heaven? and behold the height of the
u sayest, How doth God know?
 through the dark cloud?  22:14 Thick clouds are a
ot; and he walketh in the circuit of
en.
which wicked men have trodden?
h were cut down out of time, whose foundation was overflown
ch said unto God, Depart from us: and what can
 he filled their houses with good
 but the counsel of the wicked is far from me.
e glad: and the innocent laugh them
orn.
 cut down, but the remnant of them
re consumeth.
f with him, and be at peace: thereby good
 pray thee, the law from his mouth, and lay up his
f thou return to the Almighty, thou shalt be built up, thou
 far from thy tabernacles.
halt thou lay up gold as dust, and the gold of Ophir as

ence, and thou shalt have
r.
elight in the Almighty, and shalt
 thy face unto God.
ke thy prayer unto him, and he shall hear thee, and
28 Thou shalt also decree a thing, and it shall be established unto
ight shall shine upon thy ways.
hen men are cast down, then thou shalt say, There is lifting
the humble person.
er the island of the innocent: and it is delivered

ven to day is my complaint
oke is heavier than my groaning.
h that I knew where I might find him! that I might come even to
ould order my cause before him, and fill my mouth
now the words which he would answer me, and understand

reat power? No; but he would
 in me.
dispute with him; so should I be
d for ever from my judge.
I go forward, but he is not there; and backward, but I
 the left hand, where he doth work, but I
he right hand, that I cannot
10 But he knoweth the way that I take: when he hath tried
 gold.
s, his way have I kept, and not

e commandment of his lips; I
d the words of his mouth more than my necessary food.
, and who can turn him? and what his soul
r he performeth the thing that is appointed for me: and many
im.
s presence: when I consider, I am
of him.
oft, and the Almighty troubleth me:
 Because I was not cut off before the darkness, neither hath he
s from my face.
are not hidden from the Almighty, do they that
e remove the landmarks; they
ke away flocks, and feed thereof.
They drive away the ass of the fatherless, they take the widow's

 the poor of the earth hide
gether.
he desert, go they forth to their work;
ising betimes for a prey: the wilderness yieldeth food for them and
ren.
in the field: and they gather the
 of the wicked.
ed to lodge without clothing, that they have no
are wet with the showers of the mountains, and embrace the
er.
 the breast, and take a pledge of
r.
hout clothing, and they take away
af from the hungry; 24:11 Which make oil within their walls,
esses, and suffer thirst.
an from out of the city, and the soul of the wounded
 folly to them.
 that rebel against the light; they know not
hs thereof.
ith the light killeth the poor and needy,
The eye also of the adulterer waiteth for the twilight, saying,
: and disguiseth his face.
 dark they dig through houses, which they had marked for
 they know not the light.
 morning is to them even as the shadow of death: if one
terrors of the shadow of death.
e is swift as the waters; their portion is cursed in the earth:
e way of the vineyards.
nd heat consume the snow waters: so doth the grave
0 The womb shall forget him; the worm shall feed sweetly on him;
e remembered; and wickedness shall be broken as a
 the barren that beareth not: and doeth not
also the mighty with his power: he riseth up, and no
Though it be given him to be in safety, whereon he resteth; yet
heir ways.
 little while, but are gone and brought
ow; they are taken out of the way as all other, and cut off as the
 of corn.
, who will make me a liar, and make my
eech nothing worth?  25:1 Then answered Bildad the Shuhite, and
 and fear are with him, he maketh peace in his high
mber of his armies? and upon whom doth not his
be justified with God? or how can
lean that is born of a woman?  25:5 Behold even to the moon,
a, the stars are not pure in his sight.

nd the son of man, which is a
 But Job answered and said, 26:2 How hast thou helped him
w savest thou the arm that hath no strength?
 hath no wisdom? and how hast
fully declared the thing as it is?  26:4 To whom hast thou
 spirit came from thee?  26:5 Dead things are
 inhabitants thereof.
d before him, and destruction hath no covering.
over the empty place, and hangeth the
th upon nothing.
 waters in his thick clouds; and the cloud is
th back the face of his throne, and spreadeth his cloud
ompassed the waters with bounds, until the day and
he pillars of heaven tremble and are astonished at his reproof.
 the sea with his power, and by his understanding he
26:13 By his spirit he hath garnished the heavens; his hand hath
 serpent.
his ways: but how little a portion is
rd of him? but the thunder of his power who can understand?  27:1
inued his parable, and said, 27:2 As God liveth, who
nd the Almighty, who hath vexed my soul;
27:3 All the while my breath is in me, and the spirit of God is in my
4 My lips shall not speak wickedness, nor my tongue utter
d that I should justify you: till I die I will not

ill not let it go: my heart
roach me so long as I live.
ne enemy be as the wicked, and he that riseth up against me
27:8 For what is the hope of the hypocrite, though he hath gained,
away his soul?  27:9 Will God hear his cry when
l he delight himself in the
l he always call upon God?  27:11 I will teach you by the
s with the Almighty will I not conceal.

 it; why then are ye thus
?  27:13 This is the portion of a wicked man with God,
rs, which they shall receive of the
hty.
d, it is for the sword: and his
 shall not be satisfied with bread.
15 Those that remain of him shall be buried in death: and his
.
 dust, and prepare raiment as the
7:17 He may prepare it, but the just shall put it on, and the
 the silver.
e as a moth, and as a booth that the keeper
 down, but he shall not be gathered: he
peneth his eyes, and he is not.
errors take hold on him as waters, a tempest stealeth him away
21 The east wind carrieth him away, and he departeth: and as a
t of his place.
t upon him, and not spare: he would fain flee
lap their hands at him, and shall hiss him out of his
s a vein for the silver, and a place for gold where
aken out of the earth, and brass is molten out of the
end to darkness, and searcheth out all perfection:
shadow of death.
h out from the inhabitant; even the waters
, they are gone away from men.
for the earth, out of it cometh bread: and under it is turned

apphires: and it hath dust of
:7 There is a path which no fowl knoweth, and which the vulture's
: 28:8 The lion's whelps have not trodden it, nor the
28:9 He putteth forth his hand upon the rock; he overturneth the
oots.
 the rocks; and his eye seeth every
ous thing.
from overflowing; and the thing that is
id bringeth he forth to light.
t where shall wisdom be found? and where is the place of
knoweth not the price thereof; neither is it
:14 The depth saith, It is not in me: and the sea saith, It is not
5 It cannot be gotten for gold, neither shall silver be weighed
of.
gold of Ophir, with the precious
 the sapphire.
rystal cannot equal it: and the exchange of it
.
al, or of pearls: for the price
 is above rubies.
hiopia shall not equal it, neither shall it be
ce then cometh wisdom? and where is the place of
 hid from the eyes of all living,
t close from the fowls of the air.
2 Destruction and death say, We have heard the fame thereof with
 God understandeth the way thereof, and he knoweth the place
he looketh to the ends of the earth, and seeth under the
e the weight for the winds; and he weigheth
 made a decree for the rain, and a way for the lightning
 did he see it, and declare it; he prepared
And unto man he said, Behold, the fear of the LORD, that is
rom evil is understanding.
r Job continued his parable, and said, 29:2 Oh that I were
 the days when God preserved me; 29:3 When his
 by his light I walked through
29:4 As I was in the days of my youth, when the secret of
e; 29:5 When the Almighty was yet with me,
n I washed my steps with
rock poured me out rivers of oil; 29:7 When I went out
, when I prepared my seat in the street!
29:8 The young men saw me, and hid themselves: and the aged arose, and

aid their hand on their
he nobles held their peace, and their tongue cleaved to the

sed me; and when the eye saw
witness to me: 29:12 Because I delivered the poor that
nd him that had none to help him.
 The blessing of him that was ready to perish came upon me: and I
s heart to sing for joy.
 righteousness, and it clothed me: my judgment was as a
 I was eyes to the blind, and feet was I to the lame.
 poor: and the cause which I knew not I
earched out.
 of the wicked, and plucked the spoil out of
ll die in my nest, and I shall multiply my
pread out by the waters, and the dew lay all night
y was fresh in me, and my bow was renewed in my hand.
 and waited, and kept silence at my
el.
 again; and my speech dropped upon

 rain; and they opened their
s for the latter rain.
ed on them, they believed it not; and the light of my
n.
 chief, and dwelt as a king in the
as one that comforteth the mourners.
:1 But now they that are younger than I have me in derision, whose
have disdained to have set with the dogs of my flock.
 strength of their hands profit me, in whom
d famine they were solitary;
 the wilderness in former time desolate and waste.
 bushes, and juniper roots for their
.
g men, (they cried after them as
thief;) 30:6 To dwell in the cliffs of the valleys, in caves
he rocks.
ayed; under the nettles they were
d together.
fools, yea, children of base men: they were
m I their song, yea, I am their byword.

e, and spare not to spit in
0:11 Because he hath loosed my cord, and afflicted me, they have also
 bridle before me.
hand rise the youth; they push away my feet, and
of their destruction.
 path, they set forward my calamity, they have no
e as a wide breaking in of waters: in the
.
y pursue my soul as the wind: and
are passeth away as a cloud.
now my soul is poured out upon me; the days of affliction

 night season: and my sinews
.
e is my garment changed: it
out as the collar of my coat.
hath cast me into the mire, and I am become like dust and
o thee, and thou dost not hear me: I stand up, and thou
Thou art become cruel to me: with thy strong hand thou opposest

thou causest me to ride upon it,
olvest my substance.
hat thou wilt bring me to death, and to the house
4 Howbeit he will not stretch out his hand to the grave, though
truction.
that was in trouble? was not my soul
ved for the poor?  30:26 When I looked for good, then evil came
 waited for light, there came darkness.

he days of affliction
:28 I went mourning without the sun: I stood up, and I cried in the

ompanion to owls.
k upon me, and my bones are burned with heat.
rning, and my organ into the voice
m that weep.
h mine eyes; why then should I think upon a
there from above? and what
 the Almighty from on high?  31:3 Is not destruction to
unishment to the workers of iniquity?  31:4
my steps?  31:5 If I have
ity, or if my foot hath hasted to deceit; 31:6 Let me
 that God may know mine integrity.
 If my step hath turned out of the way, and mine heart walked
if any blot hath cleaved to mine hands; 31:8 Then
yea, let my offspring be rooted out.
:9 If mine heart have been deceived by a woman, or if I have laid
our's door; 31:10 Then let my wife grind unto
 her.
e; yea, it is an iniquity to be
by the judges.
hat consumeth to destruction, and would root
id despise the cause of my manservant or of my
h me; 31:14 What then shall I do
 riseth up? and when he visiteth, what shall I answer him?
de me in the womb make him? and did not one
e withheld the poor from their
 have caused the eyes of the widow to fail; 31:17 Or have
one, and the fatherless hath not eaten
ereof; 31:18 (For from my youth he was brought up with me, as with a
have guided her from my mother's womb;) 31:19 If I have
 clothing, or any poor without covering;
31:20 If his loins have not blessed me, and if he were not warmed with
f my sheep; 31:21 If I have lifted up my hand against the
 help in the gate: 31:22 Then let mine arm
m be broken from the bone.
struction from God was a terror to me, and by reason of
dure.
, or have said to the fine gold, Thou
 my confidence; 31:25 If I rejoice because my wealth was great, and
nd had gotten much; 31:26 If I beheld the sun when it
n brightness; 31:27 And my heart hath
n secretly enticed, or my mouth hath kissed my hand: 31:28 This
ty to be punished by the judge: for I should have
31:29 If I rejoice at the destruction of him that hated me, or lifted
n evil found him: 31:30 Neither have I suffered my mouth
to his soul.
ernacle said not, Oh that we had of his
lesh!  we cannot be satisfied.
e stranger did not lodge in the street: but I opened my doors
31:33 If I covered my transgressions as Adam, by hiding mine iniquity
31:34 Did I fear a great multitude, or did the contempt
t I kept silence, and went not out of the
ehold, my desire is, that the
uld answer me, and that mine adversary had written a book.
ake it upon my shoulder, and bind it as a crown
o him the number of my steps; as a prince
land cry against me, or that the furrows likewise thereof
 eaten the fruits thereof without money, or
their life: 31:40 Let thistles
ad of wheat, and cockle instead of barley.
 these three men ceased to answer Job, because he was righteous

the son of Barachel the
ndred of Ram: against Job was his wrath kindled,
r than God.
 friends was his wrath kindled, because
hey had found no answer, and yet had condemned Job.
l Job had spoken, because they were elder
e was no answer in the mouth of these
ee men, then his wrath was kindled.
6 And Elihu the son of Barachel the Buzite answered and said, I am
e very old; wherefore I was afraid, and durst not shew
said, Days should speak, and multitude of years should teach
ere is a spirit in man: and the inspiration of the Almighty
ng.
 neither do the aged understand

 I also will shew mine opinion.
ehold, I waited for your words; I gave ear to your reasons,
what to say.
 you, and, behold, there was none of you
that convinced Job, or that answered his words: 32:13 Lest ye should
ound out wisdom: God thrusteth him down, not man.
his words against me: neither will I
er him with your speeches.
ere amazed, they answered no more: they left off speaking.
d, (for they spake not, but stood still, and
l answer also my part, I also
ine opinion.
ter, the spirit within me constraineth me.
h hath no vent; it is ready to
 new bottles.
I may be refreshed: I will open my lips and
, accept any man's person, neither let me
 For I know not to give flattering titles; in so doing my maker
away.
 hear my speeches, and hearken to all
words.
y mouth, my tongue hath spoken in my
h.
tness of my heart: and my lips
r knowledge clearly.
 God hath made me, and the breath of the Almighty
ou canst answer me, set thy words in order before me, stand
m according to thy wish in God's stead: I also am
ehold, my terror shall not make thee afraid, neither shall my
ee.
e hearing, and I have heard the
thy words, saying, 33:9 I am clean without transgression, I
 there iniquity in me.
 findeth occasions against me, he counteth me for his
et in the stocks, he marketh all my
.
st: I will answer thee, that God
er than man.
 against him? for he giveth not account of
aketh once, yea twice, yet man perceiveth it not.
f the night, when deep sleep falleth
 men, in slumberings upon the bed; 33:16 Then he openeth the ears
th their instruction, 33:17 That he may withdraw man
de from man.
soul from the pit, and his life from
shing by the sword.
ed also with pain upon his bed, and the multitude
:20 So that his life abhorreth bread,
 his soul dainty meat.
is consumed away, that it cannot be seen; and his
t.
o the grave, and his life to the
rs.
him, an interpreter, one among a
, to shew unto man his uprightness: 33:24 Then he is gracious
Deliver him from going down to the pit: I have
hall be fresher than a child's: he shall return to
shall pray unto God, and he will be
rable unto him: and he shall see his face with joy: for he will
 righteousness.
en, and if any say, I have sinned, and
rverted that which was right, and it profited me not; 33:28 He will
l from going into the pit, and his life shall see the
 things worketh God oftentimes with man, 33:30 To
 to be enlightened with the light of
living.
 unto me: hold thy peace, and I will
k.
answer me: speak, for I desire to
 thee.
old thy peace, and I shall teach thee
dom.
d said, 34:2 Hear my words, O ye
; and give ear unto me, ye that have knowledge.
 the mouth tasteth meat.
oose to us judgment: let us know among ourselves what is
 said, I am righteous: and God hath taken away my
ainst my right? my wound is incurable without
ke Job, who drinketh up scorning like water?  34:8
workers of iniquity, and walketh with
ked men.
iteth a man nothing that he should
t himself with God.
rken unto me ye men of understanding: far be it
ess; and from the Almighty, that he
d commit iniquity.
f a man shall he render unto him, and cause every
.
kedly, neither will the Almighty
judgment.
arge over the earth? or who hath disposed
rt upon man, if he gather
s spirit and his breath; 34:15 All flesh shall perish
again unto dust.
 understanding, hear this: hearken to the voice
 that hateth right govern? and wilt thou condemn
t fit to say to a king, Thou art
and to princes, Ye are ungodly?  34:19 How much less to him
persons of princes, nor regardeth the rich more
 work of his hands.
hall they die, and the people shall be troubled at
 mighty shall be taken away without

f man, and he seeth all his
:22 There is no darkness, nor shadow of death, where the workers of
de themselves.
y upon man more than right; that he should
e shall break in pieces mighty men without number, and set

and he overturneth them in the
that they are destroyed.
eth them as wicked men in the open sight of others;
from him, and would not consider any of
is ways: 34:28 So that they cause the cry of the poor to come unto
eth the cry of the afflicted.
n he giveth quietness, who then can make trouble? and when he
then can behold him? whether it be done against a
:30 That the hypocrite reign not,
e people be ensnared.
s meet to be said unto God, I have borne
chastisement, I will not offend any more: 34:32 That which I see not
 if I have done iniquity, I will do no more.
mind? he will recompense it,
 refuse, or whether thou choose; and not I: therefore
4:34 Let men of understanding tell me, and let a wise man hearken
 Job hath spoken without knowledge, and his words were without
desire is that Job may be tried unto the end because of his

 sin, he clappeth his hands
 multiplieth his words against God.
1 Elihu spake moreover, and said, 35:2 Thinkest thou this to be
idst, My righteousness is more than God's?  35:3
ll it be unto thee? and, What profit
l I have, if I be cleansed from my sin?  35:4 I will answer thee,
s with thee.
, and see; and behold the clouds which are
t, what doest thou against him? or if thy
thou unto him?  35:7 If thou
, what givest thou him? or what receiveth he of thine
y hurt a man as thou art; and thy
usness may profit the son of man.
By reason of the multitude of oppressions they make the oppressed
out by reason of the arm of the mighty.

er, who giveth songs in the
Who teacheth us more than the beasts of the earth, and
ls of heaven?  35:12 There they cry, but
none giveth answer, because of the pride of evil men.
ear vanity, neither will the Almighty
ard it.
 shalt not see him, yet judgment is
e him; therefore trust thou in him.
15 But now, because it is not so, he hath visited in his anger; yet
ot in great extremity: 35:16 Therefore doth Job open
eth words without knowledge.
 also proceeded, and said, 36:2 Suffer me a little, and I
e yet to speak on God's behalf.
will fetch my knowledge from afar, and will ascribe
6:4 For truly my words shall not be false: he that is perfect in
thee.
espiseth not any: he is mighty in
h and wisdom.
e life of the wicked: but giveth right to the
eyes from the righteous: but with kings
re they on the throne; yea, he doth establish them for ever, and they

nd be holden in cords of
 Then he sheweth them their work, and their

cipline, and commandeth that
from iniquity.
erve him, they shall spend their days in
prosperity, and their years in pleasures.
perish by the sword, and they
ithout knowledge.
tes in heart heap up wrath: they cry not when he
 youth, and their life is among the unclean.
affliction, and openeth their ears
ression.
moved thee out of the strait into a
 place, where there is no straitness; and that which should be
uld be full of fatness.
hast fulfilled the judgment of the wicked: judgment and

st he take thee away with his
n a great ransom cannot deliver thee.
6:19 Will he esteem thy riches? no, not gold, nor all the forces of
:20 Desire not the night, when people are cut off in their place.
, regard not iniquity: for this hast thou chosen rather
ehold, God exalteth by his power: who teacheth like him?  36:23
im his way? or who can say, Thou hast wrought
agnify his work, which men
25 Every man may see it; man may behold it afar off.
and we know him not, neither can the
er of his years be searched out.
For he maketh small the drops of water: they pour down rain
 thereof: 36:28 Which the clouds do drop and
lso can any understand the spreadings of the clouds, or the
?  36:30 Behold, he spreadeth his light upon
.
le; he giveth meat in abundance.
With clouds he covereth the light; and commandeth it not to
 cometh betwixt.
f sheweth concerning it, the cattle also
concerning the vapour.
o my heart trembleth, and is moved out of his place.
ise of his voice, and the sound that goeth
t under the whole heaven, and his lightning unto
er it a voice roareth: he thundereth with the voice of his
not stay them when his voice is heard.
37:5 God thundereth marvellously with his voice; great things doeth
nnot comprehend.
he snow, Be thou on the earth; likewise to the
 his strength.
and of every man; that all men may know his
ens, and remain in their places.
ut of the south cometh the whirlwind: and cold out of the north.
ath of God frost is given: and the breadth of the
so by watering he wearieth the thick cloud: he scattereth his
nd it is turned round about by his counsels: that
eth them upon the face of the world
e earth.
hether for correction, or for his land,
r for mercy.
 Job: stand still, and consider the wondrous
when God disposed them, and caused the light of
u know the balancings of the
wondrous works of him which is perfect in knowledge?
m, when he quieteth the earth by the
h wind?  37:18 Hast thou with him spread out the sky, which is
ten looking glass?  37:19 Teach us what we shall
our speech by reason of darkness.
 Shall it be told him that I speak? if a man speak, surely he
.
light which is in the clouds: but
d passeth, and cleanseth them.
ir weather cometh out of the north: with God is terrible
 the Almighty, we cannot find him out: he is excellent
nd in plenty of justice: he will not
ict.
e respecteth not any that are wise
rt.
 of the whirlwind, and said, 38:2
this that darkeneth counsel by words without knowledge?  38:3
 like a man; for I will demand of thee, and
 when I laid the foundations of the earth?
38:5 Who hath laid the measures thereof, if thou knowest? or who hath
 line upon it?  38:6 Whereupon are the foundations
e corner stone thereof; 38:7 When the
ning stars sang together, and all the sons of God shouted for joy?
 up the sea with doors, when it brake forth, as if it
38:9 When I made the cloud the garment
ereof, and thick darkness a swaddlingband for it, 38:10 And brake up
eed place, and set bars and doors, 38:11 And said,
 further: and here shall thy proud
be stayed?  38:12 Hast thou commanded the morning since thy
yspring to know his place; 38:13 That it might
that the wicked might be shaken
?  38:14 It is turned as clay to the seal; and they stand as
d from the wicked their light is withholden, and the high arm
8:16 Hast thou entered into the springs of the sea? or hast thou
ch of the depth?  38:17 Have the gates of death been
 seen the doors of the shadow of death?
8:18 Hast thou perceived the breadth of the earth? declare if thou

leth? and as for darkness,
lace thereof, 38:20 That thou shouldest take it to the
 shouldest know the paths to the house
ereof?  38:21 Knowest thou it, because thou wast then born? or
f thy days is great?  38:22 Hast thou entered into
st thou seen the treasures of the
8:23 Which I have reserved against the time of trouble, against
nd war?  38:24 By what way is the light parted,
 the earth?  38:25 Who hath divided
ercourse for the overflowing of waters, or a way for the
6 To cause it to rain on the earth, where no
re is no man; 38:27 To satisfy
te and waste ground; and to cause the bud of the tender herb
8 Hath the rain a father? or who hath begotten
e womb came the ice? and the hoary
of heaven, who hath gendered it?  38:30 The waters are hid as
 face of the deep is frozen.
t thou bind the sweet influences of Pleiades, or loose the
anst thou bring forth Mazzaroth in his season?
s sons?  38:33 Knowest thou the
s of heaven? canst thou set the dominion thereof in the
ft up thy voice to the clouds, that
ance of waters may cover thee?  38:35 Canst thou send lightnings,
and say unto thee, Here we are?  38:36 Who hath put
who hath given understanding to the
?  38:37 Who can number the clouds in wisdom? or who can stay the
, 38:38 When the dust groweth into hardness, and the
8:39 Wilt thou hunt the prey for the
? or fill the appetite of the young lions, 38:40 When they couch
 abide in the covert to lie in wait?  38:41 Who
hen his young ones cry unto God,
der for lack of meat.
 the time when the wild goats of the rock bring
hinds do calve?  39:2 Canst thou
he months that they fulfil? or knowest thou the time when they
hey bow themselves, they bring forth their young

ng, they grow up with corn; they
, and return not unto them.
th sent out the wild ass free? or who hath loosed the bands
Whose house I have made the wilderness, and the
He scorneth the multitude of the city, neither regardeth he the
r.
is pasture, and he searcheth after
green thing.
illing to serve thee, or abide by thy crib?
his band in the furrow? or will
 the valleys after thee?  39:11 Wilt thou trust him, because
 or wilt thou leave thy labour to him?  39:12
ring home thy seed, and gather it
y barn?  39:13 Gavest thou the goodly wings unto the peacocks?
s unto the ostrich?  39:14 Which leaveth her eggs
 dust, 39:15 And forgetteth that the
 may crush them, or that the wild beast may break them.
inst her young ones, as though they were not
ear; 39:17 Because God hath
of wisdom, neither hath he imparted to her understanding.
teth up herself on high, she scorneth the horse
iven the horse strength? hast thou clothed his neck
 make him afraid as a grasshopper? the
ory of his nostrils is terrible.
He paweth in the valley, and rejoiceth in his strength: he goeth
ed men.
s not affrighted; neither turneth he
 from the sword.
eth against him, the glittering spear and the
ound with fierceness and rage: neither
lieveth he that it is the sound of the trumpet.
, Ha, ha; and he smelleth the battle
 off, the thunder of the captains, and the shouting.
hy wisdom, and stretch her wings toward
he south?  39:27 Doth the eagle mount up at thy command, and make her
  39:28 She dwelleth and abideth on the rock, upon the
rong place.
th the prey, and her eyes behold afar off.
d: and where the slain are,

nd said, 40:2 Shall he that
th the Almighty instruct him? he that reproveth God, let
n Job answered the LORD, and said, 40:4 Behold, I am vile;
? I will lay mine hand upon my mouth.
0:5 Once have I spoken; but I will not answer: yea, twice; but I will
rther.
 Job out of the whirlwind, and said,
 Gird up thy loins now like a man: I will demand of thee, and

nt? wilt thou condemn me, that
t be righteous?  40:9 Hast thou an arm like God? or canst
 like him?  40:10 Deck thyself now with
ajesty and excellency; and array thyself with glory and beauty.
 the rage of thy wrath: and behold every one that is
 Look on every one that is proud, and bring him low; and tread
heir place.
 together; and bind their faces in secret.
ee that thine own right hand can
e.
ade with thee; he eateth grass as

ins, and his force is in the
 belly.
 cedar: the sinews of his stones are
ped together.
rong pieces of brass; his bones are like bars
the ways of God: he that made him can make
 Surely the mountains bring him forth food, where all the beasts

in the covert of the reed, and
0:22 The shady trees cover him with their shadow; the willows of the
him about.
 a river, and hasteth not: he trusteth
at he can draw up Jordan into his mouth.

se pierceth through snares.
thou draw out leviathan with an hook? or his tongue with a
down?  41:2 Canst thou put an hook into his
orn?  41:3 Will he make many
s unto thee? will he speak soft words unto thee?  41:4
 thee? wilt thou take him for a servant
or ever?  41:5 Wilt thou play with him as with a bird? or wilt thou
y maidens?  41:6 Shall the companions make a banquet of
ong the merchants?  41:7 Canst thou fill
his skin with barbed irons? or his head with fish spears?  41:8 Lay
 him, remember the battle, do no more.
41:9 Behold, the hope of him is in vain: shall not one be cast down
ht of him?  41:10 None is so fierce that dare stir him
d before me?  41:11 Who hath prevented me,
nder the whole heaven is mine.
will not conceal his parts, nor his power, nor his comely
can discover the face of his garment? or who can come to him
?  41:14 Who can open the doors of his face? his

ogether as with a close seal.
 is so near to another, that no air can come between them.
one to another, they stick together, that they
neesings a light doth shine, and his eyes are like the
1:19 Out of his mouth go burning lamps, and sparks of fire leap out.
 his nostrils goeth smoke, as out of a seething pot or
 kindleth coals, and a flame goeth out of his mouth.
strength, and sorrow is turned into joy
efore him.
h are joined together: they are firm in
hemselves; they cannot be moved.
His heart is as firm as a stone; yea, as hard as a piece of the

ghty are afraid: by reason of
hey purify themselves.
of him that layeth at him cannot hold: the spear, the
1:27 He esteemeth iron as straw, and brass as rotten wood.
 make him flee: slingstones are turned with him
unted as stubble: he laugheth at the shaking of a
under him: he spreadeth sharp pointed things
deep to boil like a pot: he maketh the sea like a
th a path to shine after him; one would think the deep to
arth there is not his like, who is made without fear.
 things: he is a king over all the children
 LORD, and said, 42:2 I know that thou canst
n be withholden from thee.
he that hideth counsel without knowledge? therefore have I
d not; things too wonderful for me, which I
 and I will speak: I will demand of thee,
heard of thee by the hearing of the ear: but now mine eye
fore I abhor myself, and repent in dust and ashes.
 the LORD had spoken these words unto
, the LORD said to Eliphaz the Temanite, My wrath is kindled
nst thy two friends: for ye have not spoken of
rvant Job hath.
o you now seven bullocks and seven rams, and go
 yourselves a burnt offering; and
ant Job shall pray for you: for him will I accept: lest I deal
folly, in that ye have not spoken of me the thing
ob.
ldad the Shuhite and Zophar the
e went, and did according as the LORD commanded them: the

of Job, when he prayed for his
lso the LORD gave Job twice as much as he had before.
him all his brethren, and all his sisters,
ntance before, and did eat
 in his house: and they bemoaned him, and comforted him
LORD had brought upon him: every man also
an earring of gold.
lessed the latter end of Job more than his
sheep, and six thousand
usand yoke of oxen, and a thousand she asses.
ree daughters.
name of the first, Jemima; and the name of the
hird, Kerenhappuch.
e land were no women found so fair as the daughters
hem inheritance among their brethren.
2:16 After this lived Job an hundred and forty years, and saw his
s' sons, even four generations.
o Job died, being old and full of days.

 is the man that walketh not in the counsel of the ungodly,
 of sinners, nor sitteth in the seat of the
the law of the LORD; and in his law doth he
hall be like a tree planted by the rivers of water, that
n his season; his leaf also shall not
her; and whatsoever he doeth shall prosper.
ike the chaff which the wind
.
tand in the judgment, nor sinners
congregation of the righteous.
the LORD knoweth the way of the righteous: but the way of the

he people imagine a vain thing?
 kings of the earth set themselves, and the rulers take counsel
he LORD, and against his anointed, saying,
and cast away their cords from
 He that sitteth in the heavens shall laugh: the LORD shall have

s wrath, and vex them in his
sure.
y holy hill of Zion.
 the decree: the LORD hath said unto me, Thou art my
thee.
hee the heathen for thine
d the uttermost parts of the earth for thy possession.
with a rod of iron; thou shalt dash them in
Be wise now therefore, O ye kings: be instructed, ye judges of
erve the LORD with fear, and rejoice with trembling.
e angry, and ye perish from the way, when
d are all they that put their
m.
 that trouble me! many are they that
 up against me.
 say of my soul, There is no help for him in
, art a shield for me; my glory, and the lifter up
o the LORD with my voice, and he heard me out of his
d me down and slept; I awaked; for the LORD sustained me.
d of ten thousands of people, that have set
:7 Arise, O LORD; save me, O my God: for thou hast smitten all mine
e cheek bone; thou hast broken the teeth of the
 unto the LORD: thy blessing is upon thy
people.
I call, O God of my righteousness: thou hast enlarged
ve mercy upon me, and hear my prayer.
:2 O ye sons of men, how long will ye turn my glory into shame? how
ve vanity, and seek after leasing? Selah.
rt him that is godly for
D will hear when I call unto him.
tand in awe, and sin not: commune with your own heart upon your
Selah.
teousness, and put your trust in the
.
shew us any good? LORD, lift thou
light of thy countenance upon us.
hou hast put gladness in my heart, more than in the time that
wine increased.
down in peace, and sleep: for thou, LORD, only
1 Give ear to my words, O LORD, consider my meditation.
e of my cry, my King, and my God: for unto
thou hear in the morning, O LORD; in the morning
 and will look up.
 a God that hath pleasure in wickedness: neither
 The foolish shall not stand in thy sight: thou hatest all workers
5:6 Thou shalt destroy them that speak leasing: the LORD will abhor
deceitful man.
l come into thy house in the multitude of thy
 toward thy holy temple.
 LORD, in thy righteousness because of mine enemies;
y face.
s in their mouth; their inward part is
ry wickedness; their throat is an open sepulchre; they flatter with

fall by their own counsels;
 in the multitude of their transgressions; for they have
5:11 But let all those that put their trust in thee rejoice: let them
r joy, because thou defendest them: let them also that
hee.
e righteous; with favour wilt thou
s him as with a shield.
 rebuke me not in thine anger, neither chasten me in thy
ve mercy upon me, O LORD; for I am weak: O LORD, heal me; for my

, O LORD, how long?
 deliver my soul: oh save me for thy mercies' sake.
remembrance of thee: in the grave who
ll give thee thanks?
h my groaning; all the night make I my bed to swim;

ief; it waxeth old because of
emies.
rs of iniquity; for the LORD hath
he voice of my weeping.
th heard my supplication; the LORD will receive my
mies be ashamed and sore vexed: let them return
 O LORD my God, in thee do I put my trust: save me from all them
 and deliver me:
ul like a lion, rending it in pieces, while
 my God, If I have done this; if there be iniquity in my
warded evil unto him that was at peace with me; (yea,
hout cause is mine enemy:)
enemy persecute my soul, and take it; yea, let him tread
h, and lay mine honour in the dust. Selah.
t up thyself because of the rage
enemies: and awake for me to the judgment that thou hast
 the congregation of the people compass thee about: for
n thou on high.
e the people: judge me, O LORD, according to my
e integrity that is in me.
he wickedness of the wicked come to an end; but establish
us God trieth the hearts and reins.
0 My defence is of God, which saveth the upright in heart.
ighteous, and God is angry with the wicked every
ll whet his sword; he hath bent his bow, and
epared for him the instruments of death; he
utors.
iniquity, and hath conceived mischief,
d brought forth falsehood.
 a pit, and digged it, and is fallen into the ditch which
hief shall return upon his own head, and his violent
is own pate.
D according to his righteousness: and will
 high.
cellent is thy name in all the earth! who
8:2 Out of the mouth of babes and sucklings hast thou ordained
thine enemies, that thou mightest still the enemy
nsider thy heavens, the work of thy fingers, the moon and
t ordained;
art mindful of him? and the son of man,
hat thou visitest him?
t made him a little lower than the angels, and hast
ur.
n over the works of thy hands; thou
put all things under his feet:
sheep and oxen, yea, and the beasts of the field;
e fish of the sea, and whatsoever
 through the paths of the seas.
ORD our Lord, how excellent is thy name in all the earth!
e, O LORD, with my whole heart; I will shew forth
I will be glad and rejoice in thee: I will sing praise to thy
h.
k, they shall fall and perish at
ence.
ight and my cause; thou satest in the
one judging right.
d the heathen, thou hast destroyed the wicked,
r and ever.
ons are come to a perpetual end: and thou
perished with them.
all endure for ever: he hath prepared his throne
judge the world in righteousness, he shall minister
htness.
uge for the oppressed, a refuge in
of trouble.
 name will put their trust in thee: for
hou, LORD, hast not forsaken them that seek thee.
which dwelleth in Zion: declare among
 people his doings.
 inquisition for blood, he remembereth them: he
e.
sider my trouble which I suffer of
hat hate me, thou that liftest me up from the gates of death:
w forth all thy praise in the gates of the daughter
salvation.
wn in the pit that they made: in the net
which they hid is their own foot taken.

ich he executeth: the wicked
 the work of his own hands. Higgaion. Selah.
 hell, and all the nations that
d.
e forgotten: the expectation of
shall not perish for ever.
O LORD; let not man prevail: let the heathen be judged in
em in fear, O LORD: that the nations may know themselves to

? why hidest thou thyself in
uble?
 persecute the poor: let them be
 the devices that they have imagined.
0:3 For the wicked boasteth of his heart's desire, and blesseth the
the LORD abhorreth.
rough the pride of his countenance, will not seek
thoughts.
vous; thy judgments are far above out of
his sight: as for all his enemies, he puffeth at them.
eart, I shall not be moved: for I shall
ever be in adversity.
 full of cursing and deceit and fraud: under his
10:8 He sitteth in the lurking places of the villages: in the secret
 murder the innocent: his eyes are privily set against
n wait secretly as a lion in his den: he lieth in wait
atch the poor, when he draweth him into
is net.
h himself, that the poor may fall by
strong ones.
heart, God hath forgotten: he hideth his
face; he will never see it.
, O LORD; O God, lift up thine hand: forget not the humble.
the wicked contemn God? he hath said in his
14 Thou hast seen it; for thou beholdest mischief and spite, to
 hand: the poor committeth himself unto thee; thou
.
d and the evil man: seek out his
ss till thou find none.
is King for ever and ever: the heathen are perished out
 thou hast heard the desire of the humble: thou wilt
 cause thine ear to hear:
e the fatherless and the oppressed, that the man of the

w say ye to my soul, Flee as a bird
ur mountain?
end their bow, they make ready their arrow
hoot at the upright in heart.
he foundations be destroyed, what can the righteous do?
oly temple, the LORD's throne is in heaven:
hildren of men.
e righteous: but the wicked and him that loveth
pon the wicked he shall rain snares, fire and brimstone, and an
his shall be the portion of their cup.
11:7 For the righteous LORD loveth righteousness; his countenance doth
pright.
dly man ceaseth; for the faithful fail from
 speak vanity every one with his neighbour: with flattering
heart do they speak.
l cut off all flattering lips, and the tongue that
ho have said, With our tongue will we prevail; our lips are our
er us?
oor, for the sighing of the needy, now
ll I arise, saith the LORD; I will set him in safety from him that

ds: as silver tried in a
, purified seven times.
 keep them, O LORD, thou shalt preserve them from this
 The wicked walk on every side, when the vilest men are exalted.
g wilt thou forget me, O LORD? for ever? how long wilt

y soul, having sorrow in my
how long shall mine enemy be exalted over me?
y God: lighten mine eyes, lest I
e sleep of death;
say, I have prevailed against him; and those that
d.
; my heart shall rejoice in thy
.
se he hath dealt bountifully with

There is no God. They are
ave done abominable works, there is none that doeth
own from heaven upon the children of men, to see
and, and seek God.
ne aside, they are all together become filthy:
ot one.
iquity no knowledge? who eat up my
 as they eat bread, and call not upon the LORD.
r: for God is in the generation of
ghteous.
l of the poor, because the LORD is his
fuge.
ael were come out of Zion! when the
bringeth back the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice,
 glad.
n thy tabernacle? who shall dwell in thy
holy hill?
ly, and worketh righteousness, and
th the truth in his heart.
 backbiteth not with his tongue, nor doeth evil to his
eproach against his neighbour.
whose eyes a vile person is contemned; but he honoureth them
 that sweareth to his own hurt, and changeth
is money to usury, nor taketh reward
nst the innocent. He that doeth these things shall never be moved.
rve me, O God: for in thee do I put my trust.
 the LORD, Thou art my Lord: my
extendeth not to thee;
saints that are in the earth, and to the excellent, in
6:4 Their sorrows shall be multiplied that hasten after another god:
ferings of blood will I not offer, nor take up their
e LORD is the portion of mine inheritance and of my cup: thou

asant places; yea, I have a
ge.
h given me counsel: my reins also
t me in the night seasons.
set the LORD always before me: because he is at my right
.
my glory rejoiceth: my flesh also
est in hope.
ave my soul in hell; neither wilt thou
ffer thine Holy One to see corruption.
16:11 Thou wilt shew me the path of life: in thy presence is fulness
 right hand there are pleasures for evermore.
tend unto my cry, give ear unto my
, that goeth not out of feigned lips.
7:2 Let my sentence come forth from thy presence; let thine eyes
that are equal.
ine heart; thou hast visited me in the night;
thing; I am purposed that my
not transgress.
ks of men, by the word of thy lips I have kept

at my footsteps slip not.
alled upon thee, for thou wilt hear me, O God: incline
my speech.
ingkindness, O thou that savest by thy
ght hand them which put their trust in thee from those that rise up

de me under the shadow of thy
7:9 From the wicked that oppress me, from my deadly enemies, who

t: with their mouth they speak

steps: they have set their
wn to the earth;
hat is greedy of his prey, and as it were a

 him down: deliver my soul
d, which is thy sword:
hich are thy hand, O LORD, from men of the world,
life, and whose belly thou fillest
hy hid treasure: they are full of children, and leave the rest
o their babes.
behold thy face in righteousness: I shall be
ness.
, my strength.
, and my fortress, and my deliverer; my God,
buckler, and the horn of my
d my high tower.
the LORD, who is worthy to be praised: so shall
:4 The sorrows of death compassed me, and the floods of ungodly men

about: the snares of death

ORD, and cried unto my God: he
oice out of his temple, and my cry came before him, even
n the earth shook and trembled; the foundations also of the
aken, because he was wroth.
went up a smoke out of his nostrils, and fire out of his
 kindled by it.
ns also, and came down: and darkness was under
a cherub, and did fly: yea, he did fly upon the
 darkness his secret place; his pavilion round about him
 clouds of the skies.
htness that was before him his thick clouds passed,

avens, and the Highest gave his
il stones and coals of fire.
 he sent out his arrows, and scattered them; and he shot out
fited them.
waters were seen, and the foundations of
the world were discovered at thy rebuke, O LORD, at the blast of the
nostrils.
took me, he drew me out of many waters.

y, and from them which hated
 were too strong for me.
vented me in the day of my calamity: but the LORD was my
me forth also into a large place; he delivered me,
8:20 The LORD rewarded me according to my righteousness; according to
 of my hands hath he recompensed me.
:21 For I have kept the ways of the LORD, and have not wickedly
d.
ore me, and I did not put away his
es from me.
fore him, and I kept myself from mine
quity.
compensed me according to my
s, according to the cleanness of my hands in his eyesight.
l thou wilt shew thyself merciful; with an
ht;
thyself pure; and with the froward
ilt shew thyself froward.
u wilt save the afflicted people; but wilt bring down
 wilt light my candle: the LORD my God will enlighten my
thee I have run through a troop; and by my God have I
As for God, his way is perfect: the word of the LORD is tried:
ll those that trust in him.
ho is God save the LORD? or who is a rock save our God?
eth me with strength, and maketh my way
erfect.
nds' feet, and setteth me upon my high
aces.
, so that a bow of steel is broken by
e arms.
he shield of thy salvation: and thy
 hand hath holden me up, and thy gentleness hath made me great.
nlarged my steps under me, that my feet did not slip.
nemies, and overtaken them: neither did I
:38 I have wounded them that they were not able to rise: they are
eet.
 strength unto the battle: thou hast
ued under me those that rose up against me.
ks of mine enemies; that I might
them that hate me.
t there was none to save them: even unto the LORD,
42 Then did I beat them small as the dust before the wind: I did
he dirt in the streets.
 delivered me from the strivings of the people; and
he heathen: a people whom I have not
n shall serve me.
 hear of me, they shall obey me: the strangers
18:45 The strangers shall fade away, and be afraid out of their close
:46 The LORD liveth; and blessed be my rock; and let the God of my
lted.
 and subdueth the people under me.
8 He delivereth me from mine enemies: yea, thou liftest me up
 up against me: thou hast delivered me from the
l I give thanks unto thee, O LORD, among the
e.
 his king; and sheweth mercy to
ted, to David, and to his seed for evermore.
ry of God; and the firmament sheweth
handywork.
peech, and night unto night sheweth
edge.
age, where their voice is not heard.
:4 Their line is gone out through all the earth, and their words to
world. In them hath he set a tabernacle for the sun,
m coming out of his chamber, and rejoiceth
is going forth is from the end of the heaven, and his circuit
and there is nothing hid from the heat thereof.
ct, converting the soul: the
 the LORD is sure, making wise the simple.
t, rejoicing the heart: the
f the LORD is pure, enlightening the eyes.
during for ever: the judgments
D are true and righteous altogether.
:10 More to be desired are they than gold, yea, than much fine gold:
han honey and the honeycomb.
over by them is thy servant warned: and in keeping of them

anse thou me from secret
 Keep back thy servant also from presumptuous sins; let them not
 me: then shall I be upright, and I shall be

he meditation of my heart, be
in thy sight, O LORD, my strength, and my redeemer.
n the day of trouble; the name of the God of
elp from the sanctuary, and strengthen thee out of
fferings, and accept thy burnt sacrifice;
ine own heart, and fulfil all thy
.
, and in the name of our God we
up our banners: the LORD fulfil all thy petitions.
saveth his anointed; he will hear him
m his holy heaven with the saving strength of his right hand.
chariots, and some in horses: but we will remember

t we are risen, and stand
9 Save, LORD: let the king hear us when we call.
hy strength, O LORD; and in thy salvation
u hast given him his heart's desire, and hast not withholden
s. Selah.
with the blessings of goodness: thou
est a crown of pure gold on his head.
1:4 He asked life of thee, and thou gavest it him, even length of
 ever.
alvation: honour and majesty hast thou
id upon him.
m most blessed for ever: thou hast made him

nd through the mercy of the
shall not be moved.
ll find out all thine enemies: thy right hand shall

en in the time of thine anger:
hall swallow them up in his wrath, and the fire shall devour
ruit shalt thou destroy from the earth, and their seed
en.
t thee: they imagined a mischievous
e, which they are not able to perform.
21:12 Therefore shalt thou make them turn their back, when thou shalt
ine arrows upon thy strings against the face of them.
, in thine own strength: so will we sing
and praise thy power.
my God, why hast thou forsaken me? why art thou so far
e words of my roaring?
 cry in the day time, but thou hearest not; and in the
ent.
t inhabitest the praises of Israel.
4 Our fathers trusted in thee: they trusted, and thou didst deliver
hey cried unto thee, and were delivered: they trusted in thee,
ded.
a reproach of men, and despised of
ople.
e to scorn: they shoot out the lip,
shake the head, saying,
 on the LORD that he would deliver him: let him deliver
 him.
 out of the womb: thou didst make me
 when I was upon my mother's breasts.
2:10 I was cast upon thee from the womb: thou art my God from my

near; for there is none to
 Many bulls have compassed me: strong bulls of Bashan have beset
 They gaped upon me with their mouths, as a ravening and a
 am poured out like water, and all my bones are out of joint:
 it is melted in the midst of my bowels.

sherd; and my tongue cleaveth
 and thou hast brought me into the dust of death.
e: the assembly of the wicked have
ed me: they pierced my hands and my feet.
k and stare upon me.
 garments among them, and cast lots upon my vesture.
om me, O LORD: O my strength, haste thee
to help me.
the sword; my darling from the power of the
outh: for thou hast heard me from the
ns of the unicorns.
e thy name unto my brethren: in the midst of the

 all ye the seed of Jacob,
nd fear him, all ye the seed of Israel.

ed the affliction of the
er hath he hid his face from him; but when he cried
 praise shall be of thee in the great congregation: I will pay
that fear him.
 and be satisfied: they shall praise the LORD
for ever.
ld shall remember and turn unto the LORD:
 worship before thee.
gdom is the LORD's: and he is the governor among the
t be fat upon earth shall eat and worship: all they
bow before him: and none can keep alive
is own soul.
im; it shall be accounted to the Lord for a
nd shall declare his righteousness unto a
one this.
erd; I shall not want.
e to lie down in green pastures: he leadeth me beside
restoreth my soul: he leadeth me in the paths of righteousness

lley of the shadow of death, I
no evil: for thou art with me; thy rod and thy staff they
preparest a table before me in the presence of mine enemies:
 with oil; my cup runneth over.
rely goodness and mercy shall follow me all the days of my
n the house of the LORD for ever.
4:1 The earth is the LORD's, and the fulness thereof; the world, and
l therein.
upon the seas, and established it upon the
e hill of the LORD? or who shall stand in
n hands, and a pure heart; who hath not lifted
eceitfully.
lessing from the LORD, and righteousness
from the God of his salvation.
s is the generation of them that seek him, that seek thy face,
4:7 Lift up your heads, O ye gates; and be ye lift up, ye everlasting
e King of glory shall come in.
 is this King of glory? The LORD strong and mighty, the LORD
4:9 Lift up your heads, O ye gates; even lift them up, ye everlasting
e King of glory shall come in.
o is this King of glory? The LORD of hosts, he is the King of
25:1 Unto thee, O LORD, do I lift up my soul.
 me not be ashamed, let not mine
triumph over me.
t wait on thee be ashamed: let them be ashamed
5:4 Shew me thy ways, O LORD; teach me thy paths.
teach me: for thou art the God of my
ation; on thee do I wait all the day.
5:6 Remember, O LORD, thy tender mercies and thy lovingkindnesses;
en ever of old.
ins of my youth, nor my transgressions:
ccording to thy mercy remember thou me for thy goodness' sake, O
 and upright is the LORD: therefore will he teach sinners in
eek will he guide in judgment: and the meek will he teach
 paths of the LORD are mercy and truth unto such as keep
monies.
RD, pardon mine iniquity; for it is
.
 LORD? him shall he teach in the
 he shall choose.
dwell at ease; and his seed shall inherit the
D is with them that fear him; and he will
s are ever toward the LORD; for he shall pluck my feet
n thee unto me, and have mercy upon me; for I am desolate and
he troubles of my heart are enlarged: O bring thou me out of my
8 Look upon mine affliction and my pain; and forgive all my sins.
mine enemies; for they are many; and they hate me with
p my soul, and deliver me: let me not be ashamed; for I put
:21 Let integrity and uprightness preserve me; for I wait on thee.
srael, O God, out of all his troubles.

ed in mine integrity: I have
 in the LORD; therefore I shall not slide.
 try my reins and my heart.
y lovingkindness is before mine eyes: and I have walked in
e not sat with vain persons, neither will I go in with
hated the congregation of evil doers; and will not sit
ill wash mine hands in innocency: so will I compass thine
at I may publish with the voice of thanksgiving, and tell of
.
n of thy house, and the place
 honour dwelleth.
ul with sinners, nor my life with bloody men:
nd their right hand is full of

integrity: redeem me, and be
o me.
 place: in the congregations will I
 the LORD.
t and my salvation; whom shall I fear? the
 shall I be afraid?
d, even mine enemies and my foes, came upon me to
d fell.
mp against me, my heart shall not fear:
hough war should rise against me, in this will I be confident.
e I desired of the LORD, that will I seek after;
he LORD all the days of my life, to
d the beauty of the LORD, and to enquire in his temple.
rouble he shall hide me in his pavilion: in
ide me; he shall set me up upon

p above mine enemies round
efore will I offer in his tabernacle sacrifices of joy;
ng praises unto the LORD.
LORD, when I cry with my voice: have mercy also upon me,
n thou saidst, Seek ye my face; my heart said unto thee, Thy
k.
put not thy servant away in anger:
ast been my help; leave me not, neither forsake me, O God of my
 When my father and my mother forsake me, then the LORD will take
each me thy way, O LORD, and lead me in a plain path, because
7:12 Deliver me not over unto the will of mine enemies: for false
en up against me, and such as breathe out cruelty.
had believed to see the goodness of the
ORD in the land of the living.
it on the LORD: be of good courage, and he shall strengthen
y, on the LORD.
 I cry, O LORD my rock; be not silent to me: lest,
e like them that go down into the pit.
28:2 Hear the voice of my supplications, when I cry unto thee, when I
nds toward thy holy oracle.
e not away with the wicked, and with the workers of
their neighbours, but mischief is in
r hearts.
heir deeds, and according to the
ss of their endeavours: give them after the work of their
ir desert.
 the works of the LORD, nor the operation
not build them up.
LORD, because he hath heard the voice of my
trength and my shield; my heart trusted in him,
 greatly rejoiceth; and with my
 I praise him.
trength, and he is the saving strength of his
d bless thine inheritance: feed them also, and
ive unto the LORD, O ye mighty, give unto the LORD glory and
 unto the LORD the glory due unto his name; worship the LORD
ess.
 the waters: the God of glory
 the LORD is upon many waters.
 voice of the LORD is powerful; the voice of the LORD is full
he voice of the LORD breaketh the cedars; yea, the LORD breaketh
non.
ike a calf; Lebanon and Sirion like
ng unicorn.
divideth the flames of fire.
oice of the LORD shaketh the wilderness; the LORD shaketh

hinds to calve, and discovereth
ts: and in his temple doth every one speak of his glory.
pon the flood; yea, the LORD sitteth King for
ength unto his people; the LORD will bless
l extol thee, O LORD; for thou hast lifted me up, and hast
ice over me.
d unto thee, and thou hast healed me.
0:3 O LORD, thou hast brought up my soul from the grave: thou hast
hat I should not go down to the pit.
:4 Sing unto the LORD, O ye saints of his, and give thanks at the
s holiness.
 but a moment; in his favour is life:
ping may endure for a night, but joy cometh in the morning.
rity I said, I shall never be moved.
:7 LORD, by thy favour thou hast made my mountain to stand strong:
thy face, and I was troubled.
ied to thee, O LORD; and unto the LORD I made supplication.
here in my blood, when I go down to the pit?
eclare thy truth?
nd have mercy upon me: LORD, be thou my helper.
mourning into dancing: thou hast put
my sackcloth, and girded me with gladness;
g praise to thee, and not be
 LORD my God, I will give thanks unto thee for ever.
 I put my trust; let me never be ashamed:
Bow down thine ear to me; deliver me speedily: be thou my strong
 of defence to save me.
rt my rock and my fortress; therefore for thy name's

e laid privily for me: for
rength.
y spirit: thou hast redeemed me, O LORD
od of truth.
t regard lying vanities: but I trust in the
e in thy mercy: for thou hast considered
my trouble; thou hast known my soul in adversities;
into the hand of the enemy: thou hast set
cy upon me, O LORD, for I am in trouble: mine eye is
oul and my belly.
spent with grief, and my years with sighing: my
iquity, and my bones are consumed.
1 I was a reproach among all mine enemies, but especially among my
a fear to mine acquaintance: they that did see me
am forgotten as a dead man out of mind: I am like a broken
ave heard the slander of many: fear was on every side:
ther against me, they devised to take away
 O LORD: I said, Thou art my God.
 My times are in thy hand: deliver me from the hand of mine
that persecute me.
to shine upon thy servant: save me for thy
hamed, O LORD; for I have called upon thee: let
 be silent in the grave.
lying lips be put to silence; which speak grievous
y against the righteous.
reat is thy goodness, which thou hast laid up for them
ast wrought for them that trust in thee
efore the sons of men!
 hide them in the secret of thy presence from the
m secretly in a pavilion from the
of tongues.
for he hath shewed me his marvellous
ness in a strong city.
 in my haste, I am cut off from before thine eyes:
oice of my supplications when I cried
o thee.
is saints: for the LORD preserveth the
ithful, and plentifully rewardeth the proud doer.
e shall strengthen your heart, all ye
t hope in the LORD.
 he whose transgression is forgiven, whose sin is
an unto whom the LORD imputeth not iniquity, and

ed old through my roaring all
g.
heavy upon me: my moisture is
 the drought of summer. Selah.
cknowledge my sin unto thee, and mine iniquity have I not hid.
ss my transgressions unto the LORD; and thou
h.
s godly pray unto thee in a time
u mayest be found: surely in the floods of great waters they
to him.
thou shalt preserve me from trouble;
 shalt compass me about with songs of deliverance. Selah.
ee and teach thee in the way which thou shalt

mule, which have no
mouth must be held in with bit and bridle, lest
Many sorrows shall be to the wicked: but he that trusteth in the
compass him about.
 LORD, and rejoice, ye righteous: and shout for
rt.
righteous: for praise is comely for the
pright.
 sing unto him with the psaltery and an
nstrument of ten strings.
o him a new song; play skilfully with a loud noise.
 is right; and all his works are done in
truth.
 judgment: the earth is full of the
ess of the LORD.
e LORD were the heavens made; and all the host

 together as an heap: he layeth
pth in storehouses.
rth fear the LORD: let all the inhabitants of the
9 For he spake, and it was done; he commanded, and it stood fast.
bringeth the counsel of the heathen to nought: he
of none effect.
e LORD standeth for ever, the thoughts of his
essed is the nation whose God is the LORD; and the people whom
is own inheritance.
eth from heaven; he beholdeth all the sons of men.
bitation he looketh upon all the
nts of the earth.
heir hearts alike; he considereth all their
by the multitude of an host: a mighty man
17 An horse is a vain thing for safety: neither shall he deliver
trength.
ORD is upon them that fear him, upon
 that hope in his mercy;
er their soul from death, and to keep them alive in
th for the LORD: he is our help and our shield.
 in him, because we have trusted in
oly name.
be upon us, according as we hope in thee.
imes: his praise shall continually
my mouth.
oast in the LORD: the humble shall hear
hereof, and be glad.
 LORD with me, and let us exalt his name together.
 heard me, and delivered me from all my
ears.
re lightened: and their faces were
hamed.
e LORD heard him, and saved him out of
l his troubles.
ORD encampeth round about them that fear him,
and see that the LORD is good: blessed is the man that
ear the LORD, ye his saints: for there is no want to them that
he young lions do lack, and suffer hunger: but they that seek
nt any good thing.
ren, hearken unto me: I will teach you the fear of
e that desireth life, and loveth many days, that he
 tongue from evil, and thy lips from speaking guile.
do good; seek peace, and pursue it.
15 The eyes of the LORD are upon the righteous, and his ears are
y.
t them that do evil, to cut off
brance of them from the earth.
e righteous cry, and the LORD heareth, and delivereth them out
s.
t are of a broken heart; and
as be of a contrite spirit.
are the afflictions of the righteous: but the LORD

 of them is broken.
ay the wicked: and they that hate the righteous
D redeemeth the soul of his servants: and none of them
esolate.
D, with them that strive with me: fight
gainst them that fight against me.
 Take hold of shield and buckler, and stand up for mine help.
the spear, and stop the way against them that
thy salvation.
ded and put to shame that seek after my soul:
o confusion that devise my hurt.
et them be as chaff before the wind: and let the angel of the
5:6 Let their way be dark and slippery: and let the angel of the LORD
m.
 for me their net in a pit, which
 cause they have digged for my soul.
:8 Let destruction come upon him at unawares; and let his net that
h himself: into that very destruction let him fall.
ful in the LORD: it shall rejoice in his
salvation.
, LORD, who is like unto thee, which
verest the poor from him that is too strong for him, yea, the poor
om him that spoileth him?
itnesses did rise up; they laid to my charge things that
rewarded me evil for good to the spoiling of my soul.
hey were sick, my clothing was sackcloth: I
ayer returned into mine own
14 I behaved myself as though he had been my friend or brother: I
y, as one that mourneth for his mother.

, and gathered themselves
the abjects gathered themselves together against me,
ar me, and ceased not:
ritical mockers in feasts, they gnashed upon me with
w long wilt thou look on? rescue my soul from their
he lions.
 in the great congregation: I will praise
them that are mine enemies wrongfully rejoice over me:
he eye that hate me without a cause.
:20 For they speak not peace: but they devise deceitful matters
re quiet in the land.
pened their mouth wide against me, and said, Aha,
22 This thou hast seen, O LORD: keep not silence: O Lord, be not
:23 Stir up thyself, and awake to my judgment, even unto my cause,
rd.
rding to thy righteousness; and let
not rejoice over me.
 say in their hearts, Ah, so would we have it: let
him up.
rought to confusion together that
 at mine hurt: let them be clothed with shame and dishonour
 against me.
oy, and be glad, that favour my righteous
 the LORD be magnified, which
re in the prosperity of his servant.
:28 And my tongue shall speak of thy righteousness and of thy praise
ng.
icked saith within my heart, that there
s no fear of God before his eyes.
For he flattereth himself in his own eyes, until his iniquity be
l.
uity and deceit: he hath left off
ise, and to do good.
ischief upon his bed; he setteth himself in a way
t evil.
he heavens; and thy faithfulness
 unto the clouds.
s is like the great mountains; thy judgments are
est man and beast.
s thy lovingkindness, O God! therefore the
e shadow of thy wings.
be abundantly satisfied with the fatness of thy house;
nk of the river of thy pleasures.
For with thee is the fountain of life: in thy light shall we see
continue thy lovingkindness unto them that know thee; and thy
upright in heart.
t of pride come against me, and let not the hand
There are the workers of iniquity fallen: they are cast down,
 to rise.
ause of evildoers, neither be thou envious
 For they shall soon be cut down like the grass, and wither as the
7:3 Trust in the LORD, and do good; so shalt thou dwell in the land,
u shalt be fed.
so in the LORD: and he shall give thee the
hy way unto the LORD; trust also in him; and he shall
 he shall bring forth thy righteousness as the light, and thy
ay.
iently for him: fret not thyself
of him who prospereth in his way, because of the man who
 pass.
ke wrath: fret not thyself in any wise
 do evil.
ut off: but those that wait upon the
, they shall inherit the earth.
or yet a little while, and the wicked shall not be: yea, thou
ider his place, and it shall not be.
:11 But the meek shall inherit the earth; and shall delight
ance of peace.
h against the just, and gnasheth upon him with
augh at him: for he seeth that his day is
t the sword, and have bent their bow, to
cast down the poor and needy, and to slay such as be of upright
:15 Their sword shall enter into their own heart, and their bows

 is better than the riches of
.
l be broken: but the LORD
ighteous.
ys of the upright: and their inheritance
shall be for ever.
 be ashamed in the evil time: and in the days of

e enemies of the LORD shall
 of lambs: they shall consume; into smoke shall they
ked borroweth, and payeth not again: but the righteous

l inherit the earth; and they
sed of him shall be cut off.
steps of a good man are ordered by the LORD: and he
 Though he fall, he shall not be utterly cast down: for the LORD
 his hand.
 now am old; yet have I not seen the
teous forsaken, nor his seed begging bread.
h; and his seed is blessed.
t from evil, and do good; and dwell for evermore.
ent, and forsaketh not his saints; they
re preserved for ever: but the seed of the wicked shall be cut off.
hteous shall inherit the land, and dwell therein for
e righteous speaketh wisdom, and his tongue
f his God is in his heart; none of his steps shall
eth the righteous, and seeketh to slay him.
his hand, nor condemn him when he
ed.
s way, and he shall exalt thee to
 the land: when the wicked are cut off, thou shalt see it.
wicked in great power, and spreading himself
 passed away, and, lo, he was not: yea, I sought him, but

e upright: for the end of
ce.
e destroyed together: the end of
ed shall be cut off.
ation of the righteous is of the LORD: he is their

d deliver them: he shall deliver
m the wicked, and save them, because they trust in him.
e not in thy wrath: neither chasten me in thy hot
rows stick fast in me, and thy hand presseth me sore.
in my flesh because of thine anger; neither
f my sin.
gone over mine head: as an heavy burden
hey are too heavy for me.
s stink and are corrupt because of my foolishness.
 down greatly; I go mourning all the day
long.
 a loathsome disease: and there is no
ndness in my flesh.
d sore broken: I have roared by reason of the
d, all my desire is before thee; and my groaning is not hid
heart panteth, my strength faileth me: as for the light of
ne from me.
nds stand aloof from my sore; and my
men stand afar off.
t seek after my life lay snares for me: and they
s things, and imagine deceits all
 long.
d not; and I was as a dumb man that
th not his mouth.
 man that heareth not, and in whose mouth are no
LORD, do I hope: thou wilt hear, O Lord my God.
therwise they should rejoice over me:
n my foot slippeth, they magnify themselves against me.
alt, and my sorrow is continually before me.
ty; I will be sorry for my sin.
ut mine enemies are lively, and they are strong: and they that
re multiplied.
der evil for good are mine adversaries;
ecause I follow the thing that good is.

e not far from me.
help me, O Lord my salvation.
I said, I will take heed to my ways, that I sin not with my
mouth with a bridle, while the wicked is before
, I held my peace, even from good; and my
hot within me, while I was musing the fire burned:
39:4 LORD, make me to know mine end, and the measure of my days, what
 may know how frail I am.
thou hast made my days as an handbreadth; and mine age is
erily every man at his best state is
gether vanity.
ery man walketh in a vain shew: surely they are
iches, and knoweth not who shall
hem.
r? my hope is in thee.
from all my transgressions: make me not the reproach
dumb, I opened not my mouth; because thou didst it.
from me: I am consumed by the blow of
ne hand.
ost correct man for iniquity, thou
 his beauty to consume away like a moth: surely every man is
2 Hear my prayer, O LORD, and give ear unto my cry; hold not thy
 for I am a stranger with thee, and a sojourner, as
 spare me, that I may recover strength, before I go hence, and
0:1 I waited patiently for the LORD; and he inclined unto me, and
40:2 He brought me up also out of an horrible pit, out of the miry
 feet upon a rock, and established my goings.
my mouth, even praise unto our God:
shall see it, and fear, and shall trust in the LORD.
t maketh the LORD his trust, and
th not the proud, nor such as turn aside to lies.
hy wonderful works which thou hast
and thy thoughts which are to us-ward: they cannot be reckoned
e: if I would declare and speak of them, they are
6 Sacrifice and offering thou didst not desire; mine ears hast thou
ffering and sin offering hast thou not required.
 the volume of the book it is written
me,
 God: yea, thy law is within my

 great congregation: lo, I
ined my lips, O LORD, thou knowest.
10 I have not hid thy righteousness within my heart; I have
ss and thy salvation: I have not concealed thy
e great congregation.
t thou thy tender mercies from me, O LORD: let thy
tinually preserve me.
able evils have compassed me about: mine iniquities
t I am not able to look up; they are
 than the hairs of mine head: therefore my heart faileth me.
LORD, to deliver me: O LORD, make haste to help
d confounded together that seek after my
soul to destroy it; let them be driven backward and put to shame that

d of their shame that say unto
ha.
rejoice and be glad in thee: let
love thy salvation say continually, The LORD be magnified.
d needy; yet the Lord thinketh upon me: thou art
tarrying, O my God.
 he that considereth the poor: the LORD will deliver
2 The LORD will preserve him, and keep him alive; and he shall be
earth: and thou wilt not deliver him unto the will of
 will strengthen him upon the bed of languishing: thou
 sickness.
ul unto me: heal my soul; for I have
ed against thee.
k evil of me, When shall he die, and his name
 me, he speaketh vanity: his heart gathereth
ad, he telleth it.
e whisper together against me: against me do they
isease, say they, cleaveth fast unto him: and now that
 more.
nd, in whom I trusted, which did eat
y bread, hath lifted up his heel against me.
unto me, and raise me up, that I
ite them.
u favourest me, because mine enemy doth
ot triumph over me.
, thou upholdest me in mine integrity, and settest
41:13 Blessed be the LORD God of Israel from everlasting, and to
 and Amen.
 after the water brooks, so panteth my soul
steth for God, for the living God: when shall I come
 My tears have been my meat day and night, while they continually
e is thy God?
e things, I pour out my soul in me: for I had
them to the house of God, with
of joy and praise, with a multitude that kept holyday.
n, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted in
 praise him for the help of his
ce.
 within me: therefore will I
e from the land of Jordan, and of the Hermonites, from the
 calleth unto deep at the noise of thy waterspouts: all thy
re gone over me.
 command his lovingkindness in the day time, and
h me, and my prayer unto the God of
fe.
hy hast thou forgotten me? why go I
ing because of the oppression of the enemy?
ne enemies reproach me; while
ily unto me, Where is thy God?
y art thou cast down, O my soul? and why art thou disquieted
n God: for I shall yet praise him, who is the

 cause against an ungodly nation: O
er me from the deceitful and unjust man.

: why dost thou cast me off?
rning because of the oppression of the enemy?
ruth: let them lead me; let them
 unto thy holy hill, and to thy tabernacles.
f God, unto God my exceeding joy:
on the harp will I praise thee, O God my God.
oul? and why art thou disquieted
e? hope in God: for I shall yet praise him, who is the health
d my God.
ur ears, O God, our fathers have told us,
e times of old.
ve out the heathen with thy hand, and plantedst
ople, and cast them out.
got not the land in possession by their own sword,
hem: but thy right hand, and thine
nd the light of thy countenance, because thou hadst a favour
u art my King, O God: command deliverances for Jacob.
ush down our enemies: through thy name will
t us.
ow, neither shall my sword save me.
7 But thou hast saved us from our enemies, and hast put them to
.
, and praise thy name for ever.

 to shame; and goest not forth
rmies.
k from the enemy: and they which hate
spoil for themselves.
iven us like sheep appointed for meat; and hast
44:12 Thou sellest thy people for nought, and dost not increase thy
 price.
 to our neighbours, a scorn and a
n to them that are round about us.
4 Thou makest us a byword among the heathen, a shaking of the head
.
ore me, and the shame of my face
ered me,
t reproacheth and blasphemeth; by reason
of the enemy and avenger.
s is come upon us; yet have we not forgotten thee,
 thy covenant.
urned back, neither have our steps declined
 sore broken us in the place of dragons, and

ur God, or stretched out our
trange god;
this out? for he knoweth the secrets of the
e killed all the day long; we are counted
e, why sleepest thou, O Lord? arise, cast us not off for
idest thou thy face, and forgettest our affliction
 our soul is bowed down to the dust: our belly cleaveth unto
ise for our help, and redeem us for thy mercies' sake.
ing a good matter: I speak of the things which I
ngue is the pen of a ready writer.
 Thou art fairer than the children of men: grace is poured into
 God hath blessed thee for ever.
ird thy sword upon thy thigh, O most mighty, with thy glory and
4 And in thy majesty ride prosperously because of truth and
ess; and thy right hand shall teach thee
terrible things.
sharp in the heart of the king's enemies;
:6 Thy throne, O God, is for ever and ever: the sceptre of thy
ceptre.
 and hatest wickedness: therefore God,
y God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above thy
hy garments smell of myrrh, and aloes, and cassia, out of
y they have made thee glad.
 daughters were among thy honourable women: upon thy right
 in gold of Ophir.
ghter, and consider, and incline thine ear; forget
ather's house;
greatly desire thy beauty: for he is thy Lord;
he daughter of Tyre shall be there with a gift; even the
l intreat thy favour.
daughter is all glorious within: her clothing is of
l be brought unto the king in raiment of needlework: the
t follow her shall be brought unto thee.

they be brought: they shall
e king's palace.
athers shall be thy children, whom thou mayest
:17 I will make thy name to be remembered in all generations:
eople praise thee for ever and ever.

ery present help in trouble.
fore will not we fear, though the earth be removed, and
ried into the midst of the sea;
ough the waters thereof roar and be troubled, though the
welling thereof. Selah.
 river, the streams whereof shall make glad the city of
tabernacles of the most High.
is in the midst of her; she shall not be moved: God shall
early.
doms were moved: he uttered his voice,
e earth melted.
is with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge.
f the LORD, what desolations he hath made
ease unto the end of the earth; he breaketh
r; he burneth the chariot in

 will be exalted among the
l be exalted in the earth.
RD of hosts is with us; the God of Jacob is our refuge.
our hands, all ye people; shout unto God with the voice
 LORD most high is terrible; he is a great King over all
l subdue the people under us, and the nations under our
se our inheritance for us, the excellency of Jacob
d is gone up with a shout, the LORD with the sound of a
es to God, sing praises: sing praises unto our King,
is the King of all the earth: sing ye praises with
eth over the heathen: God sitteth upon the throne of his
ces of the people are gathered together, even the people
 the shields of the earth belong unto God:
 is the LORD, and greatly to be praised in the city of our
his holiness.
ion, the joy of the whole earth, is mount
 of the great King.
n her palaces for a refuge.
o, the kings were assembled, they passed by together.
ey marvelled; they were troubled, and
ted away.
 there, and pain, as of a woman in
l.
hish with an east wind.
 heard, so have we seen in the city of the LORD of
od will establish it for ever. Selah.
8:9 We have thought of thy lovingkindness, O God, in the midst of thy
:10 According to thy name, O God, so is thy praise unto the ends of
right hand is full of righteousness.
:11 Let mount Zion rejoice, let the daughters of Judah be glad,
ments.
und about her: tell the towers

r her palaces; that ye may
 generation following.
od is our God for ever and ever: he will be our guide
Hear this, all ye people; give ear, all ye inhabitants of the
ow and high, rich and poor, together.
9:3 My mouth shall speak of wisdom; and the meditation of my heart
rstanding.
 to a parable: I will open my dark saying
 fear in the days of evil, when the iniquity of

 boast themselves in the
ir riches;
 means redeem his brother, nor give to God
ption of their soul is precious, and it ceaseth for
till live for ever, and not see corruption.
 likewise the fool and the
 perish, and leave their wealth to others.
eir houses shall continue for
heir dwelling places to all generations; they call their
s.
ur abideth not: he is like the
t perish.
 folly: yet their posterity approve their
are laid in the grave; death shall feed on them;
n over them in the morning; and
uty shall consume in the grave from their dwelling.
soul from the power of the grave: for he
shall receive me. Selah.
hou afraid when one is made rich, when the glory of his
7 For when he dieth he shall carry nothing away: his glory shall
him.
ssed his soul: and men will praise
when thou doest well to thyself.
He shall go to the generation of his fathers; they shall never
Man that is in honour, and understandeth not, is like the beasts

 spoken, and called the earth
sing of the sun unto the going down thereof.
beauty, God hath shined.
hall come, and shall not keep silence: a fire shall
 be very tempestuous round about him.
0:4 He shall call to the heavens from above, and to the earth, that
s people.
r unto me; those that have made a
t with me by sacrifice.
avens shall declare his righteousness: for God is judge
r, O my people, and I will speak; O Israel, and I will testify
od, even thy God.
ve thee for thy sacrifices or thy burnt
fferings, to have been continually before me.
thy house, nor he goats out of thy

 mine, and the cattle upon a
ls.
ountains: and the wild beasts of
d are mine.
ould not tell thee: for the world is mine,
 eat the flesh of bulls, or drink the blood of goats?
giving; and pay thy vows unto the most
gh:
f trouble: I will deliver thee, and
shalt glorify me.
cked God saith, What hast thou to do to declare
 take my covenant in thy mouth?
eeing thou hatest instruction, and casteth my words behind
 sawest a thief, then thou consentedst with him, and
rers.
il, and thy tongue frameth deceit.
0 Thou sittest and speakest against thy brother; thou slanderest
 son.
, and I kept silence; thou thoughtest
t I was altogether such an one as thyself: but I will reprove thee,
 order before thine eyes.
sider this, ye that forget God, lest I tear you in
iver.
fieth me: and to him that ordereth
nversation aright will I shew the salvation of God.
O God, according to thy lovingkindness:
ccording unto the multitude of thy tender mercies blot out my
:2 Wash me throughly from mine iniquity, and cleanse me from my sin.
cknowledge my transgressions: and my sin is ever before
hee only, have I sinned, and done this evil in thy
tified when thou speakest, and be
hen thou judgest.
apen in iniquity; and in sin did my mother
st truth in the inward parts: and in the
hidden part thou shalt make me to know wisdom.
hall be clean: wash me, and I shall
iter than snow.
y and gladness; that the bones which thou hast
 face from my sins, and blot out all mine iniquities.
heart, O God; and renew a right spirit
thin me.
y presence; and take not thy holy spirit
from me.
of thy salvation; and uphold me with thy
free spirit.
ansgressors thy ways; and sinners shall be
 from bloodguiltiness, O God, thou God of my
oud of thy righteousness.
 open thou my lips; and my mouth shall shew forth thy
irest not sacrifice; else would I give it: thou

 spirit: a broken and a
 God, thou wilt not despise.
ood in thy good pleasure unto Zion: build thou the walls of
n shalt thou be pleased with the sacrifices of righteousness,
nd whole burnt offering: then shall they offer
:1 Why boastest thou thyself in mischief, O mighty man? the goodness
h continually.
 mischiefs; like a sharp razor, working
eceitfully.
than good; and lying rather than to speak
 all devouring words, O thou deceitful tongue.
ee for ever, he shall take thee
 pluck thee out of thy dwelling place, and root thee out of
 Selah.
ee, and fear, and shall laugh at him:
2:7 Lo, this is the man that made not God his strength; but trusted
e of his riches, and strengthened himself in his
a green olive tree in the house of God: I trust in
er.
ecause thou hast done it: and I
 on thy name; for it is good before thy saints.
s heart, There is no God. Corrupt are
y, and have done abominable iniquity: there is none that doeth
oked down from heaven upon the children of men, to see if
nderstand, that did seek God.
y one of them is gone back: they are altogether become
oeth good, no, not one.
orkers of iniquity no knowledge? who eat up my people
not called upon God.
ey in great fear, where no fear was: for God hath
ncampeth against thee: thou hast put
 to shame, because God hath despised them.
ere come out of Zion! When God
ack the captivity of his people, Jacob shall rejoice, and

judge me by thy strength.
prayer, O God; give ear to the words of my mouth.
 against me, and oppressors seek after
 soul: they have not set God before them. Selah.
 the Lord is with them that uphold my
l.
enemies: cut them off in thy
:6 I will freely sacrifice unto thee: I will praise thy name, O
d.
 all trouble: and mine eye hath
desire upon mine enemies.
 ear to my prayer, O God; and hide not thyself from my
 unto me, and hear me: I mourn in my complaint, and make a
f the voice of the enemy, because of the oppression of
iquity upon me, and in wrath they hate me.
: and the terrors of death are
n me.
e come upon me, and horror hath
ed me.
ings like a dove! for then would I fly
ay, and be at rest.
 I wander far off, and remain in the wilderness.
scape from the windy storm and tempest.

ngues: for I have seen
e in the city.
 go about it upon the walls thereof: mischief
t.
reof: deceit and guile depart not
r streets.
y that reproached me; then I could have
orne it: neither was it he that hated me that did magnify himself
I would have hid myself from him:
 But it was thou, a man mine equal, my guide, and mine
ok sweet counsel together, and walked unto the house of God
t death seize upon them, and let them go down quick into hell:
 their dwellings, and among them.
 As for me, I will call upon God; and the LORD shall save me.
morning, and at noon, will I pray, and cry aloud:
:18 He hath delivered my soul in peace from the battle that was
re were many with me.
ear, and afflict them, even he that abideth of old.
hanges, therefore they fear not God.
:20 He hath put forth his hands against such as be at peace with
n his covenant.
mouth were smoother than butter, but war was in
an oil, yet were they drawn swords.
22 Cast thy burden upon the LORD, and he shall sustain thee: he
the righteous to be moved.
ou, O God, shalt bring them down into the pit of
men shall not live out half their
ut I will trust in thee.
rciful unto me, O God: for man would swallow me up; he
.
 me up: for they be many that
st me, O thou most High.
 I am afraid, I will trust in thee.
4 In God I will praise his word, in God I have put my trust; I will
lesh can do unto me.
y wrest my words: all their thoughts are against me
hemselves together, they hide themselves, they mark
 soul.
ty? in thine anger cast down the
O God.
 put thou my tears into thy bottle:
hey not in thy book?
to thee, then shall mine enemies turn back: this I
0 In God will I praise his word: in the LORD will I praise his
d have I put my trust: I will not be afraid what man can do
ows are upon me, O God: I will render praises unto thee.
vered my soul from death: wilt not thou
eliver my feet from falling, that I may walk before God in the light

e merciful unto me: for my soul
in thee: yea, in the shadow of thy wings will I make my
ies be overpast.
od most high; unto God that performeth all
m heaven, and save me from the reproach of him
 shall send forth his mercy and
.
e even among them that are set on
ven the sons of men, whose teeth are spears and arrows, and
ord.
 the heavens; let thy glory be above
the earth.
t for my steps; my soul is bowed down:
ey have digged a pit before me, into the midst whereof they are
Selah.
y heart is fixed: I will sing and give
aise.
saltery and harp: I myself will awake
ly.
ong the people: I will sing unto
ng the nations.
great unto the heavens, and thy truth unto the
God, above the heavens: let thy glory be
above all the earth.
eed speak righteousness, O congregation? do ye judge

e weigh the violence of your
 earth.
rom the womb: they go astray as soon as
hey be born, speaking lies.
poison is like the poison of a serpent: they are like the
her ear;
 the voice of charmers, charming never
 wisely.
 in their mouth: break out the great
h of the young lions, O LORD.
them melt away as waters which run continually: when he
s arrows, let them be as cut in pieces.

one of them pass away: like
birth of a woman, that they may not see the sun.
he thorns, he shall take them away as
h a whirlwind, both living, and in his wrath.
hen he seeth the vengeance: he
 his feet in the blood of the wicked.
8:11 So that a man shall say, Verily there is a reward for the
 is a God that judgeth in the earth.

God: defend me from them that
inst me.
rs of iniquity, and save me from bloody
en.
my soul: the mighty are gathered
me; not for my transgression, nor for my sin, O LORD.
hemselves without my fault: awake to help
 LORD God of hosts, the God of Israel, awake to
ful to any wicked transgressors.

 noise like a dog, and go
 city.
 their mouth: swords are in their
or who, say they, doth hear?
hou, O LORD, shalt laugh at them; thou shalt have all the
9:9 Because of his strength will I wait upon thee: for God is my
The God of my mercy shall prevent me: God shall let me see my
ies.
e forget: scatter them by thy power;
bring them down, O Lord our shield.
12 For the sin of their mouth and the words of their lips let them
 their pride: and for cursing and lying which they
wrath, consume them, that they may not be: and
ob unto the ends of the earth.
59:14 And at evening let them return; and let them make a noise like a
round about the city.
nder up and down for meat, and grudge if they be not
 sing of thy power; yea, I will sing aloud of thy
st been my defence and refuge in the
of my trouble.
rength, will I sing: for God is my defence,
God, thou hast cast us off, thou hast scattered us, thou hast
rn thyself to us again.
made the earth to tremble; thou hast broken it: heal
haketh.
e hard things: thou hast made us to
 the wine of astonishment.
st given a banner to them that fear thee, that it may be
ruth. Selah.
be delivered; save with thy right hand, and
 holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide
Shechem, and mete out the valley of Succoth.
 mine; Ephraim also is the
ne head; Judah is my lawgiver;
b is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe: Philistia,
 of me.
 strong city? who will lead me into

t cast us off? and thou, O God,
st not go out with our armies?
ve us help from trouble: for vain is the help of man.
do valiantly: for he it is that shall tread
ry, O God; attend unto my prayer.
From the end of the earth will I cry unto thee, when my heart is
me to the rock that is higher than I.
1:3 For thou hast been a shelter for me, and a strong tower from the
 I will abide in thy tabernacle for ever: I will trust in the
Selah.
 my vows: thou hast given me the
 of those that fear thy name.
 wilt prolong the king's life: and his years as many
abide before God for ever: O prepare mercy and truth,
:8 So will I sing praise unto thy name for ever, that I may daily

: from him cometh my salvation.
 only is my rock and my salvation; he is my defence; I shall

against a man? ye shall be
ou: as a bowing wall shall ye be, and as a tottering
lt to cast him down from his excellency: they
r mouth, but they curse inwardly.

for my expectation is from him.
 only is my rock and my salvation: he is my defence; I shall
In God is my salvation and my glory: the rock of my strength, and
God.
 people, pour out your heart before
God is a refuge for us. Selah.
ely men of low degree are vanity, and men of high degree are a
he balance, they are altogether lighter than
on, and become not vain in robbery: if
ches increase, set not your heart upon them.
ve I heard this; that power
o God.
longeth mercy: for thou renderest to
y man according to his work.
 God, thou art my God; early will I seek thee: my soul thirsteth
 longeth for thee in a dry and thirsty land, where
power and thy glory, so as I have seen thee in the
ovingkindness is better than life, my lips shall
less thee while I live: I will lift up my hands in
be satisfied as with marrow and fatness; and my
 lips:
y bed, and meditate on thee in the
watches.
 help, therefore in the shadow of thy
gs will I rejoice.
th hard after thee: thy right hand upholdeth me.
, to destroy it, shall go into the
parts of the earth.
ll by the sword: they shall be a portion for foxes.
ice in God; every one that sweareth by
m shall glory: but the mouth of them that speak lies shall be
Hear my voice, O God, in my prayer: preserve my life from fear of
2 Hide me from the secret counsel of the wicked; from the
rs of iniquity:
gue like a sword, and bend their bows to shoot
64:4 That they may shoot in secret at the perfect: suddenly do they
nd fear not.
lves in an evil matter: they commune of
aying snares privily; they say, Who shall see them?
es; they accomplish a diligent search:
th the inward thought of every one of them, and the heart, is deep.
shall shoot at them with an arrow; suddenly shall they be
shall make their own tongue to fall upon themselves: all
way.
hall declare the work of God; for
all wisely consider of his doing.
 The righteous shall be glad in the LORD, and shall trust in him;
ht in heart shall glory.
e waiteth for thee, O God, in Sion: and unto thee shall the
:2 O thou that hearest prayer, unto thee shall all flesh come.
evail against me: as for our transgressions, thou
essed is the man whom thou choosest, and causest to approach
 dwell in thy courts: we shall be satisfied with
 thy holy temple.
gs in righteousness wilt thou answer us, O God of
ence of all the ends of the earth,
 them that are afar off upon the sea:
5:6 Which by his strength setteth fast the mountains; being girded
5:7 Which stilleth the noise of the seas, the noise of their waves,
of the people.
l in the uttermost parts are afraid at thy
 morning and evening to
Thou visitest the earth, and waterest it: thou greatly enrichest
of God, which is full of water: thou preparest them
d for it.
s thereof abundantly: thou settlest the
urrows thereof: thou makest it soft with showers: thou blessest the
of.
hy goodness; and thy paths drop

e wilderness: and the little
e on every side.
 clothed with flocks; the valleys also are
oy, they also sing.
ful noise unto God, all ye lands:
Sing forth the honour of his name: make his praise glorious.
ow terrible art thou in thy works! through the
nemies submit themselves unto
:4 All the earth shall worship thee, and shall sing unto thee; they
hy name. Selah.
orks of God: he is terrible in his doing toward
ned the sea into dry land: they went through the flood on
e in him.
or ever; his eyes behold the nations: let
h.
 make the voice of his praise to
:
and suffereth not our feet to be

hou hast tried us, as silver

ou laidst affliction upon our
6:12 Thou hast caused men to ride over our heads; we went through
water: but thou broughtest us out into a wealthy
 house with burnt offerings: I will pay thee
ttered, and my mouth hath spoken, when I was
 thee burnt sacrifices of fatlings, with the
 with goats. Selah.
, all ye that fear God, and I will declare what he
I cried unto him with my mouth, and he was extolled with my
egard iniquity in my heart, the Lord will not hear me:
heard me; he hath attended to the voice of
h hath not turned away my prayer, nor his
l unto us, and bless us; and cause his face to
hy way may be known upon earth, thy saving health among all
e people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise
ons be glad and sing for joy: for thou shalt judge
rn the nations upon earth. Selah.
Let the people praise thee, O God; let all the people praise
ll the earth yield her increase; and God, even our own
 God shall bless us; and all the ends of the earth shall fear him.
od arise, let his enemies be scattered: let them also that
.
e them away: as wax melteth
re, so let the wicked perish at the presence of God.
e glad; let them rejoice before God: yea,
g unto God, sing praises to his name: extol him that rideth
 name JAH, and rejoice before him.
 A father of the fatherless, and a judge of the widows, is God in
on.
milies: he bringeth out those which
ound with chains: but the rebellious dwell in a dry land.
entest forth before thy people, when thou didst
:
o dropped at the presence of God:
nai itself was moved at the presence of God, the God of Israel.
 didst send a plentiful rain, whereby thou didst
 was weary.
 dwelt therein: thou, O God, hast prepared
he Lord gave the word: great was the company of those that
ings of armies did flee apace: and she that tarried at home
8:13 Though ye have lien among the pots, yet shall ye be as the wings
ered with silver, and her feathers with yellow gold.
tered kings in it, it was white as snow in
he hill of Bashan; an high hill as the
ll of Bashan.
h hills? this is the hill which God desireth
in it for ever.
od are twenty thousand, even thousands of
ai, in the holy place.
ascended on high, thou hast led captivity captive:
; yea, for the rebellious also, that
LORD God might dwell among them.
Blessed be the Lord, who daily loadeth us with benefits, even
ion. Selah.
 the God of salvation; and unto GOD the
ord belong the issues from death.
 But God shall wound the head of his enemies, and the hairy scalp
 goeth on still in his trespasses.
2 The Lord said, I will bring again from Bashan, I will bring my
the depths of the sea:
oot may be dipped in the blood of thine enemies, and
same.
O God; even the goings of my God, my
, in the sanctuary.
ent before, the players on instruments followed
playing with timbrels.
od in the congregations, even the Lord, from the
 is little Benjamin with their ruler, the princes of Judah
rinces of Zebulun, and the princes of
htali.
 strength: strengthen, O God, that
thou hast wrought for us.
 of thy temple at Jerusalem shall kings bring presents
he company of spearmen, the multitude of the bulls, with
till every one submit himself with pieces of
elight in war.
 out of Egypt; Ethiopia shall soon stretch out
to God, ye kingdoms of the earth; O sing praises unto the
him that rideth upon the heavens of heavens, which were of
t his voice, and that a mighty voice.
8:34 Ascribe ye strength unto God: his excellency is over Israel, and
is in the clouds.
 terrible out of thy holy places: the God of
power unto his people. Blessed

re come in unto my soul.
 deep mire, where there is no standing: I am come into
s overflow me.
ying: my throat is dried: mine eyes fail while
 hate me without a cause are more than the hairs of mine
roy me, being mine enemies wrongfully, are
k not away.
 foolishness; and my sins are not hid from
thee, O Lord GOD of hosts, be ashamed
 my sake: let not those that seek thee be confounded for my sake, O

reproach; shame hath covered my
69:8 I am become a stranger unto my brethren, and an alien unto my
n.
h eaten me up; and the reproaches
 that reproached thee are fallen upon me.
l with fasting, that was to my

 and I became a proverb to
 They that sit in the gate speak against me; and I was the song

hee, O LORD, in an acceptable
, in the multitude of thy mercy hear me, in the truth of
liver me out of the mire, and let me not sink: let me be
ate me, and out of the deep waters.
15 Let not the waterflood overflow me, neither let the deep swallow
not the pit shut her mouth upon me.
16 Hear me, O LORD; for thy lovingkindness is good: turn unto me
ultitude of thy tender mercies.
nd hide not thy face from thy servant; for I am in trouble:
:18 Draw nigh unto my soul, and redeem it: deliver me because of
9:19 Thou hast known my reproach, and my shame, and my dishonour:
are all before thee.
h broken my heart; and I am full of heaviness: and I
but there was none; and for comforters,
ut I found none.
o gall for my meat; and in my thirst they gave
eir table become a snare before them: and that which
fare, let it become a trap.
heir eyes be darkened, that they see not; and make their
.
 them, and let thy wrathful anger
ld of them.
be desolate; and let none dwell in their
tents.
m thou hast smitten; and they talk to
 grief of those whom thou hast wounded.

nd let them not come into thy
ss.
e book of the living, and not be
with the righteous.
 and sorrowful: let thy salvation, O God, set me up
 the name of God with a song, and will magnify him
 also shall please the LORD better than an ox or bullock

e glad: and your heart shall
ek God.
poor, and despiseth not his prisoners.
69:34 Let the heaven and earth praise him, the seas, and every thing
erein.
d will build the cities of Judah: that
ey may dwell there, and have it in possession.
s shall inherit it: and they that
s name shall dwell therein.
ke haste, O God, to deliver me; make haste to help me, O Lord.
shamed and confounded that seek after my soul: let
 to confusion, that desire my hurt.
3 Let them be turned back for a reward of their shame that say,
et all those that seek thee rejoice and be glad in thee: and let
alvation say continually, Let God be magnified.
e haste unto me, O God: thou art my
and my deliverer; O LORD, make no tarrying.
 trust: let me never be put to

and cause me to escape: incline
 unto me, and save me.
strong habitation, whereunto I may continually resort:
to save me; for thou art my rock and my
ortress.
 of the hand of the wicked, out of the
nd of the unrighteous and cruel man.
:5 For thou art my hope, O Lord GOD: thou art my trust from my
ee have I been holden up from the womb: thou art he that
 bowels: my praise shall be continually of
; but thou art my strong refuge.
et my mouth be filled with thy praise and with thy honour all
 me not off in the time of old age; forsake me not when my
10 For mine enemies speak against me; and they that lay wait for my
el together,
saken him: persecute and take him; for there
, be not far from me: O my God, make haste for my help.
ded and consumed that are adversaries to my
 and dishonour that seek my
4 But I will hope continually, and will yet praise thee more and
mouth shall shew forth thy righteousness and thy salvation
not the numbers thereof.
o in the strength of the Lord GOD: I will make mention
f thine only.
ught me from my youth: and hitherto have I
w also when I am old and greyheaded, O God, forsake me not;
 strength unto this generation, and thy power
9 Thy righteousness also, O God, is very high, who hast done great
ho is like unto thee!
 hast shewed me great and sore troubles, shalt
 up again from the depths of the

and comfort me on every side.
ill also praise thee with the psaltery, even thy truth, O my
sing with the harp, O thou Holy One of Israel.
e when I sing unto thee; and my
ch thou hast redeemed.
also shall talk of thy righteousness all the day long:
 they are brought unto shame, that seek my
ments, O God, and thy righteousness unto
the king's son.
 people with righteousness, and thy poor with
 bring peace to the people, and the little
l judge the poor of the people, he shall save the children
break in pieces the oppressor.
y shall fear thee as long as the sun and moon endure,

he mown grass: as showers that
earth.
eous flourish; and abundance of peace
long as the moon endureth.
l have dominion also from sea to sea, and from the river
.
s shall bow before him; and his
hall lick the dust.
Tarshish and of the isles shall bring presents: the
ffer gifts.
fall down before him: all nations shall
erve him.
e needy when he crieth; the poor also,
d him that hath no helper.
ll spare the poor and needy, and shall save the souls of
ll redeem their soul from deceit and violence: and
 his sight.
d to him shall be given of the gold of
eba: prayer also shall be made for him continually; and daily shall

 in the earth upon the top of
ns; the fruit thereof shall shake like Lebanon: and they of
 like grass of the earth.
e shall endure for ever: his name shall be continued as
all be blessed in him: all nations shall
call him blessed.
LORD God, the God of Israel, who only doeth
e his glorious name for ever: and let the whole
n, and Amen.
 the son of Jesse are ended.
ruly God is good to Israel, even to such as are of a clean
r me, my feet were almost gone; my steps had well nigh
nvious at the foolish, when I saw the prosperity of
re no bands in their death: but their strength is
uble as other men; neither are they plagued
 compasseth them about as a chain; violence
ir eyes stand out with fatness: they have more than heart
are corrupt, and speak wickedly concerning oppression: they
They set their mouth against the heavens, and their tongue
h.
ther: and waters of a full cup are
out to them.
th God know? and is there knowledge in the
e ungodly, who prosper in the world; they
e cleansed my heart in vain, and washed my hands in
 day long have I been plagued, and chastened every
ll speak thus; behold, I should offend against the
3:16 When I thought to know this, it was too painful for me;
nto the sanctuary of God; then understood I their
et them in slippery places: thou castedst
are they brought into desolation, as in a moment! they are
rrors.
h; so, O Lord, when thou awakest, thou
alt despise their image.
heart was grieved, and I was pricked in my reins.
orant: I was as a beast before thee.
:23 Nevertheless I am continually with thee: thou hast holden me by

sel, and afterward receive me

d there is none upon earth
beside thee.
t faileth: but God is the strength of my
heart, and my portion for ever.
or, lo, they that are far from thee shall perish: thou hast
 go a whoring from thee.
s good for me to draw near to God: I have put my trust
declare all thy works.
why hast thou cast us off for ever? why doth thine anger
 thy pasture?
ation, which thou hast purchased of old; the
ast redeemed; this mount Zion,
ou hast dwelt.
to the perpetual desolations; even all that
ctuary.
midst of thy congregations; they set up
heir ensigns for signs.
famous according as he had lifted up axes upon the
y break down the carved work thereof at once with axes
ve cast fire into thy sanctuary, they have defiled by
ce of thy name to the ground.
 said in their hearts, Let us destroy them together: they
nagogues of God in the land.
e not our signs: there is no more any prophet: neither is
noweth how long.
shall the adversary reproach? shall the enemy
 Why withdrawest thou thy hand, even thy right hand? pluck it out
74:12 For God is my King of old, working salvation in the midst of the
:13 Thou didst divide the sea by thy strength: thou brakest the
s in the waters.
 heads of leviathan in pieces, and gavest him to
he wilderness.
the fountain and the flood: thou driedst up
e, the night also is thine: thou hast prepared
 hast set all the borders of the earth: thou hast made
Remember this, that the enemy hath reproached, O LORD, and that
have blasphemed thy name.
er not the soul of thy turtledove unto the multitude of
congregation of thy poor for ever.
0 Have respect unto the covenant: for the dark places of the earth
habitations of cruelty.
 the oppressed return ashamed: let the poor and needy
se, O God, plead thine own cause: remember how the foolish
ly.
 enemies: the tumult of those that
p against thee increaseth continually.

ks, unto thee do we give thanks:
 thy name is near thy wondrous works declare.
egation I will judge uprightly.
e earth and all the inhabitants thereof are dissolved: I bear
 Selah.
l not foolishly: and to the wicked,
not up the horn:
horn on high: speak not with a stiff neck.
 the east, nor from the west,
e south.
putteth down one, and setteth up

 is a cup, and the wine is red;
l of mixture; and he poureth out of the same: but the dregs
 of the earth shall wring them out, and drink
ever; I will sing praises to the God of
acob.
 also will I cut off; but the horns
e righteous shall be exalted.
In Judah is God known: his name is great in Israel.
ernacle, and his dwelling place in Zion.

w, the shield, and the sword,
tle. Selah.
 and excellent than the mountains of prey.
y have slept their sleep: and
 men of might have found their hands.
6:6 At thy rebuke, O God of Jacob, both the chariot and horse are
sleep.
feared: and who may stand in thy sight
en once thou art angry?
 cause judgment to be heard from heaven; the earth
hen God arose to judgment, to save all the meek of the earth.
y the wrath of man shall praise thee: the remainder of

d: let all that be round about
presents unto him that ought to be feared.
rinces: he is terrible to the
e earth.
 my voice, even unto God with my voice; and
 of my trouble I sought the Lord: my sore ran in the
 refused to be comforted.
ered God, and was troubled: I complained, and my spirit
77:4 Thou holdest mine eyes waking: I am so troubled that I cannot
 have considered the days of old, the years of ancient times.
mbrance my song in the night: I commune with mine
igent search.
ff for ever? and will he be favourable no
 ever? doth his promise fail for
?
s? hath he in anger shut up his
rcies? Selah.
 my infirmity: but I will remember the years

RD: surely I will remember
 old.
 thy work, and talk of thy doings.
3 Thy way, O God, is in the sanctuary: who is so great a God as
hou art the God that doest wonders: thou hast declared thy
e.
med thy people, the sons of Jacob
eph. Selah.
O God, the waters saw thee; they were
aid: the depths also were troubled.
17 The clouds poured out water: the skies sent out a sound: thine
abroad.
was in the heaven: the lightnings
ed the world: the earth trembled and shook.
path in the great waters, and thy
ps are not known.
y people like a flock by the hand of Moses and
ople, to my law: incline your ears to the words
 mouth in a parable: I will utter dark sayings of
and known, and our fathers have told us.

ildren, shewing to the
 the praises of the LORD, and his strength, and his
ne.
 in Jacob, and appointed a law in
 which he commanded our fathers, that they should make them
:
t know them, even the children
ld be born; who should arise and declare them to their
might set their hope in God, and not forget the works
ents:
thers, a stubborn and rebellious
on; a generation that set not their heart aright, and whose
 with God.
, being armed, and carrying bows, turned
back in the day of battle.
ept not the covenant of God, and refused to walk in his
s works, and his wonders that he had shewed them.
in the sight of their fathers, in the
d of Egypt, in the field of Zoan.
 He divided the sea, and caused them to pass through; and he made
nd as an heap.
o he led them with a cloud, and all the night
ve the rocks in the wilderness, and gave them drink as out
78:16 He brought streams also out of the rock, and caused waters to
ivers.
gainst him by provoking the most High
the wilderness.
God in their heart by asking meat for their
God; they said, Can God furnish a table
n the wilderness?
e the rock, that the waters gushed out, and the
ad also? can he provide flesh for
ple?
s, and was wroth: so a fire was
gainst Jacob, and anger also came up against Israel;
not in God, and trusted not in his
ion:
clouds from above, and opened the
f heaven,
na upon them to eat, and had given them
f the corn of heaven.
 angels' food: he sent them meat to the full.
w in the heaven: and by his power
ght in the south wind.
flesh also upon them as dust, and feathered fowls like
8:28 And he let it fall in the midst of their camp, round about their

lled: for he gave them their

r lust. But while their meat
heir mouths,
e upon them, and slew the fattest of them,

and believed not for his

me in vanity, and their years

ght him: and they returned and
arly after God.
ed that God was their rock, and the high God
they did flatter him with their mouth, and they

 him, neither were they
ovenant.
mpassion, forgave their iniquity, and
troyed them not: yea, many a time turned he his anger away, and did
 his wrath.
t they were but flesh; a wind that passeth
 oft did they provoke him in the wilderness, and grieve him
 Yea, they turned back and tempted God, and limited the Holy One
2 They remembered not his hand, nor the day when he delivered them

gypt, and his wonders in the
n.
to blood; and their floods, that
ld not drink.
s of flies among them, which devoured them;
46 He gave also their increase unto the caterpiller, and their
st.
 hail, and their sycomore trees
t.
o the hail, and their flocks to
erbolts.
erceness of his anger, wrath, and
tion, and trouble, by sending evil angels among them.
anger; he spared not their soul from death,
nce;
in Egypt; the chief of their
the tabernacles of Ham:
his own people to go forth like sheep, and guided them
ck.
 that they feared not: but the sea
elmed their enemies.
ht them to the border of his sanctuary, even to this
 had purchased.
eathen also before them, and divided them an
es of Israel to dwell in their
78:56 Yet they tempted and provoked the most high God, and kept not
:
ithfully like their fathers: they
rned aside like a deceitful bow.
For they provoked him to anger with their high places, and moved
th their graven images.
heard this, he was wroth, and greatly abhorred Israel:
he tabernacle of Shiloh, the tent which he
 his strength into captivity, and his glory into
 his people over also unto the sword; and was wroth with
The fire consumed their young men; and their maidens were not

d their widows made no
:65 Then the LORD awaked as one out of sleep, and like a mighty man
y reason of wine.
s enemies in the hinder parts: he put them to a
er he refused the tabernacle of Joseph, and chose not the
8 But chose the tribe of Judah, the mount Zion which he loved.
 his sanctuary like high palaces, like the earth
.
, and took him from the
:71 From following the ewes great with young he brought him to feed
e, and Israel his inheritance.
 he fed them according to the integrity of his heart; and
lness of his hands.
 heathen are come into thine inheritance; thy holy
ave laid Jerusalem on heaps.
ead bodies of thy servants have they given to be meat unto
 the flesh of thy saints unto the beasts of
y shed like water round about Jerusalem; and
e are become a reproach to our neighbours, a scorn and derision
und about us.
 thou be angry for ever? shall thy jealousy
ath upon the heathen that have not known thee, and
called upon thy name.
e devoured Jacob, and laid waste his dwelling place.
us former iniquities: let thy tender
ies speedily prevent us: for we are brought very low.
salvation, for the glory of thy name: and
thy name's sake.
 the heathen say, Where is their God? let him be
ht by the revenging of the blood of
ervants which is shed.
ghing of the prisoner come before thee; according to
serve thou those that are appointed to
e;
 sevenfold into their bosom their
h, wherewith they have reproached thee, O Lord.
of thy pasture will give thee thanks
ever: we will shew forth thy praise to all generations.
herd of Israel, thou that leadest Joseph like a
he cherubims, shine forth.
Ephraim and Benjamin and Manasseh stir up thy strength,
:3 Turn us again, O God, and cause thy face to shine; and we shall
4 O LORD God of hosts, how long wilt thou be angry against the
?
 of tears; and givest them tears
 in great measure.
a strife unto our neighbours: and our enemies
us again, O God of hosts, and cause thy face to shine; and
:8 Thou hast brought a vine out of Egypt: thou hast cast out the
ed it.
 it, and didst cause it to take deep
, and it filled the land.
ls were covered with the shadow of it, and the boughs
cedars.
nto the sea, and her branches unto the
ver.
wn her hedges, so that all they
s by the way do pluck her?
ar out of the wood doth waste it, and the wild beast of

hosts: look down from heaven,
 and visit this vine;
eyard which thy right hand hath planted, and the
 thyself.
 it is cut down: they perish at the
e of thy countenance.
d be upon the man of thy right hand, upon the son of
r thyself.
 from thee: quicken us, and we will call
upon thy name.
ORD God of hosts, cause thy face to shine; and
aloud unto God our strength: make a joyful noise unto the
e a psalm, and bring hither the timbrel, the pleasant harp
:3 Blow up the trumpet in the new moon, in the time appointed, on
day.
rael, and a law of the God of Jacob.
:5 This he ordained in Joseph for a testimony, when he went out
 Egypt: where I heard a language that I understood
der from the burden: his hands were delivered
in trouble, and I delivered thee; I answered thee
 proved thee at the waters of

ill testify unto thee: O Israel, if
wilt hearken unto me;
no strange god be in thee; neither shalt thou worship
m the LORD thy God, which brought thee out of the land of
e, and I will fill it.
ple would not hearken to my voice; and Israel would
them up unto their own hearts' lust: and they walked
3 Oh that my people had hearkened unto me, and Israel had walked
14 I should soon have subdued their enemies, and turned my hand
saries.
ould have submitted themselves unto
but their time should have endured for ever.
ith the finest of the wheat: and
ey out of the rock should I have satisfied thee.
gregation of the mighty; he judgeth among
unjustly, and accept the persons of the
icked? Selah.
fatherless: do justice to the afflicted and
dy: rid them out of the hand of the
d.
y understand; they walk on in
ll the foundations of the earth are out of course.
 and all of you are children of the most
High.
nd fall like one of the princes.
rise, O God, judge the earth: for thou shalt inherit all
not thou silence, O God: hold not thy peace, and be not
lo, thine enemies make a tumult: and they that hate thee

nst thy people, and consulted
 hidden ones.
, and let us cut them off from being a
tion; that the name of Israel may be no more in remembrance.
onsulted together with one consent: they are
tabernacles of Edom, and the Ishmaelites; of Moab, and the
, and Ammon, and Amalek; the Philistines with the
r also is joined with them: they have holpen the children of
 Do unto them as unto the Midianites; as to Sisera, as to Jabin,
son:
y became as dung for the earth.
ake their nobles like Oreb, and like Zeeb: yea, all their
Zalmunna:
o ourselves the houses of God in
on.
eel; as the stubble before the
3:14 As the fire burneth a wood, and as the flame setteth the

 and make them afraid with
83:16 Fill their faces with shame; that they may seek thy name, O
t them be confounded and troubled for ever; yea, let them be
sh:
whose name alone is JEHOVAH, art
 high over all the earth.
amiable are thy tabernacles, O LORD of hosts!
nteth for the courts of the LORD:
t and my flesh crieth out for the living God.
 house, and the swallow a nest for
f, where she may lay her young, even thine altars, O LORD of
 God.
in thy house: they will be still
 thee. Selah.
hose strength is in thee; in whose heart are
through the valley of Baca make it a well; the rain
 They go from strength to strength, every one of them in Zion

er: give ear, O God of Jacob.
4:9 Behold, O God our shield, and look upon the face of thine
r a day in thy courts is better than a thousand. I had rather
e house of my God, than to dwell in the tents of
God is a sun and shield: the LORD will give grace
withhold from them that walk

n that trusteth in thee.
 thou hast been favourable unto thy land: thou hast brought
acob.
ity of thy people, thou hast covered
their sin. Selah.
away all thy wrath: thou hast turned thyself from

 cause thine anger toward us

 wilt thou draw out thine
nerations?
 again: that thy people may rejoice in
ee?
 grant us thy salvation.
ar what God the LORD will speak: for he will speak peace
s saints: but let them not turn again to
folly.
h them that fear him; that glory may
l in our land.
e met together; righteousness and peace have
l spring out of the earth; and righteousness shall
Yea, the LORD shall give that which is good; and our land shall

m; and shall set us in the way
ps.
, hear me: for I am poor and needy.
2 Preserve my soul; for I am holy: O thou my God, save thy servant
 thee.
: for I cry unto thee daily.
ce the soul of thy servant: for unto thee, O Lord, do I lift
r thou, Lord, art good, and ready to forgive; and plenteous in
that call upon thee.
ORD, unto my prayer; and attend to the voice of my
y of my trouble I will call upon thee: for thou wilt
ods there is none like unto thee, O Lord; neither are
 works.
 made shall come and worship before
 O Lord; and shall glorify thy name.
:10 For thou art great, and doest wondrous things: thou art God
ch me thy way, O LORD; I will walk in thy truth: unite my

 with all my heart: and I will
y name for evermore.
 thy mercy toward me: and thou hast delivered my
4 O God, the proud are risen against me, and the assemblies of
ght after my soul; and have not set thee before
t a God full of compassion, and gracious,
d truth.
 mercy upon me; give thy strength unto
y servant, and save the son of thine handmaid.
at they which hate me may see it,
ashamed: because thou, LORD, hast holpen me, and comforted me.
ation is in the holy mountains.
e LORD loveth the gates of Zion more than all the dwellings of
ous things are spoken of thee, O city of God. Selah.
Rahab and Babylon to them that know me:
ehold Philistia, and Tyre, with Ethiopia; this man was born there.
on it shall be said, This and that man was born in her:
ll establish her.
ount, when he writeth up the people, that this
s well the singers as the players on instruments shall be there:
 in thee.
vation, I have cried day and night before
hee: incline thine ear unto my cry;
3 For my soul is full of troubles: and my life draweth nigh unto
 I am counted with them that go down into the pit: I am as a man
gth:
 slain that lie in the grave, whom
ememberest no more: and they are cut off from thy hand.
 the lowest pit, in darkness, in the deeps.
d thou hast afflicted me with all
es. Selah.
 acquaintance far from me; thou hast made
, and I cannot come forth.
e mourneth by reason of affliction: LORD, I have called
etched out my hands unto thee.
lt thou shew wonders to the dead? shall the dead arise and
8:11 Shall thy lovingkindness be declared in the grave? or thy
ruction?
wn in the dark? and thy righteousness in
the land of forgetfulness?
to thee have I cried, O LORD; and in the morning shall my
8:14 LORD, why castest thou off my soul? why hidest thou thy face
 I am afflicted and ready to die from my youth up: while I suffer
distracted.
h over me; thy terrors have cut me off.

 water; they compassed me

ar from me, and mine
rkness.
cies of the LORD for ever: with my mouth
will I make known thy faithfulness to all generations.
y shall be built up for ever: thy
lness shalt thou establish in the very heavens.
my chosen, I have sworn unto David my
vant,
r ever, and build up thy throne to
nerations. Selah.
shall praise thy wonders, O LORD: thy
thfulness also in the congregation of the saints.
be compared unto the LORD? who among
sons of the mighty can be likened unto the LORD?
 in the assembly of the saints, and to
 had in reverence of all them that are about him.
s a strong LORD like unto thee? or to
 faithfulness round about thee?
ou rulest the raging of the sea: when the waves thereof arise,

 as one that is slain; thou
d thine enemies with thy strong arm.
:11 The heavens are thine, the earth also is thine: as for the world
s thereof, thou hast founded them.
2 The north and the south thou hast created them: Tabor and Hermon
 thy name.
: strong is thy hand, and high is thy
ht hand.
 the habitation of thy throne: mercy and
truth shall go before thy face.
lessed is the people that know the joyful sound: they shall
ght of thy countenance.
me shall they rejoice all the day: and in thy

trength: and in thy favour our
 be exalted.
defence; and the Holy One of Israel is our
on to thy holy one, and saidst, I have
id help upon one that is mighty; I have exalted one chosen out of
:20 I have found David my servant; with my holy oil have I anointed
ith whom my hand shall be established: mine arm also shall
 The enemy shall not exact upon him; nor the son of wickedness
3 And I will beat down his foes before his face, and plague them
89:24 But my faithfulness and my mercy shall be with him: and in my
horn be exalted.
and also in the sea, and his right hand in the
e, Thou art my father, my God, and the rock
ake him my firstborn, higher than the kings of the
keep for him for evermore, and my covenant shall
seed also will I make to endure for ever, and his throne as
89:30 If his children forsake my law, and walk not in my judgments;
 break my statutes, and keep not my commandments;
ransgression with the rod, and their
uity with stripes.
y lovingkindness will I not utterly take from him,
il.
 nor alter the thing that is gone
my lips.
holiness that I will not lie unto David.

d his throne as the sun before
37 It shall be established for ever as the moon, and as a faithful
n. Selah.
and abhorred, thou hast been wroth with
hine anointed.
d the covenant of thy servant: thou hast
profaned his crown by casting it to the ground.
is hedges; thou hast brought his
olds to ruin.
e way spoil him: he is a reproach to his
neighbours.
right hand of his adversaries; thou hast
made all his enemies to rejoice.
Thou hast also turned the edge of his sword, and hast not made
battle.
to cease, and cast his throne down to
 ground.
st thou shortened: thou hast covered him
with shame. Selah.
? wilt thou hide thyself for ever? shall thy wrath
r how short my time is: wherefore hast thou made all men
 is he that liveth, and shall not see death? shall he
d of the grave? Selah.
e are thy former lovingkindnesses, which thou swarest
9:50 Remember, Lord, the reproach of thy servants; how I do bear in
proach of all the mighty people;
Wherewith thine enemies have reproached, O LORD; wherewith they
 footsteps of thine anointed.
ssed be the LORD for evermore. Amen, and Amen.
dwelling place in all generations.
 Before the mountains were brought forth, or ever thou hadst
he world, even from everlasting to everlasting,
man to destruction; and sayest, Return, ye children
years in thy sight are but as yesterday when it is
t.
 a flood; they are as a sleep: in
ning they are like grass which groweth up.
d groweth up; in the evening it
wn, and withereth.
umed by thine anger, and by thy wrath are we
iquities before thee, our secret sins in the
all our days are passed away in thy wrath: we spend our years
d.
escore years and ten; and if by
 strength they be fourscore years, yet is their strength
is soon cut off, and we fly away.
 Who knoweth the power of thine anger? even according to thy

that we may apply our hearts

t it repent thee concerning thy

y; that we may rejoice and be
r days.
 the days wherein thou hast afflicted
 and the years wherein we have seen evil.
ants, and thy glory unto their

r God be upon us: and establish
work of our hands upon us; yea, the work of our hands
1 He that dwelleth in the secret place of the most High shall abide
w of the Almighty.
he LORD, He is my refuge and my fortress: my God;
ly he shall deliver thee from the snare of the fowler, and
nce.
feathers, and under his wings shalt
trust: his truth shall be thy shield and buckler.
or the terror by night; nor for the
 that flieth by day;
estilence that walketh in darkness; nor for the
.
e, and ten thousand at thy right
t it shall not come nigh thee.
y with thine eyes shalt thou behold and see the reward of the
se thou hast made the LORD, which is my refuge, even the

 neither shall any plague come
welling.
gels charge over thee, to keep thee in
l thy ways.
up in their hands, lest thou dash thy foot
ad upon the lion and adder: the young lion and the
feet.
e upon me, therefore will I deliver
I will set him on high, because he hath known my name.
e, and I will answer him: I will be with him
nour him.
atisfy him, and shew him my salvation.

 unto the Lord, and to sing
thy name, O most High:
th thy lovingkindness in the morning, and thy
n an instrument of ten strings, and upon the psaltery; upon
sound.
e glad through thy work: I will
n the works of thy hands.
how great are thy works! and thy thoughts are very deep.
th not; neither doth a fool understand this.
rass, and when all the workers of
y do flourish; it is that they shall be destroyed for ever:
art most high for evermore.
o, thine enemies, O LORD, for, lo, thine enemies shall
niquity shall be scattered.
y horn shalt thou exalt like the horn of an unicorn: I
 oil.
desire on mine enemies, and mine ears
ll hear my desire of the wicked that rise up against me.
l flourish like the palm tree: he shall grow
e that be planted in the house of the LORD shall flourish in

it in old age; they shall be fat
rishing;
 upright: he is my rock, and there is no
unrighteousness in him.
RD reigneth, he is clothed with majesty; the LORD is
th he hath girded himself: the world
 is stablished, that it cannot be moved.

hou art from everlasting.
ds have lifted up, O LORD, the floods have lifted up
p their waves.
 mightier than the noise of many waters, yea,
93:5 Thy testimonies are very sure: holiness becometh thine house, O
.
e belongeth; O God, to whom vengeance
ongeth, shew thyself.
elf, thou judge of the earth: render a reward to the
shall the wicked, how long shall the wicked
ter and speak hard things? and all the
rkers of iniquity boast themselves?
5 They break in pieces thy people, O LORD, and afflict thine
 slay the widow and the stranger, and murder the fatherless.
he LORD shall not see, neither shall the God of
, ye brutish among the people: and ye fools, when will
planted the ear, shall he not hear? he that formed the
:10 He that chastiseth the heathen, shall not he correct? he that
ledge, shall not he know?
D knoweth the thoughts of man, that they are vanity.
m thou chastenest, O LORD, and teachest
im out of thy law;
st give him rest from the days of adversity, until
.
his people, neither will he
nheritance.
turn unto righteousness: and all the
ght in heart shall follow it.
 will rise up for me against the evildoers? or who will stand
 workers of iniquity?
LORD had been my help, my soul had almost dwelt in
y foot slippeth; thy mercy, O LORD, held me up.
ghts within me thy comforts delight
ul.
have fellowship with thee, which
mischief by a law?
emselves together against the soul of the
.
 my God is the rock of my refuge.
 And he shall bring upon them their own iniquity, and shall cut
wn wickedness; yea, the LORD our God shall cut them
 sing unto the LORD: let us make a joyful noise to
:2 Let us come before his presence with thanksgiving, and make a
him with psalms.
 great God, and a great King above all gods.
 of the earth: the strength of the
is his also.
e made it: and his hands formed the dry
and.
w down: let us kneel before the LORD
maker.
re the people of his pasture, and the
ep of his hand. To day if ye will hear his voice,
in the provocation, and as in the day
temptation in the wilderness:
 your fathers tempted me, proved me, and saw my work.
I grieved with this generation, and said,
, and they have not known my
11 Unto whom I sware in my wrath that they should not enter into my
:1 O sing unto the LORD a new song: sing unto the LORD, all the
 unto the LORD, bless his name; shew forth his salvation from
eclare his glory among the heathen, his wonders among all
ORD is great, and greatly to be praised: he is to be
 For all the gods of the nations are idols: but the LORD made the
Honour and majesty are before him: strength and beauty are in his
7 Give unto the LORD, O ye kindreds of the people, give unto the
ength.
y due unto his name: bring an
nd come into his courts.
 the LORD in the beauty of holiness: fear before him,
mong the heathen that the LORD reigneth: the world also
t shall not be moved: he shall judge the
people righteously.
ns rejoice, and let the earth be glad; let the sea

hat is therein: then shall all
of the wood rejoice
RD: for he cometh, for he cometh to judge the
righteousness, and the people
uth.
e earth rejoice; let the multitude of
es be glad thereof.
kness are round about him: righteousness and
one.
burneth up his enemies round about.
4 His lightnings enlightened the world: the earth saw, and
lls melted like wax at the presence of the LORD, at the
 whole earth.
his righteousness, and all the people see his
 that serve graven images, that boast
mselves of idols: worship him, all ye gods.
e daughters of Judah rejoiced
thy judgments, O LORD.
ORD, art high above all the earth: thou art exalted
 that love the LORD, hate evil: he preserveth the souls of his
h them out of the hand of the wicked.
7:11 Light is sown for the righteous, and gladness for the upright in
12 Rejoice in the LORD, ye righteous; and give thanks at the
iness.
new song; for he hath done marvellous
ngs: his right hand, and his holy arm, hath gotten him the victory.
 hath made known his salvation: his righteousness hath he
t of the heathen.
ed his mercy and his truth toward the house of
ve seen the salvation of our God.
Make a joyful noise unto the LORD, all the earth: make a loud
nd sing praise.
 with the harp; with the harp, and the voice of
sound of cornet make a joyful noise before the
roar, and the fulness thereof; the world, and they
the floods clap their hands: let the hills be joyful together
D; for he cometh to judge the earth: with
nd the people with equity.
 LORD reigneth; let the people tremble: he sitteth between the
arth be moved.
n Zion; and he is high above all the people.
errible name; for it is holy.
king's strength also loveth judgment; thou dost establish
dgment and righteousness in Jacob.
 Exalt ye the LORD our God, and worship at his footstool; for he
oses and Aaron among his priests, and Samuel among them that
ey called upon the LORD, and he answered them.
udy pillar: they kept his
d the ordinance that he gave them.
 Thou answeredst them, O LORD our God: thou wast a God that
thou tookest vengeance of their inventions.
hip at his holy hill; for the
d is holy.
e unto the LORD, all ye lands.
rve the LORD with gladness: come before his presence with
 that the LORD he is God: it is he that hath made us, and
his people, and the sheep of his pasture.
iving, and into his courts with
e thankful unto him, and bless his name.

 everlasting; and his truth
ll generations.
f mercy and judgment: unto thee, O LORD, will I
 wisely in a perfect way. O when wilt thou
e with a perfect heart.
t no wicked thing before mine eyes: I hate the work of
ll not cleave to me.
art shall depart from me: I will not know a wicked
landereth his neighbour, him will I cut off: him
 heart will not I suffer.
es shall be upon the faithful of the land, that they may
keth in a perfect way, he shall serve me.
dwell within my house: he that
es shall not tarry in my sight.
 will early destroy all the wicked of the land; that I may cut
 from the city of the LORD.
ear my prayer, O LORD, and let my cry come unto thee.
m me in the day when I am in trouble;
line thine ear unto me: in the day when I call answer me speedily.
ays are consumed like smoke, and my bones are burned as
t is smitten, and withered like grass; so that I forget
y reason of the voice of my groaning my bones cleave to my
 a pelican of the wilderness: I am like an owl of the
 am as a sparrow alone upon the house top.
 day; and they that are mad
e sworn against me.
ten ashes like bread, and mingled my drink with
 indignation and thy wrath: for thou hast
 My days are like a shadow that declineth; and I am withered
But thou, O LORD, shall endure for ever; and thy remembrance

 upon Zion: for the time to
ea, the set time, is come.
hy servants take pleasure in her stones, and favour the
the heathen shall fear the name of the LORD, and all the
ry.
 Zion, he shall appear in his
02:17 He will regard the prayer of the destitute, and not despise
102:18 This shall be written for the generation to come: and the
 be created shall praise the LORD.
19 For he hath looked down from the height of his sanctuary; from
RD behold the earth;
 groaning of the prisoner; to loose those that are
 declare the name of the LORD in Zion, and his praise in
the people are gathered together, and the kingdoms, to
 weakened my strength in the way; he shortened my days.
take me not away in the midst of my days: thy

ation of the earth: and the
he work of thy hands.
 perish, but thou shalt endure: yea, all of them
 vesture shalt thou change them, and
 shall be changed:
the same, and thy years shall have no end.
all continue, and their seed
ablished before thee.
he LORD, O my soul: and all that is within me, bless his
the LORD, O my soul, and forget not all his benefits:
ne iniquities; who healeth all thy
es;
estruction; who crowneth thee with
kindness and tender mercies;
satisfieth thy mouth with good things; so that thy youth is
s.
ss and judgment for all that are
d.
ses, his acts unto the children of
.
us, slow to anger, and plenteous
.
er will he keep his anger for
3:10 He hath not dealt with us after our sins; nor rewarded us
quities.
gh above the earth, so great is his
 toward them that fear him.
ar as the east is from the west, so far hath he removed our

ildren, so the LORD pitieth them
r him.
 he remembereth that we are dust.
5 As for man, his days are as grass: as a flower of the field, so

 it is gone; and the place
know it no more.
f the LORD is from everlasting to everlasting
teousness unto children's
3:18 To such as keep his covenant, and to those that remember his
o them.
is throne in the heavens; and his
 ruleth over all.
, ye his angels, that excel in strength, that do
the voice of his word.
the LORD, all ye his hosts; ye ministers of his, that
ess the LORD, all his works in all places of his dominion:
l.
 O LORD my God, thou art very great;
 art clothed with honour and majesty.
04:2 Who coverest thyself with light as with a garment: who
ens like a curtain:
e beams of his chambers in the waters: who maketh
th upon the wings of the wind:
o maketh his angels spirits; his ministers a flaming fire:
ndations of the earth, that it should not be
dst it with the deep as with a garment: the waters
4:7 At thy rebuke they fled; at the voice of thy thunder they hasted
 They go up by the mountains; they go down by the valleys unto
 hast founded for them.
 set a bound that they may not pass over; that they
th.
the valleys, which run among the

 the field: the wild asses
hirst.
f the heaven have their habitation,
 sing among the branches.
ereth the hills from his chambers: the earth is satisfied
ks.
 for the cattle, and herb for the
 of man: that he may bring forth food out of the earth;
th glad the heart of man, and oil to make his
theneth man's heart.
f the LORD are full of sap; the cedars of Lebanon,
 Where the birds make their nests: as for the stork, the fir

he wild goats; and the rocks
es.
asons: the sun knoweth his going

ght: wherein all the beasts
 do creep forth.
 roar after their prey, and seek their meat from
ey gather themselves together, and lay them
 forth unto his work and to his labour until the
ifold are thy works! in wisdom hast thou made
ches.
sea, wherein are things creeping
ble, both small and great beasts.
6 There go the ships: there is that leviathan, whom thou hast

thou mayest give them their meat
eason.
y gather: thou openest thine hand,
re filled with good.
 thy face, they are troubled: thou takest away their
o their dust.
 thy spirit, they are created: and thou
enewest the face of the earth.
he glory of the LORD shall endure for ever: the LORD shall

embleth: he toucheth the
smoke.
 as long as I live: I will sing praise
 my God while I have my being.
y meditation of him shall be sweet: I will be glad in the
inners be consumed out of the earth, and let the
LORD, O my soul. Praise ye the LORD.

upon his name: make known his
 the people.
psalms unto him: talk ye of all his wondrous
ame: let the heart of them rejoice that
eek the LORD.
his strength: seek his face evermore.
05:5 Remember his marvellous works that he hath done; his wonders,
s of his mouth;
ham his servant, ye children of Jacob his
his judgments are in all the earth.
:8 He hath remembered his covenant for ever, the word which he
and generations.
e made with Abraham, and his oath unto Isaac;
Jacob for a law, and to Israel for
rlasting covenant:
thee will I give the land of Canaan, the lot of
ey were but a few men in number; yea, very few, and
 they went from one nation to another, from one kingdom to
4 He suffered no man to do them wrong: yea, he reproved kings for
05:15 Saying, Touch not mine anointed, and do my prophets no harm.
r he called for a famine upon the land: he brake the
7 He sent a man before them, even Joseph, who was sold for a
se feet they hurt with fetters: he was laid in iron:
is word came: the word of the LORD tried
him.
m; even the ruler of the people, and
him go free.
 his house, and ruler of all his substance:
asure; and teach his senators
105:23 Israel also came into Egypt; and Jacob sojourned in the land of
24 And he increased his people greatly; and made them stronger

s people, to deal subtilly with
nts.
and Aaron whom he had chosen.
ey shewed his signs among them, and wonders in the land of
arkness, and made it dark; and they rebelled not
ned their waters into blood, and slew their fish.
 frogs in abundance, in the chambers of
heir kings.
came divers sorts of flies, and lice in all
il for rain, and flaming fire in their land.
 their fig trees; and brake the
their coasts.
locusts came, and caterpillers, and that
without number,
ll the herbs in their land, and devoured the
ote also all the firstborn in their land, the chief of all
7 He brought them forth also with silver and gold: and there was
son among their tribes.
s glad when they departed: for the fear of them fell
 a cloud for a covering; and fire to give light in the
asked, and he brought quails, and satisfied them
1 He opened the rock, and the waters gushed out; they ran in the
river.
y promise, and Abraham his servant.
:43 And he brought forth his people with joy, and his chosen with
44 And gave them the lands of the heathen: and they inherited the
ple;
 statutes, and keep his laws. Praise
he LORD.
O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good:
6:2 Who can utter the mighty acts of the LORD? who can shew forth

t, and he that doeth
 times.
 the favour that thou bearest unto thy
ople: O visit me with thy salvation;
6:5 That I may see the good of thy chosen, that I may rejoice in the
y nation, that I may glory with thine inheritance.
fathers, we have committed iniquity, we
ave done wickedly.
derstood not thy wonders in Egypt; they remembered
; but provoked him at the sea, even at
e Red sea.
them for his name's sake, that he might
ake his mighty power to be known.
 He rebuked the Red sea also, and it was dried up: so he led them
s, as through the wilderness.
d he saved them from the hand of him that hated them, and
nd of the enemy.
covered their enemies: there was not one of them
 his words; they sang his praise.
3 They soon forgat his works; they waited not for his counsel:
exceedingly in the wilderness, and tempted God in
 them their request; but sent leanness into their
 also in the camp, and Aaron the saint of the
swallowed up Dathan and covered the
ny of Abiram.
dled in their company; the flame burned up
n Horeb, and worshipped the molten image.
to the similitude of an ox that
ass.
ur, which had done great things in

am, and terrible things by the

estroy them, had not Moses his
od before him in the breach, to turn away his wrath, lest he

and, they believed not his
5 But murmured in their tents, and hearkened not unto the voice
:26 Therefore he lifted up his hand against them, to overthrow them
ss:
 among the nations, and to scatter
n the lands.
ves also unto Baalpeor, and ate the
fices of the dead.
voked him to anger with their inventions: and the
:30 Then stood up Phinehas, and executed judgment: and so the

righteousness unto all
ermore.
 the waters of strife, so that it went
l with Moses for their sakes:
cause they provoked his spirit, so that he spake unadvisedly
34 They did not destroy the nations, concerning whom the LORD
6:35 But were mingled among the heathen, and learned their works.
 served their idols: which were a snare unto them.
eir sons and their daughters unto

he blood of their sons and of
ters, whom they sacrificed unto the idols of Canaan: and
 blood.
ith their own works, and went a whoring
ith their own inventions.
ore was the wrath of the LORD kindled against his people,
 his own inheritance.
e them into the hand of the heathen; and they that
06:42 Their enemies also oppressed them, and they were brought into
r their hand.
deliver them; but they provoked him with
their counsel, and were brought low for their iniquity.
garded their affliction, when he heard their
hem his covenant, and repented according
to the multitude of his mercies.
 He made them also to be pitied of all those that carried them
Save us, O LORD our God, and gather us from among the heathen,
thy holy name, and to triumph in thy praise.
rael from everlasting to
 let all the people say, Amen. Praise ye the LORD.
he LORD, for he is good: for his mercy
dureth for ever.
 of the LORD say so, whom he hath redeemed from
 gathered them out of the lands, from the east, and from the
and from the south.
 in the wilderness in a solitary way; they found no
ry and thirsty, their soul fainted in them.
n their trouble, and he delivered
t of their distresses.
 them forth by the right way, that they might go to a
Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his
the children of men!
fieth the longing soul, and filleth the hungry soul
s sit in darkness and in the shadow of death, being bound

 words of God, and contemned
of the most High:
rought down their heart with labour; they fell

heir trouble, and he saved
eir distresses.
out of darkness and the shadow of death, and
 Oh that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his
 the children of men!
h broken the gates of brass, and cut the bars of iron
cause of their transgression, and because of their
7:18 Their soul abhorreth all manner of meat; and they draw near
death.
RD in their trouble, and he saveth
ut of their distresses.
his word, and healed them, and delivered them from
 that men would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his
e children of men!
sacrifice the sacrifices of thanksgiving, and
107:23 They that go down to the sea in ships, that do business in
107:24 These see the works of the LORD, and his wonders in the deep.
e commandeth, and raiseth the stormy wind, which lifteth
07:26 They mount up to the heaven, they go down again to the depths:
melted because of trouble.
reel to and fro, and stagger like a drunken man, and are
:28 Then they cry unto the LORD in their trouble, and he bringeth
 distresses.
 a calm, so that the waves thereof are
ill.
they be quiet; so he bringeth them
heir desired haven.
would praise the LORD for his goodness, and for his
 of men!
 in the congregation of the people, and
raise him in the assembly of the elders.

ss, and the watersprings into

, for the wickedness of them
herein.
s into a standing water, and dry ground
nto watersprings.
aketh the hungry to dwell, that they may prepare
nd sow the fields, and plant vineyards, which may yield fruits
38 He blesseth them also, so that they are multiplied greatly; and
eir cattle to decrease.
hey are minished and brought low through oppression,
:40 He poureth contempt upon princes, and causeth them to wander in
 where there is no way.
eth he the poor on high from affliction, and maketh him
07:42 The righteous shall see it, and rejoice: and all iniquity shall
h.
ve these things, even they shall
nd the lovingkindness of the LORD.
108:1 O god, my heart is fixed; I will sing and give praise, even with

will awake early.
hee, O LORD, among the people: and I will sing

 heavens: and thy truth reacheth
 clouds.
above the heavens: and thy glory above
l the earth;
 be delivered: save with thy right hand, and
 his holiness; I will rejoice, I will divide
ccoth.
s mine; Ephraim also is the strength
ine head; Judah is my lawgiver;
oab is my washpot; over Edom will I cast out my shoe; over
.
ong city? who will lead me into
108:11 Wilt not thou, O God, who hast cast us off? and wilt not thou,
th with our hosts?
from trouble: for vain is the help of man.
ly: for he it is that shall
r enemies.
, O God of my praise;
th of the wicked and the mouth of the deceitful are
oken against me with a lying tongue.
9:3 They compassed me about also with words of hatred; and fought
t a cause.
y adversaries: but I give myself unto
yer.
il for good, and hatred for my love.
9:6 Set thou a wicked man over him: and let Satan stand at his right
 When he shall be judged, let him be condemned: and let his
09:8 Let his days be few; and let another take his office.
 be fatherless, and his wife a widow.
09:10 Let his children be continually vagabonds, and beg: let them
 also out of their desolate places.
:11 Let the extortioner catch all that he hath; and let the
our.
 mercy unto him: neither let there
 to favour his fatherless children.
:13 Let his posterity be cut off; and in the generation following
 blotted out.
f his fathers be remembered with the LORD;
tted out.
 LORD continually, that he may cut off
e memory of them from the earth.
 Because that he remembered not to shew mercy, but persecuted
n, that he might even slay the broken in heart.
t it come unto him: as he delighted
n blessing, so let it be far from him.
109:18 As he clothed himself with cursing like as with his garment, so
into his bowels like water, and like oil into his bones.
m as the garment which covereth him, and for a
ually.
 mine adversaries from the LORD, and
hem that speak evil against my soul.
9:21 But do thou for me, O GOD the Lord, for thy name's sake:
good, deliver thou me.
poor and needy, and my heart is wounded within me.
ow when it declineth: I am tossed up and
down as the locust.
 weak through fasting; and my flesh faileth of
eproach unto them: when they looked upon me
 me, O LORD my God: O save me according to thy mercy:
hat this is thy hand; that thou, LORD, hast
bless thou: when they arise, let them be
ashamed; but let thy servant rejoice.
09:29 Let mine adversaries be clothed with shame, and let them cover
h their own confusion, as with a mantle.

th my mouth; yea, I will
 the multitude.
nd at the right hand of the poor, to save him

thou at my right hand, until I
 enemies thy footstool.
shall send the rod of thy strength out of Zion: rule
mies.
 in the day of thy power, in the
 of holiness from the womb of the morning: thou hast the dew
 The LORD hath sworn, and will not repent, Thou art a priest for
er of Melchizedek.
y right hand shall strike through kings in the day
judge among the heathen, he shall fill the places with
und the heads over many countries.
7 He shall drink of the brook in the way: therefore shall he lift

 the LORD with my whole heart,
embly of the upright, and in the congregation.
eat, sought out of all them that
asure therein.
able and glorious: and his righteousness
endureth for ever.
is wonderful works to be remembered: the LORD is

fear him: he will ever be
covenant.
le the power of his works, that he may
ve them the heritage of the heathen.
1:7 The works of his hands are verity and judgment; all his

, and are done in truth and

e: he hath commanded his
r: holy and reverend is his name.
0 The fear of the LORD is the beginning of wisdom: a good
ey that do his commandments: his praise
ndureth for ever.
he LORD. Blessed is the man that feareth the LORD,
ommandments.
ghty upon earth: the generation of the
right shall be blessed.
d riches shall be in his house: and his righteousness
nto the upright there ariseth light in the darkness: he is
mpassion, and righteous.
an sheweth favour, and lendeth: he will guide his
 Surely he shall not be moved for ever: the righteous shall be in
brance.
 evil tidings: his heart is fixed,
ng in the LORD.
blished, he shall not be afraid, until he see
 He hath dispersed, he hath given to the poor; his righteousness
 his horn shall be exalted with honour.

ieved; he shall gnash with
 melt away: the desire of the wicked shall perish.
Praise, O ye servants of the LORD, praise
 the name of the LORD from this time forth and for
ng of the sun unto the going down of the same the
113:4 The LORD is high above all nations, and his glory above the
 Who is like unto the LORD our God, who dwelleth on high,
elf to behold the things that are in heaven,
up the poor out of the dust, and lifteth the needy
at he may set him with princes, even with the princes of his
keth the barren woman to keep house, and to be a joyful
ye the LORD.
 out of Egypt, the house of Jacob from a people
 was his sanctuary, and Israel his dominion.
an was driven back.
 skipped like rams, and the little hills like
ou sea, that thou fleddest? thou Jordan,
that thou wast driven back?
untains, that ye skipped like rams; and ye little hills,
le, thou earth, at the presence of the Lord, at the

ing water, the flint into a
aters.
ot unto us, but unto thy name give glory,

 Where is now their God?
God is in the heavens: he hath done whatsoever he hath
s are silver and gold, the work of men's hands.
speak not: eyes have they, but they
ot:
 not: noses have they, but they
:
e not: feet have they, but they
 neither speak they through their throat.
 them; so is every one that
hem.
LORD: he is their help and their

ORD: he is their help and their

he LORD: he is their help and
d.
 us: he will bless us; he will
house of Israel; he will bless the house of Aaron.
 fear the LORD, both small and great.
15:14 The LORD shall increase you more and more, you and your
e are blessed of the LORD which made heaven and earth.
e heavens, are the LORD's: but the earth
hath he given to the children of men.
15:17 The dead praise not the LORD, neither any that go down into
8 But we will bless the LORD from this time forth and for
ORD.
 he hath heard my voice and my
ons.
 ear unto me, therefore will I call
him as long as I live.
s of death compassed me, and the pains of hell gat
d sorrow.
name of the LORD; O LORD, I beseech thee,
 LORD, and righteous; yea, our God is merciful.
ple: I was brought low, and he helped

 for the LORD hath dealt
 thee.
 soul from death, mine eyes from
nd my feet from falling.
alk before the LORD in the land of the living.
I spoken: I was greatly afflicted:
11 I said in my haste, All men are liars.
D for all his benefits toward
13 I will take the cup of salvation, and call upon the name of the
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his
recious in the sight of the LORD is the death of his saints.
 I am thy servant; I am thy servant, and the son
d my bonds.
 the sacrifice of thanksgiving, and will
call upon the name of the LORD.
I will pay my vows unto the LORD now in the presence of all his
n the courts of the LORD's house, in the midst of thee, O
LORD.
ye nations: praise him, all ye people.
117:2 For his merciful kindness is great toward us: and the truth of
eth for ever. Praise ye the LORD.
18:1 O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: because his mercy
er.
mercy endureth for ever.
house of Aaron now say, that his mercy endureth for
t fear the LORD say, that his mercy endureth for
ORD in distress: the LORD answered me, and
RD is on my side; I will not fear: what can man do unto
h my part with them that help me: therefore shall
te me.
he LORD than to put confidence in man.
118:9 It is better to trust in the LORD than to put confidence in
0 All nations compassed me about: but in the name of the LORD

ey compassed me about: but in
 the LORD I will destroy them.
hey compassed me about like bees: they are quenched as the
he name of the LORD I will destroy them.

I might fall: but the LORD
118:14 The LORD is my strength and song, and is become my salvation.
oice of rejoicing and salvation is in the tabernacles of
and of the LORD doeth valiantly.
 The right hand of the LORD is exalted: the right hand of the

declare the works of the LORD.
he LORD hath chastened me sore: but he hath not given me over
 Open to me the gates of righteousness: I will go into them, and
LORD:
o which the righteous shall enter.
21 I will praise thee: for thou hast heard me, and art become my
22 The stone which the builders refused is become the head stone
118:23 This is the LORD's doing; it is marvellous in our eyes.
 day which the LORD hath made; we will rejoice and
w, I beseech thee, O LORD: O LORD, I beseech thee, send
lessed be he that cometh in the name of the LORD: we have
use of the LORD.
, which hath shewed us light: bind the sacrifice
 the altar.
 I will praise thee: thou art my God, I
ill exalt thee.
to the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy
are the undefiled in the way, who walk in the law of the
 they that keep his testimonies, and that seek him
hey also do no iniquity: they walk in his ways.
eep thy precepts diligently.
at my ways were directed to keep thy statutes!
 when I have respect unto all thy
ments.
rightness of heart, when I shall have
rned thy righteous judgments.
ill keep thy statutes: O forsake me not utterly.
man cleanse his way? by taking heed
to according to thy word.
y whole heart have I sought thee: O let me not wander
:11 Thy word have I hid in mine heart, that I might not sin against
 Blessed art thou, O LORD: teach me thy statutes.
ared all the judgments of thy mouth.
9:14 I have rejoiced in the way of thy testimonies, as much as in
9:15 I will meditate in thy precepts, and have respect unto thy
ill delight myself in thy statutes: I will not forget thy
tifully with thy servant, that I may live, and keep
ine eyes, that I may behold wondrous things out of
er in the earth: hide not thy commandments from
the longing that it hath unto thy
ts at all times.
ed the proud that are cursed, which do err from
from me reproach and contempt; for I have kept thy
lso did sit and speak against me: but thy servant did
119:24 Thy testimonies also are my delight and my counsellors.
aveth unto the dust: quicken thou me according to
ed my ways, and thou heardest me: teach me thy
stand the way of thy precepts: so shall I talk
soul melteth for heaviness: strengthen thou me according
emove from me the way of lying: and grant me thy law
hosen the way of truth: thy judgments have I laid
 unto thy testimonies: O LORD, put me not to shame.
thy commandments, when thou shalt enlarge
 way of thy statutes; and I shall keep it
ding, and I shall keep thy law; yea, I shall
:35 Make me to go in the path of thy commandments; for therein do I
:36 Incline my heart unto thy testimonies, and not to covetousness.
way mine eyes from beholding vanity; and quicken thou me
lish thy word unto thy servant, who is devoted to thy fear.
eproach which I fear: for thy judgments are good.
ter thy precepts: quicken me in thy
eousness.
lso unto me, O LORD, even thy salvation,
according to thy word.
I have wherewith to answer him that reproacheth me:
:43 And take not the word of truth utterly out of my mouth; for I
 judgments.
law continually for ever and ever.
45 And I will walk at liberty: for I seek thy precepts.
y testimonies also before kings, and will not
ght myself in thy commandments, which I have
lift up unto thy commandments, which I
ve loved; and I will meditate in thy statutes.
servant, upon which thou hast caused
o hope.
 affliction: for thy word hath
me.
y in derision: yet have I not
om thy law.
gments of old, O LORD; and have comforted
upon me because of the wicked that
e thy law.
n my songs in the house of my pilgrimage.
RD, in the night, and have kept

recepts.
LORD: I have said that I would keep thy
ords.
h my whole heart: be merciful unto me
ording to thy word.
 my ways, and turned my feet unto thy testimonies.
ed not to keep thy commandments.
 The bands of the wicked have robbed me: but I have not
2 At midnight I will rise to give thanks unto thee because of thy
ts.
 that fear thee, and of them that
y precepts.
s full of thy mercy: teach me thy statutes.
servant, O LORD, according unto

ledge: for I have believed thy
ts.
t astray: but now have I kept thy

ach me thy statutes.
ave forged a lie against me: but I will keep thy
19:70 Their heart is as fat as grease; but I delight in thy law.
d for me that I have been afflicted; that I might
 law of thy mouth is better unto me than thousands of gold
y hands have made me and fashioned me: give me understanding,
commandments.
e will be glad when they see me; because I
, O LORD, that thy judgments are right, and that thou in
d me.
iful kindness be for my comfort,
g to thy word unto thy servant.
Let thy tender mercies come unto me, that I may live: for thy

 dealt perversely with me
: but I will meditate in thy precepts.
119:79 Let those that fear thee turn unto me, and those that have
nies.
hy statutes; that I be not ashamed.
:81 My soul fainteth for thy salvation: but I hope in thy word.
fail for thy word, saying, When wilt thou comfort me?
 a bottle in the smoke; yet do I not forget
e days of thy servant? when wilt thou execute

, which are not after thy law.
ll thy commandments are faithful: they persecute me
9:87 They had almost consumed me upon earth; but I forsook not thy
:88 Quicken me after thy lovingkindness; so shall I keep the
.
settled in heaven.
ess is unto all generations: thou hast established
9:91 They continue this day according to thine ordinances: for all
.
ights, I should then have
e affliction.
t thy precepts: for with them thou hast
uickened me.
: for I have sought thy precepts.
5 The wicked have waited for me to destroy me: but I will

ction: but thy commandment is
road.
s my meditation all the day.
u through thy commandments hast made me wiser than mine
with me.
ng than all my teachers: for thy
ies are my meditation.
tand more than the ancients, because I keep thy
ed my feet from every evil way, that I might
eparted from thy judgments: for thou hast taught
ords unto my taste! yea, sweeter than honey
cepts I get understanding: therefore I hate
 a lamp unto my feet, and a light unto my path.
perform it, that I will keep thy
s judgments.
y much: quicken me, O LORD, according unto
hee, the freewill offerings of my mouth, O
:109 My soul is continually in my hand: yet do I not forget thy
 wicked have laid a snare for me: yet I erred not from thy
 testimonies have I taken as an heritage for ever: for they
 heart.
art to perform thy statutes alway, even
nto the end.
ts: but thy law do I love.
 art my hiding place and my shield: I hope in thy word.
e evildoers: for I will keep the commandments
ding unto thy word, that I may live: and let me
17 Hold thou me up, and I shall be safe: and I will have respect
continually.
down all them that err from thy statutes:
 Thou puttest away all the wicked of the earth like dross:
timonies.
r fear of thee; and I am afraid of thy
dgments.
nd justice: leave me not to mine
rs.
or good: let not the proud oppress

 and for the word of thy

unto thy mercy, and teach me
.
erstanding, that I may know thy
es.
to work: for they have made void

nts above gold; yea, above fine
119:128 Therefore I esteem all thy precepts concerning all things to
I hate every false way.
timonies are wonderful: therefore doth my soul keep
f thy words giveth light; it giveth
standing unto the simple.
ned my mouth, and panted: for I longed for thy
pon me, and be merciful unto me, as thou usest to

d let not any iniquity have
 me.
sion of man: so will I keep thy

y servant; and teach me thy
119:136 Rivers of waters run down mine eyes, because they keep not thy
137 Righteous art thou, O LORD, and upright are thy judgments.
onies that thou hast commanded are righteous and
hath consumed me, because mine enemies have forgotten
d is very pure: therefore thy servant loveth it.
 yet do not I forget thy precepts.
142 Thy righteousness is an everlasting righteousness, and thy law

ld on me: yet thy
ights.
 testimonies is everlasting: give me
rstanding, and I shall live.
cried with my whole heart; hear me, O LORD: I will keep thy
cried unto thee; save me, and I shall keep thy testimonies.
he dawning of the morning, and cried: I hoped in
vent the night watches, that I might meditate in
 according unto thy lovingkindness: O LORD,

 mischief: they are far from
119:151 Thou art near, O LORD; and all thy commandments are truth.
ning thy testimonies, I have known of old that thou hast
119:153 Consider mine affliction, and deliver me: for I do not forget
19:154 Plead my cause, and deliver me: quicken me according to thy
 Salvation is far from the wicked: for they seek not thy
 are thy tender mercies, O LORD: quicken me according to
Many are my persecutors and mine enemies; yet do I not decline
.
nd was grieved; because they kept
 word.
precepts: quicken me, O LORD,
o thy lovingkindness.
is true from the beginning: and every one of thy
ver.
 without a cause: but my heart
n awe of thy word.
 thy word, as one that findeth great spoil.
hy law do I love.
 day do I praise thee because of thy righteous
ve they which love thy law: and nothing shall
hoped for thy salvation, and done thy
mandments.
y testimonies; and I love them
y.
 thy testimonies: for all my ways
ore thee.
before thee, O LORD: give me
g according to thy word.
 supplication come before thee: deliver me according to
s shall utter praise, when thou hast taught me thy
hall speak of thy word: for all thy commandments
thine hand help me; for I have chosen thy precepts.
 salvation, O LORD; and thy law is my
ight.
shall praise thee; and let thy
help me.
e a lost sheep; seek thy servant; for I
o not forget thy commandments.
1 In my distress I cried unto the LORD, and he heard me.
 LORD, from lying lips, and from a deceitful
nto thee? or what shall be done unto thee,
 of the mighty, with coals of juniper.
120:5 Woe is me, that I sojourn in Mesech, that I dwell in the tents
20:6 My soul hath long dwelt with him that hateth peace.
t when I speak, they are for war.
21:1 I will lift up mine eyes unto the hills, from whence cometh my
My help cometh from the LORD, which made heaven and earth.
er thy foot to be moved: he that keepeth thee
 that keepeth Israel shall neither slumber nor sleep.
r: the LORD is thy shade upon thy right
and.
 by day, nor the moon by night.
he LORD shall preserve thee from all evil: he shall preserve
 LORD shall preserve thy going out and thy coming in from
 for evermore.
n they said unto me, Let us go into the house of
stand within thy gates, O Jerusalem.
2:3 Jerusalem is builded as a city that is compact together:
ibes go up, the tribes of the LORD, unto the
to the name of the LORD.
e are set thrones of judgment, the thrones of the house
 the peace of Jerusalem: they shall prosper that love
n thy walls, and prosperity within thy palaces.
ons' sakes, I will now say, Peace be
in thee.
the LORD our God I will seek thy good.

 thou that dwellest in the
3:2 Behold, as the eyes of servants look unto the hand of their
 eyes of a maiden unto the hand of her mistress; so
 God, until that he have mercy upon us.

rcy upon us: for we are
d with contempt.
edingly filled with the scorning of those that
f the proud.
en the LORD who was on our side, now may Israel
e LORD who was on our side, when men rose
llowed us up quick, when their wrath was
kindled against us:
rs had overwhelmed us, the stream had gone over our
aters had gone over our soul.
ssed be the LORD, who hath not given us as a prey to their
 is escaped as a bird out of the snare of the fowlers:
are escaped.
ame of the LORD, who made heaven and earth.
 shall be as mount Zion, which cannot
removed, but abideth for ever.
 the mountains are round about Jerusalem, so the LORD is round
m henceforth even for ever.
he rod of the wicked shall not rest upon the lot of the
us put forth their hands unto iniquity.

 good, and to them that are
eir hearts.
side unto their crooked ways, the LORD
all lead them forth with the workers of iniquity: but peace shall be

 captivity of Zion, we were like
t dream.
d with laughter, and our tongue with
ing: then said they among the heathen, The LORD hath done great

 us; whereof we are glad.
ain our captivity, O LORD, as the streams in the south.
ars shall reap in joy.
eth forth and weepeth, bearing precious seed, shall
cing, bringing his sheaves with him.

hey labour in vain that build
the LORD keep the city, the watchman waketh but in vain.
 to rise up early, to sit up late, to eat the
s beloved sleep.
 an heritage of the LORD: and the fruit of the
ws are in the hand of a mighty man; so are children of
 the man that hath his quiver full of them: they shall
ll speak with the enemies in the gate.

h the LORD; that walketh in his
128:2 For thou shalt eat the labour of thine hands: happy shalt thou
ll be well with thee.
all be as a fruitful vine by the sides of thine
ts round about thy table.
 that thus shall the man be blessed that feareth the
bless thee out of Zion: and thou shalt see the
y life.
hildren's children, and peace upon
.
cted me from my youth, may Israel now
:
 me from my youth: yet they have
ailed against me.
wed upon my back: they made long their furrows.
ath cut asunder the cords of the

rned back that hate Zion.
m be as the grass upon the housetops, which withereth
 Wherewith the mower filleth not his hand; nor he that bindeth

he blessing of the LORD be
less you in the name of the LORD.
30:1 Out of the depths have I cried unto thee, O LORD.
 let thine ears be attentive to the voice of
RD, shouldest mark iniquities, O Lord, who shall
veness with thee, that thou mayest be feared.
doth wait, and in his word do I
130:6 My soul waiteth for the Lord more than they that watch for the
, more than they that watch for the morning.
or with the LORD there is mercy,
 him is plenteous redemption.
 he shall redeem Israel from all his iniquities.
haughty, nor mine eyes lofty: neither do I
things too high for me.
have behaved and quieted myself, as a child that is
s even as a weaned child.
ael hope in the LORD from henceforth and for ever.
, and all his afflictions:
 sware unto the LORD, and vowed unto the mighty God of
l not come into the tabernacle of my house, nor go
not give sleep to mine eyes, or slumber to mine eyelids,
 place for the LORD, an habitation for the
rd of it at Ephratah: we found it in the fields of the
to his tabernacles: we will worship at his
thy rest; thou, and the ark of thy strength.
h righteousness; and let thy
 for joy.
s sake turn not away the face of thine
ointed.
ruth unto David; he will not turn from
; Of the fruit of thy body will I set upon thy throne.
l keep my covenant and my testimony that I
lso sit upon thy throne for
132:13 For the LORD hath chosen Zion; he hath desired it for his
:14 This is my rest for ever: here will I dwell; for I have desired
 will abundantly bless her provision: I will satisfy her poor
 I will also clothe her priests with salvation: and her saints
r joy.
n of David to bud: I have ordained a
 for mine anointed.
will I clothe with shame: but upon himself shall
ehold, how good and how pleasant it is for brethren to dwell
133:2 It is like the precious ointment upon the head, that ran down
 even Aaron's beard: that went down to the skirts of
dew of Hermon, and as the dew that descended upon the
the LORD commanded the blessing, even
e for evermore.
 ye the LORD, all ye servants of the LORD, which by
 LORD.
sanctuary, and bless the LORD.
e LORD that made heaven and earth bless thee out of Zion.
 LORD. Praise ye the name of the LORD; praise him,
5:2 Ye that stand in the house of the LORD, in the courts of the

good: sing praises unto his
is pleasant.
osen Jacob unto himself, and Israel for his
that the LORD is great, and that our Lord is above
e LORD pleased, that did he in heaven, and in
es.
end from the ends of the earth; he
 lightnings for the rain; he bringeth the wind out of his
smote the firstborn of Egypt, both of man and beast.
nders into the midst of thee, O Egypt,
on Pharaoh, and upon all his servants.
135:10 Who smote great nations, and slew mighty kings;
morites, and Og king of Bashan, and all the
their land for an heritage, an heritage unto Israel
 O LORD, endureth for ever; and thy memorial, O LORD,

e, and he will repent himself
his servants.
eathen are silver and gold, the work of men's
t they speak not; eyes have they, but they
hey hear not; neither is there any breath
 them are like unto them: so is every one that
e LORD, O house of Israel: bless the LORD, O house of
RD, O house of Levi: ye that fear the LORD, bless
e LORD out of Zion, which dwelleth at Jerusalem.
 O give thanks unto the LORD; for he is good: for his mercy
36:2 O give thanks unto the God of gods: for his mercy endureth for
O give thanks to the Lord of lords: for his mercy endureth for
m who alone doeth great wonders: for his mercy endureth for
hat by wisdom made the heavens: for his mercy endureth
at stretched out the earth above the waters: for his
6:7 To him that made great lights: for his mercy endureth for ever:
 to rule by day: for his mercy endureth for ever:
e by night: for his mercy endureth for
er.
heir firstborn: for his mercy
r ever:
rom among them: for his mercy endureth
r ever:
with a stretched out arm: for his mercy
ndureth for ever.
ivided the Red sea into parts: for his mercy
Israel to pass through the midst of it: for his mercy
But overthrew Pharaoh and his host in the Red sea: for his

ough the wilderness: for his
th for ever.
great kings: for his mercy endureth for
ver:
his mercy endureth for ever:
on king of the Amorites: for his mercy endureth for ever:
of Bashan: for his mercy endureth for ever:
itage: for his mercy endureth for

servant: for his mercy

tate: for his mercy endureth for

ies: for his mercy endureth
136:25 Who giveth food to all flesh: for his mercy endureth for ever.
ve thanks unto the God of heaven: for his mercy endureth
the rivers of Babylon, there we sat down, yea, we wept, when

s in the midst thereof.
 they that carried us away captive required of us a
equired of us mirth, saying, Sing us
of the songs of Zion.
e sing the LORD's song in a strange land?
t my right hand forget her
7:6 If I do not remember thee, let my tongue cleave to the roof of
refer not Jerusalem above my chief joy.

dom in the day of Jerusalem;
se it, rase it, even to the foundation thereof.
art to be destroyed; happy shall he
hat rewardeth thee as thou hast served us.
nd dasheth thy little ones
ones.
 my whole heart: before the gods will I
ing praise unto thee.
hip toward thy holy temple, and praise thy name for
truth: for thou hast magnified thy word
bove all thy name.
n I cried thou answeredst me, and strengthenedst
8:4 All the kings of the earth shall praise thee, O LORD, when they
of thy mouth.
g in the ways of the LORD: for great is the
LORD be high, yet hath he respect unto the lowly: but
.
rouble, thou wilt revive me: thou
tretch forth thine hand against the wrath of mine enemies, and
 save me.
hat which concerneth me: thy mercy, O
D, endureth for ever: forsake not the works of thine own hands.
 thou hast searched me, and known me.
39:2 Thou knowest my downsitting and mine uprising, thou
far off.
and my lying down, and art acquainted
h all my ways.
 word in my tongue, but, lo, O LORD, thou
 beset me behind and before, and laid thine hand upon
s too wonderful for me; it is high, I cannot
 I go from thy spirit? or whither shall I flee from
end up into heaven, thou art there: if I make my bed in
e.
ning, and dwell in the uttermost
 the sea;
and lead me, and thy right hand shall
d me.
ess shall cover me; even the night
be light about me.
ness hideth not from thee; but the night shineth
ight are both alike to thee.
 thou hast possessed my reins: thou hast covered me in my
I will praise thee; for I am fearfully and wonderfully made:
ks; and that my soul knoweth right well.

e, when I was made in secret,
ly wrought in the lowest parts of the earth.
ce, yet being unperfect; and in
all my members were written, which in continuance were
 was none of them.
also are thy thoughts unto me, O God! how great is
should count them, they are more in number than the sand:
with thee.
 the wicked, O God: depart from me
ore, ye bloody men.
ak against thee wickedly, and thine enemies take
 I hate them, O LORD, that hate thee? and am not I
against thee?
erfect hatred: I count them mine enemies.
art: try me, and know my
:24 And see if there be any wicked way in me, and lead me in the

vil man: preserve me from the
;
r heart; continually are they
gether for war.
ed their tongues like a serpent; adders' poison
4 Keep me, O LORD, from the hands of the wicked; preserve me from
who have purposed to overthrow my goings.
, and cords; they have spread a
e wayside; they have set gins for me. Selah.
 my God: hear the voice of my
ns, O LORD.
trength of my salvation, thou hast covered
rant not, O LORD, the desires of the wicked: further not his
ey exalt themselves. Selah.
r the head of those that compass me about, let the mischief
 them.
on them: let them be cast into the
into deep pits, that they rise not up again.
tablished in the earth: evil shall
he violent man to overthrow him.
 I know that the LORD will maintain the cause of the afflicted,
e poor.
ll give thanks unto thy name: the
 shall dwell in thy presence.
 Lord, I cry unto thee: make haste unto me; give ear unto my
 thee.
 before thee as incense; and the
up of my hands as the evening sacrifice.

th; keep the door of my lips.
line not my heart to any evil thing, to practise wicked works
iquity: and let me not eat of their dainties.
t shall be a kindness: and let him
e me; it shall be an excellent oil, which shall not break my
r also shall be in their calamities.
1:6 When their judges are overthrown in stony places, they shall
 they are sweet.
attered at the grave's mouth, as when one

OD the Lord: in thee is my
ot my soul destitute.
m the snares which they have laid for me, and the

wn nets, whilst that I withal

ice; with my voice unto the LORD
ke my supplication.
my complaint before him; I shewed before him my
s overwhelmed within me, then thou knewest my
have they privily laid a snare for me.
142:4 I looked on my right hand, and beheld, but there was no man that
e: refuge failed me; no man cared for my soul.
 said, Thou art my refuge and my
in the land of the living.
 unto my cry; for I am brought very low: deliver me from
re stronger than I.
 out of prison, that I may praise thy name: the
or thou shalt deal bountifully with

ar to my supplications: in thy
ss answer me, and in thy righteousness.

y servant: for in thy sight
living be justified.
y hath persecuted my soul; he hath smitten my life
 me to dwell in darkness, as those
ave been long dead.
my spirit overwhelmed within me; my heart within me
r the days of old; I meditate on all thy works; I muse

 my soul thirsteth after
ty land. Selah.
 O LORD: my spirit faileth: hide not thy face
t go down into the pit.
to hear thy lovingkindness in the morning; for in thee
 the way wherein I should walk; for I lift
e, O LORD, from mine enemies: I flee unto thee to hide
 thy will; for thou art my God: thy spirit is
tness.
hy name's sake: for thy righteousness'
ke bring my soul out of trouble.
 And of thy mercy cut off mine enemies, and destroy all them
for I am thy servant.
 be the LORD my strength which teacheth my hands to war,

igh tower, and my deliverer;
nd he in whom I trust; who subdueth my people under me.
that thou takest knowledge of him! or the son
im!
ys are as a shadow that passeth
144:5 Bow thy heavens, O LORD, and come down: touch the mountains, and
moke.
catter them: shoot out thine arrows,
destroy them.
m above; rid me, and deliver me out of great
ren;
 and their right hand is a right
falsehood.
 unto thee, O God: upon a psaltery and an
ises unto thee.
veth salvation unto kings: who delivereth David

 hand of strange children, whose
eaketh vanity, and their right hand is a right hand of
r sons may be as plants grown up in their youth; that
r stones, polished after the similitude
f a palace:
 be full, affording all manner of store:
that our sheep may bring forth thousands and ten thousands in our
4 That our oxen may be strong to labour; that there be no
t; that there be no complaining in our
reets.
t is in such a case: yea, happy is
eople, whose God is the LORD.
 I will extol thee, my God, O king; and I will bless thy name for

will praise thy name for ever

be praised; and his greatness
able.
 thy works to another, and shall
thy mighty acts.
the glorious honour of thy majesty, and of thy
ll speak of the might of thy terrible acts: and I
5:7 They shall abundantly utter the memory of thy great goodness,
 thy righteousness.
racious, and full of compassion; slow to anger, and
RD is good to all: and his tender mercies are over all his
 works shall praise thee, O LORD; and thy saints shall
hall speak of the glory of thy kingdom, and talk of thy
own to the sons of men his mighty acts, and the

dom, and thy dominion
 all generations.
deth all that fall, and raiseth up all those that
 of all wait upon thee; and thou givest them their meat
ou openest thine hand, and satisfiest the desire of every
he LORD is righteous in all his ways, and holy in all his
 is nigh unto all them that call upon him, to all that
45:19 He will fulfil the desire of them that fear him: he also will
 and will save them.
eserveth all them that love him: but all the wicked
outh shall speak the praise of the LORD: and let all flesh
ever and ever.
LORD. Praise the LORD, O my soul.
 While I live will I praise the LORD: I will sing praises unto my
any being.
princes, nor in the son of man, in whom
here is no help.
 forth, he returneth to his earth; in that very
appy is he that hath the God of Jacob for his help, whose hope
od:
 the sea, and all that therein is:
keepeth truth for ever:
cuteth judgment for the oppressed: which giveth food to
h the prisoners:
 the eyes of the blind: the LORD raiseth them
the righteous:
h the strangers; he relieveth the fatherless
e turneth upside down.
shall reign for ever, even thy God, O Zion, unto all
D.
 is good to sing praises unto our God;
r it is pleasant; and praise is comely.

e gathereth together the
el.
t, and bindeth up their wounds.
e telleth the number of the stars; he calleth them all by their
at is our Lord, and of great power: his understanding is
D lifteth up the meek: he casteth the wicked down to the
 the LORD with thanksgiving; sing praise upon the harp
overeth the heaven with clouds, who prepareth rain for the
to grow upon the mountains.
veth to the beast his food, and to the young ravens which
eth not in the strength of the horse: he taketh not

 that fear him, in those that
 mercy.
alem; praise thy God, O Zion.
r he hath strengthened the bars of thy gates; he hath blessed
hee.
ers, and filleth thee with the
the wheat.
commandment upon earth: his word runneth
very swiftly.
e wool: he scattereth the hoarfrost like
ashes.
like morsels: who can stand before his
ld?
 melteth them: he causeth his wind
w, and the waters flow.
th his word unto Jacob, his statutes and his judgments
th not dealt so with any nation: and as for his judgments,
. Praise ye the LORD.
ye the LORD. Praise ye the LORD from the heavens: praise
:2 Praise ye him, all his angels: praise ye him, all his hosts.
im, sun and moon: praise him, all ye stars of light.
 of heavens, and ye waters that be above
the heavens.
name of the LORD: for he commanded, and they
ablished them for ever and ever: he hath made a
:7 Praise the LORD from the earth, ye dragons, and all deeps:
l; snow, and vapours; stormy wind fulfilling his
hills; fruitful trees, and all cedars:
148:10 Beasts, and all cattle; creeping things, and flying fowl:
the earth, and all people; princes, and all judges of
ng men, and maidens; old men, and children:
e LORD: for his name alone is
his glory is above the earth and heaven.

people, the praise of all his
n of the children of Israel, a people near unto him. Praise
:1 Praise ye the LORD. Sing unto the LORD a new song, and his
ation of saints.
ce in him that made him: let the children of
 Let them praise his name in the dance: let them sing praises
brel and harp.
h pleasure in his people: he will beautify the
e saints be joyful in glory: let them sing aloud upon
high praises of God be in their mouth, and a two-edged
7 To execute vengeance upon the heathen, and punishments upon the
To bind their kings with chains, and their nobles with fetters
 execute upon them the judgment written: this honour have all
 the LORD.
. Praise God in his sanctuary: praise him in
raise him for his mighty acts: praise him according to his
150:3 Praise him with the sound of the trumpet: praise him with the
rp.
nd dance: praise him with stringed
ments and organs.
 the loud cymbals: praise him upon the high
ing that hath breath praise the LORD. Praise ye the LORD.

vid, king of Israel; 1:2 To
nd instruction; to perceive the words of understanding;
ion of wisdom, justice, and judgment, and
e, to the young man knowledge
ion.
 increase learning; and a man of
nding shall attain unto wise counsels: 1:6 To understand a
etation; the words of the wise, and their dark
 is the beginning of knowledge: but fools
 son, hear the instruction of thy father, and forsake not the
9 For they shall be an ornament of grace unto thy

nsent thou not.
with us, let us lay wait for blood, let us lurk
use: 1:12 Let us swallow them up
 the grave; and whole, as those that go down into the pit:
recious substance, we shall fill our houses
us; let us all have one purse:
n, walk not thou in the way with them; refrain thy foot from
heir feet run to evil, and make haste to shed
 is spread in the sight of any bird.
18 And they lay wait for their own blood; they lurk privily for

 greedy of gain; which taketh
fe of the owners thereof.
rieth without; she uttereth her voice in the streets:
place of concourse, in the openings of
e gates: in the city she uttereth her words, saying, 1:22 How long,
 will ye love simplicity? and the scorners delight in
e knowledge?  1:23 Turn you at my
: behold, I will pour out my spirit unto you, I will make known

sed; I have stretched out my
 man regarded; 1:25 But ye have set at nought all my
reproof: 1:26 I also will laugh at your
alamity; I will mock when your fear cometh; 1:27 When your fear
n, and your destruction cometh as a whirlwind; when
n you.
e, but I will not answer; they shall
 me early, but they shall not find me: 1:29 For that they hated
not choose the fear of the LORD: 1:30 They would
all my reproof.
ey eat of the fruit of their own way, and be
 For the turning away of the simple shall slay them, and the
all destroy them.
neth unto me shall dwell safely, and shall be
n, if thou wilt receive my words, and hide my commandments
hou incline thine ear unto wisdom, and apply
 if thou criest after knowledge,
est up thy voice for understanding; 2:4 If thou seekest her as
t for her as for hid treasures; 2:5 Then shalt
, and find the knowledge of God.
r the LORD giveth wisdom: out of his mouth cometh knowledge and
:7 He layeth up sound wisdom for the righteous: he is a buckler to
prightly.
udgment, and preserveth the way of his
ints.
ghteousness, and judgment, and
a, every good path.
tereth into thine heart, and knowledge is pleasant
hall preserve thee, understanding
eep thee: 2:12 To deliver thee from the way of the evil man,
keth froward things; 2:13 Who leave the paths of
f darkness; 2:14 Who rejoice to do
and delight in the frowardness of the wicked; 2:15 Whose ways
 froward in their paths: 2:16 To deliver thee
 stranger which flattereth with
; 2:17 Which forsaketh the guide of her youth, and forgetteth
od.
eath, and her paths unto the dead.
 None that go unto her return again, neither take they hold of the

 good men, and keep the paths
teous.
 in the land, and the perfect shall
n in it.
ut off from the earth, and the
ors shall be rooted out of it.
on, forget not my law; but let thine heart keep my
days, and long life, and peace, shall
y add to thee.
uth forsake thee: bind them about thy neck;
t: 3:4 So shalt thou find
 understanding in the sight of God and man.
heart; and lean not unto thine
tanding.
e him, and he shall direct thy paths.
:7 Be not wise in thine own eyes: fear the LORD, and depart from
all be health to thy navel, and marrow to thy bones.
 substance, and with the firstfruits of
ll thine increase: 3:10 So shall thy barns be filled with plenty, and
hall burst out with new wine.
on, despise not the chastening of the LORD; neither be weary
2 For whom the LORD loveth he correcteth; even
hteth.
th wisdom, and the man that getteth
standing.
t is better than the merchandise of
r, and the gain thereof than fine gold.

d all the things thou canst
t to be compared unto her.
of days is in her right hand; and in her left hand riches
ays are ways of pleasantness, and all her paths are peace.
life to them that lay hold upon her: and happy
3:19 The LORD by wisdom hath founded the earth; by understanding hath
d the heavens.
e depths are broken up, and the clouds drop
hem depart from thine eyes: keep sound wisdom
 life unto thy soul, and grace to
k.
 safely, and thy foot shall not

ot be afraid: yea, thou shalt
nd thy sleep shall be sweet.
t afraid of sudden fear, neither of the desolation of the

e, and shall keep thy foot
en.
 whom it is due, when it is in the
of thine hand to do it.
to thy neighbour, Go, and come again, and to morrow I
by thee.
hy neighbour, seeing he dwelleth
 by thee.
thout cause, if he have done thee no
.
 choose none of his ways.
froward is abomination to the LORD: but his secret is
he curse of the LORD is in the house of the wicked: but he
of the just.
e scorners: but he giveth grace unto the
lowly.
y: but shame shall be the promotion of
ols.
tion of a father, and attend to know
rstanding.
rine, forsake ye not my law.
was my father's son, tender and only beloved in the sight of
aught me also, and said unto me, Let thine heart retain my
nts, and live.
rstanding: forget it not; neither decline from
e her not, and she shall preserve thee: love her, and she
isdom is the principal thing; therefore get wisdom: and with all
derstanding.
ll promote thee: she shall bring thee to
honour, when thou dost embrace her.
 She shall give to thine head an ornament of grace: a crown of
ver to thee.
eceive my sayings; and the years of thy life
hee in the way of wisdom; I have led thee in right
thy steps shall not be straitened; and when thou

her not go: keep her; for she
.
icked, and go not in the way of

om it, and pass away.
ep not, except they have done mischief; and their
cause some to fall.
he bread of wickedness, and drink the wine of
 just is as the shining light, that shineth
4:19 The way of the wicked is as darkness: they know not at what they
:20 My son, attend to my words; incline thine ear unto my sayings.
not depart from thine eyes; keep them in the midst of
 are life unto those that find them, and health to all
y heart with all diligence; for out of it are the issues
from thee a froward mouth, and perverse lips put far
yes look right on, and let thine eyelids look straight
the path of thy feet, and let all thy ways be established.
ight hand nor to the left: remove thy foot from
 wisdom, and bow thine ear to my
nding: 5:2 That thou mayest regard discretion, and that thy
.
rop as an honeycomb, and her
other than oil: 5:4 But her end is bitter as wormwood,

s take hold on hell.
ldest ponder the path of life, her ways are
.
ren, and depart not from the
mouth.
 and come not nigh the door of her
 5:9 Lest thou give thine honour unto others, and thy years unto
st strangers be filled with thy wealth; and thy
er; 5:11 And thou mourn at the
 thy flesh and thy body are consumed, 5:12 And say, How have
nd my heart despised reproof; 5:13 And have not
r inclined mine ear to them that
ed me!  5:14 I was almost in all evil in the midst of the
.
stern, and running waters out of
n well.
rsed abroad, and rivers of waters in
streets.
n, and not strangers' with thee.
et thy fountain be blessed: and rejoice with the wife of thy
 be as the loving hind and pleasant roe; let her breasts
 and be thou ravished always with her love.
vished with a strange woman, and
the bosom of a stranger?  5:21 For the ways of man are before
 and he pondereth all his goings.
His own iniquities shall take the wicked himself, and he shall be
ords of his sins.
hout instruction; and in the greatness of his
on, if thou be surety for thy friend, if thou hast stricken
r, 6:2 Thou art snared with the words of thy
f thy mouth.
nd deliver thyself, when thou art come into
elf, and make sure thy friend.
 not sleep to thine eyes, nor slumber to thine eyelids.
roe from the hand of the hunter, and as a
Go to the ant, thou sluggard; consider her ways, and be wise: 6:7
uide, overseer, or ruler, 6:8 Provideth her meat in
ood in the harvest.
hou sleep, O sluggard? when wilt thou arise out of
eep, a little slumber, a little
f the hands to sleep: 6:11 So shall thy poverty come as one
y want as an armed man.
person, a wicked man, walketh with a froward mouth.
, he speaketh with his feet, he teacheth
with his fingers; 6:14 Frowardness is in his heart, he deviseth
y; he soweth discord.
all his calamity come suddenly; suddenly shall he be
 These six things doth the LORD hate: yea, seven are an
A proud look, a lying tongue, and hands
hat shed innocent blood, 6:18 An heart that deviseth wicked
 be swift in running to mischief, 6:19 A false
hat soweth discord among brethren.
 My son, keep thy father's commandment, and forsake not the law of
 Bind them continually upon thine heart, and tie them
thou goest, it shall lead thee; when thou sleepest, it shall
ou awakest, it shall talk with thee.
23 For the commandment is a lamp; and the law is light; and reproofs
 are the way of life: 6:24 To keep thee from the evil
he tongue of a strange woman.
 not after her beauty in thine heart; neither let her take

an is brought to a piece of
e adultress will hunt for the precious life.
m, and his clothes not be burned?
n one go upon hot coals, and his feet not be burned?  6:29 So
is neighbour's wife; whosoever toucheth her shall
ot despise a thief, if he steal to satisfy his soul when
he be found, he shall restore sevenfold; he
se.
with a woman lacketh understanding:
at doeth it destroyeth his own soul.
33 A wound and dishonour shall he get; and his reproach shall not be

herefore he will not spare in
vengeance.
ransom; neither will he rest content,
ugh thou givest many gifts.
 keep my words, and lay up my commandments with thee.
nd live; and my law as the apple of thine
rite them upon the table of thine

; and call understanding thy
:5 That they may keep thee from the strange woman, from
th with her words.
w of my house I looked through my casement, 7:7
 discerned among the youths, a
void of understanding, 7:8 Passing through the street near
the way to her house, 7:9 In the twilight, in
ght: 7:10 And, behold, there met
man with the attire of an harlot, and subtil of heart.
born; her feet abide not in her house: 7:12
 and lieth in wait at every
3 So she caught him, and kissed him, and with an impudent
I have peace offerings with me; this day have
me I forth to meet thee, diligently to seek thy face,
6 I have decked my bed with coverings of tapestry, with carved
en of Egypt.
d with myrrh, aloes, and cinnamon.
 Come, let us take our fill of love until the morning: let us
 loves.
home, he is gone a long journey: 7:20
hath taken a bag of money with him, and will come home at the day
1 With her much fair speech she caused him to yield, with the
s she forced him.
er straightway, as an ox goeth to the slaughter,
the stocks; 7:23 Till a dart strike
gh his liver; as a bird hasteth to the snare, and knoweth not
fe.
 O ye children, and attend to the
f my mouth.
cline to her ways, go not astray in her
aths.
wounded: yea, many strong men have
lain by her.
to hell, going down to the chambers of
ath.
standing put forth her voice?  8:2
andeth in the top of high places, by the way in the places of
 crieth at the gates, at the entry of the city, at the coming
:4 Unto you, O men, I call; and my voice is to the sons of man.
understand wisdom: and, ye fools, be ye of an
 I will speak of excellent things; and the opening of my
.
nd wickedness is an abomination
s.
 righteousness; there is nothing
or perverse in them.
lain to him that understandeth, and right to them
ive my instruction, and not silver; and knowledge rather than
For wisdom is better than rubies; and all the things that may be
 be compared to it.
 with prudence, and find out knowledge of witty
 LORD is to hate evil: pride, and arrogancy, and
h, do I hate.
 sound wisdom: I am understanding; I have
princes decree justice.
ces rule, and nobles, even all the judges of the earth.
e me; and those that seek me early shall find
h me; yea, durable riches and
ss.
yea, than fine gold; and my revenue
choice silver.
f righteousness, in the midst of the paths of
 that love me to inherit
 will fill their treasures.
RD possessed me in the beginning of his way, before his
 set up from everlasting, from the beginning, or ever the
here were no depths, I was brought forth; when there were
th water.
e settled, before the hills was I brought
the earth, nor the fields,
t part of the dust of the world.
hen he prepared the heavens, I was there: when he set a compass
e depth: 8:28 When he established the clouds above:
ins of the deep: 8:29 When he gave to
 sea his decree, that the waters should not pass his commandment:
 the foundations of the earth: 8:30 Then I was by
and I was daily his delight,
ways before him; 8:31 Rejoicing in the habitable part of
 were with the sons of men.
erefore hearken unto me, O ye children: for blessed are
8:33 Hear instruction, and be wise, and refuse it not.
at heareth me, watching daily at my gates,
5 For whoso findeth me findeth life, and shall obtain favour of the
ut he that sinneth against me wrongeth his own soul: all they
th.
she hath hewn out her seven
She hath killed her beasts; she hath mingled her wine;
table.
ens: she crieth upon the highest
f the city, 9:4 Whoso is simple, let him turn in hither: as
derstanding, she saith to him, 9:5 Come, eat of
ch I have mingled.
ish, and live; and go in the way of understanding.
r getteth to himself shame: and he that
ebuketh a wicked man getteth himself a blot.
ate thee: rebuke a wise man, and
love thee.
se man, and he will be yet wiser: teach a
g.
inning of wisdom: and the
e holy is understanding.
 thy days shall be multiplied, and the years of thy life
2 If thou be wise, thou shalt be wise for thyself: but if thou
 shalt bear it.
 clamorous: she is simple, and knoweth nothing.
of her house, on a seat in the high
s of the city, 9:15 To call passengers who go right on their
mple, let him turn in hither: and as for him
to him, 9:17 Stolen waters are
 bread eaten in secret is pleasant.
8 But he knoweth not that the dead are there; and that her guests
 of hell.
 A wise son maketh a glad father: but a
oolish son is the heaviness of his mother.
thing: but righteousness
death.
e soul of the righteous to famish: but
 casteth away the substance of the wicked.
h a slack hand: but the hand of
ent maketh rich.
 in summer is a wise son: but he that sleepeth
me.
 the just: but violence covereth
h of the wicked.
 just is blessed: but the name of the wicked
ill receive commandments: but a prating fool
rightly walketh surely: but he that perverteth
 that winketh with the eye causeth sorrow: but a prating fool
The mouth of a righteous man is a well of life: but violence
the wicked.
rifes: but love covereth all sins.
3 In the lips of him that hath understanding wisdom is found: but
back of him that is void of understanding.
he mouth of the foolish is near
on.
strong city: the destruction of the
is their poverty.
he righteous tendeth to life: the fruit of the
 way of life that keepeth instruction: but he that
8 He that hideth hatred with lying lips, and he that uttereth a

wanteth not sin: but he that
is lips is wise.
e just is as choice silver: the heart of the
ips of the righteous feed many: but fools die for want of
sing of the LORD, it maketh rich, and he addeth no
s sport to a fool to do mischief: but a man of
The fear of the wicked, it shall come upon him: but the desire
ll be granted.
asseth, so is the wicked no more: but the

oke to the eyes, so is the
em that send him.
 LORD prolongeth days: but the years of the
 hope of the righteous shall be gladness: but the expectation
erish.
ength to the upright: but destruction
ll be to the workers of iniquity.
 The righteous shall never be removed: but the wicked shall not

rth wisdom: but the froward
be cut out.
eous know what is acceptable: but the mouth
11:1 A false balance is abomination to the LORD: but a just weight is

me: but with the lowly is
 The integrity of the upright shall guide them: but the
rs shall destroy them.
it not in the day of wrath: but righteousness
ghteousness of the perfect shall direct his way: but the
wn wickedness.
f the upright shall deliver them: but
nsgressors shall be taken in their own naughtiness.
 his expectation shall perish: and the
pe of unjust men perisheth.
ghteous is delivered out of trouble, and the wicked cometh
 hypocrite with his mouth destroyeth his neighbour: but through
 just be delivered.
 well with the righteous, the city rejoiceth: and
shouting.
upright the city is exalted: but it is
erthrown by the mouth of the wicked.
:12 He that is void of wisdom despiseth his neighbour: but a man of
oldeth his peace.
vealeth secrets: but he that is of a faithful
4 Where no counsel is, the people fall: but in the multitude of
s safety.
 stranger shall smart for it: and he that
cious woman retaineth honour: and strong men retain riches.
n doeth good to his own soul: but he that is
8 The wicked worketh a deceitful work: but to him that soweth
e a sure reward.
 tendeth to life: so he that pursueth evil
hey that are of a froward heart are abomination to the LORD:
t in their way are his delight.
hough hand join in hand, the wicked shall not be unpunished:
ghteous shall be delivered.
jewel of gold in a swine's snout, so is a fair woman which

y good: but the expectation of
 is wrath.
th, and yet increaseth; and there is that
deth to poverty.
 shall be made fat: and he that watereth shall
 that withholdeth corn, the people shall curse him: but
head of him that selleth it.
hat diligently seeketh good procureth favour: but he that
l come unto him.
 in his riches shall fall; but the righteous
e that troubleth his own house shall inherit the wind: and the
t to the wise of heart.
 of the righteous is a tree of life; and he that
hold, the righteous shall be recompensed in the earth: much
 sinner.
loveth knowledge: but he that hateth
oof is brutish.
th favour of the LORD: but a man of wicked
hall not be established by wickedness: but the root of the
oved.
to her husband: but she that maketh
ed is as rottenness in his bones.
The thoughts of the righteous are right: but the counsels of the

e in wait for blood: but the
 upright shall deliver them.
icked are overthrown, and are not: but the house of the
2:8 A man shall be commended according to his wisdom: but he that is
heart shall be despised.
s despised, and hath a servant, is better than he that
th bread.
th the life of his beast: but the tender
mercies of the wicked are cruel.
He that tilleth his land shall be satisfied with bread: but he
persons is void of understanding.
 The wicked desireth the net of evil men: but the root of the
uit.
transgression of his lips: but the
hall come out of trouble.
hall be satisfied with good by the fruit of his mouth:
s hands shall be rendered unto him.
15 The way of a fool is right in his own eyes: but he that
is wise.
tly known: but a prudent man covereth
me.
h forth righteousness: but a false
s deceit.
like the piercings of a sword: but the
ngue of the wise is health.
ip of truth shall be established for ever: but a lying

at imagine evil: but to the
f peace is joy.
il happen to the just: but the wicked shall be
 lips are abomination to the LORD: but they that deal truly
23 A prudent man concealeth knowledge: but the heart of fools
ss.
l bear rule: but the slothful shall
der tribute.
rt of man maketh it stoop: but a good word
s more excellent than his neighbour: but the way
:27 The slothful man roasteth not that which he took in hunting: but
of a diligent man is precious.
 the way of righteousness is life: and in the pathway thereof

ruction: but a scorner
.
t of his mouth: but the soul of
gressors shall eat violence.
at keepeth his mouth keepeth his life: but he that openeth
 destruction.
gard desireth, and hath nothing: but the soul

wicked man is loathsome, and
ame.
t is upright in the way: but
verthroweth the sinner.
hat maketh himself rich, yet hath nothing: there is
ath great riches.
man's life are his riches: but the poor heareth
e righteous rejoiceth: but the lamp of the wicked
y pride cometh contention: but with the well advised is
ten by vanity shall be diminished: but he that

ck: but when the desire cometh,
ree of life.
word shall be destroyed: but he that feareth
13:14 The law of the wise is a fountain of life, to depart from the
.
r: but the way of transgressors

owledge: but a fool layeth open
.
 mischief: but a faithful
ealth.
 to him that refuseth instruction: but
 that regardeth reproof shall be honoured.
 to the soul: but it is
ols to depart from evil.
walketh with wise men shall be wise: but a companion of

righteous good shall be
 A good man leaveth an inheritance to his children's children:
e sinner is laid up for the just.
 Much food is in the tillage of the poor: but there is that is
f judgment.
od hateth his son: but he that loveth him
teous eateth to the satisfying of his soul: but the

se: but the foolish plucketh it
 her hands.
 uprightness feareth the LORD: but he that

d of pride: but the lips of
l preserve them.
, the crib is clean: but much increase is by the
hful witness will not lie: but a false witness will utter
eeketh wisdom, and findeth it not: but knowledge is
h.
sh man, when thou perceivest not
he lips of knowledge.
f the prudent is to understand his way: but the folly
ools make a mock at sin: but among the righteous there is
t knoweth his own bitterness; and a stranger doth not
14:11 The house of the wicked shall be overthrown: but the tabernacle
t shall flourish.
which seemeth right unto a man, but the end
 Even in laughter the heart is sorrowful; and the end of that

illed with his own ways: and a
hall be satisfied from himself.
he simple believeth every word: but the prudent man looketh
4:16 A wise man feareth, and departeth from evil: but the fool
dent.
th foolishly: and a man of wicked
 is hated.
ly: but the prudent are crowned with
ledge.
od; and the wicked at the gates of the
ghteous.
f his own neighbour: but the rich hath
ny friends.
 neighbour sinneth: but he that hath mercy
ey not err that devise evil? but mercy and truth shall be

ut the talk of the lips tendeth
enury.
heir riches: but the foolishness of
 is folly.
eth souls: but a deceitful witness
th lies.
is strong confidence: and his children
all have a place of refuge.
ear of the LORD is a fountain of life, to depart from the
 In the multitude of people is the king's honour: but in the want
destruction of the prince.
t is slow to wrath is of great understanding: but he that
th folly.
fe of the flesh: but envy the rottenness
of the bones.
the poor reproacheth his Maker: but he that

ickedness: but the righteous
 his death.
 heart of him that hath understanding: but
ade known.
 a nation: but sin is a reproach to any
eople.
d a wise servant: but his wrath is
t him that causeth shame.
nswer turneth away wrath: but grievous words stir up
he wise useth knowledge aright: but the mouth of
15:3 The eyes of the LORD are in every place, beholding the evil and
5:4 A wholesome tongue is a tree of life: but perverseness therein is
he spirit.
ther's instruction: but he that regardeth
of the righteous is much treasure: but in the

dge: but the heart of the
ot so.
 is an abomination to the LORD: but
rayer of the upright is his delight.
:9 The way of the wicked is an abomination unto the LORD: but he
lloweth after righteousness.
ection is grievous unto him that forsaketh the way: and he
l die.
efore the LORD: how much more then the
arts of the children of men?  15:12 A scorner loveth not one that
ither will he go unto the wise.
 merry heart maketh a cheerful countenance: but by sorrow of
s broken.
ath understanding seeketh knowledge: but
the mouth of fools feedeth on foolishness.
e evil: but he that is of a
ath a continual feast.
little with the fear of the LORD than great treasure
7 Better is a dinner of herbs where love is, than a stalled ox and
.
fe: but he that is slow to anger
h strife.
 man is as an hedge of thorns: but the
y of the righteous is made plain.
 A wise son maketh a glad father: but a foolish man despiseth his
Folly is joy to him that is destitute of wisdom: but a man of
 uprightly.
ses are disappointed: but in the multitude
15:23 A man hath joy by the answer of his mouth: and a word spoken in
ow good is it!  15:24 The way of life is above to the
 hell beneath.
roy the house of the proud: but he will
stablish the border of the widow.
 The thoughts of the wicked are an abomination to the LORD: but
re are pleasant words.
 greedy of gain troubleth his own house; but he that
:28 The heart of the righteous studieth to answer: but the mouth of
eth out evil things.
far from the wicked: but he heareth the prayer of
 of the eyes rejoiceth the heart: and a good report
The ear that heareth the reproof of life abideth among the wise.
fuseth instruction despiseth his own soul: but he that
rstanding.
s the instruction of wisdom; and before
onour is humility.
s of the heart in man, and the answer of the
the ways of a man are clean in his own eyes; but the LORD
16:3 Commit thy works unto the LORD, and thy thoughts shall be
 The LORD hath made all things for himself: yea, even the wicked
l.
t is an abomination to the LORD:
and join in hand, he shall not be unpunished.
 purged: and by the fear of the
depart from evil.
s please the LORD, he maketh even his enemies to
er is a little with righteousness than great revenues without
s heart deviseth his way: but the LORD directeth his steps.
ce is in the lips of the king: his mouth
transgresseth not in judgment.
just weight and balance are the LORD's: all the weights of the

mmit wickedness: for the
ished by righteousness.
 lips are the delight of kings; and they love him that
 wrath of a king is as messengers of death: but a wise man
 In the light of the king's countenance is life; and his favour
e latter rain.
 it to get wisdom than gold! and to get
nderstanding rather to be chosen than silver!  16:17 The highway of
to depart from evil: he that keepeth his way preserveth
eth before destruction, and an haughty spirit before a
to be of an humble spirit with the lowly, than to

shall find good: and whoso
e LORD, happy is he.
heart shall be called prudent: and the sweetness of

ife unto him that hath it: but
ction of fools is folly.
t of the wise teacheth his mouth, and addeth learning to
t words are as an honeycomb, sweet to the soul, and
here is a way that seemeth right unto a man, but the end
ath.
for himself; for his mouth craveth
him.
il: and in his lips there is as a
 fire.
e: and a whisperer separateth chief
ds.
ighbour, and leadeth him into the
t is not good.
es to devise froward things: moving his lips
 hoary head is a crown of glory, if it be found in the way of
32 He that is slow to anger is better than the mighty; and he that
t than he that taketh a city.
 lot is cast into the lap; but the whole disposing thereof is
Better is a dry morsel, and quietness therewith, than an house
ith strife.
ave rule over a son that causeth shame, and
g the brethren.
for silver, and the furnace for gold: but the
ked doer giveth heed to false lips; and a liar giveth ear to
7:5 Whoso mocketh the poor reproacheth his Maker: and he that is glad
 shall not be unpunished.
's children are the crown of old men; and the glory of

ol: much less do lying lips a
17:8 A gift is as a precious stone in the eyes of him that hath it:
t turneth, it prospereth.
covereth a transgression seeketh love; but he that
ry friends.
re into a wise man than an hundred stripes
h only rebellion: therefore a cruel messenger
et a bear robbed of her whelps meet a man, rather than a fool
3 Whoso rewardeth evil for good, evil shall not depart from his
 beginning of strife is as when one letteth out water:
on, before it be meddled with.
 that justifieth the wicked, and he that condemneth the just,
omination to the LORD.
is there a price in the hand of a fool to get wisdom,
?  17:17 A friend loveth at all times,
d a brother is born for adversity.
8 A man void of understanding striketh hands, and becometh surety
f his friend.
sion that loveth strife: and he that exalteth
0 He that hath a froward heart findeth no good: and he that hath a
falleth into mischief.
getteth a fool doeth it to his sorrow: and the father
22 A merry heart doeth good like a medicine: but a broken spirit

 the bosom to pervert the ways
t.
 understanding; but the eyes of a
e in the ends of the earth.
lish son is a grief to his father, and bitterness to her
so to punish the just is not good, nor to strike princes for
at hath knowledge spareth his words: and a man of
spirit.
eth his peace, is counted wise: and he
at shutteth his lips is esteemed a man of understanding.
n, having separated himself, seeketh and
intermeddleth with all wisdom.
ool hath no delight in understanding, but that his heart may
:3 When the wicked cometh, then cometh also contempt, and with

eep waters, and the wellspring
as a flowing brook.
 to accept the person of the wicked, to overthrow
6 A fool's lips enter into contention, and his mouth calleth for
 fool's mouth is his destruction, and his lips are the snare of
he words of a talebearer are as wounds, and they go down into
f the belly.
ful in his work is brother to him that is a
LORD is a strong tower: the righteous runneth
ch man's wealth is his strong city, and as an high wall in
2 Before destruction the heart of man is haughty, and before

e heareth it, it is folly and
him.
tain his infirmity; but a wounded
who can bear?  18:15 The heart of the prudent getteth
 wise seeketh knowledge.
gift maketh room for him, and bringeth him before great
rst in his own cause seemeth just; but his
8:18 The lot causeth contentions to cease, and parteth between the
 A brother offended is harder to be won than a strong city: and
re like the bars of a castle.
an's belly shall be satisfied with the fruit of his mouth;
 his lips shall he be filled.
th and life are in the power of the tongue: and they that
it thereof.
findeth a good thing, and obtaineth favour
reaties; but the rich answereth roughly.

himself friendly: and there is
hat sticketh closer than a brother.
1 Better is the poor that walketh in his integrity, than he that is
 lips, and is a fool.
he soul be without knowledge, it is not good; and he
neth.
rteth his way: and his heart fretteth
inst the LORD.
friends; but the poor is separated from his
l not be unpunished, and he that speaketh
intreat the favour of the prince: and every man is a
s.
 hate him: how much more do his
o far from him? he pursueth them with words, yet they are
e that getteth wisdom loveth his own soul: he that keepeth
 good.
e unpunished, and he that speaketh
hall perish.
y for a fool; much less for a servant to
have rule over princes.
etion of a man deferreth his anger; and it is his glory
n.
ring of a lion; but his favour is
upon the grass.
the calamity of his father: and the contentions

ance of fathers: and a prudent
om the LORD.
 into a deep sleep; and an idle soul shall
the commandment keepeth his own soul; but he
19:17 He that hath pity upon the poor lendeth unto the LORD; and that
 given will he pay him again.
sten thy son while there is hope, and let not thy soul spare
19 A man of great wrath shall suffer punishment: for if thou
must do it again.
nd receive instruction, that thou mayest be wise
are many devices in a man's heart; nevertheless the
 stand.
s kindness: and a poor man is better
 a liar.
deth to life: and he that hath it shall
bide satisfied; he shall not be visited with evil.
s hand in his bosom, and will not so
 as bring it to his mouth again.
Smite a scorner, and the simple will beware: and reprove one
g, and he will understand knowledge.
:26 He that wasteth his father, and chaseth away his mother, is a
shame, and bringeth reproach.
se, my son, to hear the instruction that causeth to err from
.
gment: and the mouth of the
eth iniquity.
red for scorners, and stripes for the back of
ng drink is raging: and whosoever is
ived thereby is not wise.
 of a king is as the roaring of a lion: whoso provoketh
t his own soul.
r a man to cease from strife: but every fool
 will not plow by reason of the cold; therefore shall
othing.
n is like deep water; but a man of
tanding will draw it out.
 will proclaim every one his own goodness: but a faithful
he just man walketh in his integrity: his
 king that sitteth in the throne of judgment scattereth away all
.
t clean, I am pure from my sin?
ers weights, and divers measures, both of them are alike

s, whether his work be pure,
it be right.
 the seeing eye, the LORD hath made even
both of them.
t thou come to poverty; open thine eyes, and

he buyer: but when he is gone
en he boasteth.
d a multitude of rubies: but the lips of
knowledge are a precious jewel.
ake his garment that is surety for a stranger: and take a
ge woman.
t to a man; but afterwards his mouth
l be filled with gravel.
rpose is established by counsel: and with good advice
eth about as a talebearer revealeth secrets: therefore
ttereth with his lips.
eth his father or his mother, his lamp shall be put
21 An inheritance may be gotten hastily at the beginning; but the
 not be blessed.
will recompense evil; but wait on the LORD, and
 weights are an abomination unto the LORD; and a false
4 Man's goings are of the LORD; how can a man then understand his
t is a snare to the man who devoureth that which is
quiry.
 wicked, and bringeth the wheel over
.
 of the LORD, searching all the
rts of the belly.
 preserve the king: and his throne is upholden by
g men is their strength: and the beauty of old
lueness of a wound cleanseth away evil: so do stripes the
.
of the LORD, as the rivers of
urneth it whithersoever he will.
very way of a man is right in his own eyes: but the LORD
1:3 To do justice and judgment is more acceptable to the LORD than
:4 An high look, and a proud heart, and the plowing of the wicked,
The thoughts of the diligent tend only to plenteousness; but of
asty only to want.
treasures by a lying tongue is a vanity tossed to

stroy them; because they refuse
gment.
nd strange: but as for the pure, his
 is right.
n a corner of the housetop, than with a
rawling woman in a wide house.
e soul of the wicked desireth evil: his neighbour findeth no

imple is made wise: and when
instructed, he receiveth knowledge.
12 The righteous man wisely considereth the house of the wicked:
th the wicked for their wickedness.
13 Whoso stoppeth his ears at the cry of the poor, he also shall
hall not be heard.
et pacifieth anger: and a reward in the bosom
he just to do judgment: but destruction shall be
16 The man that wandereth out of the way of understanding shall
egation of the dead.
th pleasure shall be a poor man: he that loveth wine
21:18 The wicked shall be a ransom for the righteous, and the
upright.
 the wilderness, than with a contentious
and an angry woman.
sure to be desired and oil in the dwelling of the
it up.
ghteousness and mercy findeth life,
eousness, and honour.
scaleth the city of the mighty, and casteth down the
reof.
 his tongue keepeth his soul from
s.
is name, who dealeth in proud
1:25 The desire of the slothful killeth him; for his hands refuse to
26 He coveteth greedily all the day long: but the righteous giveth

bomination: how much more, when
th it with a wicked mind?  21:28 A false witness shall
reth speaketh constantly.
d man hardeneth his face: but as for the upright, he
ere is no wisdom nor understanding nor counsel against the
 is prepared against the day of battle: but safety is
ame is rather to be chosen than great riches, and loving
and gold.
ogether: the LORD is the maker of them
l.
l, and hideth himself: but the
s on, and are punished.
y and the fear of the LORD are riches, and honour, and
res are in the way of the froward: he that doth
m.
should go: and when he is old, he
t depart from it.
over the poor, and the borrower is servant to the
iquity shall reap vanity: and the rod of his
 a bountiful eye shall be blessed; for he giveth of
 Cast out the scorner, and contention shall go out; yea, strife
cease.
 heart, for the grace of his lips the
g shall be his friend.
f the LORD preserve knowledge, and he overthroweth the

 lion without, I shall be
reets.
 is a deep pit: he that is abhorred of
e LORD shall fall therein.
hness is bound in the heart of a child; but the rod of
r from him.
e poor to increase his riches, and he that
 want.
ar the words of the wise, and apply
 heart unto my knowledge.
is a pleasant thing if thou keep them within thee; they
hy lips.
 the LORD, I have made known to thee
 day, even to thee.
itten to thee excellent things in counsels and
hee know the certainty of the
uth; that thou mightest answer the words of truth to them
22 Rob not the poor, because he is poor:
neither oppress the afflicted in the gate: 22:23 For the LORD will
e, and spoil the soul of those that spoiled them.
n angry man; and with a furious man
shalt not go: 22:25 Lest thou learn his ways, and get a snare to
 Be not thou one of them that strike hands, or of them that are

 should he take away thy bed
hee?  22:28 Remove not the ancient landmark, which thy
eest thou a man diligent in his business? he shall stand before
 stand before mean men.
sittest to eat with a ruler, consider diligently what
a knife to thy throat, if thou be a man
iven to appetite.
of his dainties: for they are deceitful meat.
rom thine own wisdom.
t thine eyes upon that which is not? for riches
ey fly away as an eagle toward

ath an evil eye, neither
dainty meats: 23:7 For as he thinketh in his heart, so
he to thee; but his heart is not with
e.
n shalt thou vomit up, and lose
 words.
 fool: for he will despise the wisdom
thy words.
dmark; and enter not into the fields of
he fatherless: 23:11 For their redeemer is mighty; he shall plead
thee.
ruction, and thine ears to the words
nowledge.
 from the child: for if thou beatest him
with the rod, he shall not die.
hou shalt beat him with the rod, and shalt deliver his soul
son, if thine heart be wise, my heart shall rejoice, even
ins shall rejoice, when thy lips speak right things.
vy sinners: but be thou in the fear of the
ly there is an end; and thine expectation shall not be
 my son, and be wise, and guide thine heart in the
ibbers; among riotous eaters of flesh: 23:21
 come to poverty: and drowsiness
othe a man with rags.
o thy father that begat thee, and despise not thy
Buy the truth, and sell it not; also wisdom, and instruction,

reatly rejoice: and he that
ise child shall have joy of him.
Thy father and thy mother shall be glad, and she that bare thee
3:26 My son, give me thine heart, and let thine eyes observe my ways.
 whore is a deep ditch; and a strange woman is a narrow
h in wait as for a prey, and increaseth the
ath woe? who hath sorrow? who hath contentions? who hath
without cause? who hath redness of eyes?
23:30 They that tarry long at the wine; they that go to seek mixed
ook not thou upon the wine when it is red, when it giveth his
en it moveth itself aright.
e last it biteth like a serpent, and stingeth like an
all behold strange women, and thine heart shall
, thou shalt be as he that lieth down in the midst of the
upon the top of a mast.
 stricken me, shalt thou say, and I was not sick; they
t not: when shall I awake? I will seek it
ainst evil men, neither desire to be with
struction, and their lips talk of
f.
ded; and by understanding it is
ed: 24:4 And by knowledge shall the chambers be filled with
nt riches.
ea, a man of knowledge increaseth
h.
make thy war: and in multitude of
lors there is safety.
o high for a fool: he openeth not his mouth in the
o do evil shall be called a mischievous person.
s sin: and the scorner is an
to men.
of adversity, thy strength is small.
:11 If thou forbear to deliver them that are drawn unto death, and
eady to be slain; 24:12 If thou sayest, Behold, we
ndereth the heart consider it? and he
t keepeth thy soul, doth not he know it? and shall not he render to
ding to his works?  24:13 My son, eat thou honey,
comb, which is sweet to thy taste:
So shall the knowledge of wisdom be unto thy soul: when thou
ere shall be a reward, and thy expectation shall
ait, O wicked man, against the dwelling of the
ce: 24:16 For a just man falleth
mes, and riseth up again: but the wicked shall fall into
 not when thine enemy falleth, and let not thine heart be
4:18 Lest the LORD see it, and it displease
m.
il men, neither be thou envious at
cked: 24:20 For there shall be no reward to the evil man; the
shall be put out.
ou the LORD and the king: and meddle not with
For their calamity shall rise
nd who knoweth the ruin of them both?  24:23 These things
It is not good to have respect of persons in
the wicked, Thou are righteous; him shall the
: 24:25 But to them that rebuke
 be delight, and a good blessing shall come upon them.
 his lips that giveth a right answer.
4:27 Prepare thy work without, and make it fit for thyself in the
ards build thine house.
witness against thy neighbour without cause; and
9 Say not, I will do so to him as he hath done to me: I will
rding to his work.
field of the slothful, and by the vineyard of the
And, lo, it was all grown over with
s, and nettles had covered the face thereof, and the stone wall
down.
it well: I looked upon it, and
nstruction.
 little slumber, a little folding of the
hands to sleep: 24:34 So shall thy poverty come as one that
t as an armed man.
proverbs of Solomon, which the men of Hezekiah
 is the glory of God to conceal a thing: but the honour of
 matter.
d the earth for depth, and the heart of
ings is unsearchable.
e dross from the silver, and there shall come forth a
 Take away the wicked from before the king, and his throne shall
righteousness.
lf in the presence of the king, and stand not
etter it is that it be said unto
me up hither; than that thou shouldest be put lower in the
hom thine eyes have seen.
orth hastily to strive, lest thou know not what to do in
neighbour hath put thee to shame.
Debate thy cause with thy neighbour himself; and discover not a
25:10 Lest he that heareth it put thee to shame,

of gold in pictures of
s an earring of gold, and an ornament of fine gold, so is a
bedient ear.
in the time of harvest, so is a faithful
messenger to them that send him: for he refresheth the soul of his
4 Whoso boasteth himself of a false gift is like clouds and wind
5:15 By long forbearing is a prince persuaded, and a soft tongue

ch as is sufficient for thee,
e filled therewith, and vomit it.
 Withdraw thy foot from thy neighbour's house; lest he be weary
e thee.
witness against his neighbour is a
and a sword, and a sharp arrow.
onfidence in an unfaithful man in time of trouble is like a
t out of joint.
 away a garment in cold weather, and as vinegar
ongs to an heavy heart.
enemy be hungry, give him bread to eat; and if he be
nk: 25:22 For thou shalt heap coals of
re upon his head, and the LORD shall reward thee.
ay rain: so doth an angry countenance a
ackbiting tongue.
 dwell in the corner of the housetop, than with a
e.
ul, so is good news from a far

e the wicked is as a troubled
nd a corrupt spring.
od to eat much honey: so for men to search their own
e that hath no rule over his own spirit is like a city that is
hout walls.
 as rain in harvest, so honour is not
mly for a fool.
dering, as the swallow by flying, so the curse
whip for the horse, a bridle for the ass, and a rod for the
swer not a fool according to his folly, lest thou also be like
swer a fool according to his folly, lest he be wise in his own
that sendeth a message by the hand of a fool cutteth off the
age.
equal: so is a parable in the mouth
ols.
 a sling, so is he that giveth
a fool.
he hand of a drunkard, so is a parable
 the mouths of fools.
od that formed all things both rewardeth the fool,
26:11 As a dog returneth to his vomit, so a fool returneth to his
eest thou a man wise in his own conceit? there is more hope of

a lion in the way; a lion is in
ts.
hinges, so doth the slothful upon
.
 his bosom; it grieveth him to
gain to his mouth.
s wiser in his own conceit than seven men that can
t passeth by, and meddleth with strife belonging not to
h a dog by the ears.
 who casteth firebrands, arrows, and death, 26:19 So
neighbour, and saith, Am not I in sport?
26:20 Where no wood is, there the fire goeth out: so where there is no
the strife ceaseth.
to burning coals, and wood to fire; so is a
:22 The words of a talebearer are as wounds, and they go down into
rts of the belly.
d a wicked heart are like a potsherd covered with
teth dissembleth with his lips, and layeth up deceit
keth fair, believe him not: for there
 seven abominations in his heart.
 Whose hatred is covered by deceit, his wickedness shall be
 congregation.
t shall fall therein: and he that rolleth a
8 A lying tongue hateth those that are afflicted by it; and a
eth ruin.
morrow; for thou knowest not what a day
ay bring forth.
aise thee, and not thine own mouth; a stranger,
tone is heavy, and the sand weighty; but a fool's wrath is

geous; but who is able to stand
vy?  27:5 Open rebuke is better than secret love.
 a friend; but the kisses of an enemy
 deceitful.
 an honeycomb; but to the hungry soul every
d that wandereth from her nest, so is a man that
Ointment and perfume rejoice the heart: so doth the sweetness of
hearty counsel.
 and thy father's friend, forsake not; neither
ay of thy calamity: for better is
bour that is near than a brother far off.
t glad, that I may answer him
cheth me.
 the evil, and hideth himself; but the
mple pass on, and are punished.
ake his garment that is surety for a stranger, and take a
ge woman.
iend with a loud voice, rising early in
he morning, it shall be counted a curse to him.
ery rainy day and a contentious woman
 alike.
th the wind, and the ointment of his
t hand, which bewrayeth itself.
ron sharpeneth iron; so a man sharpeneth the countenance of his
oso keepeth the fig tree shall eat the fruit thereof: so he
ter shall be honoured.
r face answereth to face, so the heart of man to man.
are never full; so the eyes of man are
ver satisfied.
for silver, and the furnace for gold; so is a
ou shouldest bray a fool in a mortar among wheat with a
olishness depart from him.
u diligent to know the state of thy flocks, and look well
r riches are not for ever: and doth the crown endure to every
e hay appeareth, and the tender grass sheweth
e gathered.
 clothing, and the goats are the price of
oats' milk enough for thy food, for the
ood of thy household, and for the maintenance for thy maidens.
ee when no man pursueth: but the righteous are bold
sgression of a land many are the princes thereof: but
 knowledge the state thereof shall be
longed.
 the poor is like a sweeping rain which
eaveth no food.
the law praise the wicked: but such as keep the
 men understand not judgment: but they that seek the LORD

is uprightness, than he that
in his ways, though he be rich.
oso keepeth the law is a wise son: but he that is a companion
h his father.
 unjust gain increaseth his substance, he
e poor.
ar from hearing the law, even his
shall be abomination.
th the righteous to go astray in an evil way, he
t: but the upright shall have good
 in possession.
ise in his own conceit; but the poor that hath
28:12 When righteous men do rejoice, there is great glory: but when
, a man is hidden.
th his sins shall not prosper: but whoso
confesseth and forsaketh them shall have mercy.
th alway: but he that hardeneth his
 shall fall into mischief.
oaring lion, and a ranging bear; so is a wicked ruler over
6 The prince that wanteth understanding is also a great oppressor:
th covetousness shall prolong his days.

ood of any person shall flee
let no man stay him.
h uprightly shall be saved: but he that is perverse

ave plenty of bread: but he that
h after vain persons shall have poverty enough.
 with blessings: but he that maketh
 to be rich shall not be innocent.
1 To have respect of persons is not good: for for a piece of bread
ansgress.
ich hath an evil eye, and considereth not
3 He that rebuketh a man afterwards shall find more favour than he
with the tongue.
s father or his mother, and saith, It is no
n of a destroyer.
 proud heart stirreth up strife: but he that
 made fat.
s own heart is a fool: but whoso walketh
wisely, he shall be delivered.
 that giveth unto the poor shall not lack: but he that hideth
any a curse.
, men hide themselves: but when they perish,
at being often reproved hardeneth his neck, shall suddenly
ithout remedy.
are in authority, the people rejoice: but when
mourn.
th his father: but he that keepeth
y with harlots spendeth his substance.
29:4 The king by judgment establisheth the land: but he that receiveth
roweth it.
is neighbour spreadeth a net for his feet.
an there is a snare: but the
th sing and rejoice.
 considereth the cause of the poor: but the wicked
8 Scornful men bring a city into a snare: but wise men turn away
a wise man contendeth with a foolish man, whether he rage or
t.
ght: but the just seek his soul.
A fool uttereth all his mind: but a wise man keepeth it in till
2 If a ruler hearken to lies, all his servants are wicked.
 deceitful man meet together: the LORD
ghteneth both their eyes.
g that faithfully judgeth the poor, his throne shall be
:15 The rod and reproof give wisdom: but a child left to himself
r to shame.
ultiplied, transgression increaseth: but
the righteous shall see their fall.
17 Correct thy son, and he shall give thee rest; yea, he shall give
y soul.
 the people perish: but he that keepeth
he law, happy is he.
ll not be corrected by words: for though he
 Seest thou a man that is hasty in his words? there is more hope
him.
up his servant from a child shall
m become his son at the length.
n angry man stirreth up strife, and a furious man aboundeth in
:23 A man's pride shall bring him low: but honour shall uphold the
.
ateth his own soul: he heareth
nd bewrayeth it not.
man bringeth a snare: but whoso putteth his trust in
26 Many seek the ruler's favour; but every man's judgment cometh
29:27 An unjust man is an abomination to the just: and he that is
y is abomination to the wicked.
e words of Agur the son of Jakeh, even the prophecy: the man
n unto Ithiel and Ucal, 30:2 Surely I am more
e understanding of a man.
r learned wisdom, nor have the knowledge of the holy.
nto heaven, or descended? who hath gathered
he waters in a garment? who
hed all the ends of the earth? what is his name, and what
u canst tell?  30:5 Every word of God is
pure: he is a shield unto them that put their trust in him.
o his words, lest he reprove thee, and thou be
e I required of thee; deny me them not before I
 and lies: give me neither poverty
ches; feed me with food convenient for me: 30:9 Lest I be full,
say, Who is the LORD? or lest I be poor, and steal,
vain.
is master, lest he curse thee, and
e found guilty.
tion that curseth their father, and doth not
a generation that are pure in their own eyes, and yet
hiness.
how lofty are their eyes! and their
ds are lifted up.
ration, whose teeth are as swords, and their jaw
r from off the earth, and the needy
among men.
o daughters, crying, Give, give. There are
ea, four things say not, It is
:16 The grave; and the barren womb; the earth that is not
e fire that saith not, It is enough.
:17 The eye that mocketh at his father, and despiseth to obey his
s of the valley shall pick it out, and the young
e be three things which are too wonderful for me, yea, four
 The way of an eagle in the air; the way of a
p in the midst of the sea; and
 a man with a maid.
ay of an adulterous woman; she eateth, and wipeth
 no wickedness.
the earth is disquieted, and for four which it
n he reigneth; and a fool when he
ed with meat; 30:23 For an odious woman when she is married;
s heir to her mistress.
four things which are little upon the earth, but they
 ants are a people not strong, yet they
repare their meat in the summer; 30:26 The conies are but a feeble
hey their houses in the rocks; 30:27 The locusts have
l of them by bands; 30:28 The spider
th hold with her hands, and is in kings' palaces.
ch go well, yea, four are comely in
: 30:30 A lion which is strongest among beasts, and turneth not
 A greyhound; an he goat also; and a king, against
0:32 If thou hast done foolishly in lifting up thyself, or if thou
l, lay thine hand upon thy mouth.
 Surely the churning of milk bringeth forth butter, and the
ingeth forth blood: so the forcing of wrath
s of king Lemuel, the prophecy that his mother taught
d what, the son of my womb? and what, the son of
th unto women, nor thy ways to that
 destroyeth kings.
ings, O Lemuel, it is not for kings to drink wine;
:5 Lest they drink, and forget the
nd pervert the judgment of any of the afflicted.
that is ready to perish, and wine unto
ose that be of heavy hearts.
im drink, and forget his poverty, and remember his misery no
 mouth for the dumb in the cause of all such as are
:9 Open thy mouth, judge righteously, and plead the cause of the

her price is far above
he heart of her husband doth safely trust in her, so that he
spoil.
ot evil all the days of her life.
 She seeketh wool, and flax, and worketh willingly with her
like the merchants' ships; she bringeth her food from
o while it is yet night, and giveth meat to her
dens.
d buyeth it: with the fruit of her
she planteth a vineyard.
eth her loins with strength, and strengtheneth her arms.
t her merchandise is good: her candle goeth
er hands to the spindle, and her hands hold the
t her hand to the poor; yea, she reacheth forth
e is not afraid of the snow for her household: for all her
th scarlet.
verings of tapestry; her clothing is silk
 in the gates, when he sitteth among the
elders of the land.
ne linen, and selleth it; and delivereth girdles
th and honour are her clothing; and she shall rejoice in
 openeth her mouth with wisdom; and in her tongue is the law
She looketh well to the ways of her household, and eateth not
.
 her blessed; her husband also,
aiseth her.
one virtuously, but thou excellest them
ll.
ty is vain: but a woman that
LORD, she shall be praised.
her of the fruit of her hands; and let her own works praise


f David, king in Jerusalem.
of vanities, saith the Preacher, vanity of vanities; all is
fit hath a man of all his labour which he taketh under the
 passeth away, and another generation cometh:
5 The sun also ariseth, and the sun goeth down, and hasteth to his
rose.
th, and turneth about unto the north;
whirleth about continually, and the wind returneth again according

et the sea is not full; unto the
om whence the rivers come, thither they return again.
labour; man cannot utter it: the eye is not
ed with hearing.
h been, it is that which shall be; and that
ne: and there is no new thing
un.
may be said, See, this is new? it
en already of old time, which was before us.
er things; neither shall there be
embrance of things that are to come with those that shall come
 Preacher was king over Israel in Jerusalem.
 search out by wisdom concerning
gs that are done under heaven: this sore travail hath God
to be exercised therewith.
seen all the works that are done under the sun; and,
tion of spirit.
ked cannot be made straight: and that which is
I communed with mine own heart, saying, Lo, I am come to great
ten more wisdom than all they that have been
had great experience of wisdom
dge.
isdom, and to know madness and
erceived that this also is vexation of spirit.
ief: and he that increaseth
reaseth sorrow.
t, Go to now, I will prove thee with mirth,
this also is vanity.
hter, It is mad: and of mirth, What doeth it?  2:3 I
yself unto wine, yet acquainting mine
rt with wisdom; and to lay hold on folly, till I might see what was
he sons of men, which they should do under the heaven

houses; I planted me
e me gardens and orchards, and I planted trees in
 made me pools of water, to water
th the wood that bringeth forth trees: 2:7 I got me servants
ervants born in my house; also I had great
ove all that were in Jerusalem
 2:8 I gathered me also silver and gold, and the peculiar
the provinces: I gat me men singers and women
 of men, as musical instruments,
 of all sorts.
increased more than all that were before me in
ith me.
esired I kept not from them, I withheld
ot my heart from any joy; for my heart rejoiced in all my labour: and
ortion of all my labour.
oked on all the works that my hands had wrought, and on
red to do: and, behold, all was vanity and
fit under the sun.
self to behold wisdom, and madness, and folly: for
after the king? even that which hath
 already done.
dom excelleth folly, as far as light excelleth
s are in his head; but the fool walketh in
at one event happeneth to them
15 Then said I in my heart, As it happeneth to the fool, so it
; and why was I then more wise? Then I said in my

 wise more than of the fool for
ing that which now is in the days to come shall all be
the wise man? as the fool.
re I hated life; because the work that is wrought under
: for all is vanity and vexation of spirit.
 I had taken under the sun:
uld leave it unto the man that shall be after me.
 shall be a wise man or a fool? yet
 he have rule over all my labour wherein I have laboured, and
 myself wise under the sun. This is also vanity.
ause my heart to despair of all the
r which I took under the sun.
there is a man whose labour is in wisdom, and in knowledge,
 man that hath not laboured therein shall he
 vanity and a great evil.
 hath man of all his labour, and of the vexation of his
ured under the sun?  2:23 For all his days
 his heart taketh not rest in
This is also vanity.
ing better for a man, than that he should eat and
s soul enjoy good in his labour. This
o I saw, that it was from the hand of God.
hasten hereunto, more than I?
d giveth to a man that is good in his sight wisdom, and
the sinner he giveth travail, to gather and
t is good before God. This also
 and vexation of spirit.
hing there is a season, and a time to every purpose
 be born, and a time to die; a time to
ant, and a time to pluck up that which is planted; 3:3 A time to
o heal; a time to break down, and a time to build
e to laugh; a time to mourn, and a
o dance; 3:5 A time to cast away stones, and a time to gather
me to embrace, and a time to refrain from
to lose; a time to keep, and
st away; 3:7 A time to rend, and a time to sew; a time to
to speak; 3:8 A time to love, and a time to
e.
 in that wherein he laboureth?
e seen the travail, which God hath given to the sons of men

 in his time: also he hath set
in their heart, so that no man can find out the work that
ning to the end.
 is no good in them, but for a man to rejoice,
And also that every man should eat and drink, and enjoy the good
 it is the gift of God.
t, whatsoever God doeth, it shall be for ever: nothing
ing taken from it: and God doeth it, that
which hath been is now; and that which is to be hath already
h that which is past.
 I saw under the sun the place of judgment, that
e of righteousness, that iniquity
re.
l judge the righteous and the
 there is a time there for every purpose and for every
 heart concerning the estate of the sons of men,
that they might see that they
are beasts.
th the sons of men befalleth beasts; even
h, so dieth the other; yea,
 one breath; so that a man hath no preeminence above a

e dust, and all turn to dust
21 Who knoweth the spirit of man that goeth upward, and the spirit
t goeth downward to the earth?  3:22 Wherefore I
ter, than that a man should rejoice
s own works; for that is his portion: for who shall bring him to
after him?  4:1 So I returned, and considered all
er the sun: and behold the tears of
as were oppressed, and they had no comforter; and on the side of
here was power; but they had no comforter.
 are already dead more than the
ich are yet alive.
e than both they, which hath not yet been, who
done under the sun.
ered all travail, and every right work, that for
our. This is also vanity and
spirit.
together, and eateth his own flesh.
 Better is an handful with quietness, than both the hands full with
ation of spirit.
nd I saw vanity under the sun.
e is one alone, and there is not a second; yea, he hath
yet is there no end of all his labour;
ither is his eye satisfied with riches; neither saith he, For whom
 bereave my soul of good? This is also vanity, yea, it
o are better than one; because they have a good reward for their
r if they fall, the one will lift up his fellow: but woe to him
he falleth; for he hath not another to help him up.
er, then they have heat: but how can one
be warm alone?  4:12 And if one prevail against him, two shall
 threefold cord is not quickly broken.
4:13 Better is a poor and a wise child than an old and foolish king,
re be admonished.
n he cometh to reign; whereas also he that is

lk under the sun, with the
hat shall stand up in his stead.
here is no end of all the people, even of all that have been
 that come after shall not rejoice in him.
of spirit.
goest to the house of God, and be more
ady to hear, than to give the sacrifice of fools: for they consider
o evil.
 and let not thine heart be hasty to
r any thing before God: for God is in heaven, and thou upon earth:
y words be few.
through the multitude of business; and a fool's
s.
 defer not to pay it; for he hath
sure in fools: pay that which thou hast vowed.
st not vow, than that thou shouldest
and not pay.
o cause thy flesh to sin; neither say thou
wherefore should God be angry
e, and destroy the work of thine hands?  5:7 For in the
y words there are also divers vanities: but
 oppression of the poor, and violent perverting
ce, marvel not at the matter: for
 is higher than the highest regardeth; and there be higher than
er the profit of the earth is for all: the king himself is
5:10 He that loveth silver shall not be satisfied with silver; nor he
bundance with increase: this is also vanity.
ncreased that eat them: and what
there to the owners thereof, saving the beholding of them with
e sleep of a labouring man is sweet, whether he
ce of the rich will not suffer him
ep.
ave seen under the sun, namely,
pt for the owners thereof to their hurt.

vail: and he begetteth a son,
s nothing in his hand.
forth of his mother's womb, naked shall he return to
nothing of his labour, which he may
 away in his hand.
s a sore evil, that in all points as he came, so
he that hath laboured for the wind?
All his days also he eateth in darkness, and he hath much sorrow
 sickness.
e seen: it is good and comely for one to
eat and to drink, and to enjoy the good of all his labour that he
sun all the days of his life, which God giveth him:
Every man also to whom God hath given riches and wealth, and hath
o eat thereof, and to take his portion, and to
ift of God.
remember the days of his life; because God

nder the sun, and it is common
 6:2 A man to whom God hath given riches, wealth, and
thing for his soul of all that he
h, yet God giveth him not power to eat thereof, but a stranger
anity, and it is an evil disease.
f a man beget an hundred children, and live many years, so that
rs be many, and his soul be not filled with good,
I say, that an untimely birth is
han he.
y, and departeth in darkness, and his
e shall be covered with darkness.
oreover he hath not seen the sun, nor known any thing: this hath
 other.
and years twice told, yet hath he seen
 good: do not all go to one place?  6:7 All the labour of man is for
 yet the appetite is not filled.
r what hath the wise more than the fool? what hath the poor,
efore the living?  6:9 Better is the sight of
sire: this is also vanity and
 spirit.
amed already, and it is known that it is
man: neither may he contend with him that is mightier than he.
be many things that increase vanity, what is man the
what is good for man in this life, all
e days of his vain life which he spendeth as a shadow? for who can
shall be after him under the sun?  7:1 A good name is
; and the day of death than the day of
e's birth.
e house of mourning, than to go to the
use of feasting: for that is the end of all men; and the living will
heart.
er: for by the sadness of the
 the heart is made better.
t of the wise is in the house of mourning; but the heart
f mirth.
ebuke of the wise, than for a man to
 the song of fools.
kling of thorns under a pot, so is the laughter of

mad; and a gift destroyeth the
7:8 Better is the end of a thing than the beginning thereof: and the
rit is better than the proud in spirit.

y: for anger resteth in the
s.
 that the former days were better
ese? for thou dost not enquire wisely concerning this.
n inheritance: and by it there is profit to
om is a defence, and money is a defence: but the
isdom giveth life to them that have

an make that straight, which
 crooked?  7:14 In the day of prosperity be joyful, but in
sider: God also hath set the one over against
 find nothing after him.
s have I seen in the days of my vanity: there is a just
ighteousness, and there is a wicked man
hat prolongeth his life in his wickedness.
er make thyself over wise: why
thou destroy thyself ?  7:17 Be not over much wicked,
shouldest thou die before thy time?  7:18
of this; yea, also from this
 thine hand: for he that feareth God shall come forth of
trengtheneth the wise more than ten mighty men which are
here is not a just man upon earth, that doeth good, and
ake no heed unto all words that are spoken; lest thou hear
7:22 For oftentimes also thine own heart
knoweth that thou thyself likewise hast cursed others.
d by wisdom: I said, I will be wise; but it
far off, and exceeding deep, who can find it out?
, and to search, and to seek out
and the reason of things, and to know the wickedness of folly,
and madness: 7:26 And I find more bitter than
s and nets, and her hands as
 pleaseth God shall escape from her; but the sinner shall
Behold, this have I found, saith the preacher, counting one by
 account: 7:28 Which yet my soul seeketh, but I
have I found; but a woman among all
 have I not found.
ave I found, that God hath made man upright; but
ns.
 knoweth the interpretation of a
a man's wisdom maketh his face to shine, and the boldness of
ged.
g's commandment, and that in regard
e oath of God.
ut of his sight: stand not in an evil thing;

is power: and who may say unto
doest thou?  8:5 Whoso keepeth the commandment shall feel no
 man's heart discerneth both time and judgment.
e is time and judgment, therefore the
ery of man is great upon him.
e knoweth not that which shall be: for who can tell him when
e is no man that hath power over the spirit to
ower in the day of death: and
 discharge in that war; neither shall wickedness deliver
.
 my heart unto every work that is
der the sun: there is a time wherein one man ruleth over

 had come and gone from the
holy, and they were forgotten in the city where they had
ty.
il work is not executed speedily,
re the heart of the sons of men is fully set in them to do
inner do evil an hundred times, and his days be
t shall be well with them that fear
which fear before him: 8:13 But it shall not be well with the
 he prolong his days, which are as a shadow;
8:14 There is a vanity which is done upon the earth; that there be
hom it happeneth according to the work of the wicked;
o whom it happeneth according to the work
s vanity.
because a man hath no better thing under
the sun, than to eat, and to drink, and to be merry: for that shall
of his labour the days of his life, which God giveth
n I applied mine heart to know wisdom, and to see the business
e earth: (for also there is that neither day nor
8:17 Then I beheld all the work of
hat a man cannot find out the work that is done under the sun:
 labour to seek it out, yet he shall not find it;
ink to know it, yet shall he not be
to find it.
ed in my heart even to declare all this,
that the righteous, and the wise, and their works, are in the hand of
noweth either love or hatred by all that is before them.
e to all: there is one event to the righteous,
o the clean, and to the unclean;
hat sacrificeth, and to him that sacrificeth not: as is the
 and he that sweareth, as he that feareth an
 things that are done under the sun, that
e heart of the sons of men is
l, and madness is in their heart while they live, and after
d.
 the living there is hope: for a
og is better than a dead lion.
the living know that they shall die: but the dead know not any
they any more a reward; for the memory of them is
, and their hatred, and their envy, is now
ortion for ever in any thing
 under the sun.
 bread with joy, and drink thy wine with a
orks.
ite; and let thy head lack no

u lovest all the days of the
vanity, which he hath given thee under the sun, all the
t is thy portion in this life, and in thy

do it with thy might; for
k, nor device, nor knowledge, nor wisdom, in the grave,
 I returned, and saw under the sun, that the race is not to the
le to the strong, neither yet bread to the wise,
ding, nor yet favour to men of
 time and chance happeneth to them all.

s the fishes that are taken
t, and as the birds that are caught in the snare; so are
an evil time, when it falleth suddenly upon
lso under the sun, and it seemed great
to me: 9:14 There was a little city, and few men within it; and
king against it, and besieged it, and built great
re was found in it a poor wise man,
e by his wisdom delivered the city; yet no man remembered that
16 Then said I, Wisdom is better than strength: nevertheless the
is despised, and his words are not heard.
 quiet more than the cry of him
th among fools.
han weapons of war: but one sinner destroyeth
he ointment of the apothecary to send forth a
ly him that is in reputation for
nd honour.
t his right hand; but a fool's heart at
is left.
 a fool walketh by the way, his wisdom
ileth him, and he saith to every one that he is a fool.
 ruler rise up against thee, leave not thy
nces.
e seen under the sun, as an error
roceedeth from the ruler: 10:6 Folly is set in great dignity,
ow place.
n horses, and princes walking as servants
 pit shall fall into it; and whoso breaketh an
10:9 Whoso removeth stones shall be hurt therewith; and he that
 be endangered thereby.
on be blunt, and he do not whet the edge, then must he
sdom is profitable to direct.
ely the serpent will bite without enchantment; and a babbler
 The words of a wise man's mouth are gracious; but the lips of a
up himself.
words of his mouth is foolishness: and the

an cannot tell what shall be;
all be after him, who can tell him?  10:15 The labour of
 one of them, because he knoweth not how to
 land, when thy king is a child, and thy princes
 art thou, O land, when thy king is
on of nobles, and thy princes eat in due season, for strength,
ess!  10:18 By much slothfulness the building
 hands the house droppeth
19 A feast is made for laughter, and wine maketh merry: but money
ngs.
n thy thought; and curse not the
thy bedchamber: for a bird of the air shall carry the voice,
ngs shall tell the matter.
y bread upon the waters: for thou shalt find it after many
tion to seven, and also to eight; for thou knowest not
earth.
in, they empty themselves upon the
 and if the tree fall toward the south, or toward the north, in
 tree falleth, there it shall be.
He that observeth the wind shall not sow; and he that regardeth
t reap.
s the way of the spirit, nor how the
s do grow in the womb of her that is with child: even so thou
 of God who maketh all.
ning sow thy seed, and in the evening withhold not
 whether shall prosper, either this or
at, or whether they both shall be alike good.
a pleasant thing it is for the eyes
hold the sun: 11:8 But if a man live many years, and rejoice in
im remember the days of darkness; for they shall be
.
th; and let thy heart cheer thee
ays of thy youth, and walk in the ways of thine heart, and in
es: but know thou, that for all these things God
11:10 Therefore remove sorrow from thy heart, and put away evil from
 childhood and youth are vanity.
emember now thy Creator in the days of thy youth, while the evil
 the years draw nigh, when thou shalt say, I have no
he sun, or the light, or the moon, or
 stars, be not darkened, nor the clouds return after the rain: 12:3
 the keepers of the house shall tremble, and the strong
nd the grinders cease because they are few,
be darkened, 12:4 And the doors
shut in the streets, when the sound of the grinding is low,
 the voice of the bird, and all the daughters
Also when they shall be afraid of
ich is high, and fears shall be in the way, and the almond tree
 the grasshopper shall be a burden, and desire
 long home, and the mourners go
 streets: 12:6 Or ever the silver cord be loosed, or the
the pitcher be broken at the fountain, or
Then shall the dust return to the earth as it was: and the spirit
 God who gave it.
es, saith the preacher; all is vanity.
12:9 And moreover, because the preacher was wise, he still taught the
dge; yea, he gave good heed, and sought out, and set in
10 The preacher sought to find out acceptable words: and that which
 upright, even words of truth.
e words of the wise are as goads, and as nails fastened by the
s, which are given from one shepherd.
2:12 And further, by these, my son, be admonished: of making many
 end; and much study is a weariness of the flesh.
n of the whole matter: Fear God, and
 his commandments: for this is the whole duty of man.
very work into judgment, with every secret
 be evil.

s.
of his mouth: for thy love is
 wine.
 good ointments thy name is as
oured forth, therefore do the virgins love thee.
hee: the king hath brought me into his
ambers: we will be glad and rejoice in thee, we will remember thy
ne: the upright love thee.
ck, but comely, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, as the tents
 of Solomon.
use I am black, because the sun hath looked
y with me; they made me the
 vineyards; but mine own vineyard have I not kept.
ul loveth, where thou feedest, where
 makest thy flock to rest at noon: for why should I be as one that
 the flocks of thy companions?  1:8 If thou know not,
o thy way forth by the footsteps of the
lock, and feed thy kids beside the shepherds' tents.
my love, to a company of horses in
h's chariots.
y with rows of jewels, thy neck with chains
ers of gold with studs of silver.
While the king sitteth at his table, my spikenard sendeth forth

ed unto me; he shall lie all
t my breasts.
e as a cluster of camphire in the vineyards
r, my love; behold, thou art fair; thou hast
fair, my beloved, yea, pleasant: also our bed is
use are cedar, and our rafters of fir.
2:1 I am the rose of Sharon, and the lily of the valleys.
horns, so is my love among the daughters.
f the wood, so is my beloved
ns. I sat down under his shadow with great delight, and
aste.
ng house, and his banner over me was
.
with apples: for I am sick of
6 His left hand is under my head, and his right hand doth embrace
ge you, O ye daughters of Jerusalem, by the roes, and by the
at ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he
d! behold, he cometh leaping upon the
ntains, skipping upon the hills.
 beloved is like a roe or a young hart: behold, he standeth
keth forth at the windows, shewing himself
spake, and said unto me, Rise up, my love, my fair
 lo, the winter is past, the rain is over and gone; 2:12 The
earth; the time of the singing of birds is come,
rd in our land; 2:13 The fig tree
 forth her green figs, and the vines with the tender grape give
, my love, my fair one, and come away.
2:14 O my dove, that art in the clefts of the rock, in the secret
irs, let me see thy countenance, let me hear thy
 thy countenance is comely.
s the foxes, the little foxes, that spoil the vines: for
es.
is: he feedeth among the lilies.
ntil the day break, and the shadows flee away, turn, my beloved,
 roe or a young hart upon the mountains of Bether.
t him whom my soul loveth: I sought him,
but I found him not.
w, and go about the city in the streets, and in the
 my soul loveth: I sought him, but I
d him not.
ut the city found me: to whom I said, Saw
ut a little that I passed
I found him whom my soul loveth: I held him, and would
brought him into my mother's house, and
nto the chamber of her that conceived me.
usalem, by the roes, and by the
the field, that ye stir not up, nor awake my love, till he
is that cometh out of the wilderness like pillars of
 frankincense, with all powders of the
rchant?  3:7 Behold his bed, which is Solomon's; threescore valiant
t, of the valiant of Israel.
ll hold swords, being expert in war: every man hath his
e of fear in the night.
n made himself a chariot of the wood of Lebanon.
 of silver, the bottom thereof of
he covering of it of purple, the midst thereof being paved with
ters of Jerusalem.
daughters of Zion, and behold king Solomon with
ned him in the day of his
in the day of the gladness of his heart.

ld, thou art fair; thou hast
within thy locks: thy hair is as a flock of goats, that

that are even shorn, which
he washing; whereof every one bear twins, and none is
 lips are like a thread of scarlet, and thy speech is comely:
a piece of a pomegranate within thy locks.
d builded for an armoury,
ang a thousand bucklers, all shields of mighty men.
two young roes that are twins, which feed
eak, and the shadows flee away, I will get me to
hill of frankincense.
fair, my love; there is no spot in thee.

, with me from Lebanon: look
 of Amana, from the top of Shenir and Hermon, from the
ins of the leopards.
shed my heart, my sister, my spouse; thou hast
eyes, with one chain of thy neck.
How fair is thy love, my sister, my spouse! how much better is
and the smell of thine ointments than all spices!
as the honeycomb: honey and milk are
r thy tongue; and the smell of thy garments is like the smell of
 garden inclosed is my sister, my spouse; a spring shut up, a
:13 Thy plants are an orchard of pomegranates, with pleasant fruits;
 spikenard, 4:14 Spikenard and saffron; calamus and
nkincense; myrrh and aloes, with all
chief spices: 4:15 A fountain of gardens, a well of living waters,
 Lebanon.
 come, thou south; blow upon my garden,
hat the spices thereof may flow out. Let my beloved come into his
is pleasant fruits.
my garden, my sister, my spouse: I have gathered my
en my honeycomb with my honey; I have
nk my wine with my milk: eat, O friends; drink, yea, drink

the voice of my beloved that
ying, Open to me, my sister, my love, my dove, my
with dew, and my locks with the drops
the night.
how shall I put it on? I have washed my
eet; how shall I defile them?  5:4 My beloved put in his hand by the
or, and my bowels were moved for him.
:5 I rose up to open to my beloved; and my hands dropped with myrrh,
 with sweet smelling myrrh, upon the handles of the
oved; but my beloved had withdrawn himself, and
ake: I sought him, but I could not
im; I called him, but he gave me no answer.
city found me, they smote me,
d me; the keepers of the walls took away my veil from me.
ghters of Jerusalem, if ye find my beloved,
e.
other beloved, O thou fairest
? what is thy beloved more than another beloved, that thou
 My beloved is white and ruddy, the chiefest
s as the most fine gold, his locks are bushy, and black
s are as the eyes of doves by the rivers of waters, washed
.
s, as sweet flowers: his lips
, dropping sweet smelling myrrh.
is hands are as gold rings set with the beryl: his belly is as
d with sapphires.
pillars of marble, set upon sockets of fine gold:
cellent as the cedars.
s most sweet: yea, he is altogether lovely. This is my
nd, O daughters of Jerusalem.
er is thy beloved gone, O thou fairest among women? whither
side? that we may seek him with thee.
:2 My beloved is gone down into his garden, to the beds of spices, to
ardens, and to gather lilies.
my beloved's, and my beloved is mine: he feedeth among the
beautiful, O my love, as Tirzah, comely as Jerusalem,
ers.
for they have overcome me: thy hair
 a flock of goats that appear from Gilead.
which go up from the washing,
ry one beareth twins, and there is not one barren among
a pomegranate are thy temples within thy locks.
and fourscore concubines, and virgins
hout number.
is but one; she is the only one of her
ther, she is the choice one of her that bare her. The daughters saw
d her; yea, the queens and the concubines, and they
 that looketh forth as the morning, fair as the moon,
e as an army with banners?  6:11 I went
own into the garden of nuts to see the fruits of the valley, and to
 vine flourished and the pomegranates budded.
ade me like the chariots of

 return, that we may look
 will ye see in the Shulamite? As it were the company
utiful are thy feet with shoes, O prince's daughter! the
ike jewels, the work of the hands of a
nning workman.
round goblet, which wanteth not liquor: thy
t with lilies.
like two young roes that are twins.
 Thy neck is as a tower of ivory; thine eyes like the fishpools in
gate of Bathrabbim: thy nose is as the tower of
us.
rmel, and the hair of thine head
ple; the king is held in the galleries.

 love, for delights!  7:7
e is like to a palm tree, and thy breasts to clusters
ill go up to the palm tree, I will take hold of the
easts shall be as clusters of the vine,
nd the smell of thy nose like apples; 7:9 And the roof of thy mouth
ine for my beloved, that goeth down sweetly, causing
eep to speak.
nd his desire is toward me.
my beloved, let us go forth into the field; let us lodge in
et us get up early to the vineyards; let us see if the vine
ender grape appear, and the pomegranates bud
.
at our gates are all manner of
ruits, new and old, which I have laid up for thee, O my
 wert as my brother, that sucked the breasts of my
 without, I would kiss thee; yea, I
d not be despised.
e, and bring thee into my mother's house, who
 to drink of spiced wine of the
my pomegranate.
d be under my head, and his right hand should
ughters of Jerusalem, that ye stir not up, nor
:5 Who is this that cometh up from the wilderness, leaning upon her
ed thee up under the apple tree: there thy mother
ught thee forth that bare thee.
 me as a seal upon thine heart, as a seal upon thine arm: for
th; jealousy is cruel as the grave: the coals
 a most vehement flame.
 cannot quench love, neither can the floods drown it:
ubstance of his house for love, it would
utterly be contemned.
tle sister, and she hath no breasts: what shall we do
n she shall be spoken for?  8:9 If she be
f silver: and if she be a
nclose her with boards of cedar.
 am a wall, and my breasts like towers: then was I in his eyes
vour.
alhamon; he let out the vineyard unto
pers; every one for the fruit thereof was to bring a thousand
8:12 My vineyard, which is mine, is before me: thou, O Solomon, must
d, and those that keep the fruit thereof two hundred.
the gardens, the companions hearken to thy
 haste, my beloved, and be thou like to a roe or to a young
 of spices.
et Isaiah
e son of Amoz, which he saw concerning
dah and Jerusalem in the days of Uzziah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah,
.
earth: for the LORD hath spoken,
ourished and brought up children, and they have rebelled
knoweth his owner, and the ass his master's crib: but
le doth not consider.
ion, a people laden with iniquity, a seed of
s: they have forsaken the LORD,
 provoked the Holy One of Israel unto anger, they are gone
y should ye be stricken any more? ye will revolt more and more:
ick, and the whole heart faint.
m the sole of the foot even unto the head there is no soundness
and bruises, and putrifying sores: they have not
ther mollified with ointment.
country is desolate, your cities are burned with fire: your
it in your presence, and it is desolate, as
 daughter of Zion is left as a cottage in a vineyard, as a
umbers, as a besieged city.
the LORD of hosts had left unto us a very small remnant, we
om, and we should have been like unto Gomorrah.
e rulers of Sodom; give ear unto the
of our God, ye people of Gomorrah.
 To what purpose is the multitude of your sacrifices unto me?
full of the burnt offerings of rams, and the fat
n the blood of bullocks, or of
of he goats.
r before me, who hath required this at your
o more vain oblations; incense
ination unto me; the new moons and sabbaths, the calling of
ay with; it is iniquity, even the solemn
meeting.
ppointed feasts my soul hateth: they are
a trouble unto me; I am weary to bear them.
nds, I will hide mine eyes from
 when ye make many prayers, I will not hear: your hands are
Wash you, make you clean; put away the evil of your doings from
ease to do evil; 1:17 Learn to do well; seek
 the fatherless, plead for the
1:18 Come now, and let us reason together, saith the LORD: though your
carlet, they shall be as white as snow; though they be red
 be as wool.
obedient, ye shall eat the good of the land:
all be devoured with the sword:
outh of the LORD hath spoken it.
ow is the faithful city become an harlot! it was full of
dged in it; but now murderers.
 silver is become dross, thy wine mixed with water: 1:23 Thy
, and companions of thieves: every one loveth
hey judge not the fatherless,
h the cause of the widow come unto them.

of hosts, the mighty One of
 will ease me of mine adversaries, and avenge me of mine
urn my hand upon thee, and purely purge away
1:26 And I will restore thy
the first, and thy counsellors as at the beginning:
 The city of righteousness, the
city.
judgment, and her converts with
ness.
ransgressors and of the sinners shall
together, and they that forsake the LORD shall be consumed.
e ashamed of the oaks which ye have desired, and
dens that ye have chosen.
hall be as an oak whose leaf fadeth, and as a garden that
d the strong shall be as tow, and the maker of it as a spark,
urn together, and none shall quench them.
z saw concerning Judah and
2:2 And it shall come to pass in the last days, that the mountain of
se shall be established in the top of the mountains, and
 hills; and all nations shall flow unto it.
 Come ye, and let us go up to the
n of the LORD, to the house of the God of Jacob; and he will
and we will walk in his paths: for out of Zion
 of the LORD from Jerusalem.
 shall judge among the nations, and shall rebuke many
heir swords into plowshares, and their
ears into pruninghooks: nation shall not lift up sword against
l they learn war any more.
of Jacob, come ye, and let us walk in the light of the
hast forsaken thy people the house of Jacob,
ast, and are soothsayers like
ines, and they please themselves in the children of
so is full of silver and gold, neither is there any
and is also full of horses, neither is
ere any end of their chariots: 2:8 Their land also is full of idols;
he work of their own hands, that which their own fingers
n man boweth down, and the great man
leth himself: therefore forgive them not.
 in the dust, for fear of the
or the glory of his majesty.
ofty looks of man shall be humbled, and the haughtiness of
 and the LORD alone shall be exalted in that
f hosts shall be upon every one that is
roud and lofty, and upon every one that is lifted up; and he shall be
2:13 And upon all the cedars of Lebanon, that are high
the oaks of Bashan, 2:14 And upon all the
at are lifted up, 2:15 And
h tower, and upon every fenced wall, 2:16 And upon all
pon all pleasant pictures.
 loftiness of man shall be bowed down, and the haughtiness
: and the LORD alone shall be exalted in that
tterly abolish.
into the holes of the rocks, and into the caves
 and for the glory of his majesty,
e ariseth to shake terribly the earth.
2:20 In that day a man shall cast his idols of silver, and his idols
 they made each one for himself to worship, to the moles
o into the clefts of the rocks, and into the
the LORD, and for the glory of
y, when he ariseth to shake terribly the earth.
ath is in his nostrils: for wherein
 to be accounted of ?  3:1 For, behold, the Lord, the LORD of
 from Jerusalem and from Judah the stay and the
 the whole stay of water.
y man, and the man of war, the judge, and the prophet,
ient, 3:3 The captain of fifty, and the
onourable man, and the counsellor, and the cunning artificer, and the
or.
their princes, and babes shall rule
them.
ssed, every one by another, and every
 by his neighbour: the child shall behave himself proudly against
the base against the honourable.
en a man shall take hold of his brother of the house of his
st clothing, be thou our ruler, and let this
y shall he swear, saying, I will
n healer; for in my house is neither bread nor clothing: make
 people.
nd Judah is fallen: because their tongue
and their doings are against the LORD, to provoke the eyes of his
 shew of their countenance doth witness against them; and they
 Sodom, they hide it not. Woe unto their soul! for
mselves.
that it shall be well with him: for they
shall eat the fruit of their doings.
11 Woe unto the wicked! it shall be ill with him: for the reward of
 be given him.
hildren are their oppressors, and women rule
d thee cause thee to err, and
 way of thy paths.
th up to plead, and standeth to judge the people.
udgment with the ancients of his
and the princes thereof: for ye have eaten up the vineyard;
s in your houses.
t ye beat my people to pieces, and grind the
of hosts.
 Because the daughters of Zion are
y, and walk with stretched forth necks and wanton eyes, walking
 go, and making a tinkling with their feet: 3:17
 a scab the crown of the head of the
hters of Zion, and the LORD will discover their secret parts.
e Lord will take away the bravery of their tinkling
 their cauls, and their round tires
the moon, 3:19 The chains, and the bracelets, and the mufflers,
nd the ornaments of the legs, and the headbands,
 3:21 The rings, and nose jewels,
e changeable suits of apparel, and the mantles, and the
ins, 3:23 The glasses, and the fine linen,
d it shall come to pass, that instead of sweet smell there
ead of a girdle a rent; and instead of well
macher a girding of sackcloth;
g instead of beauty.
 fall by the sword, and thy mighty in the war.
d mourn; and she being desolate
 upon the ground.
even women shall take hold of one man, saying, We
our own apparel: only let us be
 thy name, to take away our reproach.
:2 In that day shall the branch of the LORD be beautiful and
t of the earth shall be excellent and comely for

hat is left in Zion, and he
h in Jerusalem, shall be called holy, even every one that
ng in Jerusalem: 4:4 When the Lord shall have
s of Zion, and shall have purged
d of Jerusalem from the midst thereof by the spirit of
of burning.
e upon every dwelling place of mount Zion,
ke by day, and the shining of
ire by night: for upon all the glory shall be a defence.
 tabernacle for a shadow in the day time from
and for a covert from storm and
.
 a song of my beloved touching
rd. My wellbeloved hath a vineyard in a very fruitful hill:
nd gathered out the stones thereof, and planted
t a tower in the midst of it, and
de a winepress therein: and he looked that it should bring
ught forth wild grapes.
inhabitants of Jerusalem, and men of Judah, judge, I
neyard.
ore to my vineyard, that I have not
in it? wherefore, when I looked that it should bring forth
 wild grapes?  5:5 And now go to; I will tell
will take away the hedge thereof,
shall be eaten up; and break down the wall thereof, and it
:6 And I will lay it waste: it shall not be
e up briers and thorns: I will
nd the clouds that they rain no rain upon it.
 hosts is the house of Israel, and
n of Judah his pleasant plant: and he looked for judgment, but
or righteousness, but behold a cry.
 Woe unto them that join house to house, that lay field to field,
place, that they may be placed alone in the midst of
aid the LORD of hosts, Of a truth many
uses shall be desolate, even great and fair, without inhabitant.
res of vineyard shall yield one bath, and the seed of
.
 in the morning, that they may
ong drink; that continue until night, till wine inflame
nd the viol, the tabret, and pipe, and
ne, are in their feasts: but they regard not the work of the LORD,
 the operation of his hands.
fore my people are gone into captivity, because they have no
onourable men are famished, and their multitude
fore hell hath enlarged herself, and opened her mouth
ory, and their multitude, and their pomp,
 it.
ught down, and the mighty man shall
mbled, and the eyes of the lofty shall be humbled: 5:16 But the
 be exalted in judgment, and God that is holy shall

heir manner, and the waste
fat ones shall strangers eat.
unto them that draw iniquity with cords of vanity, and sin as
ope: 5:19 That say, Let him make speed, and
d let the counsel of the Holy
el draw nigh and come, that we may know it!  5:20 Woe unto
, and good evil; that put darkness for light,
er for sweet, and sweet for
 Woe unto them that are wise in their own eyes, and
22 Woe unto them that are mighty to
 wine, and men of strength to mingle strong drink: 5:23 Which
r reward, and take away the righteousness of the
e as the fire devoureth the stubble,
the flame consumeth the chaff, so their root shall be as
som shall go up as dust: because they have
and despised the word of the
Israel.
the LORD kindled against his people,
he hath stretched forth his hand against them, and hath smitten
 did tremble, and their carcases were torn in the
this his anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched
 he will lift up an ensign to the nations from far, and will
e end of the earth: and, behold, they shall come
l be weary nor stumble among them;
hall slumber nor sleep; neither shall the girdle of their loins
latchet of their shoes be broken: 5:28 Whose arrows
ent, their horses' hoofs shall be
 like flint, and their wheels like a whirlwind: 5:29 Their
lion, they shall roar like young lions: yea,
rey, and shall carry it away
ne shall deliver it.
ay they shall roar against them like the roaring of
he land, behold darkness and sorrow,
the light is darkened in the heavens thereof.
ed I saw also the LORD sitting upon
one, high and lifted up, and his train filled the temple.
seraphims: each one had six wings; with twain
e covered his feet, and with
 fly.
nd said, Holy, holy, holy, is the
 hosts: the whole earth is full of his glory.
 at the voice of him that cried,
house was filled with smoke.
aid I, Woe is me! for I am undone; because I am a man of
in the midst of a people of unclean lips:
D of hosts.
raphims unto me, having a live coal in his
from off the altar: 6:7 And he
on my mouth, and said, Lo, this hath touched thy lips; and
away, and thy sin purged.
ard the voice of the Lord, saying, Whom shall I send, and
said I, Here am I; send me.
said, Go, and tell this people, Hear ye indeed, but
ed, but perceive not.
rt of this people fat, and make their ears heavy, and
e with their eyes, and hear with their
rs, and understand with their heart, and convert, and be healed.
, Lord, how long? And he answered, Until the cities be
nd the houses without man, and the land be
 removed men far away, and
at forsaking in the midst of the land.
6:13 But yet in it shall be a tenth, and it shall return, and shall be
teil tree, and as an oak, whose substance is in them, when
so the holy seed shall be the substance
hereof.
days of Ahaz the son of Jotham, the son
f Uzziah, king of Judah, that Rezin the king of Syria, and Pekah the
h, king of Israel, went up toward Jerusalem to war
l against it.
ouse of David, saying, Syria is confederate
and the heart of his people, as
 of the wood are moved with the wind.
:3 Then said the LORD unto Isaiah, Go forth now to meet Ahaz, thou,
 thy son, at the end of the conduit of the upper pool
s field; 7:4 And say unto him, Take heed,
earted for the two tails of
 firebrands, for the fierce anger of Rezin with Syria,

 of Remaliah, have taken evil
inst thee, saying, 7:6 Let us go up against Judah, and vex
each therein for us, and set a king in the
 Thus saith the Lord GOD, It
and, neither shall it come to pass.
 For the head of Syria is Damascus, and the head of Damascus is
hreescore and five years shall Ephraim be broken,
nd the head of Ephraim is Samaria, and the head of Samaria is
 will not believe, surely ye shall not be
ake again unto Ahaz, saying, 7:11 Ask thee a
r in the depth, or in the height

her will I tempt the LORD.
said, Hear ye now, O house of David; Is it a small thing
will ye weary my God also?  7:14 Therefore
Behold, a virgin shall
 a son, and shall call his name Immanuel.
t he may know to refuse the
ose the good.
 shall know to refuse the evil, and choose
hall be forsaken of both her
17 The LORD shall bring upon thee, and upon thy people, and upon thy
, days that have not come, from the day that Ephraim
king of Assyria.
 to pass in that day, that the LORD shall hiss
 part of the rivers of Egypt, and
 bee that is in the land of Assyria.
19 And they shall come, and shall rest all of them in the desolate
the holes of the rocks, and upon all thorns, and upon
me day shall the Lord shave with a razor that is hired,
river, by the king of Assyria, the head,
and the hair of the feet: and it shall also consume the beard.
come to pass in that day, that a man shall nourish a
 And it shall come to pass, for the
ance of milk that they shall give he shall eat butter: for butter
very one eat that is left in the land.
7:23 And it shall come to pass in that day, that every place shall be,
were a thousand vines at a thousand silverlings, it shall
orns.
all men come thither; because all the
d shall become briers and thorns.
And on all hills that shall be digged with the mattock, there
r the fear of briers and thorns: but it shall be
 for the treading of lesser cattle.
 Moreover the LORD said unto me, Take thee a great roll, and write
's pen concerning Mahershalalhashbaz.
:2 And I took unto me faithful witnesses to record, Uriah the priest,
 the son of Jeberechiah.
 unto the prophetess; and she conceived, and bare a son.
, Call his name Mahershalalhashbaz.
 For before the child shall have knowledge to cry, My father, and
ches of Damascus and the spoil of Samaria shall be
syria.
again, saying, 8:6 Forasmuch as this
le refuseth the waters of Shiloah that go softly, and rejoice in
's son; 8:7 Now therefore, behold, the Lord bringeth
 river, strong and many, even the king
 Assyria, and all his glory: and he shall come up over all his
r all his banks: 8:8 And he shall pass through
, he shall reach even to the neck;
e stretching out of his wings shall fill the breadth of thy
9 Associate yourselves, O ye people, and ye shall be broken in
, all ye of far countries: gird yourselves, and ye
yourselves, and ye shall be broken in
ces.
 shall come to nought; speak the
d it shall not stand: for God is with us.
 a strong hand, and instructed
should not walk in the way of this people, saying, 8:12 Say
to all them to whom this people shall say, A
r, nor be afraid.
D of hosts himself; and let him be your fear, and
d he shall be for a sanctuary; but for a stone of stumbling and
ce to both the houses of Israel, for a gin and for
rusalem.
 stumble, and fall, and be broken, and
 snared, and be taken.
 testimony, seal the law among my disciples.
that hideth his face from the
cob, and I will look for him.
ld, I and the children whom the LORD hath given me are for
 Israel from the LORD of hosts, which dwelleth
 shall say unto you, Seek unto them that have
at peep, and that mutter: should
ople seek unto their God? for the living to the dead?  8:20 To
estimony: if they speak not according to this
 in them.
ugh it, hardly bestead and hungry: and it
be hungry, they shall fret
d curse their king and their God, and look upward.
the earth; and behold trouble and
s, dimness of anguish; and they shall be driven to darkness.
 dimness shall not be such as was in her vexation,
licted the land of Zebulun and the
f Naphtali, and afterward did more grievously afflict her by the
yond Jordan, in Galilee of the nations.

ve seen a great light: they
 the land of the shadow of death, upon them hath the
 multiplied the nation, and not increased the joy: they
o the joy in harvest, and as men rejoice
when they divide the spoil.
u hast broken the yoke of his burden, and the staff of his
 oppressor, as in the day of Midian.
5 For every battle of the warrior is with confused noise, and
ood; but this shall be with burning and fuel of
 born, unto us a son is given: and the
vernment shall be upon his shoulder: and his name shall be called
llor, The mighty God, The everlasting Father, The
crease of his government and peace there shall be no end,
 and upon his kingdom, to order it, and to
ice from henceforth even for
al of the LORD of hosts will perform this.
nd it hath lighted upon Israel.
 all the people shall know, even Ephraim and the inhabitant of
 the pride and stoutness of heart, 9:10 The bricks
ld with hewn stones: the sycomores are
t down, but we will change them into cedars.
 the adversaries of Rezin against
d join his enemies together; 9:12 The Syrians before, and the
nd they shall devour Israel with open mouth. For
way, but his hand is stretched out

im that smiteth them, neither do
k the LORD of hosts.
 LORD will cut off from Israel head and tail, branch
The ancient and honourable, he is the head; and the prophet that
is the tail.
is people cause them to err; and they that
herefore the LORD shall have no joy in their young men, neither
 their fatherless and widows: for every one is an
ery mouth speaketh folly. For all
s anger is not turned away, but his hand is stretched out
ness burneth as the fire: it shall devour the briers
n the thickets of the forest, and they
all mount up like the lifting up of smoke.
hosts is the land darkened, and
e shall be as the fuel of the fire: no man shall spare his
shall snatch on the right hand, and be hungry; and he
nd they shall not be satisfied: they
l eat every man the flesh of his own arm: 9:21 Manasseh, Ephraim;
sseh: and they together shall be against Judah. For
d away, but his hand is stretched out
ll.
ghteous decrees, and that write
ess which they have prescribed; 10:2 To turn aside the needy
take away the right from the poor of my people,
that they may rob the fatherless!
d what will ye do in the day of visitation, and in the
from far? to whom will ye flee for help?
and where will ye leave your glory?  10:4 Without me they shall bow
prisoners, and they shall fall under the slain. For all
d away, but his hand is stretched out
ll.
ger, and the staff in their hand is
indignation.
st an hypocritical nation, and against the
rge, to take the spoil, and to
rey, and to tread them down like the mire of the streets.
 not so, neither doth his heart think so; but
 off nations not a few.
th, Are not my princes altogether kings?  10:9 Is not
amath as Arpad? is not Samaria as
s?  10:10 As my hand hath found the kingdoms of the idols, and
did excel them of Jerusalem and of Samaria; 10:11
Samaria and her idols, so do to
 and her idols?  10:12 Wherefore it shall come to pass, that
formed his whole work upon mount Zion and on
the stout heart of the king of
nd the glory of his high looks.
or he saith, By the strength of my hand I have done it, and by
prudent: and I have removed the bounds of the
es, and I have put down the
ike a valiant man: 10:14 And my hand hath found as a nest
 and as one gathereth eggs that are left,
was none that moved the wing,
he mouth, or peeped.
e boast itself against him that heweth therewith? or
gainst him that shaketh it? as if the
 should shake itself against them that lift it up, or as if the
p itself, as if it were no wood.
Therefore shall the Lord, the Lord of hosts, send among his fat
under his glory he shall kindle a burning like the
the light of Israel shall be for a fire, and his Holy One
 burn and devour his thorns and his briers in
glory of his forest, and of his
field, both soul and body: and they shall be as when a

rest shall be few, that a
 them.
in that day, that the remnant of
and such as are escaped of the house of Jacob, shall no more
at smote them; but shall stay upon the LORD, the
0:21 The remnant shall return, even the remnant of Jacob, unto the
0:22 For though thy people Israel be as the sand of the sea, yet a
shall return: the consumption decreed shall overflow
or the Lord GOD of hosts shall make a consumption, even
 all the land.
th the Lord GOD of hosts, O my people that
ssyrian: he shall smite thee
and shall lift up his staff against thee, after the manner
et a very little while, and the indignation shall cease,
struction.
shall stir up a scourge for him according
 Oreb: and as his rod was
o shall he lift it up after the manner of Egypt.
in that day, that his burden shall be
en away from off thy shoulder, and his yoke from off thy neck, and
e destroyed because of the anointing.
0:28 He is come to Aiath, he is passed to Migron; at Michmash he hath
arriages: 10:29 They are gone over the passage: they have
 Geba; Ramah is afraid; Gibeah of Saul is
ter of Gallim: cause it to be heard
Laish, O poor Anathoth.
is removed; the inhabitants of Gebim gather themselves
ll he remain at Nob that day: he shall shake his hand
hter of Zion, the hill of Jerusalem.
:33 Behold, the Lord, the LORD of hosts, shall lop the bough with
igh ones of stature shall be hewn down, and the
And he shall cut down the thickets of the forest with iron, and
by a mighty one.
ome forth a rod out of the stem of Jesse, and a
 11:2 And the spirit of the LORD
st upon him, the spirit of wisdom and understanding, the
t, the spirit of knowledge and of the fear
quick understanding in the
RD: and he shall not judge after the sight of his eyes,
earing of his ears: 11:4 But with
usness shall he judge the poor, and reprove with equity for the
and he shall smite the earth: with the rod of his
 lips shall he slay the wicked.
d righteousness shall be the girdle of his loins, and
s reins.
 with the lamb, and the leopard shall
 down with the kid; and the calf and the young lion and the fatling
 little child shall lead them.
 the cow and the bear shall feed; their young ones shall lie
 lion shall eat straw like the ox.
 And the sucking child shall play on the hole of the asp, and the
l put his hand on the cockatrice' den.
11:9 They shall not hurt nor destroy in all my holy mountain: for the
e full of the knowledge of the LORD, as the waters cover
hat day there shall be a root of Jesse, which shall
le; to it shall the Gentiles seek: and
s rest shall be glorious.
shall come to pass in that day, that the Lord shall set
ime to recover the remnant of his people,
om Egypt, and from Pathros,
, and from Elam, and from Shinar, and from Hamath, and

r the nations, and shall
casts of Israel, and gather together the dispersed of
f the earth.
raim shall depart, and the adversaries of
 envy Judah, and Judah shall
aim.
shoulders of the Philistines toward
est; they shall spoil them of the east together: they shall lay
m and Moab; and the children of Ammon shall obey
utterly destroy the tongue of the Egyptian
hake his hand over the river,
mite it in the seven streams, and make men go over dryshod.
 be an highway for the remnant of his people,
ke as it was to Israel in the day
 came up out of the land of Egypt.
 And in that day thou shalt say, O LORD, I will praise thee:
 with me, thine anger is turned away, and thou
is my salvation; I will trust, and not be afraid: for
th and my song; he also is become my
ation.
 draw water out of the wells of
.
aise the LORD, call upon his
e his doings among the people, make mention that his name
unto the LORD; for he hath done excellent things: this is

of Zion: for great is the Holy
ael in the midst of thee.
en of Babylon, which Isaiah the son of Amoz did see.
n the high mountain, exalt the voice unto
to the gates of the nobles.
 commanded my sanctified ones, I have also called my mighty
en them that rejoice in my highness.
:4 The noise of a multitude in the mountains, like as of a great
us noise of the kingdoms of nations gathered
the host of the battle.
from a far country, from the end of heaven, even the
ndignation, to destroy the whole land.
13:6 Howl ye; for the day of the LORD is at hand; it shall come as a
om the Almighty.
ll hands be faint, and every man's heart shall
 pangs and sorrows shall take hold
m; they shall be in pain as a woman that travaileth: they shall
other; their faces shall be as flames.
13:9 Behold, the day of the LORD cometh, cruel both with wrath and
 lay the land desolate: and he shall destroy the
0 For the stars of heaven and the constellations thereof shall not
: the sun shall be darkened in his going forth, and
ght to shine.
he world for their evil, and the wicked for
rogancy of the proud to cease,
ay low the haughtiness of the terrible.

n fine gold; even a man than
edge of Ophir.
hake the heavens, and the earth shall remove
LORD of hosts, and in the day of
ce anger.
chased roe, and as a sheep that no man
keth up: they shall every man turn to his own people, and flee every
wn land.
shall be thrust through; and every one
at is joined unto them shall fall by the sword.
e dashed to pieces before their eyes;
ir houses shall be spoiled, and their wives ravished.
p the Medes against them, which shall not
l not delight in it.
lso shall dash the young men to pieces; and they
 the womb; their eyes shall not
ldren.
kingdoms, the beauty of the Chaldees'
ellency, shall be as when God overthrew Sodom and Gomorrah.
be inhabited, neither shall it be dwelt in from
hall the Arabian pitch tent there;
r shall the shepherds make their fold there.
shall lie there; and their houses
e full of doleful creatures; and owls shall dwell there, and
re.
lands shall cry in their desolate
 and dragons in their pleasant palaces: and her time is near to
shall not be prolonged.
RD will have mercy on Jacob, and will yet choose
land: and the strangers shall be
ith them, and they shall cleave to the house of Jacob.
take them, and bring them to their place:
m in the land of the LORD for
d handmaids: and they shall take them captives, whose
shall rule over their oppressors.
And it shall come to pass in the day that the LORD shall give
rrow, and from thy fear, and from the hard
 14:4 That thou shalt take up
b against the king of Babylon, and say, How hath the
ity ceased!  14:5 The LORD hath broken
e staff of the wicked, and the sceptre of the rulers.
e in wrath with a continual stroke, he that
ed, and none hindereth.
earth is at rest, and is quiet: they break forth into
 trees rejoice at thee, and the cedars of Lebanon,
, no feller is come up against us.
 Hell from beneath is moved for thee to meet thee at thy coming:
 dead for thee, even all the chief ones of the
thrones all the kings of the
14:10 All they shall speak and say unto thee, Art thou also become
thou become like unto us?  14:11 Thy pomp is brought
se of thy viols: the worm is spread
 thee, and the worms cover thee.
How art thou fallen from heaven, O Lucifer, son of the morning!
wn to the ground, which didst weaken the nations!
 heart, I will ascend into heaven, I
 exalt my throne above the stars of God: I will sit also upon the
regation, in the sides of the north: 14:14 I will
louds; I will be like the most High.
:15 Yet thou shalt be brought down to hell, to the sides of the pit.
hat see thee shall narrowly look upon thee, and consider
man that made the earth to tremble, that did
rld as a wilderness, and
ties thereof; that opened not the house of his
he nations, even all of them, lie
y, every one in his own house.
t thou art cast out of thy grave like an abominable branch,
hose that are slain, thrust through with a
 pit; as a carcase trodden

in burial, because thou hast
y land, and slain thy people: the seed of evildoers shall
21 Prepare slaughter for his children for the iniquity of their
do not rise, nor possess the land, nor fill the
4:22 For I will rise up against them, saith the LORD of hosts, and
ylon the name, and remnant, and son, and nephew, saith
so make it a possession for the bittern, and pools of
th the besom of destruction, saith the
RD of hosts.
th sworn, saying, Surely as I have thought,
 purposed, so shall it stand:
I will break the Assyrian in my land, and upon my mountains
hen shall his yoke depart from off them, and
ders.
 purposed upon the whole earth: and
is the hand that is stretched out upon all the nations.
ts hath purposed, and who shall disannul it?
 shall turn it back?  14:28 In
hat king Ahaz died was this burden.
29 Rejoice not thou, whole Palestina, because the rod of him that
ken: for out of the serpent's root shall come forth a
ll be a fiery flying serpent.
 the firstborn of the poor shall feed, and the needy shall
I will kill thy root with famine, and he shall
ate; cry, O city; thou, whole Palestina, art dissolved:
he north a smoke, and none shall be alone
ll one then answer the messengers of the nation? That
nd the poor of his people shall trust in
it.
 the night Ar of Moab is laid
brought to silence; because in the night Kir of Moab is
silence; 15:2 He is gone up to Bajith, and
 shall howl over Nebo, and
n all their heads shall be baldness, and every beard cut
ets they shall gird themselves with sackcloth: on
their streets, every one shall howl,
ing abundantly.
cry, and Elealeh: their voice shall be heard
oldiers of Moab shall cry out;
hall be grievous unto him.
t shall cry out for Moab; his fugitives shall flee unto
ars old: for by the mounting up of Luhith
the way of Horonaim they
 cry of destruction.
s of Nimrim shall be desolate: for the hay is
re is no green thing.
e abundance they have gotten, and that which they
ay to the brook of the willows.
r the cry is gone round about the borders of Moab; the howling
 and the howling thereof unto Beerelim.

l of blood: for I will bring
mon, lions upon him that escapeth of Moab, and upon the
1 Send ye the lamb to the ruler of the land from Sela to the
ount of the daughter of Zion.
it shall be, that, as a wandering bird cast out of the nest,
ab shall be at the fords of Arnon.
 Take counsel, execute judgment; make thy shadow as the night in
oonday; hide the outcasts; bewray not him that
 dwell with thee, Moab; be thou a covert to them
the extortioner is at an end, the
 ceaseth, the oppressors are consumed out of the land.
e throne be established: and he shall sit
id, judging, and seeking
sting righteousness.
 of the pride of Moab; he is very proud: even of his
d his wrath: but his lies shall not be
.
ab, every one shall howl: for the
ions of Kirhareseth shall ye mourn; surely they are stricken.
 of Heshbon languish, and the vine of Sibmah: the
down the principal plants thereof,
re come even unto Jazer, they wandered through the wilderness:
etched out, they are gone over the sea.

ping of Jazer the vine of
water thee with my tears, O Heshbon, and Elealeh: for
ruits and for thy harvest is fallen.
:10 And gladness is taken away, and joy out of the plentiful field;
yards there shall be no singing, neither shall there be
l tread out no wine in their presses; I
ave made their vintage shouting to cease.
ike an harp for Moab, and mine
ts for Kirharesh.
me to pass, when it is seen that Moab is weary on
e to his sanctuary to pray; but he
not prevail.
t the LORD hath spoken concerning Moab since
ath spoken, saying, Within three years, as the
of Moab shall be contemned, with
 great multitude; and the remnant shall be very small and
n of Damascus. Behold, Damascus is taken away from being
ruinous heap.
are forsaken: they shall be for flocks, which
hem afraid.
l cease from Ephraim, and the kingdom from
 shall be as the glory of the
 Israel, saith the LORD of hosts.
And in that day it shall come to pass, that the glory of Jacob
and the fatness of his flesh shall wax lean.
vestman gathereth the corn, and
he ears with his arm; and it shall be as he that gathereth
phaim.
e left in it, as the shaking of an
tree, two or three berries in the top of the uppermost bough,
utmost fruitful branches thereof, saith the LORD
 shall a man look to his Maker, and his eyes shall
Israel.
he altars, the work of his hands,
 shall respect that which his fingers have made, either the

s be as a forsaken bough, and
t branch, which they left because of the children of
olation.
ten the God of thy salvation, and hast
t been mindful of the rock of thy strength, therefore shalt thou
nts, and shalt set it with strange slips: 17:11 In
t to grow, and in the morning shalt
make thy seed to flourish: but the harvest shall be a heap in the
of desperate sorrow.
ultitude of many people, which make a noise like the
rushing of nations, that make a rushing
ike the rushing of mighty waters!  17:13 The nations shall rush like
 many waters: but God shall rebuke them, and they shall
chased as the chaff of the mountains before
re the whirlwind.
veningtide trouble; and before the morning he is
m that spoil us, and the lot of them that
 with wings, which is beyond the rivers
f Ethiopia: 18:2 That sendeth ambassadors by the sea, even in vessels
upon the waters, saying, Go, ye swift messengers, to a
 to a people terrible from their beginning
 down, whose land the rivers
!  18:3 All ye inhabitants of the world, and dwellers on
 lifteth up an ensign on the mountains; and
18:4 For so the LORD said unto me, I will take my rest, and I will
welling place like a clear heat upon herbs, and like a
harvest.
en the bud is perfect, and the sour
 is ripening in the flower, he shall both cut off the sprigs with
d take away and cut down the branches.
18:6 They shall be left together unto the fowls of the mountains, and
 of the earth: and the fowls shall summer upon them, and
h shall winter upon them.
time shall the present be brought unto the LORD of hosts
peeled, and from a people terrible from
heir beginning hitherto; a nation meted out and trodden under foot,
rivers have spoiled, to the place of the name of the

LORD rideth upon a swift cloud,
 come into Egypt: and the idols of Egypt shall be moved at
art of Egypt shall melt in the midst of it.
inst the Egyptians: and they
every one against his brother, and every one against his
ty, and kingdom against kingdom.
nd the spirit of Egypt shall fail in the midst thereof; and I
sel thereof: and they shall seek to the idols,
t have familiar spirits, and to
ds.
over into the hand of a cruel lord;
 fierce king shall rule over them, saith the Lord, the LORD of
he waters shall fail from the sea, and the river shall be
9:6 And they shall turn the rivers far away; and the brooks of
tied and dried up: the reeds and flags shall
 brooks, by the mouth of the brooks, and
every thing sown by the brooks, shall wither, be driven away, and be
:8 The fishers also shall mourn, and all they that cast angle into
 lament, and they that spread nets upon the waters
 they that work in fine flax, and they that weave

poses thereof, all that make
ponds for fish.
s of Zoan are fools, the counsel of the wise
sh: how say ye unto Pharaoh, I
 of the wise, the son of ancient kings?  19:12 Where are
en? and let them tell thee now, and let them
sed upon Egypt.
an are become fools, the princes of Noph are
, even they that are the stay of
es thereof.
 a perverse spirit in the midst thereof:
and they have caused Egypt to err in every work thereof, as a drunken
h in his vomit.
re be any work for Egypt, which the head or
In that day shall Egypt be like unto women: and it shall be
 of the shaking of the hand of the LORD of
7 And the land of Judah shall be a terror unto Egypt, every one
 thereof shall be afraid in himself, because of the
hich he hath determined against it.
18 In that day shall five cities in the land of Egypt speak the
 and swear to the LORD of hosts; one shall be
9:19 In that day shall there be an altar to the LORD in the midst of
ypt, and a pillar at the border thereof to the LORD.
sign and for a witness unto the LORD of
osts in the land of Egypt: for they shall cry unto the LORD because
rs, and he shall send them a saviour, and a great one,

pt, and the Egyptians shall
 in that day, and shall do sacrifice and oblation; yea,
he LORD, and perform it.
LORD shall smite Egypt: he shall smite and heal it: and
he LORD, and he shall be intreated of them,
ay shall there be a highway out of Egypt to Assyria,
to Egypt, and the Egyptian into Assyria,
and the Egyptians shall serve with the Assyrians.
be the third with Egypt and with
 even a blessing in the midst of the land: 19:25 Whom the LORD
, saying, Blessed be Egypt my people, and Assyria
mine inheritance.
 Tartan came unto Ashdod, (when Sargon the king
ainst Ashdod, and took it; 20:2 At
me time spake the LORD by Isaiah the son of Amoz, saying, Go and
h from off thy loins, and put off thy shoe from thy
ked and barefoot.
d, Like as my servant Isaiah hath walked naked
and wonder upon Egypt and upon
20:4 So shall the king of Assyria lead away the Egyptians
ians captives, young and old, naked and
arefoot, even with their buttocks uncovered, to the shame of Egypt.
 shall be afraid and ashamed of Ethiopia their
y.
 shall say in that day, Behold,
ur expectation, whither we flee for help to be delivered from
and how shall we escape?  21:1 The burden of the
n the south pass through; so it
om the desert, from a terrible land.
:2 A grievous vision is declared unto me; the treacherous dealer
sly, and the spoiler spoileth. Go up, O Elam:
reof have I made to cease.
re are my loins filled with pain: pangs have taken hold
woman that travaileth: I was bowed down at
 seeing of it.
arfulness affrighted me: the night of my
pleasure hath he turned into fear unto me.
atchtower, eat, drink: arise, ye
 and anoint the shield.
ath the LORD said unto me, Go, set a watchman, let him
:7 And he saw a chariot with a couple of horsemen, a chariot of
t of camels; and he hearkened diligently with much
 My lord, I stand continually upon the
tchtower in the daytime, and I am set in my ward whole nights: 21:9
re cometh a chariot of men, with a couple of horsemen.
Babylon is fallen, is fallen; and all the
unto the ground.
and the corn of my floor: that which I have
Israel, have I declared unto
1 The burden of Dumah. He calleth to me out of Seir, Watchman,
atchman, what of the night?  21:12 The watchman
the night: if ye will enquire,
: return, come.
rabia. In the forest in Arabia shall ye lodge,
.
Tema brought water to him that
y, they prevented with their bread him that fled.
ords, from the drawn sword, and from
bent bow, and from the grievousness of war.
o me, Within a year, according to
rs of an hireling, and all the glory of Kedar shall fail: 21:17
the number of archers, the mighty men of the
: for the LORD God of Israel
it.
sion. What aileth thee now, that
 wholly gone up to the housetops?  22:2 Thou that art full of
ity, joyous city: thy slain men are not slain

hey are bound by the archers:
e found in thee are bound together, which have fled from
d I, Look away from me; I will weep bitterly, labour
the spoiling of the daughter of my
.
of treading down, and of
e Lord GOD of hosts in the valley of vision, breaking
 to the mountains.
he quiver with chariots of men and horsemen, and
And it shall come to pass, that thy choicest valleys shall be
 the horsemen shall set themselves in array at
the covering of Judah, and thou didst look in
f the forest.
e breaches of the city of David, that they
aters of the lower pool.
ave numbered the houses of Jerusalem, and the houses
 the wall.
etween the two walls for the water of the
 maker thereof, neither had
him that fashioned it long ago.
nd in that day did the Lord GOD of hosts call to weeping, and
aldness, and to girding with sackcloth: 22:13 And
oxen, and killing sheep, eating
d drinking wine: let us eat and drink; for to morrow we shall
was revealed in mine ears by the LORD of hosts, Surely
urged from you till ye die, saith the Lord
rd GOD of hosts, Go, get thee unto this
reasurer, even unto Shebna, which is over the house, and say, 22:16
here? and whom hast thou here, that thou hast hewed
e that heweth him out a sepulchre on
, and that graveth an habitation for himself in a rock?  22:17
l carry thee away with a mighty captivity, and
will surely violently turn and toss thee like a ball into a
alt thou die, and there the chariots of thy
house.
 thy station, and from thy state shall
 pull thee down.
e to pass in that day, that I will call my
1 And I will clothe him with
d strengthen him with thy girdle, and I will commit thy
nd he shall be a father to the inhabitants

d will I lay upon his shoulder;
ll open, and none shall shut; and he shall shut, and none
I will fasten him as a nail in a sure place; and he shall be
to his father's house.
hall hang upon him all the glory of his father's
, all vessels of small quantity,
 vessels of cups, even to all the vessels of flagons.
e LORD of hosts, shall the nail that is
astened in the sure place be removed, and be cut down, and fall; and
t was upon it shall be cut off: for the LORD hath spoken
Tyre. Howl, ye ships of Tarshish; for it is laid
no entering in: from the land of
it is revealed to them.
ye inhabitants of the isle; thou whom the merchants of
a, have replenished.
waters the seed of Sihor, the harvest of the river,
rt of nations.
Zidon: for the sea hath spoken, even the
strength of the sea, saying, I travail not, nor bring forth children,
nourish up young men, nor bring up virgins.
t, so shall they be sorely pained
report of Tyre.
rshish; howl, ye inhabitants of the isle.
tiquity is of ancient days? her
shall carry her afar off to sojourn.
:8 Who hath taken this counsel against Tyre, the crowning city,
 princes, whose traffickers are the honourable of
s hath purposed it, to stain the
 all glory, and to bring into contempt all the honourable of
ss through thy land as a river, O daughter of Tarshish: there

e sea, he shook the kingdoms:
th given a commandment against the merchant city, to
of.
re rejoice, O thou oppressed
hter of Zidon: arise, pass over to Chittim; there also
23:13 Behold the land of the Chaldeans; this people was not, till the
ded it for them that dwell in the wilderness: they set up
raised up the palaces thereof; and he brought
f Tarshish: for your strength is laid waste.
hat day, that Tyre shall be
enty years, according to the days of one king: after the
 Tyre sing as an harlot.
harp, go about the city, thou harlot that hast been
ing many songs, that thou mayest be
bered.
after the end of seventy years, that
LORD will visit Tyre, and she shall turn to her hire, and shall
with all the kingdoms of the world upon the face of
chandise and her hire shall be holiness to the LORD:
laid up; for her merchandise shall be
 them that dwell before the LORD, to eat sufficiently, and for

pty, and maketh it waste, and
upside down, and scattereth abroad the inhabitants thereof.
 as with the people, so with the priest; as with
s with the maid, so with her
 with the buyer, so with the seller; as with the lender,
ith the taker of usury, so with the giver of
e utterly emptied, and utterly spoiled: for the
 The earth mourneth and fadeth away, the world languisheth and
ghty people of the earth do languish.
4:5 The earth also is defiled under the inhabitants thereof; because
sgressed the laws, changed the ordinance, broken the
Therefore hath the curse devoured the earth, and they that dwell
te: therefore the inhabitants of the earth are
e new wine mourneth, the vine languisheth, all the merryhearted
e mirth of tabrets ceaseth, the noise of them that rejoice
arp ceaseth.
wine with a song; strong drink shall be
itter to them that drink it.
city of confusion is broken down: every house is shut up,

 streets; all joy is darkened,
of the land is gone.
is left desolation, and the gate is smitten with
 shall be in the midst of the land among the people,
of an olive tree, and as the gleaning
pes when the vintage is done.
y shall lift up their voice, they shall sing for the majesty
l cry aloud from the sea.
re glorify ye the LORD in the fires, even the name of the
 isles of the sea.
most part of the earth have we heard songs, even
, My leanness, my leanness, woe unto
the treacherous dealers have dealt treacherously; yea, the
 dealt very treacherously.
and the pit, and the snare, are upon thee, O inhabitant of
it shall come to pass, that he who fleeth from the noise of
o the pit; and he that cometh up out of the
snare: for the windows from on
pen, and the foundations of the earth do shake.
 down, the earth is clean dissolved,
earth is moved exceedingly.
arth shall reel to and fro like a drunkard, and shall be
d the transgression thereof shall be heavy
 again.
 in that day, that the LORD shall
the host of the high ones that are on high, and the kings of
th.
gether, as prisoners are gathered
pit, and shall be shut up in the prison, and after many days

d, and the sun ashamed, when the
hosts shall reign in mount Zion, and in Jerusalem, and before
ly.
l exalt thee, I will praise thy
 thou hast done wonderful things; thy counsels of old are

p; of a defenced city a ruin:
 strangers to be no city; it shall never be built.
g people glorify thee, the city of the
rrible nations shall fear thee.
r thou hast been a strength to the poor, a strength to the
 refuge from the storm, a shadow from the
 is as a storm against the
Thou shalt bring down the noise of strangers, as the heat in a
heat with the shadow of a cloud: the branch of the
ow.
 LORD of hosts make unto all people
st of fat things, a feast of wines on the lees, of fat things
nes on the lees well refined.
he will destroy in this mountain the face of the covering
 the vail that is spread over all nations.
ry; and the Lord GOD will wipe
 from off all faces; and the rebuke of his people shall he
he earth: for the LORD hath spoken it.
25:9 And it shall be said in that day, Lo, this is our God; we have
 and he will save us: this is the LORD; we have waited
 rejoice in his salvation.
 this mountain shall the hand of the LORD rest, and Moab
r him, even as straw is trodden down for the
 forth his hands in the midst of them, as he
s to swim: and he shall bring
pride together with the spoils of their hands.
 fort of thy walls shall he bring
ay low, and bring to the ground, even to the dust.
ng be sung in the land of Judah; We have
a strong city; salvation will God appoint for walls and bulwarks.
e gates, that the righteous nation which keepeth the
ou wilt keep him in perfect peace, whose mind is stayed on
h in thee.
r ever: for in the LORD JEHOVAH is
sting strength: 26:5 For he bringeth down them that dwell on
he layeth it low; he layeth it low, even to the
dust.
, even the feet of the poor, and the
s of the needy.
t is uprightness: thou, most upright, dost
 in the way of thy judgments, O LORD, have we waited for
ul is to thy name, and to the remembrance of
red thee in the night; yea, with my
t within me will I seek thee early: for when thy judgments are in
habitants of the world will learn righteousness.
e wicked, yet will he not learn
ness: in the land of uprightness will he deal unjustly, and
esty of the LORD.
hand is lifted up, they will not see: but they
envy at the people; yea, the fire
e enemies shall devour them.
, thou wilt ordain peace for us: for thou also hast wrought

thee have had dominion over
ee only will we make mention of thy name.
e; they are deceased, they
: therefore hast thou visited and destroyed them, and
sh.
n, O LORD, thou hast increased the
: thou art glorified: thou hadst removed it far unto all the
26:16 LORD, in trouble have they visited thee, they poured out a
astening was upon them.
 woman with child, that draweth near the time of her
th out in her pangs; so have we been in
hy sight, O LORD.
th child, we have been in pain, we have as it
wrought any deliverance in the
ther have the inhabitants of the world fallen.
ether with my dead body shall they
 Awake and sing, ye that dwell in dust: for thy dew is as the
 earth shall cast out the dead.
ome, my people, enter thou into thy chambers, and shut thy
hyself as it were for a little moment, until
For, behold, the LORD cometh out of his place to punish the
h for their iniquity: the earth also shall
ver her slain.
D with his sore and great and strong sword
ent, even leviathan that
 and he shall slay the dragon that is in the sea.
er, A vineyard of red wine.
LORD do keep it; I will water it every moment: lest any
ht and day.
 would set the briers and thorns against me
ould burn them together.
m take hold of my strength, that he may make peace with
 with me.
 come of Jacob to take root: Israel shall
 world with fruit.
 him, as he smote those that smote him? or is he
f them that are slain by him?  27:8
asure, when it shooteth forth, thou wilt debate with it: he
in the day of the east wind.
is therefore shall the iniquity of Jacob be purged; and this
ke away his sin; when he maketh all the stones
 beaten in sunder, the groves and
shall not stand up.
ced city shall be desolate, and the habitation
: there shall the calf feed, and
all he lie down, and consume the branches thereof.
are withered, they shall be broken off:
he women come, and set them on fire: for it is a people of no
ore he that made them will not have mercy on
w them no favour.
me to pass in that day, that the LORD shall beat
unto the stream of Egypt, and ye
 gathered one by one, O ye children of Israel.
 that day, that the great trumpet
e blown, and they shall come which were ready to perish in the
 the outcasts in the land of Egypt, and shall
 Jerusalem.
ide, to the drunkards of Ephraim, whose
lorious beauty is a fading flower, which are on the head of the fat
 that are overcome with wine!  28:2 Behold, the Lord
which as a tempest of hail and a
ng storm, as a flood of mighty waters overflowing, shall cast
h the hand.
e drunkards of Ephraim, shall be trodden
under feet: 28:4 And the glorious beauty, which is on the head of the
hall be a fading flower, and as the hasty fruit before
at looketh upon it seeth, while it is yet
hat day shall the LORD of hosts be for a crown of glory, and
, unto the residue of his people, 28:6 And for a
teth in judgment, and for strength
m that turn the battle to the gate.
7 But they also have erred through wine, and through strong drink
y; the priest and the prophet have erred through
p of wine, they are out of the way
h strong drink; they err in vision, they stumble in judgment.
 are full of vomit and filthiness, so that there is
all he teach knowledge? and whom shall he make to
e weaned from the milk, and drawn
e breasts.
on precept, precept upon precept; line
on line, line upon line; here a little, and there a little: 28:11
ng lips and another tongue will he speak to this
This is the rest wherewith ye may cause the
ng: yet they would not hear.
the word of the LORD was unto them precept upon precept,
 upon line, line upon line; here a little,
and fall backward, and be
red, and taken.
e word of the LORD, ye scornful men, that rule

 a covenant with death, and
 we at agreement; when the overflowing scourge shall pass
e unto us: for we have made lies our refuge,
ves: 28:16 Therefore thus saith
GOD, Behold, I lay in Zion for a foundation a stone, a tried
er stone, a sure foundation: he that believeth
ent also will I lay to the line, and righteousness to the
ll sweep away the refuge of lies, and the

 be disannulled, and your
hell shall not stand; when the overflowing scourge
l be trodden down by it.
 time that it goeth forth it shall take you: for morning
ver, by day and by night: and it shall be a

 a man can stretch himself on
 covering narrower than that he can wrap himself in it.
rise up as in mount Perazim, he shall be
wroth as in the valley of Gibeon, that he may do his work, his strange
ing to pass his act, his strange act.
8:22 Now therefore be ye not mockers, lest your bands be made strong:
ard from the Lord GOD of hosts a consumption, even

hearken, and hear my speech.
 the plowman plow all day to sow? doth he open and break the
28:25 When he hath made plain the face thereof,
, and scatter the cummin, and cast
 principal wheat and the appointed barley and the rie in their
s God doth instruct him to discretion, and doth
 are not threshed with a threshing instrument,
 upon the cummin; but the fitches
ten out with a staff, and the cummin with a rod.
ause he will not ever be threshing it,
r break it with the wheel of his cart, nor bruise it with his
is also cometh forth from the LORD of hosts, which is
ellent in working.
o Ariel, the city where David dwelt! add ye year

ere shall be heaviness and
 shall be unto me as Ariel.
will camp against thee round about, and will lay siege
nd I will raise forts against thee.
4 And thou shalt be brought down, and shalt speak out of the
 shall be low out of the dust, and thy voice
ar spirit, out of the ground,
ech shall whisper out of the dust.
 Moreover the multitude of thy strangers shall be like small dust,
e of the terrible ones shall be as chaff that passeth
instant suddenly.
sited of the LORD of hosts with thunder, and with
 storm and tempest, and the flame of
uring fire.
ll the nations that fight against Ariel,
even all that fight against her and her munition, and that distress
s a dream of a night vision.
all even be as when an hungry man dreameth, and, behold, he
 and his soul is empty: or as when a thirsty
; but he awaketh, and, behold,
t, and his soul hath appetite: so shall the multitude of all
ight against mount Zion.
selves, and wonder; cry ye out, and cry: they are
stagger, but not with strong drink.
10 For the LORD hath poured out upon you the spirit of deep sleep,
your eyes: the prophets and your rulers, the seers
e vision of all is become unto you as the words of a book
 deliver to one that is learned, saying, Read
nnot; for it is sealed: 29:12 And
k is delivered to him that is not learned, saying, Read this, I
aith, I am not learned.
 the Lord said, Forasmuch as this people draw near me
eir lips do honour me, but have removed
heir heart far from me, and their fear toward me is taught by the
9:14 Therefore, behold, I will proceed to do a
ven a marvellous work and a
he wisdom of their wise men shall perish, and the
n shall be hid.
t seek deep to hide their counsel from the
nd they say, Who seeth us? and
h us?  29:16 Surely your turning of things upside down shall
ter's clay: for shall the work say of him that
e thing framed say of him that
 He had no understanding?  29:17 Is it not yet a very little
ll be turned into a fruitful field, and the
orest?  29:18 And in that day
eaf hear the words of the book, and the eyes of the blind
y, and out of darkness.
also shall increase their joy in the LORD, and the poor
the Holy One of Israel.
errible one is brought to nought, and the scorner is
or iniquity are cut off: 29:21 That make
a man an offender for a word, and lay a snare for him that reproveth
nd turn aside the just for a thing of nought.
, who redeemed Abraham, concerning
use of Jacob, Jacob shall not now be ashamed, neither shall his

he work of mine hands, in the
m, they shall sanctify my name, and sanctify the Holy One
the God of Israel.
 erred in spirit shall come to understanding, and
ctrine.
dren, saith the LORD, that take
but not of me; and that cover with a covering, but not of my
add sin to sin: 30:2 That walk to go down into
h; to strengthen themselves in the
th of Pharaoh, and to trust in the shadow of Egypt!  30:3
gth of Pharaoh be your shame, and the trust

his ambassadors came to Hanes.
y were all ashamed of a people that could not profit them, nor
t, but a shame, and also a reproach.
:6 The burden of the beasts of the south: into the land of trouble
m whence come the young and old lion, the viper and
 carry their riches upon the shoulders
 young asses, and their treasures upon the bunches of camels, to a
l not profit them.
ns shall help in vain, and to no purpose:
heir strength is to sit
w go, write it before them in a table, and note it in a book,
e time to come for ever and ever: 30:9 That this
dren, children that will not hear
 of the LORD: 30:10 Which say to the seers, See not; and to the
not unto us right things, speak unto us smooth
you out of the way, turn aside out
 path, cause the Holy One of Israel to cease from before us.
 saith the Holy One of Israel, Because ye despise
n and perverseness, and stay thereon:
13 Therefore this iniquity shall be to you as a breach ready to
in a high wall, whose breaking cometh suddenly at
 break it as the breaking of the potters' vessel
 not spare: so that there shall not
und in the bursting of it a sherd to take fire from the hearth,
thal out of the pit.
th the Lord GOD, the Holy One of Israel; In
n quietness and in confidence
ur strength: and ye would not.
t ye said, No; for we will flee upon horses; therefore shall
ride upon the swift; therefore shall they that
ousand shall flee at the rebuke of one; at the rebuke of
e be left as a beacon upon the top of a
ountain, and as an ensign on an hill.
0:18 And therefore will the LORD wait, that he may be gracious unto
ore will he be exalted, that he may have mercy upon
udgment: blessed are all they that wait
or him.
l in Zion at Jerusalem: thou shalt weep
o more: he will be very gracious unto thee at the voice of thy cry;
ear it, he will answer thee.
though the Lord give you the bread of adversity, and the
hall not thy teachers be removed into a
orner any more, but thine eyes shall see thy teachers: 30:21 And
ear a word behind thee, saying, This is the way,
 right hand, and when ye turn to the
.
ng of thy graven images of
e ornament of thy molten images of gold: thou shalt cast
cloth; thou shalt say unto it, Get thee
ence.
 of thy seed, that thou shalt sow the
und withal; and bread of the increase of the earth, and it shall be
us: in that day shall thy cattle feed in large
 and the young asses that ear the ground shall
 winnowed with the shovel and with
n.
high mountain, and upon every high
rivers and streams of waters in the day of the great slaughter,
l.
 shall be as the light of the sun,
e light of the sun shall be sevenfold, as the light of seven
the LORD bindeth up the breach of his people,
.
meth from far, burning with his
d the burden thereof is heavy: his lips are full of
a devouring fire: 30:28 And his breath,
s an overflowing stream, shall reach to the midst of the neck, to
with the sieve of vanity: and there shall be a bridle
using them to err.
a song, as in the night when a holy solemnity is
en one goeth with a pipe to come
 mountain of the LORD, to the mighty One of Israel.
e his glorious voice to be heard, and
ll shew the lighting down of his arm, with the indignation of his
he flame of a devouring fire, with scattering, and
1 For through the voice of the LORD shall the Assyrian be beaten
with a rod.
ere the grounded staff shall pass, which
the LORD shall lay upon him, it shall be with tabrets and harps: and
shaking will he fight with it.
r Tophet is ordained of old; yea, for the king it is prepared;
 and large: the pile thereof is fire and much
stream of brimstone, doth kindle
1:1 Woe to them that go down to Egypt for help; and stay on horses,
ariots, because they are many; and in horsemen, because
hey look not unto the Holy One of Israel,
is wise, and will bring evil,
t call back his words: but will arise against the house of
st the help of them that work iniquity.

od; and their horses flesh,
t. When the LORD shall stretch out his hand, both he that
e that is holpen shall fall down, and they
s hath the LORD spoken unto me, Like as the lion and the
prey, when a multitude of shepherds is
lled forth against him, he will not be afraid of their voice, nor
 the noise of them: so shall the LORD of hosts come
nd for the hill thereof.
flying, so will the LORD of hosts defend Jerusalem;
it; and passing over he will preserve

ildren of Israel have deeply

 away his idols of silver,
of gold, which your own hands have made unto you for a
Assyrian fall with the sword, not of a mighty man;
, shall devour him: but he shall flee
m the sword, and his young men shall be discomfited.
to his strong hold for fear, and his
ces shall be afraid of the ensign, saith the LORD, whose fire is
urnace in Jerusalem.
g shall reign in righteousness, and princes shall
an shall be as an hiding place from the wind, and a covert
ers of water in a dry place, as the shadow of
 And the eyes of them that see shall not be dim, and the ears of
ll hearken.
rash shall understand knowledge, and the
tongue of the stammerers shall be ready to speak plainly.
all be no more called liberal, nor the churl
vile person will speak villany, and his heart will work
risy, and to utter error against the LORD,
d he will cause the drink of
to fail.
he churl are evil: he deviseth wicked
ices to destroy the poor with lying words, even when the needy
2:8 But the liberal deviseth liberal things; and by liberal things

; hear my voice, ye careless
ive ear unto my speech.
 and years shall ye be troubled, ye careless women: for
 gathering shall not come.
e, ye women that are at ease; be troubled, ye careless
u bare, and gird sackcloth upon your
s.
s, for the pleasant fields, for
ful vine.
ple shall come up thorns and briers; yea,
city: 32:14 Because the
forsaken; the multitude of the city shall be left;
r dens for ever, a joy of wild asses,
asture of flocks; 32:15 Until the spirit be poured upon us from on
lderness be a fruitful field, and the fruitful field
:16 Then judgment shall dwell in the wilderness, and righteousness
uitful field.
hteousness shall be peace; and the effect of
for ever.
ll in a peaceable habitation, and in sure
2:19 When it shall hail,
he forest; and the city shall be low in a low place.
w beside all waters, that send forth
her the feet of the ox and the ass.
1 Woe to thee that spoilest, and thou wast not spoiled; and dealest
and they dealt not treacherously with thee! when thou
alt be spoiled; and when thou shalt make
an end to deal treacherously, they shall deal treacherously with thee.
D, be gracious unto us; we have waited for thee: be thou
ur salvation also in the time of trouble.
ple fled; at the lifting up of
e nations were scattered.
 spoil shall be gathered like the gathering of the
nd fro of locusts shall he run upon

eth on high: he hath filled Zion
gment and righteousness.
m and knowledge shall be the stability of thy times, and
 fear of the LORD is his treasure.
 Behold, their valiant ones shall cry without: the ambassadors of
bitterly.
the wayfaring man ceaseth: he hath broken
, he regardeth no man.
ourneth and languisheth: Lebanon is ashamed and hewn
ess; and Bashan and Carmel shake off
r fruits.
the LORD; now will I be exalted; now will
ive chaff, ye shall bring forth stubble: your

ings of lime: as thorns cut
 be burned in the fire.
that are far off, what I have done; and, ye that are

rfulness hath surprised the
ho among us shall dwell with the devouring fire? who
lasting burnings?  33:15 He that walketh
righteously, and speaketh uprightly; he that despiseth the gain of
t shaketh his hands from holding of bribes, that
blood, and shutteth his eyes from
evil; 33:16 He shall dwell on high: his place of defence shall
rocks: bread shall be given him; his waters shall
l see the king in his beauty: they shall behold
3:18 Thine heart shall meditate terror. Where is the scribe? where is
 where is he that counted the towers?  33:19 Thou shalt
people of a deeper speech than thou canst
ou canst not understand.
n Zion, the city of our solemnities: thine eyes shall
ion, a tabernacle that shall not be taken
 ever be removed, neither
e cords thereof be broken.
ere the glorious LORD will be unto us a place of broad
shall go no galley with oars, neither
ll gallant ship pass thereby.
 the LORD is our judge, the LORD is our lawgiver, the LORD is
e us.
hey could not well strengthen their
 they could not spread the sail: then is the prey of a great
e take the prey.
nt shall not say, I am sick: the people that
iniquity.
o hear; and hearken, ye people: let the
arth hear, and all that is therein; the world, and all things that
.
is upon all nations, and his fury
l their armies: he hath utterly destroyed them, he hath
hter.
st out, and their stink shall come up
 of their carcases, and the mountains shall be melted with their
 all the host of heaven shall be dissolved, and the heavens
r as a scroll: and all their host shall fall
 vine, and as a falling fig from
tree.
 in heaven: behold, it shall come
on Idumea, and upon the people of my curse, to judgment.
RD is filled with blood, it is made fat with
nd goats, with the fat of the
rams: for the LORD hath a sacrifice in Bozrah, and a great
 Idumea.
me down with them, and the bullocks with
the bulls; and their land shall be soaked with blood, and their dust
fatness.
LORD's vengeance, and the year of
nces for the controversy of Zion.
And the streams thereof shall be turned into pitch, and the dust
tone, and the land thereof shall become burning
nched night nor day; the smoke thereof shall
eration it shall lie waste; none
ss through it for ever and ever.
But the cormorant and the bittern shall possess it; the owl also
l dwell in it: and he shall stretch out upon it the
es of emptiness.
the nobles thereof to the kingdom, but none
ll be nothing.
ome up in her palaces, nettles and brambles in
 be an habitation of dragons, and
 for owls.
 desert shall also meet with the wild
sts of the island, and the satyr shall cry to his fellow; the
l rest there, and find for herself a place of
owl make her nest, and lay, and hatch, and
 vultures also be gathered,
h her mate.
ok of the LORD, and read: no one of these
 my mouth it hath commanded,
it it hath gathered them.
hath cast the lot for them, and his hand hath divided it
all possess it for ever, from generation to

e shall be glad for them; and
shall rejoice, and blossom as the rose.

oice even with joy and
 of Lebanon shall be given unto it, the excellency
 see the glory of the LORD, and the
lency of our God.
e weak hands, and confirm the feeble knees.
l heart, Be strong, fear not:
r God will come with vengeance, even God with a recompence;
ou.
ll be opened, and the ears of the
all be unstopped.
ame man leap as an hart, and the tongue of the
ll waters break out, and streams
esert.
l become a pool, and the thirsty land
ings of water: in the habitation of dragons, where each lay, shall
eds and rushes.
ll be there, and a way, and it shall be called
ll not pass over it; but it shall
those: the wayfaring men, though fools, shall not err therein.
 be there, nor any ravenous beast shall go up
 but the redeemed shall walk
 And the ransomed of the LORD shall return, and come to
ting joy upon their heads: they shall
ain joy and gladness, and sorrow and sighing shall flee away.
 pass in the fourteenth year of king Hezekiah, that
e up against all the defenced cities of
udah, and took them.
of Assyria sent Rabshakeh from Lachish to Jerusalem
 army. And he stood by the conduit of
 upper pool in the highway of the fuller's field.
liakim, Hilkiah's son, which was over
 house, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, Asaph's son, the recorder.
hakeh said unto them, Say ye now to Hezekiah, Thus saith
f Assyria, What confidence is this wherein
 (but they are but vain words)
nsel and strength for war: now on whom dost thou trust, that
 me?  36:6 Lo, thou trustest in the staff of
 a man lean, it will go into his
d pierce it: so is Pharaoh king of Egypt to all that trust in
hou say to me, We trust in the LORD our God: is it not
ose altars Hezekiah hath taken away, and
said to Judah and to Jerusalem, Ye shall worship before this altar?
ore give pledges, I pray thee, to my master the king of
ee two thousand horses, if thou be able on
9 How then wilt thou turn away the face of one captain of the least
servants, and put thy trust on Egypt for chariots and
 now come up without the LORD against
s land to destroy it? the LORD said unto me, Go up against this
t.
nd Joah unto Rabshakeh, Speak, I
e, unto thy servants in the Syrian language; for we understand
 us in the Jews' language, in the ears of the
 But Rabshakeh said, Hath my master sent me to thy master and to
e words? hath he not sent me to the men that sit
heir own dung, and drink their own
ith you?  36:13 Then Rabshakeh stood, and cried with a loud
uage, and said, Hear ye the words of the great
Thus saith the king, Let not Hezekiah deceive you: for he shall
ver you.
e you trust in the LORD, saying, The
 will surely deliver us: this city shall not be delivered into the
 of Assyria.
iah: for thus saith the king of Assyria,
Make an agreement with me by a present, and come out to me: and eat ye
 his vine, and every one of his fig tree, and drink ye
own cistern; 36:17 Until I come and take
you away to a land like your own land, a land of corn and wine, a land
 vineyards.
persuade you, saying, the LORD will deliver
ons delivered his land out of the hand
 the king of Assyria?  36:19 Where are the gods of Hamath and
 gods of Sepharvaim? and have they delivered
 they among all the gods of
that have delivered their land out of my hand, that the
em out of my hand?  36:21 But they held
heir peace, and answered him not a word: for the king's commandment
swer him not.
the son of Hilkiah, that was over the
sehold, and Shebna the scribe, and Joah, the son of Asaph, the
h with their clothes rent, and told him the words
 to pass, when king Hezekiah heard it, that he rent
f with sackcloth, and went into the
 of the LORD.
 who was over the household, and Shebna the
overed with sackcloth, unto
ophet the son of Amoz.
id unto him, Thus saith Hezekiah, This day is a day of
of blasphemy: for the children are come to
bring forth.
y God will hear the words of Rabshakeh, whom
nt to reproach the living God,
eprove the words which the LORD thy God hath heard:
r the remnant that is left.
 servants of king Hezekiah came to Isaiah.
hall ye say unto your master,
the LORD, Be not afraid of the words that thou hast heard,
f the king of Assyria have blasphemed me.
im, and he shall hear a rumour,
n to his own land; and I will cause him to fall by the sword
:8 So Rabshakeh returned, and found the king of Assyria warring
 he had heard that he was departed from Lachish.
 Tirhakah king of Ethiopia, He is come
rth to make war with thee. And when he heard it, he sent messengers
ying, 37:10 Thus shall ye speak to Hezekiah king of
 in whom thou trustest, deceive thee,
ing, Jerusalem shall not be given into the hand of the king of
hold, thou hast heard what the kings of Assyria have done to
g them utterly; and shalt thou be delivered?
ivered them which my fathers
ed, as Gozan, and Haran, and Rezeph, and the children of
r?  37:13 Where is the king of Hamath, and
city of Sepharvaim, Hena, and
4 And Hezekiah received the letter from the hand of the
d Hezekiah went up unto the house of the
LORD, and spread it before the LORD.
:15 And Hezekiah prayed unto the LORD, saying, 37:16 O LORD of
, that dwellest between the cherubims, thou art
e kingdoms of the earth: thou hast
eaven and earth.
r, O LORD, and hear; open thine eyes, O LORD,
nnacherib, which hath sent to
e living God.
he kings of Assyria have laid waste all the
 have cast their gods into the
they were no gods, but the work of men's hands, wood and
 destroyed them.
 LORD our God, save us from his hand, that all
hat thou art the LORD, even thou

to Hezekiah, saying, Thus
God of Israel, Whereas thou hast prayed to me against
37:22 This is the word which the LORD
h spoken concerning him; The virgin, the daughter of Zion, hath
laughed thee to scorn; the daughter of Jerusalem
7:23 Whom hast thou reproached and blasphemed? and against whom hast
hy voice, and lifted up thine eyes on high? even against

d the Lord, and hast said, By
de of my chariots am I come up to the height of the
non; and I will cut down the tall
thereof, and the choice fir trees thereof: and I will enter
border, and the forest of his Carmel.
7:25 I have digged, and drunk water; and with the sole of my feet
ll the rivers of the besieged places.
7:26 Hast thou not heard long ago, how I have done it; and of ancient
 have formed it? now have I brought it to pass, that thou
 defenced cities into ruinous heaps.
:27 Therefore their inhabitants were of small power, they were
ded: they were as the grass of the field, and as
e housetops, and as corn blasted
t be grown up.
de, and thy going out, and thy coming in, and
 thy rage against me, and thy tumult, is come up into
ut my hook in thy nose, and my bridle in
thy lips, and I will turn thee back by the way by which thou camest.
is shall be a sign unto thee, Ye shall eat this year such
 the second year that which springeth of the
d reap, and plant vineyards, and
fruit thereof.
at is escaped of the house of Judah shall
upward: 37:32 For out of
go forth a remnant, and they that escape out of mount
 hosts shall do this.
hus saith the LORD concerning the king of Assyria, He
, nor shoot an arrow there, nor come
re it with shields, nor cast a bank against it.
 the same shall he return, and shall
come into this city, saith the LORD.
:35 For I will defend this city to save it for mine own sake, and
vid's sake.
 LORD went forth, and smote in the camp of
d five thousand: and when they
y in the morning, behold, they were all dead corpses.
f Assyria departed, and went and returned,
me to pass, as he was worshipping in the house of
 and Sharezer his sons smote him with
 sword; and they escaped into the land of Armenia: and Esarhaddon
n his stead.
ekiah sick unto death. And Isaiah the
phet the son of Amoz came unto him, and said unto him, Thus saith
ne house in order: for thou shalt die, and not live.
s face toward the wall, and prayed unto
he LORD, 38:3 And said, Remember now, O LORD, I beseech thee, how I
ore thee in truth and with a perfect heart, and have
 sight. And Hezekiah wept sore.
en came the word of the LORD to Isaiah, saying, 38:5 Go, and
saith the LORD, the God of David thy father, I
hy tears: behold, I will add unto
s fifteen years.
r thee and this city out of the hand of the king
 city.
to thee from the LORD, that the LORD
 do this thing that he hath spoken; 38:8 Behold, I will bring
he degrees, which is gone down in the sun dial of
e sun returned ten degrees, by which
ees it was gone down.
of Hezekiah king of Judah, when he had been sick, and
: 38:10 I said in the cutting off of my
ays, I shall go to the gates of the grave: I am deprived of the
.
D, even the LORD, in the land of
ng: I shall behold man no more with the inhabitants of the
 is departed, and is removed from me as a shepherd's
aver my life: he will cut me off with
ing sickness: from day even to night wilt thou make an end of me.
d till morning, that, as a lion, so will he break all
ght wilt thou make an end of me.
Like a crane or a swallow, so did I chatter: I did mourn as a
with looking upward: O LORD, I am oppressed;
I say? he hath both spoken unto me, and himself hath
 my years in the bitterness of my soul.

nd in all these things is the
spirit: so wilt thou recover me, and make me to live.
ad great bitterness: but thou hast in love
corruption: for thou hast cast
s behind thy back.
cannot praise thee, death can not celebrate thee:
nnot hope for thy truth.
ng, the living, he shall praise thee, as I do this day:
shall make known thy truth.
ORD was ready to save me: therefore we will sing my songs
ts all the days of our life in the house of
 Let them take a lump of figs, and lay it
l recover.
, What is the sign that I shall go up to
the house of the LORD?  39:1 At that time Merodachbaladan, the son of
 of Babylon, sent letters and a present to Hezekiah: for
een sick, and was recovered.
ezekiah was glad of them, and shewed them the house of his
ver, and the gold, and the spices, and the
his armour, and all that was
 treasures: there was nothing in his house, nor in all his
shewed them not.
the prophet unto king Hezekiah, and said unto
ence came they unto thee? And
id, They are come from a far country unto me, even from
he, What have they seen in thine house? And Hezekiah
house have they seen: there is nothing
ong my treasures that I have not shewed them.
Hear the word of the LORD of hosts:
Behold, the days come, that all that is in thine house, and that
have laid up in store until this day, shall be
 left, saith the LORD.
sons that shall issue from thee, which thou shalt
they shall be eunuchs in the palace
e king of Babylon.
iah to Isaiah, Good is the word of the LORD which
r, For there shall be peace and truth
my days.
 people, saith your God.
comfortably to Jerusalem, and cry unto her, that her
her iniquity is pardoned: for she hath
ceived of the LORD's hand double for all her sins.
eth in the wilderness, Prepare ye the
 of the LORD, make straight in the desert a highway for our God.
y shall be exalted, and every mountain and hill shall
shall be made straight, and the rough
ces plain: 40:5 And the glory of the LORD shall be revealed, and
e it together: for the mouth of the LORD hath spoken
y. And he said, What shall I cry? All flesh is
f is as the flower of the field:
 grass withereth, the flower fadeth: because the spirit of the
: surely the people is grass.
grass withereth, the flower fadeth: but the word of our God

 get thee up into the high
rusalem, that bringest good tidings, lift up thy voice
e not afraid; say unto the cities of
h, Behold your God!  40:10 Behold, the Lord GOD will come with
 arm shall rule for him: behold, his reward is

pherd: he shall gather the
 arm, and carry them in his bosom, and shall gently lead

the hollow of his hand, and
ven with the span, and comprehended the dust of the earth
 the mountains in scales, and the hills in a
Spirit of the LORD, or being his
or hath taught him?  40:14 With whom took he counsel, and who
aught him in the path of judgment, and taught him
way of understanding?  40:15 Behold,
nations are as a drop of a bucket, and are counted as the small
: behold, he taketh up the isles as a very little
t sufficient to burn, nor the beasts thereof
:17 All nations before him are as nothing; and they are counted to
thing, and vanity.
ill ye liken God? or what likeness will ye compare
teth a graven image, and the goldsmith
readeth it over with gold, and casteth silver chains.
ished that he hath no oblation chooseth a
im a cunning workman to
image, that shall not be moved.
ave ye not known? have ye not heard? hath it not been told you
have ye not understood from the foundations of the
eth upon the circle of the earth, and
 inhabitants thereof are as grasshoppers; that stretcheth out the
ain, and spreadeth them out as a tent to dwell in:
to nothing; he maketh the judges of
arth as vanity.
ot be planted; yea, they shall not be sown:
 the earth: and he shall also
hem, and they shall wither, and the whirlwind shall take
0:25 To whom then will ye liken me, or shall I be equal? saith the
26 Lift up your eyes on high, and behold who hath created these
th out their host by number: he calleth them all by
ight, for that he is strong in power;
 one faileth.
Jacob, and speakest, O Israel, My way is hid
ed over from my God?  40:28 Hast
 known? hast thou not heard, that the everlasting God, the
 ends of the earth, fainteth not, neither is
derstanding.
he faint; and to them that have no might he
youths shall faint and be weary, and the young men
ey that wait upon the LORD shall renew
eir strength; they shall mount up with wings as eagles; they shall
weary; and they shall walk, and not faint.
; and let the people renew their
: let them come near; then let them speak: let us come near

m the east, called him to his
the nations before him, and made him rule over kings? he
is sword, and as driven stubble to his bow.
ly; even by the way that he had
with his feet.
d done it, calling the generations from the
ith the last; I am he.
aw it, and feared; the ends of the earth were afraid,
They helped every one his neighbour; and every one said to his
courage.
ed the goldsmith, and he that smootheth
ith the hammer him that smote the anvil, saying, It is ready for the
he fastened it with nails, that it should not be moved.
t my servant, Jacob whom I have chosen, the
 whom I have taken from the ends of the earth, and called
hereof, and said unto thee, Thou art my
ervant; I have chosen thee, and not cast thee away.
 with thee: be not dismayed; for I am thy
help thee; yea, I will uphold
he right hand of my righteousness.
1 Behold, all they that were incensed against thee shall be
 they shall be as nothing; and they that strive
ou shalt seek them, and shalt not find them, even them that
ey that war against thee shall be as nothing,
r I the LORD thy God will hold thy right hand, saying unto
elp thee.
ob, and ye men of Israel; I will help
e, saith the LORD, and thy redeemer, the Holy One of Israel.
 make thee a new sharp threshing instrument having
ntains, and beat them small, and shalt
ke the hills as chaff.
 fan them, and the wind shall carry them away, and the
: and thou shalt rejoice in the LORD, and

 and there is none, and their
eth for thirst, I the LORD will hear them, I the God of
m.
ces, and fountains in the midst of
lleys: I will make the wilderness a pool of water, and the dry
r.
 the cedar, the shittah tree, and
tle, and the oil tree; I will set in the desert the fir tree,
 box tree together: 41:20 That they may see, and
 together, that the hand of the LORD
 done this, and the Holy One of Israel hath created it.
 saith the LORD; bring forth your strong
reasons, saith the King of Jacob.
 Let them bring them forth, and shew us what shall happen: let
 things, what they be, that we may consider them,
or declare us things for to come.
 Shew the things that are to come hereafter, that we may know
, do good, or do evil, that we may be dismayed,
hold, ye are of nothing, and your work of nought: an
h you.
the north, and he shall come: from the
sing of the sun shall he call upon my name: and he shall come upon
morter, and as the potter treadeth clay.

ng, that we may know? and
t we may say, He is righteous? yea, there is none that
that declareth, yea, there is none that
eareth your words.
l say to Zion, Behold, behold them: and I will
good tidings.
here was no man; even among them, and there
f them, could answer a word.
ld, they are all vanity; their works are nothing: their
confusion.
 I uphold; mine elect, in whom my soul
lighteth; I have put my spirit upon him: he shall bring forth
les.
, nor cause his voice to be heard in
street.
t break, and the smoking flax shall he
t quench: he shall bring forth judgment unto truth.
 discouraged, till he have set judgment
n the earth: and the isles shall wait for his law.
he that created the heavens, and
d them out; he that spread forth the earth, and that which
t giveth breath unto the people upon it, and
 I the LORD have called thee in
ness, and will hold thine hand, and will keep thee, and give
 the people, for a light of the Gentiles; 42:7
 the prisoners from the prison,
that sit in darkness out of the prison house.
: and my glory will I not give to
, neither my praise to graven images.
2:9 Behold, the former things are come to pass, and new things do I
 they spring forth I tell you of them.
42:10 Sing unto the LORD a new song, and his praise from the end of
hat go down to the sea, and all that is therein; the
reof.
cities thereof lift up their voice,
illages that Kedar doth inhabit: let the inhabitants of the rock
ut from the top of the mountains.
 Let them give glory unto the LORD, and declare his praise in the
 The LORD shall go forth as a mighty man, he shall stir up
ar: he shall cry, yea, roar; he shall prevail
long time holden my peace; I have been still, and
like a travailing woman; I will
nd devour at once.
ste mountains and hills, and dry up all their
ands, and I will dry up the
16 And I will bring the blind by a way that they knew not; I will
s that they have not known: I will make darkness
ngs straight. These things will I do
 them, and not forsake them.
 shall be turned back, they shall be greatly ashamed, that
that say to the molten images, Ye are our
e blind, that ye may see.
blind, but my servant? or deaf, as my messenger that I
at is perfect, and blind as the LORD's
rvant?  42:20 Seeing many things, but thou observest not; opening
heareth not.
ased for his righteousness' sake; he will

poiled; they are all of them
les, and they are hid in prison houses: they are for a
or a spoil, and none saith, Restore.
:23 Who among you will give ear to this? who will hearken and hear
come?  42:24 Who gave Jacob for a spoil, and Israel to
D, he against whom we have sinned? for
ey would not walk in his ways, neither were they obedient unto his
erefore he hath poured upon him the fury of his anger, and the
and it hath set him on fire round about, yet he
 laid it not to heart.
s saith the LORD that created thee, O Jacob, and he
r not: for I have redeemed thee, I have
alled thee by thy name; thou art mine.
43:2 When thou passest through the waters, I will be with thee; and
ers, they shall not overflow thee: when thou walkest
ot be burned; neither shall the flame
dle upon thee.
hy God, the Holy One of Israel, thy Saviour: I
and Seba for thee.
 precious in my sight, thou hast been honourable,
will I give men for thee, and people
thy life.
thee: I will bring thy seed from the
, and gather thee from the west; 43:6 I will say to the north,
south, Keep not back: bring my sons from far, and
 earth; 43:7 Even every one that is
d by my name: for I have created him for my glory, I have formed
ade him.
ple that have eyes, and the deaf that
e ears.
hered together, and let the people be
embled: who among them can declare this, and shew us former things?
forth their witnesses, that they may be justified: or
 truth.
h the LORD, and my servant whom I have
osen: that ye may know and believe me, and understand that I am he:
 was no God formed, neither shall there be after me.
; and beside me there is no saviour.
:12 I have declared, and have saved, and I have shewed, when there
od among you: therefore ye are my witnesses, saith the
3 Yea, before the day was I am he; and there is none that can
d: I will work, and who shall let it?  43:14 Thus
e Holy One of Israel; For your sake I
e sent to Babylon, and have brought down all their nobles, and the
 cry is in the ships.
RD, your Holy One, the creator of Israel, your King.
hich maketh a way in the sea, and a path
in the mighty waters; 43:17 Which bringeth forth the chariot and
d the power; they shall lie down together, they
hey are quenched as tow.
 ye not the former things, neither consider the things
ill do a new thing; now it shall spring forth; shall
ke a way in the wilderness, and rivers
 the desert.
ld shall honour me, the dragons and the
wls: because I give waters in the wilderness, and rivers in the
nk to my people, my chosen.
people have I formed for myself; they shall shew forth my
 hast not called upon me, O Jacob; but thou hast been
23 Thou hast not brought me the small cattle of thy burnt
hou honoured me with thy sacrifices. I have
ng, nor wearied thee with
24 Thou hast bought me no sweet cane with money, neither hast thou
he fat of thy sacrifices: but thou hast made me to
earied me with thine iniquities.
I, even I, am he that blotteth out thy transgressions for mine
ot remember thy sins.
emembrance: let us plead together: declare thou, that
43:27 Thy first father hath sinned, and thy teachers have transgressed

nces of the sanctuary, and have
ob to the curse, and Israel to reproaches.
 and Israel, whom I have chosen:
s saith the LORD that made thee, and formed thee from the
e; Fear not, O Jacob, my servant; and thou,
r I will pour water upon him that is thirsty, and floods upon
l pour my spirit upon thy seed, and my blessing
 shall spring up as among the
illows by the water courses.
hall say, I am the LORD's; and another shall call himself by
 another shall subscribe with his hand unto the
me of Israel.
the King of Israel, and his redeemer the LORD
e last; and beside me there is no

 declare it, and set it in
since I appointed the ancient people? and the things
e, let them shew unto them.
e not, neither be afraid: have not I told thee from that
? ye are even my witnesses. Is there a God
not any.
mage are all of them vanity; and their
lectable things shall not profit; and they are their own witnesses;
or know; that they may be ashamed.
0 Who hath formed a god, or molten a graven image that is
44:11 Behold, all his fellows shall be
hamed: and the workmen, they are of men: let them all be gathered
m stand up; yet they shall fear, and they shall be
mith with the tongs both worketh in the coals, and
worketh it with the strength of his
 yea, he is hungry, and his strength faileth: he drinketh no

ule; he marketh it out with a
tteth it with planes, and he marketh it out with the
he figure of a man, according to the
ty of a man; that it may remain in the house.
d taketh the cypress and the oak,
e strengtheneth for himself among the trees of the forest: he
the rain doth nourish it.
all it be for a man to burn: for he will take thereof,
ndleth it, and baketh bread; yea, he
th a god, and worshippeth it; he maketh it a graven image, and
.
fire; with part thereof he eateth
he roasteth roast, and is satisfied: yea, he warmeth himself,
warm, I have seen the fire: 44:17 And the residue
 graven image: he falleth down unto
nd worshippeth it, and prayeth unto it, and saith, Deliver me;

od: for he hath shut their eyes,
y cannot see; and their hearts, that they cannot understand.
dereth in his heart, neither is there knowledge
rned part of it in the fire; yea,
have baked bread upon the coals thereof; I have roasted flesh,
all I make the residue thereof an abomination?
tree?  44:20 He feedeth on ashes:
ved heart hath turned him aside, that he cannot deliver his
 not a lie in my right hand?  44:21 Remember
t my servant: I have formed
t my servant: O Israel, thou shalt not be forgotten of
out, as a thick cloud, thy transgressions, and,
e; for I have redeemed thee.
, O ye heavens; for the LORD hath done it: shout, ye lower
k forth into singing, ye mountains, O forest,
hath redeemed Jacob, and
f in Israel.
 thy redeemer, and he that formed thee from
 things; that stretcheth forth
s alone; that spreadeth abroad the earth by myself; 44:25
ns of the liars, and maketh diviners mad;
h their knowledge foolish;
firmeth the word of his servant, and performeth the
 saith to Jerusalem, Thou shalt be
ted; and to the cities of Judah, Ye shall be built, and I will
 places thereof: 44:27 That saith to the deep, Be
: 44:28 That saith of Cyrus, He is my
pherd, and shall perform all my pleasure: even saying to Jerusalem,
uilt; and to the temple, Thy foundation shall be laid.
o his anointed, to Cyrus, whose right hand I
him; and I will loose the loins
 to open before him the two leaved gates; and the gates shall
ill go before thee, and make the crooked places
e gates of brass, and cut in sunder
ars of iron: 45:3 And I will give thee the treasures of darkness,
 of secret places, that thou mayest know that I, the
ame, am the God of Israel.
ob my servant's sake, and Israel mine elect, I have even
 have surnamed thee, though thou hast not
e is none else, there is no God beside me:
n me: 45:6 That they may know
sing of the sun, and from the west, that there is none
d there is none else.
ight, and create darkness: I make peace, and create
hings.
 above, and let the skies pour down
eousness: let the earth open, and let them bring forth salvation,
ness spring up together; I the LORD have created it.
eth with his Maker! Let the potsherd
ve with the potsherds of the earth. Shall the clay say to him that
hat makest thou? or thy work, He hath no hands?  45:10
 his father, What begettest thou? or to
he woman, What hast thou brought forth?  45:11 Thus saith the LORD,
 Israel, and his Maker, Ask me of things to come
 the work of my hands command ye me.
:12 I have made the earth, and created man upon it: I, even my
d out the heavens, and all their host have I
up in righteousness, and I will direct all his
 shall let go my captives, not for
nor reward, saith the LORD of hosts.
:14 Thus saith the LORD, The labour of Egypt, and merchandise of
e Sabeans, men of stature, shall come over unto
 shall come after thee; in chains
all come over, and they shall fall down unto thee, they shall
o thee, saying, Surely God is in thee; and there
45:15 Verily thou art a God that hidest thyself, O God of Israel, the
5:16 They shall be ashamed, and also confounded, all of them: they
usion together that are makers of idols.

ORD with an everlasting
ll not be ashamed nor confounded world without end.
 that created the heavens; God himself
at formed the earth and made it; he hath established it, he created
 he formed it to be inhabited: I am the LORD; and there
ve not spoken in secret, in a dark place of the earth: I
Jacob, Seek ye me in vain: I the LORD speak
e right.
come; draw near together, ye that are
aped of the nations: they have no knowledge that set up the wood of
age, and pray unto a god that cannot save.
a, let them take counsel
th declared this from ancient time? who hath told it
e LORD? and there is no God else beside
e; a just God and a Saviour; there is none beside me.
ye saved, all the ends of the earth: for I
 I have sworn by myself, the word is gone out of my mouth in
ll not return, That unto me every knee shall
4 Surely, shall one say, in the LORD have I righteousness and
 shall men come; and all that are incensed
n the LORD shall all the seed of Israel be justified, and shall
boweth down, Nebo stoopeth, their idols were upon the beasts,
your carriages were heavy loaden; they are a
y stoop, they bow down together; they could not deliver the
are gone into captivity.
nto me, O house of Jacob, and all the remnant of the
ne by me from the belly, which are
d from the womb: 46:4 And even to your old age I am he; and even
 I carry you: I have made, and I will bear; even I
.
ke me equal, and compare me, that
be like?  46:6 They lavish gold out of the bag, and weigh
d hire a goldsmith; and he maketh it a god:
6:7 They bear him upon the shoulder, they carry him, and set him in
he standeth; from his place shall he not remove: yea,
an he not answer, nor save him out of his
yourselves men: bring it again to mind, O
rmer things of old: for I am God, and there is
ne like me, 46:10 Declaring the
the beginning, and from ancient times the things that are not
counsel shall stand, and I will do all my
rom the east, the man that
ounsel from a far country: yea, I have spoken it, I will
ave purposed it, I will also do it.
12 Hearken unto me, ye stouthearted, that are far from
 near my righteousness; it shall not be
ar off, and my salvation shall not tarry: and I will place salvation
rael my glory.
in the dust, O virgin daughter of Babylon, sit
 daughter of the Chaldeans: for
t no more be called tender and delicate.

: uncover thy locks, make bare
ncover the thigh, pass over the rivers.

a, thy shame shall be seen: I
engeance, and I will not meet thee as a man.
f hosts is his name, the Holy One
el.
into darkness, O daughter of the
s: for thou shalt no more be called, The lady of kingdoms.
my people, I have polluted mine inheritance, and
idst shew them no mercy; upon the
 hast thou very heavily laid thy yoke.
47:7 And thou saidst, I shall be a lady for ever: so that thou didst
things to thy heart, neither didst remember the latter
 hear now this, thou that art given to pleasures, that
yest in thine heart, I am, and none else
beside me; I shall not sit as a widow, neither shall I know the loss
7:9 But these two things shall come to thee in a moment
ldren, and widowhood: they shall come upon
de of thy sorceries, and for
undance of thine enchantments.
r thou hast trusted in thy wickedness: thou hast said, None
d thy knowledge, it hath perverted thee; and
nd none else beside me.
 shall evil come upon thee; thou shalt not know from
 shall fall upon thee; thou shalt not be
able to put it off: and desolation shall come upon thee suddenly,
not know.
chantments, and with the multitude of thy
m thy youth; if so be thou
to profit, if so be thou mayest prevail.

of thy counsels. Let now the
 the stargazers, the monthly prognosticators, stand up,
ings that shall come upon thee.
ehold, they shall be as stubble; the fire shall burn them; they
hemselves from the power of the flame: there shall
re to sit before it.
hey be unto thee with whom thou hast laboured, even
they shall wander every one to his
r; none shall save thee.
his, O house of Jacob, which are called by the name of
ut of the waters of Judah, which swear by
 the God of Israel, but not
 in righteousness.
hemselves of the holy city, and stay themselves
 hosts is his name.
d the former things from the beginning; and they
shewed them; I did them suddenly,
y came to pass.
t thou art obstinate, and thy neck is an iron
e even from the beginning
thee; before it came to pass I shewed it thee: lest
ath done them, and my graven image, and
y molten image, hath commanded them.
:6 Thou hast heard, see all this; and will not ye declare it? I have
w things from this time, even hidden things, and thou
They are created now, and not from the beginning; even before the
rdest them not; lest thou shouldest say, Behold, I
rdest not; yea, thou knewest not; yea, from that
: for I knew that thou wouldest deal
 treacherously, and wast called a transgressor from the womb.
sake will I defer mine anger, and for my praise
 thee not off.
ined thee, but not with silver; I have chosen

n sake, will I do it: for how
ame be polluted? and I will not give my glory unto another.
, O Jacob and Israel, my called; I am he; I am
:13 Mine hand also hath laid the foundation of the earth, and my
anned the heavens: when I call unto them, they stand
assemble yourselves, and hear; which among them hath
D hath loved him: he will do his
 on Babylon, and his arm shall be on the Chaldeans.
 yea, I have called him: I have brought
im, and he shall make his way prosperous.
s; I have not spoken in secret
eginning; from the time that it was, there am I: and now the
it, hath sent me.
LORD, thy Redeemer, the Holy One of Israel; I am
ee to profit, which leadeth thee by
ay that thou shouldest go.
 thou hadst hearkened to my commandments! then had thy
hy righteousness as the waves of the sea:
 and the offspring of thy
 gravel thereof; his name should not have been cut off
.
 from the Chaldeans, with a voice
ing declare ye, tell this, utter it even to the end of the
hath redeemed his servant Jacob.
And they thirsted not when he led them through the deserts: he
 flow out of the rock for them: he clave the rock

, unto the wicked.
, unto me; and hearken, ye people, from far; The
 from the bowels of my mother hath
e mention of my name.
made my mouth like a sharp sword; in the shadow of
e me a polished shaft; in his quiver
 he hid me; 49:3 And said unto me, Thou art my servant, O Israel,
 glorified.
boured in vain, I have spent my strength
for nought, and in vain: yet surely my judgment is with the LORD, and
my God.
at formed me from the womb to be his
ant, to bring Jacob again to him, Though Israel be not gathered,
rious in the eyes of the LORD, and my God shall be
, It is a light thing that thou shouldest be my
acob, and to restore the preserved
ael: I will also give thee for a light to the Gentiles, that
ation unto the end of the earth.
hus saith the LORD, the Redeemer of Israel, and his Holy One, to
seth, to him whom the nation abhorreth, to a servant
 arise, princes also shall worship,
se of the LORD that is faithful, and the Holy One of Israel, and
ee.
eptable time have I heard thee, and
day of salvation have I helped thee: and I will preserve thee,
covenant of the people, to establish the earth, to
ritages; 49:9 That thou mayest say to
 prisoners, Go forth; to them that are in darkness, Shew
d in the ways, and their pastures shall be
not hunger nor thirst; neither shall the heat nor sun
mercy on them shall lead them, even by
e springs of water shall he guide them.

way, and my highways shall be

and, lo, these from the north
e west; and these from the land of Sinim.
 earth; and break forth into
ountains: for the LORD hath comforted his people, and will
icted.
th forsaken me, and my Lord hath
n me.
ing child, that she should not have
ssion on the son of her womb? yea, they may forget, yet will I
49:16 Behold, I have graven thee upon the palms of my hands; thy walls
lly before me.
 make haste; thy destroyers and they that made

d behold: all these gather
ether, and come to thee. As I live, saith the LORD, thou
ith them all, as with an ornament, and bind
9 For thy waste and thy desolate places, and the land of thy
n now be too narrow by reason of the
bitants, and they that swallowed thee up shall be far away.
ich thou shalt have, after thou hast lost the
 The place is too strait for me:
ce to me that I may dwell.
halt thou say in thine heart, Who hath begotten me these,
ldren, and am desolate, a captive, and
moving to and fro? and who hath brought up these? Behold, I was left
where had they been?  49:22 Thus saith the Lord GOD,
nd to the Gentiles, and set up my
d to the people: and they shall bring thy sons in their arms,
ll be carried upon their shoulders.
23 And kings shall be thy nursing fathers, and their queens thy
ey shall bow down to thee with their face toward
 thy feet; and thou shalt know that
the LORD: for they shall not be ashamed that wait for me.
 taken from the mighty, or the lawful captive
LORD, Even the captives of the
ll be taken away, and the prey of the terrible shall be
nd with him that contendeth with thee, and
 will feed them that oppress thee with their own flesh; and
ith their own blood, as with sweet wine: and
m thy Saviour and thy Redeemer,
y One of Jacob.
D, Where is the bill of your mother's
orcement, whom I have put away? or which of my creditors is it to
you?  Behold, for your iniquities have ye sold
ons is your mother put away.
fore, when I came, was there no man? when I called, was
 hand shortened at all, that it cannot
deem? or have I no power to deliver? behold, at my rebuke I dry up
the rivers a wilderness: their fish stinketh, because
for thirst.
ith blackness, and I make sackcloth their
 me the tongue of the learned, that I
uld know how to speak a word in season to him that is weary: he
 morning, he wakeneth mine ear to hear as the
ened mine ear, and I was not rebellious,
neither turned away back.
y back to the smiters, and my cheeks to them that plucked
y face from shame and spitting.
r the Lord GOD will help me; therefore shall I not be
set my face like a flint, and I know that
r that justifieth me; who will contend with me? let us
adversary? let him come near to me.
9 Behold, the Lord GOD will help me; who is he that shall condemn
 shall wax old as a garment; the moth shall eat them
that feareth the LORD, that obeyeth the voice
ess, and hath no light? let him
the name of the LORD, and stay upon his God.
ire, that compass yourselves about
parks: walk in the light of your fire, and in the sparks that ye
 shall ye have of mine hand; ye shall lie down in
 that follow after righteousness, ye that seek
ye are hewn, and to the hole of
hence ye are digged.
aham your father, and unto Sarah that bare you: for
 him, and increased him.
ORD shall comfort Zion: he will comfort all her waste
wilderness like Eden, and her desert like
shall be found therein,
 the voice of melody.
 me, my people; and give ear unto me, O my nation:
 and I will make my judgment to rest
a light of the people.
sness is near; my salvation is gone forth, and mine
e isles shall wait upon me, and on mine
rm shall they trust.
eyes to the heavens, and look upon the earth
away like smoke, and the earth
old like a garment, and they that dwell therein shall die in
lvation shall be for ever, and my righteousness
rken unto me, ye that know righteousness, the people in whose
 ye not the reproach of men, neither be ye afraid
he moth shall eat them up like a garment, and the worm shall
t my righteousness shall be for ever, and my
n.
O arm of the LORD; awake, as in
nt days, in the generations of old. Art thou not it that hath
d the dragon?  51:10 Art thou not it which hath
eat deep; that hath made the depths
e sea a way for the ransomed to pass over?  51:11 Therefore the
D shall return, and come with singing unto Zion;
their head: they shall obtain
d joy; and sorrow and mourning shall flee away.
rteth you: who art thou, that thou
est be afraid of a man that shall die, and of the son of man
 grass; 51:13 And forgettest the LORD thy maker,
ens, and laid the foundations of the
h; and hast feared continually every day because of the fury of
f he were ready to destroy? and where is the fury
ive exile hasteneth that he may be
, and that he should not die in the pit, nor that his bread
ut I am the LORD thy God, that divided the sea, whose waves
ts is his name.
 words in thy mouth, and I have covered thee in
 plant the heavens, and lay the
ns of the earth, and say unto Zion, Thou art my people.
 up, O Jerusalem, which hast drunk at the
u hast drunken the dregs of
embling, and wrung them out.
e is none to guide her among all the sons whom she hath
here any that taketh her by the hand of all
1:19 These two things are come unto thee; who shall be sorry for
 and destruction, and the famine, and the sword: by
20 Thy sons have fainted, they lie at
 head of all the streets, as a wild bull in a net: they are full of
 LORD, the rebuke of thy God.
refore hear now this, thou afflicted, and drunken, but not
ith thy Lord the LORD, and thy God that
leadeth the cause of his people, Behold, I have taken out of thine
trembling, even the dregs of the cup of my fury; thou
 51:23 But I will put it into the hand of
o thy soul, Bow down, that we
: and thou hast laid thy body as the ground, and as the
ver.
ngth, O Zion; put on thy beautiful
ts, O Jerusalem, the holy city: for henceforth there shall no
he uncircumcised and the unclean.
Shake thyself from the dust; arise, and sit down, O Jerusalem:
he bands of thy neck, O captive daughter of Zion.
e have sold yourselves for nought; and
 shall be redeemed without money.
For thus saith the Lord GOD, My people went down aforetime into
ere; and the Assyrian oppressed them without cause.
 I here, saith the LORD, that my people
s taken away for nought? they that rule over them make them to howl,
; and my name continually every day is blasphemed.
 know my name: therefore they shall know
in that day that I am he that doth speak: behold, it is I.
n the mountains are the feet of him that
bringeth good tidings, that publisheth peace; that bringeth good
hat publisheth salvation; that saith unto Zion, Thy
n shall lift up the voice; with the
 together shall they sing: for they shall see eye to eye, when
 again Zion.
 sing together, ye waste places of
lem: for the LORD hath comforted his people, he hath redeemed
he LORD hath made bare his holy arm in the eyes of all the
s of the earth shall see the salvation of our
o ye out from thence, touch no unclean
ing; go ye out of the midst of her; be ye clean, that bear the

te, nor go by flight: for the
o before you; and the God of Israel will be your rereward.
nt shall deal prudently, he shall be exalted and
14 As many were astonied at thee; his visage was so marred more
is form more than the sons of men: 52:15 So shall
gs shall shut their mouths at him:
at which had not been told them shall they see; and that which
hall they consider.
ved our report? and to whom is the arm of the LORD
w up before him as a tender plant, and
 a root out of a dry ground: he hath no form nor comeliness; and
him, there is no beauty that we should desire him.
ed of men; a man of sorrows, and
ed with grief: and we hid as it were our faces from him; he
teemed him not.
ne our griefs, and carried our sorrows: yet we
God, and afflicted.
nded for our transgressions, he was bruised for our
 our peace was upon him; and with his
ipes we are healed.
eep have gone astray; we have turned every one to
id on him the iniquity of us all.
He was oppressed, and he was afflicted, yet he opened not his
as a lamb to the slaughter, and as a sheep before
th not his mouth.
m prison and from judgment: and who shall declare
f out of the land of the living: for
transgression of my people was he stricken.
icked, and with the rich in his
cause he had done no violence, neither was any deceit in his
 pleased the LORD to bruise him; he hath put him to grief:
 soul an offering for sin, he shall see his
e pleasure of the LORD shall
is hand.
ail of his soul, and shall be satisfied:
by his knowledge shall my righteous servant justify many; for he shall
niquities.
e him a portion with the great, and he
all divide the spoil with the strong; because he hath poured out his
h: and he was numbered with the transgressors; and he
e intercession for the transgressors.
4:1 Sing, O barren, thou that didst not bear; break forth into
ud, thou that didst not travail with child: for
te than the children of the married
 saith the LORD.
 of thy tent, and let them stretch forth the
ot, lengthen thy cords, and
y stakes; 54:3 For thou shalt break forth on the right
y seed shall inherit the Gentiles, and
ke the desolate cities to be inhabited.

med: neither be thou
 shalt not be put to shame: for thou shalt forget
 not remember the reproach of thy
od any more.
e husband; the LORD of hosts is his name;
The God of the whole earth
lled.
e as a woman forsaken and grieved in
it, and a wife of youth, when thou wast refused, saith thy God.
moment have I forsaken thee; but with great mercies
a little wrath I hid my face from thee for a moment; but with
will I have mercy on thee, saith the LORD thy
waters of Noah unto me: for as I have sworn
go over the earth; so have I
 would not be wroth with thee, nor rebuke thee.
art, and the hills be removed; but my
dness shall not depart from thee, neither shall the covenant of my
, saith the LORD that hath mercy on thee.
pest, and not comforted,
ay thy stones with fair colours, and lay thy
nd I will make thy windows of agates, and thy gates of
ers of pleasant stones.
hy children shall be taught of the LORD; and great
en.
e established: thou shalt be far
ression; for thou shalt not fear: and from terror; for it

 together, but not by me:
 gather together against thee shall fall for thy sake.
ed the smith that bloweth the coals in the
ent for his work; and I have
waster to destroy.
 is formed against thee shall prosper; and every
e in judgment thou shalt condemn.
 the heritage of the servants of the LORD, and their
the LORD.
teth, come ye to the waters, and he that
hath no money; come ye, buy, and eat; yea, come, buy wine and milk
d without price.
pend money for that which is not bread? and your
ot? hearken diligently unto me, and
e that which is good, and let your soul delight itself in
your ear, and come unto me: hear, and your soul shall
lasting covenant with you, even the sure
mercies of David.
iven him for a witness to the people, a leader
 Behold, thou shalt call a nation that thou knowest not, and
thee shall run unto thee because of the LORD thy
l; for he hath glorified thee.
k ye the LORD while he may be found, call ye upon him while he
e wicked forsake his way, and the unrighteous man
unto the LORD, and he will have mercy
n him; and to our God, for he will abundantly pardon.
t your thoughts, neither are your ways my
heavens are higher than the earth, so are my ways
ughts than your thoughts.
the rain cometh down, and the snow from heaven, and
reth the earth, and maketh it bring
 and bud, that it may give seed to the sower, and bread to the
l my word be that goeth forth out of my mouth: it
t it shall accomplish that which I
, and it shall prosper in the thing whereto I sent it.
with joy, and be led forth with peace: the
h before you into singing, and
ees of the field shall clap their hands.

 the fir tree, and instead of
hall come up the myrtle tree: and it shall be to the LORD
sting sign that shall not be cut off.
6:1 Thus saith the LORD, Keep ye judgment, and do justice: for my
 to come, and my righteousness to be revealed.
 this, and the son of man that
d on it; that keepeth the sabbath from polluting it, and
g any evil.
 the stranger, that hath joined himself to
tterly separated me from his
her let the eunuch say, Behold, I am a dry tree.
o the eunuchs that keep my sabbaths,
choose the things that please me, and take hold of my covenant;
 will I give in mine house and within my walls a
ns and of daughters: I will give
everlasting name, that shall not be cut off.
that join themselves to the LORD,
e him, and to love the name of the LORD, to be his servants,
 the sabbath from polluting it, and taketh hold
 I bring to my holy mountain, and
em joyful in my house of prayer: their burnt offerings and
e accepted upon mine altar; for mine house
ll people.
hereth the outcasts of Israel saith, Yet
will I gather others to him, beside those that are gathered unto him.
 beasts of the field, come to devour, yea, all ye beasts in
s watchmen are blind: they are all ignorant, they are all dumb
rk; sleeping, lying down, loving to slumber.
h can never have enough, and they
pherds that cannot understand: they all look to their own way,
in, from his quarter.
y they, I will fetch wine, and we will fill ourselves
row shall be as this day, and much more
bundant.
and no man layeth it to heart: and
ul men are taken away, none considering that the righteous is
vil to come.
eace: they shall rest in their beds, each
ut draw near hither, ye sons of the sorceress, the seed of the
ore.
selves? against whom make ye a wide
, and draw out the tongue? are ye not children of transgression,
d.
 under every green tree, slaying
dren in the valleys under the clifts of the rocks?  57:6 Among
 the stream is thy portion; they, they are thy
 drink offering, thou hast offered
 offering. Should I receive comfort in these?  57:7 Upon a lofty
hast thou set thy bed: even thither wentest thou up
ind the doors also and the posts hast thou set up thy
scovered thyself to another than me, and
art gone up; thou hast enlarged thy bed, and made thee a covenant with
ovedst their bed where thou sawest it.
57:9 And thou wentest to the king with ointment, and didst increase
nd didst send thy messengers far off, and didst debase
7:10 Thou art wearied in the greatness of thy way; yet saidst thou
 hope: thou hast found the life of thine hand;
57:11 And of whom hast thou been afraid or feared, that thou hast
t remembered me, nor laid it to thy heart? have not I
d thou fearest me not?  57:12 I will
are thy righteousness, and thy works; for they shall not profit
 thou criest, let thy companies deliver thee; but the wind
y; vanity shall take them: but he that putteth
nd, and shall inherit my holy
7:14 And shall say, Cast ye up, cast ye up, prepare the
lock out of the way of my people.
 For thus saith the high and lofty One that inhabiteth eternity,
; I dwell in the high and holy place, with him also
e spirit, to revive the spirit of the
ble, and to revive the heart of the contrite ones.
or ever, neither will I be always wroth:
for the spirit should fail before me, and the souls which I have made.
the iniquity of his covetousness was I wroth, and smote him:
h, and he went on frowardly in the way of his
 and will heal him: I will lead him also,
mourners.
he lips; Peace, peace to him that is far
off, and to him that is near, saith the LORD; and I will heal him.
wicked are like the troubled sea, when it cannot rest,
d dirt.
my God, to the wicked.
spare not, lift up thy voice like a trumpet, and shew
, and the house of Jacob their sins.
:2 Yet they seek me daily, and delight to know my ways, as a nation
ousness, and forsook not the ordinance of their God:
of justice; they take delight in
ing to God.
ed, say they, and thou seest not? wherefore
kest no knowledge? Behold, in
your fast ye find pleasure, and exact all your labours.
strife and debate, and to smite with the fist
e do this day, to make your voice
eard on high.
at I have chosen? a day for a man to afflict
s a bulrush, and to spread
ashes under him? wilt thou call this a fast, and an
:6 Is not this the fast that I have
n? to loose the bands of wickedness, to undo the heavy burdens,
essed go free, and that ye break every yoke?  58:7
he hungry, and that thou bring the
hat are cast out to thy house? when thou seest the naked, that
that thou hide not thyself from thine own flesh?
rth as the morning, and thine health
l spring forth speedily: and thy righteousness shall go before
he LORD shall be thy rereward.
n shalt thou call, and the LORD shall answer; thou shalt cry,
e I am. If thou take away from the midst of thee
 finger, and speaking vanity; 58:10
f thou draw out thy soul to the hungry, and satisfy the afflicted
thy light rise in obscurity, and thy darkness be as
D shall guide thee continually, and
fy thy soul in drought, and make fat thy bones: and thou shalt be
rden, and like a spring of water, whose waters fail
ll be of thee shall build the old waste places:
 of many generations; and thou
alled, The repairer of the breach, The restorer of paths to
hou turn away thy foot from the sabbath, from doing thy
d call the sabbath a delight, the holy of
m, not doing thine own ways,
thine own pleasure, nor speaking thine own words: 58:14
self in the LORD; and I will cause thee to
and feed thee with the
thy father: for the mouth of the LORD hath spoken
nd is not shortened, that it cannot save;
r: 59:2 But your iniquities
d between you and your God, and your sins have hid his
not hear.
ed with blood, and your fingers with
uity; your lips have spoken lies, your tongue hath muttered
one calleth for justice, nor any pleadeth for truth: they trust
k lies; they conceive mischief, and bring forth
rice' eggs, and weave the spider's web: he that
t which is crushed breaketh out
per.
arments, neither shall they cover
ves with their works: their works are works of iniquity, and
 in their hands.
 evil, and they make haste to shed innocent
niquity; wasting and
heir paths.
know not; and there is no judgment in their
hs: whosoever goeth therein
w peace.
 from us, neither doth justice overtake
s: we wait for light, but behold obscurity; for brightness, but we
.
blind, and we grope as if we had
 we stumble at noon day as in the night; we are in desolate
59:11 We roar all like bears, and mourn sore like doves: we look for
there is none; for salvation, but it is far off from us.
ions are multiplied before thee, and our sins
sions are with us; and as for our
ies, we know them; 59:13 In transgressing and lying against the
 away from our God, speaking oppression and revolt,
e heart words of falsehood.
udgment is turned away backward, and justice standeth afar
 in the street, and equity cannot enter.

parteth from evil maketh
and the LORD saw it, and it displeased him that there
 he saw that there was no man, and wondered that there was no
e his arm brought salvation unto him; and his
9:17 For he put on righteousness as a breastplate, and an helmet of
his head; and he put on the garments of vengeance for
eal as a cloak.
r deeds, accordingly he will repay, fury to his
ies; to the islands he will repay
nce.
of the LORD from the west, and his
from the rising of the sun. When the enemy shall come in like a
f the LORD shall lift up a standard against him.
e to Zion, and unto them that turn
ransgression in Jacob, saith the LORD.
59:21 As for me, this is my covenant with them, saith the LORD; My
pon thee, and my words which I have put in thy mouth,
outh, nor out of the mouth of thy seed,
or out of the mouth of thy seed's seed, saith the LORD, from
r.
come, and the glory of the LORD is
upon thee.
ss shall cover the earth, and gross
ess the people: but the LORD shall arise upon thee, and his glory
n thee.
e to thy light, and kings to the
ss of thy rising.
es round about, and see: all they gather
themselves together, they come to thee: thy sons shall come from far,
ters shall be nursed at thy side.
Then thou shalt see, and flow together, and thine heart shall
; because the abundance of the sea shall be
Gentiles shall come unto thee.
 multitude of camels shall cover thee, the dromedaries of
y from Sheba shall come: they shall bring
th the praises of the LORD.
e flocks of Kedar shall be gathered together unto thee, the
minister unto thee: they shall come up with
orify the house of my glory.
re these that fly as a cloud, and as the doves to their
sles shall wait for me, and the ships of
Tarshish first, to bring thy sons from far, their silver and their
unto the name of the LORD thy God, and to the Holy One
lorified thee.
rangers shall build up thy walls, and their
my wrath I smote thee, but in
ave I had mercy on thee.
e thy gates shall be open continually; they shall not be
en may bring unto thee the forces of the
Gentiles, and that their kings may be brought.
hat will not serve thee shall
, those nations shall be utterly wasted.

to thee, the fir tree, the
 the box together, to beautify the place of my
 of my feet glorious.
so of them that afflicted thee shall come bending
ised thee shall bow themselves down
e soles of thy feet; and they shall call thee; The city of the
e Holy One of Israel.
u has been forsaken and hated, so that no man went
n eternal excellency, a joy of many
ations.
milk of the Gentiles, and shalt suck
breast of kings: and thou shalt know that I the LORD am thy
r, the mighty One of Jacob.
rass I will bring gold, and for iron I will bring silver,
or stones iron: I will also make thy officers
ss.
rd in thy land, wasting nor
ithin thy borders; but thou shalt call thy walls

 by day; neither for
 moon give light unto thee: but the LORD shall be
nd thy God thy glory.
ll no more go down; neither shall thy moon withdraw
hine everlasting light, and the days of
hy mourning shall be ended.
eople also shall be all righteous: they shall inherit the
 of my planting, the work of my hands, that I
ne shall become a thousand, and a small one a strong
 it in his time.
 Lord GOD is upon me; because the LORD hath
 the meek; he hath sent me to
 brokenhearted, to proclaim liberty to the captives, and
to them that are bound; 61:2 To proclaim the
ay of vengeance of our God; to
l that mourn; 61:3 To appoint unto them that mourn in Zion,
y for ashes, the oil of joy for mourning, the
eaviness; that they might be
 of righteousness, the planting of the LORD, that he might
d they shall build the old wastes, they shall raise up the
they shall repair the waste cities, the
esolations of many generations.
d strangers shall stand and feed your flocks, and the sons of
ur plowmen and your vinedressers.
But ye shall be named the Priests of the LORD: men shall call you
our God: ye shall eat the riches of the Gentiles, and
 yourselves.
ll have double; and for confusion they shall
 their land they shall possess
: everlasting joy shall be unto them.
1:8 For I the LORD love judgment, I hate robbery for burnt offering;
ect their work in truth, and I will make an everlasting
 And their seed shall be known among the Gentiles, and their
ople: all that see them shall acknowledge them,
RD hath blessed.
ejoice in the LORD, my soul shall be joyful in
the garments of salvation, he hath
d me with the robe of righteousness, as a bridegroom decketh
, and as a bride adorneth herself with her
th forth her bud, and as the garden
th the things that are sown in it to spring forth; so the Lord
eousness and praise to spring forth before all the
 will I not hold my peace, and for Jerusalem's
teousness thereof go forth as
 and the salvation thereof as a lamp that burneth.
e thy righteousness, and all kings thy
ory: and thou shalt be called by a new name, which the mouth of the
.
ory in the hand of the LORD, and
diadem in the hand of thy God.
u shalt no more be termed Forsaken; neither shall thy land any
ate: but thou shalt be called Hephzibah, and thy
th in thee, and thy land shall be
.
rgin, so shall thy sons marry
s the bridegroom rejoiceth over the bride, so shall thy God
2:6 I have set watchmen upon thy walls, O Jerusalem, which shall
eace day nor night: ye that make mention of the
ve him no rest, till he establish,
ll he make Jerusalem a praise in the earth.
 hand, and by the arm of his
rely I will no more give thy corn to be meat for thine
 stranger shall not drink thy wine, for
he which thou hast laboured: 62:9 But they that have gathered it
praise the LORD; and they that have brought it
s of my holiness.
through the gates; prepare ye the way of the
gather out the stones; lift up a
 for the people.
 hath proclaimed unto the end of the world, Say
 thy salvation cometh; behold, his
 is with him, and his work before him.
62:12 And they shall call them, The holy people, The redeemed of the
 shalt be called, Sought out, A city not forsaken.
rom Edom, with dyed garments from
  this that is glorious in his apparel, travelling in the
? I that speak in righteousness, mighty to
thine apparel, and thy garments like
that treadeth in the winefat?  63:3 I have trodden the winepress
people there was none with me: for I will tread them
m in my fury; and their blood shall be
rinkled upon my garments, and I will stain all my raiment.
ngeance is in mine heart, and the year of my
, and there was none to help; and I wondered that
re mine own arm brought salvation
; and my fury, it upheld me.
 will tread down the people in mine anger, and make them
ll bring down their strength to the earth.
es of the LORD, and the praises
RD, according to all that the LORD hath bestowed on us, and
rd the house of Israel, which he hath bestowed
d according to the multitude of
gkindnesses.
hey are my people, children that will not
all their affliction he was afflicted, and the angel of his
 his love and in his pity he redeemed them; and
the days of old.
d, and vexed his holy Spirit: therefore he was
ght against them.
red the days of old, Moses, and his people,
p out of the sea with the
 flock? where is he that put his holy Spirit within
e right hand of Moses with his glorious
rm, dividing the water before them, to make himself an everlasting
t led them through the deep, as an horse in the
umble?  63:14 As a beast goeth down
the valley, the Spirit of the LORD caused him to rest: so didst
e, to make thyself a glorious name.
15 Look down from heaven, and behold from the habitation of thy
 glory: where is thy zeal and thy strength, the
ercies toward me? are they
3:16 Doubtless thou art our father, though Abraham be
knowledge us not: thou, O LORD, art our
ather, our redeemer; thy name is from everlasting.
de us to err from thy ways, and hardened
our heart from thy fear? Return for thy servants' sake, the tribes of
ance.
have possessed it but a little while:
 adversaries have trodden down thy sanctuary.
st rule over them; they were not
y thy name.
rend the heavens, that thou wouldest come
at thy presence, 64:2 As when
 fire burneth, the fire causeth the waters to boil, to make
 adversaries, that the nations may tremble at
errible things which we looked
hou camest down, the mountains flowed down at thy presence.
ginning of the world men have not heard, nor
 eye seen, O God, beside thee,
th prepared for him that waiteth for him.
d worketh righteousness, those
ber thee in thy ways: behold, thou art wroth; for we have
nuance, and we shall be saved.
 we are all as an unclean thing, and all our righteousnesses
d we all do fade as a leaf; and our iniquities,

n thy name, that stirreth up
ake hold of thee: for thou hast hid thy face from us, and
 of our iniquities.
D, thou art our father; we are the clay, and thou
rk of thy hand.
sore, O LORD, neither remember iniquity for
are all thy people.
es are a wilderness, Zion is a wilderness,
y and our beautiful house, where our fathers praised
and all our pleasant things are laid
e.
these things, O LORD? wilt thou
peace, and afflict us very sore?  65:1 I am sought of them
 am found of them that sought me not: I said,
hat was not called by my name.
ave spread out my hands all the day unto a rebellious people,
y that was not good, after their own thoughts;
nger continually to my face; that
ceth in gardens, and burneth incense upon altars of brick; 65:4
the graves, and lodge in the monuments, which eat
nable things is in their vessels;
ich say, Stand by thyself, come not near to me; for I am holier
e a smoke in my nose, a fire that burneth all the
n before me: I will not keep silence, but
ir bosom, 65:7 Your
niquities of your fathers together, saith the
the mountains, and blasphemed me
 hills: therefore will I measure their former work into their
aith the LORD, As the new wine is found in the cluster, and
ot; for a blessing is in it: so will I do for
stroy them all.
orth a seed out of Jacob, and out of Judah an
lect shall inherit it, and my
all dwell there.
 be a fold of flocks, and the valley of Achor a
 for my people that have sought me.
11 But ye are they that forsake the LORD, that forget my holy
e a table for that troop, and that furnish the
65:12 Therefore will I number you to the sword, and ye shall all bow
aughter: because when I called, ye did not answer; when
ut did evil before mine eyes, and did
ose that wherein I delighted not.
 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD, Behold, my servants shall
hungry: behold, my servants shall drink, but ye
ts shall rejoice, but ye shall be
: 65:14 Behold, my servants shall sing for joy of heart, but ye
w of heart, and shall howl for vexation of spirit.
name for a curse unto my chosen: for the
Lord GOD shall slay thee, and call his servants by another name: 65:16
blesseth himself in the earth shall bless himself in the
sweareth in the earth shall swear by the God
are forgotten, and because they
rom mine eyes.
ate new heavens and a new earth: and the
former shall not be remembered, nor come into mind.
ice for ever in that which I create: for,
nd her people a joy.
ejoice in Jerusalem, and joy in my people: and the
e heard in her, nor the voice of

infant of days, nor an old man
not filled his days: for the child shall die an hundred
eing an hundred years old shall be
ed.
and inhabit them; and they shall
neyards, and eat the fruit of them.
22 They shall not build, and another inhabit; they shall not plant,
: for as the days of a tree are the days of my people,
joy the work of their hands.
 shall not labour in vain, nor bring forth for trouble; for
e blessed of the LORD, and their offspring with
 pass, that before they call, I will answer;
l hear.
ll feed together, and the lion shall
straw like the bullock: and dust shall be the serpent's meat. They
or destroy in all my holy mountain, saith the LORD.
 heaven is my throne, and the earth is my
ld unto me? and where is the
rest?  66:2 For all those things hath mine hand made, and
n, saith the LORD: but to this man will I
ontrite spirit, and trembleth

 slew a man; he that sacrificeth
as if he cut off a dog's neck; he that offereth an oblation,
's blood; he that burneth incense, as if he
en their own ways, and their soul delighteth in
will choose their delusions, and will bring their fears
alled, none did answer; when I spake, they
ine eyes, and chose that in
hted not.
D, ye that tremble at his word; Your
hren that hated you, that cast you out for my name's sake, said,
orified: but he shall appear to your joy, and they
e of noise from the city, a voice from the temple, a voice
th recompence to his enemies.
re she travailed, she brought forth; before her pain came,
an child.
ing? who hath seen such things? Shall the
or shall a nation be born at
s soon as Zion travailed, she brought forth her children.
he birth, and not cause to bring forth? saith
h, and shut the womb? saith thy
6:10 Rejoice ye with Jerusalem, and be glad with her, all ye that
 for joy with her, all ye that mourn for her: 66:11
ied with the breasts of her
 that ye may milk out, and be delighted with the
or thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will extend peace to her like
ory of the Gentiles like a flowing stream: then
on her sides, and be dandled upon
es.
teth, so will I comfort you; and ye
 be comforted in Jerusalem.
hen ye see this, your heart shall rejoice, and your bones
rb: and the hand of the LORD shall be known
n toward his enemies.
, the LORD will come with fire, and with his chariots
is anger with fury, and his rebuke with
lames of fire.
 his sword will the LORD plead with all flesh:
any.
s, and purify themselves in the
ehind one tree in the midst, eating swine's flesh, and the
se, shall be consumed together, saith the
 their thoughts: it shall come, that I
ll gather all nations and tongues; and they shall come, and see my
And I will set a sign among them, and I will send those that
e nations, to Tarshish, Pul, and Lud, that draw
e isles afar off, that have not
fame, neither have seen my glory; and they shall declare my
s.
brethren for an offering unto the
t of all nations upon horses, and in chariots, and in litters,
upon swift beasts, to my holy mountain Jerusalem,
f Israel bring an offering in a clean
sel into the house of the LORD.
nd I will also take of them for priests and for Levites, saith
or as the new heavens and the new earth, which I will make,
 saith the LORD, so shall your seed and your
e to pass, that from one new moon to another,
l all flesh come to worship
ith the LORD.
orth, and look upon the carcases of the men
their worm shall not die,
heir fire be quenched; and they shall be an abhorring
Book of the Prophet Jeremiah
words of Jeremiah the son of Hilkiah, of the priests that
and of Benjamin: 1:2 To whom the word of the
n of Amon king of Judah, in the
h year of his reign.
n the days of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of
th year of Zedekiah the son of Josiah
g of Judah, unto the carrying away of Jerusalem captive in the
Then the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 1:5 Before I
ly I knew thee; and before thou camest forth out
 I ordained thee a prophet unto the
ns.
ld, I cannot speak: for I am a
1:7 But the LORD said unto me, Say not, I am a child: for thou shalt
 I shall send thee, and whatsoever I command thee thou
fraid of their faces: for I am with thee to deliver thee,
en the LORD put forth his hand, and touched my mouth. And the
hold, I have put my words in thy mouth.

he nations and over the
 out, and to pull down, and to destroy, and to throw

 unto me, saying, Jeremiah,
ou? And I said, I see a rod of an almond tree.
hou hast well seen: for I will
word to perform it.
f the LORD came unto me the second time, saying,
 a seething pot; and the face
toward the north.
id unto me, Out of the north an evil shall break
the land.
 the families of the kingdoms of the
h, saith the LORD; and they shall come, and they shall set every
the entering of the gates of Jerusalem, and against
ut, and against all the cities of

nst them touching all their
ho have forsaken me, and have burned incense unto other
rks of their own hands.
fore gird up thy loins, and arise, and speak unto them
not dismayed at their faces, lest I
und thee before them.
 I have made thee this day a defenced city, and an
ainst the whole land, against the
f Judah, against the princes thereof, against the priests
people of the land.
 fight against thee; but they shall not prevail
aith the LORD, to deliver thee.
eover the word of the LORD came to me, saying, 2:2 Go and cry
lem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; I remember
ove of thine espousals, when
 after me in the wilderness, in a land that was not sown.
 unto the LORD, and the firstfruits of his
nd; evil shall come upon them,
LORD.
 O house of Jacob, and all the
f the house of Israel: 2:5 Thus saith the LORD, What
nd in me, that they are gone far from
 and have walked after vanity, and are become vain?  2:6 Neither
s the LORD that brought us up out of the land of
derness, through a land of deserts
 pits, through a land of drought, and of the shadow of death,
o man passed through, and where no man dwelt?
l country, to eat the fruit
he goodness thereof; but when ye entered, ye defiled my
e an abomination.
not, Where is the LORD? and they that handle the
transgressed against me, and the
 prophesied by Baal, and walked after things that do not
 will yet plead with you, saith the LORD, and with your
plead.
Chittim, and see; and send unto Kedar,
d consider diligently, and see if there be such a thing.
ed their gods, which are yet no gods? but my
at which doth not profit.
ished, O ye heavens, at this, and be horribly afraid, be
e LORD.
ed two evils; they have forsaken me the
ountain of living waters, and hewed them out cisterns, broken
ld no water.
is he a homeborn slave? why is he spoiled?
d yelled, and they made his
is cities are burned without inhabitant.

anes have broken the crown of

yself, in that thou hast
D thy God, when he led thee by the way?  2:18 And now
ay of Egypt, to drink the waters of
? or what hast thou to do in the way of Assyria, to drink the
 2:19 Thine own wickedness shall correct thee,
hee: know therefore and see that
 evil thing and bitter, that thou hast forsaken the LORD thy
is not in thee, saith the Lord GOD of hosts.
hy yoke, and burst thy bands; and
idst, I will not transgress; when upon every high hill and
hou wanderest, playing the harlot.
 Yet I had planted thee a noble vine, wholly a right seed: how
 into the degenerate plant of a strange vine unto
ee with nitre, and take thee much
et thine iniquity is marked before me, saith the Lord GOD.
y, I am not polluted, I have not gone after
w what thou hast done: thou art
romedary traversing her ways; 2:24 A wild ass used to the
 up the wind at her pleasure; in her occasion
seek her will not weary
r month they shall find her.
old thy foot from being unshod, and thy throat from thirst:
is no hope: no; for I have loved strangers, and
e thief is ashamed when he is found, so is the house of
 kings, their princes, and their priests,
tock, Thou art my father; and to a stone, Thou hast
 turned their back unto me, and not
 face: but in the time of their trouble they will say, Arise, and
But where are thy gods that thou hast made thee? let them arise,
hee in the time of thy trouble: for according to the
ods, O Judah.
ead with me? ye all have transgressed against
ave I smitten your children; they received no
red your prophets, like a
.
 the LORD. Have I been a
Israel? a land of darkness? wherefore say my people,
more unto thee?  2:32 Can a maid forget
er ornaments, or a bride her attire? yet my people have forgotten me
umber.
o seek love? therefore hast thou also
ght the wicked ones thy ways.
 in thy skirts is found the blood of the souls of the poor
und it by secret search, but upon all these.
nnocent, surely his anger shall
 me. Behold, I will plead with thee, because thou sayest, I
6 Why gaddest thou about so much to change thy way? thou also shalt
gypt, as thou wast ashamed of Assyria.
2:37 Yea, thou shalt go forth from him, and thine hands upon thine
RD hath rejected thy confidences, and thou shalt not
ay, If a man put away his wife, and she go from him, and
l he return unto her again? shall not that
played the harlot with many
eturn again to me, saith the LORD.
Lift up thine eyes unto the high places, and see where thou hast
. In the ways hast thou sat for them, as the Arabian
st polluted the land with thy whoredoms
nd with thy wickedness.
he showers have been withholden, and there hath been no
 a whore's forehead, thou refusedst to be
ime cry unto me, My father, thou art the
guide of my youth?  3:5 Will he reserve his anger for ever? will he
end?  Behold, thou hast spoken and done evil things as
RD said also unto me in the days of Josiah the king, Hast
sliding Israel hath done? she is gone up upon
reen tree, and there hath played
ot.
ll these things, Turn thou unto me.
he returned not. And her treacherous sister Judah saw it.
 all the causes whereby backsliding Israel
nd given her a bill of
reacherous sister Judah feared not, but went and
 it came to pass through the lightness of her whoredom, that
and committed adultery with stones and with
r treacherous sister Judah hath not turned
dly, saith the LORD.
said unto me, The backsliding Israel hath justified
udah.
toward the north, and say, Return,
acksliding Israel, saith the LORD; and I will not cause mine
: for I am merciful, saith the LORD, and I will
ly acknowledge thine iniquity, that thou hast transgressed
, and hast scattered thy ways to the strangers
not obeyed my voice, saith the
:14 Turn, O backsliding children, saith the LORD; for I am married
will take you one of a city, and two of a family, and
5 And I will give you pastors according
o mine heart, which shall feed you with knowledge and understanding.
shall come to pass, when ye be multiplied and increased in
 saith the LORD, they shall say no more, The
er shall it come to mind:
hey remember it; neither shall they visit it; neither

alem the throne of the LORD;
nations shall be gathered unto it, to the name of the
hall they walk any more after the
tion of their evil heart.
 days the house of Judah shall walk with the house of
ogether out of the land of the north to
he land that I have given for an inheritance unto your fathers.
How shall I put thee among the children, and give
ritage of the hosts of nations? and I
d, Thou shalt call me, My father; and shalt not turn away from me.
 a wife treacherously departeth from her husband, so
th me, O house of Israel, saith the

laces, weeping and supplications
hildren of Israel: for they have perverted their way, and they
ORD their God.
ing children, and I will heal your
idings.
thou art the LORD our God.
n vain is salvation hoped for from the hills, and from the
truly in the LORD our God is the salvation of
ed the labour of our fathers from our youth;
ns and their daughters.
n in our shame, and our confusion covereth us: for we
our God, we and our fathers, from our
th even unto this day, and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD
 thou wilt return, O Israel, saith the LORD, return unto me: and
way thine abominations out of my sight, then shalt
 shalt swear, The LORD liveth, in truth, in judgment, and
 nations shall bless themselves in him, and
s saith the LORD to the men of Judah and Jerusalem, Break
d sow not among thorns.
yourselves to the LORD, and take away the foreskins of
and inhabitants of Jerusalem: lest my fury
 can quench it, because of the
ur doings.
 publish in Jerusalem; and say, Blow ye
he trumpet in the land: cry, gather together, and say, Assemble
 us go into the defenced cities.
t up the standard toward Zion: retire, stay not: for I will
th, and a great destruction.
on is come up from his thicket, and the destroyer of the
 is gone forth from his place to make thy
id waste, without an
or this gird you with sackcloth, lament and howl: for the fierce
is not turned back from us.
shall come to pass at that day, saith the LORD, that the
rish, and the heart of the princes; and the
ophets shall wonder.
Ah, Lord GOD! surely thou hast greatly deceived this
Ye shall have peace; whereas the sword
acheth unto the soul.
 shall it be said to this people and to Jerusalem, A
 the wilderness toward the daughter of
 people, not to fan, nor to cleanse, 4:12 Even a full wind from
come unto me: now also will I give sentence against
come up as clouds, and his chariots shall be as
 than eagles. Woe unto us! for we
iled.
t from wickedness, that thou mayest
ved. How long shall thy vain thoughts lodge within thee?  4:15
h from Dan, and publisheth affliction from mount
o the nations; behold, publish against
rusalem, that watchers come from a far country, and give out their
e cities of Judah.
 field, are they against her round about; because
me, saith the LORD.
y doings have procured these things unto thee; this
s bitter, because it reacheth unto
heart.
pained at my very heart; my heart
a noise in me; I cannot hold my peace, because thou hast heard,
d of the trumpet, the alarm of war.
0 Destruction upon destruction is cried; for the whole land is
e my tents spoiled, and my curtains in a moment.
andard, and hear the sound of the
?  4:22 For my people is foolish, they have not known me; they
, and they have none understanding: they are wise
ave no knowledge.
th, and, lo, it was without form, and void; and

they trembled, and all the hills
ghtly.
s no man, and all the birds of the
s were fled.
e fruitful place was a wilderness, and all
he presence of the LORD, and
e anger.
id, The whole land shall be desolate;
 will I not make a full end.
his shall the earth mourn, and the heavens above be black;
, I have purposed it, and will not repent,
9 The whole city shall flee for the noise of the horsemen and
 into thickets, and climb up upon the rocks:
a man dwell therein.
 art spoiled, what wilt thou do? Though thou
thou deckest thee with ornaments
 though thou rentest thy face with painting, in vain shalt
thy lovers will despise thee, they will seek
oice as of a woman in travail, and the
guish as of her that bringeth forth her first child, the voice of
ion, that bewaileth herself, that spreadeth her
y soul is wearied because of

s of Jerusalem, and see now,
d seek in the broad places thereof, if ye can find a man,
uteth judgment, that seeketh the truth; and I
y say, The LORD liveth; surely they swear falsely.
 upon the truth? thou hast stricken
 but they have not grieved; thou hast consumed them, but they
ve correction: they have made their faces harder
return.
ese are poor; they are foolish: for
know not the way of the LORD, nor the judgment of their God.
to the great men, and will speak unto them; for
, and the judgment of their God:
e have altogether broken the yoke, and burst the bonds.
of the forest shall slay them, and a wolf of
rd shall watch over their
ne that goeth out thence shall be torn in pieces:
many, and their backslidings are
d.
? thy children have forsaken me,
n by them that are no gods: when I had fed them to the full,
ultery, and assembled themselves by troops in
 as fed horses in the morning: every one neighed after
 Shall I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: and shall not
ed on such a nation as this?  5:10 Go ye up upon her
ot a full end: take away her
 for they are not the LORD's.
the house of Israel and the house of Judah have dealt very
, saith the LORD.
 the LORD, and said, It is not he; neither shall
e see sword nor famine: 5:13 And the
hets shall become wind, and the word is not in them: thus shall it
m.
od of hosts, Because ye speak this
behold, I will make my words in thy mouth fire, and this people
devour them.
tion upon you from far, O house of Israel,
t is an ancient nation, a
nguage thou knowest not, neither understandest what
is as an open sepulchre, they are all mighty men.
e harvest, and thy bread, which thy
and thy daughters should eat: they shall eat up thy flocks and
all eat up thy vines and thy fig trees: they shall
erein thou trustedst, with the sword.
:18 Nevertheless in those days, saith the LORD, I will not make a
.
ye shall say, Wherefore doeth the
r God all these things unto us? then shalt thou answer them,
en me, and served strange gods in your land, so
that is not your's.
n the house of Jacob, and publish it in Judah,
h people, and without
h have eyes, and see not; which have ears, and hear
 the LORD: will ye not tremble at my
ence, which have placed the sand for the bound of the sea by a
at it cannot pass it: and though the waves thereof
t prevail; though they roar, yet can
 not pass over it?  5:23 But this people hath a revolting and a
hey are revolted and gone.
 say they in their heart, Let us now fear the LORD our
the former and the latter, in his season:
of the harvest.
ve turned away these things, and your sins have

 men: they lay wait, as he
nares; they set a trap, they catch men.

heir houses full of deceit:
y are become great, and waxen rich.
8 They are waxen fat, they shine: yea, they overpass the deeds of
judge not the cause, the cause of the fatherless, yet
f the needy do they not judge.
ll I not visit for these things? saith the LORD: shall not my
ch a nation as this?  5:30 A wonderful and
 5:31 The prophets prophesy
the priests bear rule by their means; and my people love
ll ye do in the end thereof?  6:1 O ye
ildren of Benjamin, gather yourselves to flee out of the midst of
ow the trumpet in Tekoa, and set up a sign of fire in
eth out of the north, and great
on.
Zion to a comely and delicate
:3 The shepherds with their flocks shall come unto her; they shall
s against her round about; they shall feed every one
e war against her; arise, and let us go up at noon. Woe
away, for the shadows of the evening are
stretched out.
 by night, and let us destroy her palaces.
id, Hew ye down trees, and cast
gainst Jerusalem: this is the city to be visited; she is
idst of her.
out her waters, so she casteth out her
ckedness: violence and spoil is heard in her; before me continually
unds.
em, lest my soul depart from thee;
 make thee desolate, a land not inhabited.
 shall throughly glean the
ael as a vine: turn back thine hand as a grapegatherer
 whom shall I speak, and give warning, that they may hear?
ircumcised, and they cannot hearken: behold,
proach; they have no delight in
11 Therefore I am full of the fury of the LORD; I am weary with
pour it out upon the children abroad, and upon the
for even the husband with the wife
be taken, the aged with him that is full of days.
turned unto others, with their fields
 wives together: for I will stretch out my hand upon the
aith the LORD.
of them even unto the greatest of them every
 the prophet even unto the
ne dealeth falsely.
ed also the hurt of the daughter of my people
there is no peace.
ed when they had committed abomination? nay, they
could they blush: therefore they
ll among them that fall: at the time that I visit them they
th the LORD.
Stand ye in the ways, and see, and ask for
d walk therein, and ye shall
r your souls. But they said, We will not walk therein.
ver you, saying, Hearken to the sound of the
arken.
 and know, O congregation, what is
them.
l bring evil upon this people, even
ruit of their thoughts, because they have not hearkened unto my
w, but rejected it.
e cometh there to me incense from Sheba, and the
r burnt offerings are not
 your sacrifices sweet unto me.
erefore thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will lay stumblingblocks
 and the fathers and the sons together shall fall
friend shall perish.
e LORD, Behold, a people cometh from the north
 raised from the sides of the
:23 They shall lay hold on bow and spear; they are cruel, and have no
voice roareth like the sea; and they ride upon horses,
against thee, O daughter of Zion.
We have heard the fame thereof: our hands wax feeble: anguish
, and pain, as of a woman in travail.
:25 Go not forth into the field, nor walk by the way; for the sword
d fear is on every side.
r of my people, gird thee with sackcloth, and wallow
urning, as for an only son, most bitter
amentation: for the spoiler shall suddenly come upon us.
 a tower and a fortress among my people, that

lking with slanders: they are
ron; they are all corrupters.
bellows are burned, the lead is consumed of the fire; the
for the wicked are not plucked away.
30 Reprobate silver shall men call them, because the LORD hath
1 The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 7:2 Stand in
e LORD's house, and proclaim there this word, and say,
ll ye of Judah, that enter in at these
tes to worship the LORD.
 the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, Amend your ways
cause you to dwell in this place.
rust ye not in lying words, saying, The temple of the LORD, The
 The temple of the LORD, are these.
 For if ye throughly amend your ways and your doings; if ye
ent between a man and his neighbour; 7:6 If ye
less, and the widow, and shed not
t blood in this place, neither walk after other gods to your
cause you to dwell in this place, in the land
 and ever.
g words, that cannot profit.
e steal, murder, and commit adultery, and swear falsely, and
, and walk after other gods whom ye know not;
this house, which is called by my
nd say, We are delivered to do all these abominations?  7:11 Is
s called by my name, become a den of robbers in
 it, saith the LORD.
 unto my place which was in Shiloh, where I set my
I did to it for the wickedness of my
le Israel.
e done all these works, saith the LORD,
nd I spake unto you, rising up early and speaking, but ye heard not;
ou, but ye answered not; 7:14 Therefore will I do unto
by my name, wherein ye trust, and unto the
thers, as I have done to
And I will cast you out of my sight, as I have cast out all your
 whole seed of Ephraim.
pray not thou for this people, neither lift up cry nor
e intercession to me: for I will not hear
 in the cities of Judah and in the
s of Jerusalem?  7:18 The children gather wood, and the fathers
d the women knead their dough, to make cakes to the
t drink offerings unto other gods, that
hey may provoke me to anger.
ey provoke me to anger? saith the LORD: do they not provoke
sion of their own faces?  7:20 Therefore thus
r and my fury shall be poured out
is place, upon man, and upon beast, and upon the trees of the
ruit of the ground; and it shall burn, and shall
h the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Put your burnt
es, and eat flesh.
 unto your fathers, nor commanded them in the day
nd of Egypt, concerning burnt
r sacrifices: 7:23 But this thing commanded I them, saying,
ll be your God, and ye shall be my people: and
commanded you, that it may be well
ou.
clined their ear, but walked in the
els and in the imagination of their evil heart, and went

ame forth out of the land of
his day I have even sent unto you all my servants the
ly and sending them: 7:26 Yet they
ned not unto me, nor inclined their ear, but hardened their
an their fathers.
halt speak all these words unto them; but they
 also call unto them; but they
nswer thee.
o them, This is a nation that obeyeth not
iveth correction: truth is
is cut off from their mouth.
ff thine hair, O Jerusalem, and cast it away, and take up a
ces; for the LORD hath rejected and forsaken
or the children of Judah have done evil in my sight, saith the
their abominations in the house which is called by
And they have built the high places of Tophet, which is in the
 Hinnom, to burn their sons and their daughters in
 not, neither came it into my heart.
32 Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall
d Tophet, nor the valley of the son of Hinnom, but the
y shall bury in Tophet, till there be no
place.
ople shall be meat for the fowls of
eaven, and for the beasts of the earth; and none shall fray them
 will I cause to cease from the cities of Judah, and from the
 the voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness,
e voice of the bride: for the land
be desolate.
e LORD, they shall bring out the bones of
princes, and the bones of the
d the bones of the prophets, and the bones of the
their graves: 8:2 And they shall
hem before the sun, and the moon, and all the host of heaven,
 and whom they have served, and after whom they
ght, and whom they have worshipped:
shall not be gathered, nor be buried; they shall be for dung upon
arth.
her than life by all the residue of
that remain of this evil family, which remain in all the places
en them, saith the LORD of hosts.
oreover thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD; Shall they
se? shall he turn away, and not return?  8:5 Why then
lidden back by a perpetual backsliding?
hey hold fast deceit, they refuse to return.
spake not aright: no man repented
his wickedness, saying, What have I done? every one turned to
rse rusheth into the battle.
he stork in the heaven knoweth her appointed times; and the
d the swallow observe the time of their coming;
 of the LORD.
 wise, and the law of the LORD is with us?
n of the scribes is in vain.
se men are ashamed, they are dismayed and taken: lo, they
 the LORD; and what wisdom is in them?  8:10
 others, and their fields to
all inherit them: for every one from the least even unto
ovetousness, from the prophet even unto the
11 For they have healed the hurt of the daughter of my people
ce, peace; when there is no peace.
 Were they ashamed when they had committed abomination? nay, they
shamed, neither could they blush: therefore shall
n the time of their visitation they
 be cast down, saith the LORD.
ill surely consume them, saith the LORD: there shall be no
figs on the fig tree, and the leaf shall fade;
m shall pass away from them.
o we sit still? assemble yourselves, and let us enter into
 let us be silent there: for the LORD our God
water of gall to drink, because
inned against the LORD.
for peace, but no good came; and for a time of health,
e snorting of his horses was heard from
an: the whole land trembled at the sound of the neighing of his
ey are come, and have devoured the land, and all
 that dwell therein.
I will send serpents, cockatrices, among you, which
hall bite you, saith the LORD.
n I would comfort myself against sorrow, my heart is faint in
e voice of the cry of the daughter of my people because
 country: Is not the LORD in Zion? is not
e to anger with their graven
with strange vanities?  8:20 The harvest is past, the
ot saved.
hter of my people am I hurt; I am black;
astonishment hath taken hold on me.
2 Is there no balm in Gilead; is there no physician there? why then
th of the daughter of my people recovered?  9:1 Oh that
ne eyes a fountain of tears, that I might
aughter of my people!  9:2 Oh
in the wilderness a lodging place of wayfaring men; that I
nd go from them! for they be all adulterers,
 And they bend their tongues like their bow for lies: but they are
the truth upon the earth; for they proceed from evil
 saith the LORD.
 one of his neighbour, and trust ye not in any
rly supplant, and every neighbour
lk with slanders.
eive every one his neighbour, and will not speak
tongue to speak lies, and weary
s to commit iniquity.
ion is in the midst of deceit; through deceit they
D.
 hosts, Behold, I will melt them,
 them; for how shall I do for the daughter of my people?  9:8
 arrow shot out; it speaketh deceit: one speaketh
is mouth, but in heart he layeth his
.
things? saith the LORD: shall not
 be avenged on such a nation as this?  9:10 For the mountains
ing and wailing, and for the habitations of the
hey are burned up, so that none can
through them; neither can men hear the voice of the cattle; both
avens and the beast are fled; they are gone.
, and a den of dragons; and I will
he cities of Judah desolate, without an inhabitant.
t may understand this? and who is he to
hom the mouth of the LORD hath spoken, that he may declare it, for
risheth and is burned up like a wilderness, that none
e LORD saith, Because they have forsaken
my law which I set before them, and have not obeyed my voice, neither
n; 9:14 But have walked after the imagination of their
 which their fathers taught them: 9:15
erefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I
even this people, with wormwood, and give them water
ll scatter them also among the heathen, whom neither they nor
own: and I will send a sword after them, till I
ith the LORD of hosts, Consider ye, and call for the
come; and send for cunning women, that
ey may come: 9:18 And let them make haste, and take up a wailing for
yes may run down with tears, and our eyelids gush out
ice of wailing is heard out of Zion, How are we spoiled!
 because we have forsaken the land, because
 Yet hear the word of the LORD, O ye women, and let your ear
s mouth, and teach your daughters wailing, and

dows, and is entered into our
 cut off the children from without, and the young men from
ak, Thus saith the LORD, Even the carcases of men shall fall
field, and as the handful after the harvestman,
 Thus saith the LORD, Let not the wise man glory in his wisdom,
hty man glory in his might, let not the rich man
him that glorieth glory in this,
understandeth and knoweth me, that I am the LORD which
gment, and righteousness, in the earth:
or in these things I delight, saith the LORD.
he LORD, that I will punish all
h are circumcised with the uncircumcised; 9:26 Egypt, and
children of Ammon, and Moab, and all that are
the wilderness: for all these
 uncircumcised, and all the house of Israel are
 Hear ye the word which the LORD speaketh unto you, O house of
ith the LORD, Learn not the way of the heathen,
 heaven; for the heathen are
them.
e are vain: for one cutteth a tree
 the forest, the work of the hands of the workman, with the axe.
t with silver and with gold; they fasten it with nails
ve not.
lm tree, but speak not: they must needs
e borne, because they cannot go. Be not afraid of them; for they
ither also is it in them to do good.
:6 Forasmuch as there is none like unto thee, O LORD; thou art
is great in might.
ear thee, O King of nations? for to thee doth it
the wise men of the nations, and in
heir kingdoms, there is none like unto thee.
 and foolish: the stock is a
vanities.
s is brought from Tarshish, and gold from
e hands of the founder: blue
s their clothing: they are all the work of cunning men.
 true God, he is the living God, and an
verlasting king: at his wrath the earth shall tremble, and the
 able to abide his indignation.
hus shall ye say unto them, The gods that have not made the
even they shall perish from the earth, and from
th made the earth by his power, he hath established the
th stretched out the heavens by his
etion.
, there is a multitude of waters in
eavens, and he causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the
lightnings with rain, and bringeth forth the wind out
ery man is brutish in his knowledge: every founder is
e: for his molten image is falsehood, and
 are vanity, and the work of errors: in the time of their
ish.
like them: for he is the former of
ings; and Israel is the rod of his inheritance: The LORD of
0:17 Gather up thy wares out of the land, O inhabitant of the
r thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will sling out the
 once, and will distress them, that
may find it so.
hurt! my wound is grievous; but I said, Truly

 my cords are broken: my
e forth of me, and they are not: there is none to
nd to set up my curtains.
 pastors are become brutish, and have not sought the
 prosper, and all their flocks shall be
cattered.
e bruit is come, and a great commotion
t of the north country, to make the cities of Judah desolate, and a

an is not in himself: it is not
at walketh to direct his steps.
 LORD, correct me, but with judgment; not in thine anger, lest
hing.
heathen that know thee not, and upon
families that call not on thy name: for they have eaten up Jacob,
 and consumed him, and have made his habitation
e to Jeremiah from the LORD saying, 11:2 Hear ye
eak unto the men of Judah, and to
abitants of Jerusalem; 11:3 And say thou unto them, Thus saith
el; Cursed be the man that obeyeth not the words
manded your fathers in the day that
ught them forth out of the land of Egypt, from the iron furnace,
ice, and do them, according to all which I command
nd I will be your God: 11:5 That I may
rform the oath which I have sworn unto your fathers, to give them a
th milk and honey, as it is this day. Then answered I,

im all these words in the
, and in the streets of Jerusalem, saying, Hear ye the
do them.
 unto your fathers in the day that I
ght them up out of the land of Egypt, even unto this day, rising
ng, saying, Obey my voice.
y obeyed not, nor inclined their ear, but walked every one
eir evil heart: therefore I will bring upon
ich I commanded them to do: but
them not.
e, A conspiracy is found among the men of
alem.
 iniquities of their forefathers,
efused to hear my words; and they went after other gods to
 Israel and the house of Judah have broken my
ers.
D, Behold, I will bring evil upon
hich they shall not be able to escape; and though they shall
t hearken unto them.
he cities of Judah and inhabitants of Jerusalem go,
 they offer incense: but they shall not
ave them at all in the time of their trouble.
f thy cities were thy gods, O
according to the number of the streets of Jerusalem have ye
hameful thing, even altars to burn incense unto
hou for this people, neither lift up a cry
them in the time that they cry
r their trouble.
oved to do in mine house, seeing she hath
flesh is passed from thee?
t evil, then thou rejoicest.
LORD called thy name, A green olive tree, fair, and of
 of a great tumult he hath kindled fire
pon it, and the branches of it are broken.
ted thee, hath pronounced evil
ee, for the evil of the house of Israel and of the house of
done against themselves to provoke me to anger
:18 And the LORD hath given me knowledge of it, and I know it: then
e their doings.
lamb or an ox that is brought to the slaughter;
d devices against me, saying, Let
roy the tree with the fruit thereof, and let us cut him off
ving, that his name may be no more remembered.
udgest righteously, that triest the
 and the heart, let me see thy vengeance on them: for unto thee
cause.
ORD of the men of Anathoth, that seek
 life, saying, Prophesy not in the name of the LORD, that thou die
 11:22 Therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts, Behold,
g men shall die by the sword; their sons
and their daughters shall die by famine: 11:23 And there shall be no
m: for I will bring evil upon the men of Anathoth, even
n.
n I plead with thee: yet let me
 thee of thy judgments: Wherefore doth the way of the wicked
e all they happy that deal very treacherously?
ey have taken root: they grow,
bring forth fruit: thou art near in their mouth, and far
But thou, O LORD, knowest me: thou hast seen me, and tried mine
pull them out like sheep for the slaughter, and
er.
 and the herbs of every field
 the wickedness of them that dwell therein? the beasts are
 because they said, He shall not see our last
e footmen, and they have wearied thee,
en how canst thou contend with horses? and if in the land of peace,
ustedst, they wearied thee, then how wilt thou do in
For even thy brethren, and the house of
hy father, even they have dealt treacherously with thee; yea, they
ltitude after thee: believe them not, though they
:7 I have forsaken mine house, I have left mine heritage; I have
eloved of my soul into the hand of her enemies.
a lion in the forest; it crieth out
st me: therefore have I hated it.
Mine heritage is unto me as a speckled bird, the birds round
 come ye, assemble all the beasts of the field,
rs have destroyed my vineyard, they have trodden my
ade my pleasant portion a desolate
ness.
 and being desolate it mourneth unto
the whole land is made desolate, because no man layeth it to
oilers are come upon all high places through the
ORD shall devour from the one end of
land even to the other end of the land: no flesh shall have peace.
e sown wheat, but shall reap thorns: they have put
t profit: and they shall be ashamed of
ur revenues because of the fierce anger of the LORD.
ainst all mine evil neighbours, that touch
eople Israel to inherit;
luck them out of their land, and pluck out the house
2:15 And it shall come to pass, after that I have plucked them out I
nd have compassion on them, and will bring them again,
nd every man to his land.
shall come to pass, if they will diligently learn the
y my name, The LORD liveth; as they
t my people to swear by Baal; then shall they be built in the

utterly pluck up and destroy
 saith the LORD.
RD unto me, Go and get thee a linen girdle, and
ot in water.
ording to the word of the LORD, and put it
 LORD came unto me the second time, saying,
, which is upon thy loins, and
to Euphrates, and hide it there in a hole of the rock.
 by Euphrates, as the LORD commanded me.

, that the LORD said unto me,
o Euphrates, and take the girdle from thence, which I

ged, and took the girdle from
here I had hid it: and, behold, the girdle was marred, it
g.
unto me, saying, 13:9 Thus saith
, After this manner will I mar the pride of Judah, and the
.
to hear my words, which walk in
nation of their heart, and walk after other gods, to serve
m, shall even be as this girdle, which is good
dle cleaveth to the loins of a man, so have I
use of Israel and the whole house
h, saith the LORD; that they might be unto me for a people, and
 a praise, and for a glory: but they would not
speak unto them this word; Thus saith the
 filled with wine: and they
o thee, Do we not certainly know that every bottle shall
3 Then shalt thou say unto them, Thus saith
nhabitants of this land, even
hat sit upon David's throne, and the priests, and the
ants of Jerusalem, with drunkenness.
:14 And I will dash them one against another, even the fathers and
r, saith the LORD: I will not pity, nor spare, nor

: for the LORD hath spoken.
glory to the LORD your God, before he cause darkness, and
upon the dark mountains, and, while ye look
f death, and make it gross
3:17 But if ye will not hear it, my soul shall weep in secret places
; and mine eye shall weep sore, and run down with tears,
s carried away captive.
the king and to the queen, Humble yourselves, sit down:
ll come down, even the crown of your glory.
e shut up, and none shall open
h shall be carried away captive all of it, it shall be

em that come from the north:
 flock that was given thee, thy beautiful flock?  13:21
shall punish thee? for thou hast taught
hem to be captains, and as chief over thee: shall not sorrows take
 in travail?  13:22 And if thou say in thine heart,
n me?  For the greatness of thine
y are thy skirts discovered, and thy heels made bare.
nge his skin, or the leopard his spots?
hen may ye also do good, that are accustomed to do evil.
catter them as the stubble that passeth away
5 This is thy lot, the portion of thy measures from me, saith the
u hast forgotten me, and trusted in falsehood.
y skirts upon thy face, that thy
y appear.
eries, and thy neighings, the lewdness of
he hills in the fields. Woe
Jerusalem! wilt thou not be made clean? when shall it
e LORD that came to Jeremiah concerning
he dearth.
 gates thereof languish; they are black
nto the ground; and the cry of Jerusalem is gone up.
ent their little ones to the waters: they
y returned with their vessels
 were ashamed and confounded, and covered their heads.
 chapt, for there was no rain in the earth,
their heads.
lved in the field, and forsook it, because
 asses did stand in the high places, they snuffed up
yes did fail, because there was no

tify against us, do thou it for
s sake: for our backslidings are many; we have sinned against
ope of Israel, the saviour thereof in time of trouble, why
tranger in the land, and as a wayfaring man
?  14:9 Why shouldest thou be
tonied, as a mighty man that cannot save? yet thou, O LORD,
 and we are called by thy name; leave us not.
 people, Thus have they loved to
they have not refrained their feet, therefore the LORD doth
l now remember their iniquity, and visit their
to me, Pray not for this people for their
 hear their cry; and when they offer
t offering and an oblation, I will not accept them: but I will
sword, and by the famine, and by the pestilence.
 behold, the prophets say unto them,
hall not see the sword, neither shall ye have famine; but I will
eace in this place.
 said unto me, The prophets prophesy lies in my
 I commanded them, neither spake
m: they prophesy unto you a false vision and divination, and a
 the deceit of their heart.
fore thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that
nt them not, yet they say, Sword and
ne shall not be in this land; By sword and famine shall those

hesy shall be cast out in the
Jerusalem because of the famine and the sword; and they
m, them, their wives, nor their sons, nor
ckedness upon them.
u shalt say this word unto them; Let mine eyes run
nd let them not cease: for the virgin
ghter of my people is broken with a great breach, with a very
18 If I go forth into the field, then behold the slain with the
ter into the city, then behold them that are sick
et and the priest go about into a
at they know not.
ly rejected Judah? hath thy soul lothed Zion? why
s no healing for us? we looked for
 and there is no good; and for the time of healing, and behold
cknowledge, O LORD, our wickedness, and the
nned against thee.
s, for thy name's sake, do not disgrace the throne
t thy covenant with us.
 any among the vanities of the Gentiles that can cause
e showers? art not thou he, O LORD our
d?  therefore we will wait upon thee: for thou hast made all these
Then said the LORD unto me, Though Moses and Samuel stood before
uld not be toward this people: cast them out of my

ay unto thee, Whither shall
then thou shalt tell them, Thus saith the LORD; Such as
d such as are for the sword, to the sword;
amine; and such as are for the
 to the captivity.
int over them four kinds, saith the LORD: the
and the fowls of the heaven, and
ts of the earth, to devour and destroy.

into all kingdoms of the
f Manasseh the son of Hezekiah king of Judah, for that

O Jerusalem? or who shall
 who shall go aside to ask how thou doest?  15:6 Thou
ORD, thou art gone backward: therefore
ll I stretch out my hand against thee, and destroy thee; I am weary

 the gates of the land; I will
em of children, I will destroy my people since they return
15:8 Their widows are increased to me above the sand of the seas: I
on them against the mother of the young men a spoiler
 to fall upon it suddenly, and terrors
on the city.
even languisheth: she hath given up the
host; her sun is gone down while it was yet day: she hath been
ed: and the residue of them will I deliver to the
 the LORD.
that thou hast borne me a man of strife
nd a man of contention to the whole earth! I have neither lent on
ve lent to me on usury; yet every one of them doth
, Verily it shall be well with thy remnant; verily
t thee well in the time of evil and in
e time of affliction.
break the northern iron and the steel?  15:13 Thy
I give to the spoil without price,
at for all thy sins, even in all thy borders.
with thine enemies into a land
 knowest not: for a fire is kindled in mine anger, which
:15 O LORD, thou knowest: remember me, and visit me, and revenge me
rs; take me not away in thy longsuffering: know that
ebuke.
I did eat them; and thy word was unto
the joy and rejoicing of mine heart: for I am called by thy name, O
ts.
the mockers, nor rejoiced; I sat
cause of thy hand: for thou hast filled me with indignation.
 perpetual, and my wound incurable, which refuseth
ether unto me as a liar, and as waters
at fail?  15:19 Therefore thus saith the LORD, If thou return, then
ee again, and thou shalt stand before me: and if thou
the vile, thou shalt be as my mouth: let
them return unto thee; but return not thou unto them.
unto this people a fenced brasen wall: and
shall not prevail against
with thee to save thee and to deliver thee, saith the
iver thee out of the hand of the wicked, and I
the terrible.
 came also unto me, saying, 16:2 Thou shalt
u have sons or daughters in

the sons and concerning the
t are born in this place, and concerning their mothers
ng their fathers that begat them in this
land; 16:4 They shall die of grievous deaths; they shall not be
hall they be buried; but they shall be as dung upon
 shall be consumed by the sword, and by
amine; and their carcases shall be meat for the fowls of heaven, and
 of the earth.
LORD, Enter not into the house of mourning,
or I have taken away my peace
eople, saith the LORD, even lovingkindness and mercies.
he small shall die in this land: they shall
 for them, nor cut themselves,
hemselves bald for them: 16:7 Neither shall men tear
g, to comfort them for the dead; neither
shall men give them the cup of consolation to drink for their father
other.
 the house of feasting, to sit with
to eat and to drink.
h the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I
lace in your eyes, and in your days,
voice of mirth, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the
ce of the bride.
e to pass, when thou shalt shew this people all
o thee, Wherefore hath the LORD
d all this great evil against us? or what is our iniquity? or
we have committed against the LORD our God?
cause your fathers have
h the LORD, and have walked after other gods, and
pped them, and have forsaken me, and
 not kept my law; 16:12 And ye have done worse than your fathers;
alk every one after the imagination of his evil
to me: 16:13 Therefore will I cast
t of this land into a land that ye know not, neither ye nor your
 shall ye serve other gods day and night; where I
4 Therefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that it shall
The LORD liveth, that brought up the children of
6:15 But, The LORD liveth, that
p the children of Israel from the land of the north, and from
 he had driven them: and I will bring them again
heir fathers.
 for many fishers, saith the LORD, and they
for many hunters, and they
m from every mountain, and from every hill, and out of
6:17 For mine eyes are upon all their ways: they are not hid from my
is their iniquity hid from mine eyes.
6:18 And first I will recompense their iniquity and their sin double;
have defiled my land, they have filled mine inheritance
detestable and abominable things.
 O LORD, my strength, and my fortress, and my refuge in the day
Gentiles shall come unto thee from the ends of the
 fathers have inherited lies, vanity,
 things wherein there is no profit.
20 Shall a man make gods unto himself, and they are no gods?  16:21
ld, I will this once cause them to know, I will cause
 might; and they shall know that my name
is The LORD.
ritten with a pen of iron, and with the
oint of a diamond: it is graven upon the table of their heart, and
f your altars; 17:2 Whilst their children remember
 the green trees upon the high hills.
7:3 O my mountain in the field, I will give thy substance and all thy
the spoil, and thy high places for sin, throughout all
u, even thyself, shalt discontinue from thine heritage
 cause thee to serve thine enemies in the
kindled a fire in mine anger,
 burn for ever.
D; Cursed be the man that trusteth in man, and
t departeth from the LORD.
shall be like the heath in the desert, and shall not see
l inhabit the parched places in the
rness, in a salt land and not inhabited.

 the LORD, and whose hope the

 the waters, and that
oots by the river, and shall not see when heat
 and shall not be careful in the
drought, neither shall cease from yielding fruit.
ve all things, and desperately wicked:
o can know it?  17:10 I the LORD search the heart, I try the reins,
ery man according to his ways, and according to the
s the partridge sitteth on eggs, and hatcheth them not; so he
and not by right, shall leave them in the midst
e a fool.
from the beginning is the place of our
nctuary.
el, all that forsake thee shall be
d, and they that depart from me shall be written in the earth,
rsaken the LORD, the fountain of living waters.
l be healed; save me, and I shall be
d: for thou art my praise.
, they say unto me, Where is the word of the LORD? let it
 me, I have not hastened from being a pastor to follow
 the woeful day; thou knowest: that which
.
rt my hope in the day of evil.
t them be confounded that persecute me, but let not me be
ismayed, but let not me be dismayed: bring
hem with double destruction.
 said the LORD unto me; Go and stand in the gate of the
reby the kings of Judah come in, and by the
 of Jerusalem; 17:20 And say
ear ye the word of the LORD, ye kings of Judah, and all
nts of Jerusalem, that enter in by these
gates: 17:21 Thus saith the LORD; Take heed to yourselves, and bear no
e sabbath day, nor bring it in by the gates of Jerusalem;
 a burden out of your houses on the sabbath
 ye the sabbath day, as I
fathers.
ther inclined their ear, but made their
eck stiff, that they might not hear, nor receive instruction.
come to pass, if ye diligently hearken unto me,
en through the gates of this city
sabbath day, but hallow the sabbath day, to do no work therein;
ere enter into the gates of this city kings and
David, riding in chariots and on
they, and their princes, the men of Judah, and the inhabitants
is city shall remain for ever.
d they shall come from the cities of Judah, and from the
d from the land of Benjamin, and from the
he south, bringing burnt
acrifices, and meat offerings, and incense, and
 the house of the LORD.
 will not hearken unto me to hallow the sabbath day,
 entering in at the gates of Jerusalem
 the sabbath day; then will I kindle a fire in the gates thereof,
ur the palaces of Jerusalem, and it shall not be
ame to Jeremiah from the LORD, saying, 18:2
e, and there I will cause thee
 words.
tter's house, and, behold, he wrought a
ork on the wheels.
that he made of clay was marred in the hand of the
her vessel, as seemed good to the
to make it.
ORD came to me, saying, 18:6 O house of
srael, cannot I do with you as this potter? saith the LORD. Behold,
in the potter's hand, so are ye in mine hand, O house
stant I shall speak concerning a nation, and concerning
 to pull down, and to destroy it; 18:8 If
ed, turn from their evil, I
f the evil that I thought to do unto them.
 concerning a nation, and
ngdom, to build and to plant it; 18:10 If it do evil in
my voice, then I will repent of the good,

en of Judah, and to the
rusalem, saying, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I frame
a device against you: return ye now every
 and your doings good.
aid, There is no hope: but we will walk after our own
e do the imagination of his evil heart.

ye now among the heathen, who
such things: the virgin of Israel hath done a very horrible
man leave the snow of Lebanon which cometh from the rock
 cold flowing waters that come from another
ople hath forgotten me, they
incense to vanity, and they have caused them to stumble in
ent paths, to walk in paths, in a way not cast
e, and a perpetual hissing; every
t passeth thereby shall be astonished, and wag his head.
m as with an east wind before the enemy; I
e, in the day of their
 Then said they, Come and let us devise devices against Jeremiah;
 not perish from the priest, nor counsel from the
et. Come, and let us smite him with
ongue, and let us not give heed to any of his words.
D, and hearken to the voice of them that
contend with me.
compensed for good? for they have digged a pit
efore thee to speak good for them,
 turn away thy wrath from them.
herefore deliver up their children to the famine, and pour out
orce of the sword; and let their wives be bereaved
; and let their men be put to death;
their young men be slain by the sword in battle.
eir houses, when thou shalt bring a
 suddenly upon them: for they have digged a pit to take me, and
eet.
their counsel against me to slay me:
ive not their iniquity, neither blot out their sin from thy sight,
overthrown before thee; deal thus with them in the
s saith the LORD, Go and get a potter's earthen bottle, and
 the people, and of the ancients of the
riests; 19:2 And go forth unto the valley of the son of Hinnom, which
ry of the east gate, and proclaim there the words that I
say, Hear ye the word of the LORD, O kings
Thus saith the LORD of hosts,
Israel; Behold, I will bring evil upon this place, the
 ears shall tingle.
ave forsaken me, and have estranged this place, and
other gods, whom neither they nor their
athers have known, nor the kings of Judah, and have filled this place
d of innocents; 19:5 They have built also the high places
ns with fire for burnt offerings unto Baal,
ither came it into my mind:
e, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that this place
ophet, nor The valley of the son of Hinnom,
d I will make void the counsel of Judah and Jerusalem in this
se them to fall by the sword before their
ek their lives: and their
 give to be meat for the fowls of the heaven, and for
9:8 And I will make this city desolate, and an hissing; every one
eby shall be astonished and hiss because of all the
will cause them to eat the flesh of their sons and the
d they shall eat every one the flesh of
is friend in the siege and straitness, wherewith their enemies, and
their lives, shall straiten them.
 Then shalt thou break the bottle in the sight of the men that go
And shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of
ople and this city, as one breaketh
ter's vessel, that cannot be made whole again: and they shall
till there be no place to bury.
hus will I do unto this place, saith the LORD, and to the
even make this city as Tophet: 19:13 And the
 the kings of Judah, shall be
the place of Tophet, because of all the houses upon whose
cense unto all the host of heaven, and have
ods.
et, whither the LORD had sent him to
hesy; and he stood in the court of the LORD's house; and said to
:15 Thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel;
 city and upon all her towns all the
 that I have pronounced against it, because they have hardened
ey might not hear my words.
shur the son of Immer the priest, who was also chief
ORD, heard that Jeremiah prophesied
 things.
h the prophet, and put him in the stocks
that were in the high gate of Benjamin, which was by the house of the
 And it came to pass on the morrow, that Pashur brought forth
tocks. Then said Jeremiah unto him, The LORD hath
agormissabib.
ORD, Behold, I will make thee a terror to
 shall fall by the sword of
, and thine eyes shall behold it: and I will give all
ng of Babylon, and he shall carry them
ptive into Babylon, and shall slay them with the sword.
ver all the strength of this city, and all
s things thereof, and all the
f the kings of Judah will I give into the hand of their
them, and take them, and carry them to
bylon.
hat dwell in thine house shall go into
ptivity: and thou shalt come to Babylon, and there thou shalt die,
ied there, thou, and all thy friends, to whom thou
LORD, thou hast deceived me, and I was deceived; thou art
 prevailed: I am in derision daily, every one
, I cried out, I cried violence and spoil;
reproach unto me, and a

on of him, nor speak any more
. But his word was in mine heart as a burning fire shut up
eary with forbearing, and I could not stay.
y, fear on every side. Report,
and we will report it. All my familiars watched for my
e he will be enticed, and we shall prevail
ge on him.
e as a mighty terrible one: therefore my
persecutors shall stumble, and they shall not prevail: they shall be
d; for they shall not prosper: their everlasting
.
st the righteous, and seest the
 the heart, let me see thy vengeance on them: for unto thee

e LORD: for he hath delivered
 the poor from the hand of evildoers.
0:14 Cursed be the day wherein I was born: let not the day wherein my
e be blessed.
ho brought tidings to my father, saying, A
very glad.
 the cities which the LORD overthrew, and
 the morning, and the
e; 20:17 Because he slew me not from the womb; or
 grave, and her womb to be always
ith me.
t of the womb to see labour and sorrow,
hat my days should be consumed with shame?  21:1 The word which came
from the LORD, when king Zedekiah sent unto him Pashur
haniah the son of Maaseiah the priest,
ying, 21:2 Enquire, I pray thee, of the LORD for us; for
ylon maketh war against us; if so be that
ll his wondrous works, that
from us.
hem, Thus shall ye say to Zedekiah: 21:4
Thus saith the LORD God of Israel; Behold, I will turn back the
 are in your hands, wherewith ye fight against the
 Chaldeans, which besiege you without
 walls, and I will assemble them into the midst of this city.
ill fight against you with an outstretched hand and
r, and in fury, and in great wrath.
6 And I will smite the inhabitants of this city, both man and
 of a great pestilence.
ard, saith the LORD, I will deliver Zedekiah king of
he people, and such as are left in this
ity from the pestilence, from the sword, and from the famine, into
chadrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand of their
f those that seek their life: and he shall
e shall not spare them,
, nor have mercy.
ople thou shalt say, Thus saith the LORD; Behold,
 and the way of death.
deth in this city shall die by the sword, and by the
 but he that goeth out, and falleth to
e Chaldeans that besiege you, he shall live, and his life shall be
rey.
st this city for evil, and not for
saith the LORD: it shall be given into the hand of the king of
l burn it with fire.
 the house of the king of Judah, say, Hear ye the
f David, thus saith the LORD; Execute
gment in the morning, and deliver him that is spoiled out of the
sor, lest my fury go out like fire, and burn that
e evil of your doings.
am against thee, O inhabitant of the valley, and rock
 which say, Who shall come down against
s? or who shall enter into our habitations?  21:14 But I will punish
to the fruit of your doings, saith the LORD: and I will
 thereof, and it shall devour all things
round about it.
D; Go down to the house of the king of Judah,
ay, Hear the word of the LORD, O
Judah, that sittest upon the throne of David, thou, and thy
e that enter in by these gates: 22:3 Thus saith
ighteousness, and deliver the
 of the hand of the oppressor: and do no wrong, do no
 fatherless, nor the widow, neither shed
innocent blood in this place.
if ye do this thing indeed, then shall there enter in by the
ngs sitting upon the throne of David, riding in
 servants, and his people.
ye will not hear these words, I swear by myself, saith the
all become a desolation.
saith the LORD unto the king's house of Judah; Thou art
d of Lebanon: yet surely I will make thee a
habited.
yers against thee, every one with his
pons: and they shall cut down thy choice cedars, and cast them into
:8 And many nations shall pass by this city, and they shall say
ighbour, Wherefore hath the LORD done thus unto
all answer, Because they have
e covenant of the LORD their God, and worshipped other
:10 Weep ye not for the dead, neither bemoan him: but weep sore for
away: for he shall return no more, nor see his native
ith the LORD touching Shallum the son of Josiah king
d of Josiah his father, which went forth
out of this place; He shall not return thither any more: 22:12 But he
the place whither they have led him captive, and shall
:13 Woe unto him that buildeth his house by unrighteousness, and his
ong; that useth his neighbour's service without wages,
ork; 22:14 That saith, I will build me a
wide house and large chambers, and cutteth him out windows; and it is
edar, and painted with vermilion.
 Shalt thou reign, because thou closest thyself in cedar? did not
d drink, and do judgment and justice, and then it was
ed the cause of the poor and needy; then
it was well with him: was not this to know me? saith the LORD.
es and thine heart are not but for thy covetousness,
, and for oppression, and for violence,
o do it.
 LORD concerning Jehoiakim the son of
iah king of Judah; They shall not lament for him, saying, Ah my
ter! they shall not lament for him, saying, Ah
all be buried with the burial of
drawn and cast forth beyond the gates of Jerusalem.
ry; and lift up thy voice in Bashan, and
cry from the passages: for all thy lovers are destroyed.
in thy prosperity; but thou saidst, I will not
 thy youth, that thou obeyedst not
ce.
 pastors, and thy lovers shall go
ptivity: surely then shalt thou be ashamed and confounded for

st thy nest in the cedars, how
halt thou be when pangs come upon thee, the pain as of a
s I live, saith the LORD, though Coniah the
 signet upon my right hand, yet
luck thee thence; 22:25 And I will give thee into the hand of
fe, and into the hand of them whose face thou
adrezzar king of Babylon, and
nd of the Chaldeans.
ast thee out, and thy mother that bare thee, into
t born; and there shall ye die.
ut to the land whereunto they desire to return, thither shall
2:28 Is this man Coniah a despised broken idol? is he a vessel
re? wherefore are they cast out, he and his seed,
ey know not?  22:29 O earth, earth,
, hear the word of the LORD.
 saith the LORD, Write ye this man childless, a man that
ays: for no man of his seed shall prosper,
ling any more in Judah.
o the pastors that destroy and scatter the sheep of my
23:2 Therefore thus saith the LORD God of Israel against the pastors
eople; Ye have scattered my flock, and driven them away,
 behold, I will visit upon you the evil of
 I will gather the remnant of my flock out of all countries
hem, and will bring them again to their folds;
ase.
ver them which shall feed them: and
shall fear no more, nor be dismayed, neither shall they be

LORD, that I will raise unto
teous Branch, and a King shall reign and prosper, and
stice in the earth.
dah shall be saved, and Israel shall dwell safely:
shall be called, THE LORD OUR
SS.
me, saith the LORD, that they shall
re say, The LORD liveth, which brought up the children of Israel
 Egypt; 23:8 But, The LORD liveth, which brought up
ouse of Israel out of the north
and from all countries whither I had driven them; and they
 land.
ken because of the prophets; all my
 shake; I am like a drunken man, and like a man whom wine hath
 the LORD, and because of the words of his
of adulterers; for because of swearing the
e wilderness are dried up, and
se is evil, and their force is not right.
rofane; yea, in my house have I
ir wickedness, saith the LORD.
erefore their way shall be unto them as slippery ways in the
e driven on, and fall therein: for I will bring
eir visitation, saith the LORD.
nd I have seen folly in the prophets of Samaria; they
d my people Israel to err.
 seen also in the prophets of Jerusalem an horrible thing:
d walk in lies: they strengthen also the hands
from his wickedness; they are all
 unto me as Sodom, and the inhabitants thereof as Gomorrah.
saith the LORD of hosts concerning the prophets;
wood, and make them drink the water
ll: for from the prophets of Jerusalem is profaneness gone forth

arken not unto the words of the
that prophesy unto you: they make you vain: they speak a
 and not out of the mouth of the LORD.
23:17 They say still unto them that despise me, The LORD hath said, Ye
eace; and they say unto every one that walketh after the
rt, No evil shall come upon you.
For who hath stood in the counsel of the LORD, and hath
d? who hath marked his word, and heard it?
 gone forth in fury, even a
lwind: it shall fall grievously upon the head of the
the LORD shall not return, until he have executed,
houghts of his heart: in the latter
ye shall consider it perfectly.
 have not sent these prophets, yet they ran: I have not spoken
ophesied.
n my counsel, and had caused my people to
ed them from their evil way,
 evil of their doings.
 at hand, saith the LORD, and not a God afar off?
ret places that I shall not see him?
h the LORD. Do not I fill heaven and earth? saith the LORD.
at the prophets said, that prophesy lies in my
 dreamed.
in the heart of the prophets that
y lies? yea, they are prophets of the deceit of their own
to cause my people to forget my name by their
is neighbour, as their fathers
tten my name for Baal.
t that hath a dream, let him tell a dream; and he that
my word faithfully. What is the chaff to
the wheat? saith the LORD.
 my word like as a fire? saith the LORD; and like a hammer
n pieces?  23:30 Therefore, behold, I am
against the prophets, saith the LORD, that steal my words every one
our.
phets, saith the LORD, that use
gues, and say, He saith.
I am against them that prophesy false dreams, saith the
 cause my people to err by their lies, and
 nor commanded them: therefore
 not profit this people at all, saith the LORD.
e prophet, or a priest, shall ask
aying, What is the burden of the LORD? thou shalt then say unto
I will even forsake you, saith the LORD.

iest, and the people, that
 burden of the LORD, I will even punish that man and his
 ye say every one to his neighbour, and every one to
D answered? and, What hath the LORD
n?  23:36 And the burden of the LORD shall ye mention no more:
 shall be his burden; for ye have perverted the
D of hosts our God.
ou say to the prophet, What hath the LORD answered
oken?  23:38 But since ye say, The
 of the LORD; therefore thus saith the LORD; Because ye say this
f the LORD, and I have sent unto you, saying, Ye
ORD; 23:39 Therefore, behold, I,
will utterly forget you, and I will forsake you, and the city
our fathers, and cast you out of my presence:
 reproach upon you, and a
, which shall not be forgotten.
e LORD shewed me, and, behold, two baskets of figs were set
e LORD, after that Nebuchadrezzar king of
 the son of Jehoiakim king of
the princes of Judah, with the carpenters and smiths, from
ht them to Babylon.
 very good figs, even like the figs that are first
ery naughty figs, which could not be
n, they were so bad.
 LORD unto me, What seest thou, Jeremiah? And I
d; and the evil, very evil, that
e eaten, they are so evil.
he word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 24:5 Thus saith
el; Like these good figs, so will I
wledge them that are carried away captive of Judah, whom I have
ace into the land of the Chaldeans for their good.
upon them for good, and I will bring
 again to this land: and I will build them, and not pull them
t them, and not pluck them up.
 I will give them an heart to know me, that I am the LORD: and
ple, and I will be their God: for they shall

t be eaten, they are so evil;
 saith the LORD, So will I give Zedekiah the king of Judah,
e residue of Jerusalem, that remain in this
f Egypt: 24:9 And I will
be removed into all the kingdoms of the earth for
a proverb, a taunt and a curse, in
aces whither I shall drive them.
And I will send the sword, the famine, and the pestilence, among
 consumed from off the land that I gave unto them
 word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the people of Judah
f Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of Judah, that
zar king of Babylon; 25:2 The which
iah the prophet spake unto all the people of Judah, and to all
erusalem, saying, 25:3 From the thirteenth year of
udah, even unto this day, that is the
ee and twentieth year, the word of the LORD hath come unto me, and
to you, rising early and speaking; but ye have not
hath sent unto you all his servants the prophets,
t ye have not hearkened, nor inclined
r ear to hear.
again now every one from his evil way, and
in the land that the LORD hath
 you and to your fathers for ever and ever: 25:6 And go not
ve them, and to worship them, and provoke me
nds; and I will do you no hurt.
t ye have not hearkened unto me, saith the LORD; that ye might
with the works of your hands to your own hurt.
 of hosts; Because ye have not heard
ords, 25:9 Behold, I will send and take all the families of the
RD, and Nebuchadrezzar the king of Babylon, my
 this land, and against the
hereof, and against all these nations round about, and
nd make them an astonishment, and an
ing, and perpetual desolations.
oreover I will take from them the voice of mirth, and the voice
ice of the bridegroom, and the voice of the bride,
 the light of the candle.
s whole land shall be a desolation, and an astonishment;
rve the king of Babylon seventy years.
25:12 And it shall come to pass, when seventy years are accomplished,
unish the king of Babylon, and that nation, saith the
 the land of the Chaldeans, and will make
will bring upon that land all my words which I have
 that is written in this book, which
miah hath prophesied against all the nations.
ngs shall serve themselves of them
and I will recompense them according to their deeds, and
their own hands.
he LORD God of Israel unto me; Take the wine cup
 all the nations, to whom I send
 drink it.
and be moved, and be mad, because of the
sword that I will send among them.
7 Then took I the cup at the LORD's hand, and made all the nations
hom the LORD had sent me: 25:18 To wit, Jerusalem, and
 kings thereof, and the princes thereof,
to make them a desolation, an astonishment, an hissing, and a curse;
day; 25:19 Pharaoh king of Egypt, and his servants, and
ople; 25:20 And all the mingled people, and
l the kings of the land of the
s, and Ashkelon, and Azzah, and Ekron, and the remnant of
oab, and the children of Ammon, 25:22 And all
 of Zidon, and the kings of the
ch are beyond the sea, 25:23 Dedan, and Tema, and Buz, and
st corners, 25:24 And all the kings of Arabia,
ple that dwell in the desert,
ll the kings of Zimri, and all the kings of Elam, and all
5:26 And all the kings of the north, far and
ngdoms of the world, which are
ace of the earth: and the king of Sheshach shall drink after
re thou shalt say unto them, Thus saith the LORD of
 ye, and be drunken, and spue, and
and rise no more, because of the sword which I will send among
 shall be, if they refuse to take the cup at thine hand to
ay unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Ye
 lo, I begin to bring evil on the city which is called by my
 utterly unpunished? Ye shall not be unpunished:
ll the inhabitants of the earth,
e LORD of hosts.
sy thou against them all these words, and say
n high, and utter his voice from
 habitation; he shall mightily roar upon his habitation; he
they that tread the grapes, against all the
ise shall come even to the ends of the earth; for the LORD
the nations, he will plead with all flesh; he
 sword, saith the LORD.
h the LORD of hosts, Behold, evil shall go forth from
 whirlwind shall be raised up from the
asts of the earth.
of the LORD shall be at that day from one end of
of the earth: they shall not be
 neither gathered, nor buried; they shall be dung upon the
e shepherds, and cry; and wallow yourselves in the ashes,
: for the days of your slaughter and of your
hall fall like a pleasant
5 And the shepherds shall have no way to flee, nor the principal
cape.
hepherds, and an howling of the
 of the flock, shall be heard: for the LORD hath spoiled
d the peaceable habitations are cut down because of the fierce

e lion: for their land is
e of the fierceness of the oppressor, and because of
he beginning of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king
rd from the LORD, saying, 26:2 Thus saith the
s house, and speak unto all the
 Judah, which come to worship in the LORD's house, all the
e to speak unto them; diminish not a word:
n every man from his evil way,
 repent me of the evil, which I purpose to do unto them
r doings.
them, Thus saith the LORD; If ye will not
 have set before you, 26:5 To
the words of my servants the prophets, whom I sent unto
and sending them, but ye have not
ed; 26:6 Then will I make this house like Shiloh, and will make
o all the nations of the earth.
 the priests and the prophets and all the people heard Jeremiah
s in the house of the LORD.
 came to pass, when Jeremiah had made an end of speaking
anded him to speak unto all the people, that
he people took him, saying, Thou
rely die.
 in the name of the LORD, saying, This
use shall be like Shiloh, and this city shall be desolate without an
nd all the people were gathered against Jeremiah in the
 When the princes of Judah heard these things, then they came up
use unto the house of the LORD, and sat down in the
RD's house.
s and the prophets unto the princes and to
hy to die; for he hath
 this city, as ye have heard with your ears.
he princes and to all the people,
 The LORD sent me to prophesy against this house and against
s that ye have heard.
ow amend your ways and your doings, and obey the
e LORD will repent him of the evil
e hath pronounced against you.
 for me, behold, I am in your hand: do with me as seemeth good

e put me to death, ye shall
innocent blood upon yourselves, and upon this city, and
f: for of a truth the LORD hath sent me
nto you to speak all these words in your ears.
l the people unto the priests and to
prophets; This man is not worthy to die: for he hath spoken to us
e LORD our God.
ain of the elders of the land, and spake to all
 26:18 Micah the Morasthite
 the days of Hezekiah king of Judah, and spake to all the
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Zion shall be
l become heaps, and the
ouse as the high places of a forest.
:19 Did Hezekiah king of Judah and all Judah put him at all to
ear the LORD, and besought the LORD, and the LORD
 had pronounced against them? Thus
we procure great evil against our souls.

hesied in the name of the
e son of Shemaiah of Kirjathjearim, who prophesied
is land according to all the words of
emiah.
g, with all his mighty men, and all
rinces, heard his words, the king sought to put him to death: but
 it, he was afraid, and fled, and went into Egypt;
t men into Egypt, namely, Elnathan the
n of Achbor, and certain men with him into Egypt.
ijah out of Egypt, and brought him unto
ehoiakim the king; who slew him with the sword, and cast his dead
ves of the common people.
eless the hand of Ahikam the son of Shaphan was with
 give him into the hand of the people to
put him to death.
 of the reign of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king
miah from the LORD, saying, 27:2 Thus
th the LORD to me; Make thee bonds and yokes, and put them upon thy
send them to the king of Edom, and to the king of Moab,
nites, and to the king of Tyrus, and to the
ngers which come to Jerusalem
ah king of Judah; 27:4 And command them to say unto their
ORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Thus shall
ade the earth, the man and the
 are upon the ground, by my great power and by my
it unto whom it seemed meet unto me.
:6 And now have I given all these lands into the hand of
 Babylon, my servant; and the beasts of the
m.
, and his son, and his son's son,
he very time of his land come: and then many nations and great
emselves of him.
 to pass, that the nation and kingdom which will
the king of Babylon, and that will
t their neck under the yoke of the king of Babylon, that nation
h the LORD, with the sword, and with the famine,
ave consumed them by his hand.
refore hearken not ye to your prophets, nor to your diviners,
 nor to your enchanters, nor to your sorcerers,
all not serve the king of Babylon:
For they prophesy a lie unto you, to remove you far from your
ld drive you out, and ye should perish.

ck under the yoke of the king
 and serve him, those will I let remain still in their own
d they shall till it, and dwell therein.

udah according to all these
, Bring your necks under the yoke of the king of Babylon,
ple, and live.
hou and thy people, by the sword, by the
famine, and by the pestilence, as the LORD hath spoken against the
 not serve the king of Babylon?  27:14 Therefore
prophets that speak unto you,
shall not serve the king of Babylon: for they prophesy a
 I have not sent them, saith the LORD, yet they prophesy a
ight drive you out, and that ye might perish,
to you.
ts and to all this people, saying, Thus
aith the LORD; Hearken not to the words of your prophets that
ying, Behold, the vessels of the LORD's house
om Babylon: for they prophesy a
you.
 the king of Babylon, and live:
 should this city be laid waste?  27:18 But if they be
 the LORD be with them, let them now make
he vessels which are left in
 the LORD, and in the house of the king of Judah, and at
on.
sts concerning the pillars, and
g the sea, and concerning the bases, and concerning the
 remain in this city.
hadnezzar king of Babylon took not, when he carried
f Jehoiakim king of Judah from
to Babylon, and all the nobles of Judah and Jerusalem; 27:21
RD of hosts, the God of Israel, concerning the
the LORD, and in the house of the
 Judah and of Jerusalem; 27:22 They shall be carried to
ey be until the day that I visit them,
ith the LORD; then will I bring them up, and restore them to this
d it came to pass the same year, in the beginning of the reign
Judah, in the fourth year, and in the fifth month,
e prophet, which was of Gibeon, spake
o me in the house of the LORD, in the presence of the priests and
, saying, 28:2 Thus speaketh the LORD of hosts, the
roken the yoke of the king of Babylon.
28:3 Within two full years will I bring again into this place all the
e LORD's house, that Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon took
carried them to Babylon: 28:4 And I will
bring again to this place Jeconiah the son of Jehoiakim king of Judah,
 captives of Judah, that went into Babylon, saith the
ke of the king of Babylon.
e prophet Jeremiah said unto the prophet Hananiah in the
nd in the presence of all the people that
 the prophet Jeremiah said,
D do so: the LORD perform thy words which thou hast
vessels of the LORD's house, and all
 is carried away captive, from Babylon into this place.
ou now this word that I speak in thine ears,
8 The prophets that have been
nd before thee of old prophesied both against many
gdoms, of war, and of evil, and of
ence.
h of peace, when the word of the
shall come to pass, then shall the prophet be known, that the
him.
ok the yoke from off the prophet
's neck, and brake it.
ah spake in the presence of all the people, saying,
ll I break the yoke of Nebuchadnezzar
g of Babylon from the neck of all nations within the space of two
he prophet Jeremiah went his way.
 Then the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah the prophet, after
prophet had broken the yoke from off the neck of the
3 Go and tell Hananiah, saying, Thus
h the LORD; Thou hast broken the yokes of wood; but thou shalt
of iron.
of hosts, the God of Israel; I have put
 yoke of iron upon the neck of all these nations, that they may serve
r king of Babylon; and they shall serve him: and I have
 field also.
t Jeremiah unto Hananiah the prophet, Hear
ee; but thou makest this
in a lie.
e LORD; Behold, I will cast thee from off
lt die, because thou hast
n against the LORD.
he prophet died the same year in the seventh month.
of the letter that Jeremiah the prophet
ent from Jerusalem unto the residue of the elders which were carried
 and to the priests, and to the prophets, and to all the
 had carried away captive from Jerusalem to
king, and the queen, and the
 princes of Judah and Jerusalem, and the carpenters, and
from Jerusalem;) 29:3 By the hand of Elasah
n of Hilkiah, (whom Zedekiah
h sent unto Babylon to Nebuchadnezzar king of Babylon)
LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, unto all
ave caused to be carried away
lem unto Babylon; 29:5 Build ye houses, and dwell in them;
at the fruit of them; 29:6 Take ye wives, and
ves for your sons, and give your
s to husbands, that they may bear sons and daughters; that ye
e, and not diminished.
e peace of the city whither I have caused you to be
 unto the LORD for it: for in the peace
hereof shall ye have peace.
us saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Let not your
ers, that be in the midst of you, deceive you,
 ye cause to be dreamed.
prophesy falsely unto you in my name: I have not sent
0 For thus saith the LORD, That after seventy years be
ll visit you, and perform my good word
ward you, in causing you to return to this place.
hat I think toward you, saith the LORD,
houghts of peace, and not of evil, to give you an expected end.
ye call upon me, and ye shall go and pray unto me,
29:13 And ye shall seek me, and find me, when ye shall search for me
heart.
, saith the LORD: and I will turn away
ur captivity, and I will gather you from all the nations, and from
hither I have driven you, saith the LORD; and I will
 whence I caused you to be carried away
aptive.
 LORD hath raised us up prophets in
on; 29:16 Know that thus saith the LORD of the king that sitteth
 David, and of all the people that dwelleth in this
 are not gone forth with you into
ty; 29:17 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Behold, I will send
e famine, and the pestilence, and will make
en, they are so evil.
persecute them with the sword, with the famine, and
eliver them to be removed to all the
doms of the earth, to be a curse, and an astonishment, and an
ch, among all the nations whither I have driven
earkened to my words, saith the
ch I sent unto them by my servants the prophets, rising up
but ye would not hear, saith the LORD.
29:20 Hear ye therefore the word of the LORD, all ye of the captivity,
sent from Jerusalem to Babylon: 29:21 Thus saith the LORD
el, of Ahab the son of Kolaiah, and of
dekiah the son of Maaseiah, which prophesy a lie unto you in my
l deliver them into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king
hem before your eyes; 29:22 And of them
hall be taken up a curse by all the captivity of Judah which are in
, The LORD make thee like Zedekiah and like Ahab, whom
in the fire; 29:23 Because they have
itted villany in Israel, and have committed adultery with their
and have spoken lying words in my name, which I
w, and am a witness, saith the
9:24 Thus shalt thou also speak to Shemaiah the Nehelamite, saying,
keth the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying,
n thy name unto all the people that
t Jerusalem, and to Zephaniah the son of Maaseiah the priest, and
s, saying, 29:26 The LORD hath made thee priest in
, that ye should be officers in the
 of the LORD, for every man that is mad, and maketh himself a
ouldest put him in prison, and in the stocks.
ot reproved Jeremiah of Anathoth,
aketh himself a prophet to you?  29:28 For therefore he sent
ying, This captivity is long: build ye houses,
, and eat the fruit of them.
Zephaniah the priest read this letter in the ears of
 Then came the word of the LORD unto Jeremiah, saying, 29:31 Send
e captivity, saying, Thus saith the LORD concerning
e that Shemaiah hath prophesied unto
 and I sent him not, and he caused you to trust in a lie: 29:32
h the LORD; Behold, I will punish Shemaiah the
ot have a man to dwell among this
 neither shall he behold the good that I will do for my people,
ause he hath taught rebellion against the LORD.
ah from the LORD, saying, 30:2 Thus
eth the LORD God of Israel, saying, Write thee all the words that
o thee in a book.
s come, saith the LORD, that I will bring again
nd Judah, saith the LORD: and I
e them to return to the land that I gave to their fathers,
t.
e LORD spake concerning Israel and
ning Judah.
D; We have heard a voice of trembling, of
w, and see whether a man doth travail with child?
 his hands on his loins, as a woman
avail, and all faces are turned into paleness?  30:7 Alas! for
o that none is like it: it is even the time of
ed out of it.
 pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts,
 neck, and will burst thy
ngers shall no more serve themselves of him: 30:9 But
ir God, and David their king, whom I will
ar thou not, O my servant Jacob, saith the LORD;
, lo, I will save thee from afar,
 seed from the land of their captivity; and Jacob shall return,
t, and be quiet, and none shall make him afraid.
the LORD, to save thee: though I make
ull end of all nations whither I have scattered thee, yet I will
d of thee: but I will correct thee in measure, and
npunished.
D, Thy bruise is incurable, and thy wound
ead thy cause, that thou mayest be bound up:
14 All thy lovers have forgotten thee; they seek thee not; for I
with the wound of an enemy, with the chastisement of
 of thine iniquity; because thy sins
 increased.
hine affliction? thy sorrow is incurable
for the multitude of thine iniquity: because thy sins were increased,
hese things unto thee.
all they that devour thee shall be devoured; and all
f them, shall go into captivity; and
 that spoil thee shall be a spoil, and all that prey upon thee
ey.
o thee, and I will heal thee of thy
s, saith the LORD; because they called thee an Outcast, saying,
no man seeketh after.
the LORD; Behold, I will bring again the captivity of
 on his dwellingplaces; and the city
l be builded upon her own heap, and the palace shall remain after
f.
thanksgiving and the voice of them
ake merry: and I will multiply them, and they shall not be few;
 them, and they shall not be small.
20 Their children also shall be as aforetime, and their
lished before me, and I will punish all
hat oppress them.
s shall be of themselves, and their governor
and I will cause him to draw
 shall approach unto me: for who is this that engaged his
? saith the LORD.
 my people, and I will be your God.
23 Behold, the whirlwind of the LORD goeth forth with fury, a
 it shall fall with pain upon the head of the
the LORD shall not return, until he hath
done it, and until he have performed the intents of his heart: in the
e shall consider it.
ime, saith the LORD, will I be the God of all the
l be my people.
D, The people which were left of the sword
el, when I went to cause him
31:3 The LORD hath appeared of old unto me, saying, Yea, I have loved
everlasting love: therefore with lovingkindness have I
will build thee, and thou shalt be built, O virgin of
dorned with thy tabrets, and shalt go
th in the dances of them that make merry.
e mountains of Samaria: the
l plant, and shall eat them as common things.
 the watchmen upon the mount
l cry, Arise ye, and let us go up to Zion unto the LORD
aith the LORD; Sing with gladness for Jacob, and shout
ns: publish ye, praise ye, and say, O
D, save thy people, the remnant of Israel.
e north country, and gather them
 coasts of the earth, and with them the blind and the lame,
d her that travaileth with child together: a

th supplications will I lead
 cause them to walk by the rivers of waters in a straight
ot stumble: for I am a father to Israel, and
 the word of the LORD, O ye nations, and declare it in the
 He that scattered Israel will gather him, and
ck.
cob, and ransomed him from the hand
m that was stronger than he.
efore they shall come and sing in the height of Zion, and
e goodness of the LORD, for wheat, and for
the flock and of the herd: and
 shall be as a watered garden; and they shall not sorrow any
Then shall the virgin rejoice in the dance, both young men and
will turn their mourning into joy, and will
m their sorrow.
e the soul of the priests with fatness, and my
odness, saith the LORD.
h the LORD; A voice was heard in Ramah, lamentation,
ing for her children refused to be
ted for her children, because they were not.
hy voice from weeping, and thine
m tears: for thy work shall be rewarded, saith the LORD; and
from the land of the enemy.
here is hope in thine end, saith the LORD, that thy
eir own border.
rd Ephraim bemoaning himself thus; Thou hast
a bullock unaccustomed to the
thou me, and I shall be turned; for thou art the LORD my
 that I was turned, I repented; and after that I was
igh: I was ashamed, yea, even
 because I did bear the reproach of my youth.
 a pleasant child? for since I
nst him, I do earnestly remember him still: therefore my
m; I will surely have mercy upon him, saith
, make thee high heaps: set thine heart
oward the highway, even the way which thou wentest: turn again, O
 turn again to these thy cities.
How long wilt thou go about, O thou backsliding daughter? for
 a new thing in the earth, A woman shall compass
D of hosts, the God of Israel; As yet they
ah and in the cities thereof,
l bring again their captivity; The LORD bless thee, O
untain of holiness.
ll dwell in Judah itself, and in all the cities
hey that go forth with flocks.
r I have satiated the weary soul, and I have replenished every
1:26 Upon this I awaked, and beheld; and my sleep was sweet unto me.
, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will sow the house
of Judah with the seed of man, and with the
me to pass, that like as I have watched over
and to throw down, and to
 afflict; so will I watch over them, to build, and to
29 In those days they shall say no more, The fathers have eaten a
he children's teeth are set on edge.
:30 But every one shall die for his own iniquity: every man that
ape, his teeth shall be set on edge.
:31 Behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will make a new
 house of Israel, and with the house of Judah: 31:32
that I made with their fathers in the
 that I took them by the hand to bring them out of the land of
nant they brake, although I was an husband unto
s shall be the covenant that I will
with the house of Israel; After those days, saith the LORD, I
eir inward parts, and write it in their hearts;
ll be my people.
each no more every man his neighbour, and every
ORD: for they shall all know me,
 least of them unto the greatest of them, saith the LORD: for
iniquity, and I will remember their sin no more.
 giveth the sun for a light by day,
he ordinances of the moon and of the stars for a light by night,
 sea when the waves thereof roar; The LORD of hosts
inances depart from before me, saith
LORD, then the seed of Israel also shall cease from being a nation
er.
n above can be measured, and the
ons of the earth searched out beneath, I will also cast off
for all that they have done, saith the LORD.
he LORD, that the city shall be
the LORD from the tower of Hananeel unto the gate of the
easuring line shall yet go forth over against it upon
pass about to Goath.
e valley of the dead bodies, and of the ashes, and
 Kidron, unto the corner of the horse
e toward the east, shall be holy unto the LORD; it shall not be
own down any more for ever.
rd that came to Jeremiah from the LORD in the tenth year of
 which was the eighteenth year of
drezzar.
lon's army besieged Jerusalem: and
ah the prophet was shut up in the court of the prison, which was
ah's house.
udah had shut him up, saying, Wherefore
ost thou prophesy, and say, Thus saith the LORD, Behold, I will give
 the hand of the king of Babylon, and he shall take it;
udah shall not escape out of the hand of
the Chaldeans, but shall surely be delivered into the hand of the king
and shall speak with him mouth to mouth, and his eyes
nd he shall lead Zedekiah to Babylon, and
h the LORD: though ye fight
deans, ye shall not prosper.
eremiah said, The word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
son of Shallum thine uncle shall come unto
n Anathoth: for the right of
s thine to buy it.
e uncle's son came to me in the court of the
RD, and said unto me, Buy my
y thee, that is in Anathoth, which is in the country of
inheritance is thine, and the redemption is
ew that this was the word of the LORD.
32:9 And I bought the field of Hanameel my uncle's son, that was in
eighed him the money, even seventeen shekels of silver.
e evidence, and sealed it, and took
sses, and weighed him the money in the balances.
the purchase, both that which was
according to the law and custom, and that which was open: 32:12
ence of the purchase unto Baruch the son of Neriah,
ht of Hanameel mine uncle's son, and in
he presence of the witnesses that subscribed the book of the
he Jews that sat in the court of the prison.
em, saying, 32:14 Thus saith the
hosts, the God of Israel; Take these evidences, this evidence
 which is sealed, and this evidence which is
l, that they may continue many
2:15 For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Houses and
eyards shall be possessed again in this land.
evidence of the purchase unto
son of Neriah, I prayed unto the LORD, saying, 32:17 Ah
 made the heaven and the earth by thy great
is nothing too hard for thee:
shewest lovingkindness unto thousands, and recompensest the
 into the bosom of their children after them:
f hosts, is his name, 32:19 Great
sel, and mighty in work: for thine eyes are open upon all the
en: to give every one according to his ways, and
gs: 32:20 Which hast set signs and
s in the land of Egypt, even unto this day, and in Israel, and
 hast made thee a name, as at this day; 32:21 And
ael out of the land of Egypt with
and with wonders, and with a strong hand, and with a stretched
eat terror; 32:22 And hast given them this land,
thers to give them, a land flowing
ilk and honey; 32:23 And they came in, and possessed it; but
ice, neither walked in thy law; they have done
 them to do: therefore thou hast
ll this evil to come upon them: 32:24 Behold the mounts, they
y to take it; and the city is given into the hand
nst it, because of the sword, and of
famine, and of the pestilence: and what thou hast spoken is come
ld, thou seest it.
said unto me, O Lord GOD, Buy thee the field for
 city is given into the hand of the
eans.
ORD unto Jeremiah, saying, 32:27
I am the LORD, the God of all flesh: is there any thing too
refore thus saith the LORD; Behold, I will give
deans, and into the hand of
r king of Babylon, and he shall take it: 32:29 And the
t this city, shall come and set fire on
his city, and burn it with the houses, upon whose roofs they have
nto Baal, and poured out drink offerings unto other

 children of Judah have only
fore me from their youth: for the children of Israel have
 with the work of their hands, saith the
LORD.
me as a provocation of mine anger and
my fury from the day that they built it even unto this day; that I
 from before my face, 32:32 Because of all the evil of
f the children of Judah, which they have
done to provoke me to anger, they, their kings, their princes, their
heir prophets, and the men of Judah, and the inhabitants
 they have turned unto me the back, and not the face: though
up early and teaching them, yet they have not
32:34 But they set their abominations in the house, which is called by
defile it.
h places of Baal, which are in the valley
 and their daughters to pass
fire unto Molech; which I commanded them not, neither came
ey should do this abomination, to cause Judah
us saith the LORD, the God of Israel,
cerning this city, whereof ye say, It shall be delivered into the
of Babylon by the sword, and by the famine, and by
will gather them out of all countries,
ither I have driven them in mine anger, and in my fury, and in great
ill bring them again unto this place, and I will cause
And they shall be my people, and I will be
e heart, and one way, that
me for ever, for the good of them, and of their children
ll make an everlasting covenant with them,
do them good; but I will put
heir hearts, that they shall not depart from me.
hem to do them good, and I will plant
m in this land assuredly with my whole heart and with my whole
hus saith the LORD; Like as I have brought all this great
 will I bring upon them all the good that I
 shall be bought in this land, whereof ye say, It is
 it is given into the hand of the
ns.
y, and subscribe evidences, and
, and take witnesses in the land of Benjamin, and in the
d in the cities of Judah, and in the cities
the valley, and in the cities
h: for I will cause their captivity to return, saith the
 word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah the second time,
he court of the prison, saying, 33:2 Thus
D that formed it, to
RD is his name; 33:3 Call unto me, and I will
mighty things, which thou knowest

Israel, concerning the houses
y, and concerning the houses of the kings of Judah, which
unts, and by the sword; 33:5 They come to
ll them with the dead bodies
 I have slain in mine anger and in my fury, and for all
 my face from this city.
 will bring it health and cure, and I will cure them,
 abundance of peace and truth.
 I will cause the captivity of Judah and the captivity of
l build them, as at the first.
 I will cleanse them from all their iniquity, whereby they
and I will pardon all their iniquities,
hereby they have sinned, and whereby they have transgressed against
 it shall be to me a name of joy, a praise and an honour
the earth, which shall hear all the good
that I do unto them: and they shall fear and tremble for all the
ll the prosperity that I procure unto it.
shall be heard in this place,
y shall be desolate without man and without beast, even in
 in the streets of Jerusalem, that are
solate, without man, and without inhabitant, and without beast,
joy, and the voice of gladness, the voice of the
ride, the voice of them that shall
raise the LORD of hosts: for the LORD is good; for his mercy
 of them that shall bring the sacrifice of
 will cause to return the
e land, as at the first, saith the LORD.

n in this place, which is
t man and without beast, and in all the cities thereof,
hepherds causing their flocks to lie down.
in the cities of the vale, and
ies of the south, and in the land of Benjamin, and in the
nd in the cities of Judah, shall the flocks
telleth them, saith the LORD.
old, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will perform that
e promised unto the house of Israel and to the
ys, and at that time, will I cause the Branch of
d; and he shall execute judgment and
teousness in the land.
ays shall Judah be saved, and Jerusalem shall dwell
erewith she shall be called, The LORD
 righteousness.
e LORD; David shall never want a man to sit
 33:18 Neither shall the
tes want a man before me to offer burnt offerings, and
d to do sacrifice continually.
d the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, saying, 33:20 Thus
 can break my covenant of the day, and my
uld not be day and night in
 33:21 Then may also my covenant be broken with David my
t have a son to reign upon his throne; and
rs.
be numbered, neither the sand of
measured: so will I multiply the seed of David my servant, and
ister unto me.
of the LORD came to Jeremiah, saying, 33:24
ave spoken, saying, The two
h the LORD hath chosen, he hath even cast them off? thus
le, that they should be no more a nation
before them.
 If my covenant be not with day and night,
es of heaven and earth; 33:26
 cast away the seed of Jacob and David my servant, so that
is seed to be rulers over the seed of Abraham,
heir captivity to return, and have
on them.
Jeremiah from the LORD, when
ar king of Babylon, and all his army, and all the kingdoms
nion, and all the people, fought against
Jerusalem, and against all the cities thereof, saying, 34:2 Thus saith
e God of Israel; Go and speak to Zedekiah king of Judah,
he LORD; Behold, I will give this city into
 shall burn it with fire: 34:3
halt not escape out of his hand, but shalt surely be taken,
hand; and thine eyes shall behold the eyes of
ak with thee mouth to mouth, and
lt go to Babylon.
d of the LORD, O Zedekiah king of Judah; Thus
t die by the sword: 34:5 But thou
ie in peace: and with the burnings of thy fathers, the former
re thee, so shall they burn odours for thee; and
lord! for I have pronounced the
th the LORD.
phet spake all these words unto Zedekiah
king of Judah in Jerusalem, 34:7 When the king of Babylon's army
usalem, and against all the cities of Judah that
ainst Azekah: for these defenced
emained of the cities of Judah.
is is the word that came unto Jeremiah from the LORD, after
had made a covenant with all the people which
y unto them; 34:9 That every man
et his manservant, and every man his maidservant, being an
go free; that none should serve himself of
4:10 Now when all the princes, and all the people, which had entered
ant, heard that every one should let his manservant, and
 go free, that none should serve themselves
 let them go.
turned, and caused the servants and the
andmaids, whom they had let go free, to return, and brought them into
r servants and for handmaids.
refore the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah from the LORD,
h the LORD, the God of Israel; I made a
ovenant with your fathers in the day that I brought them forth out of
gypt, out of the house of bondmen, saying, 34:14 At the
o every man his brother an Hebrew, which
hath been sold unto thee; and when he hath served thee six years, thou
m go free from thee: but your fathers hearkened not unto
 ear.
 had done right in my sight, in
ng liberty every man to his neighbour; and ye had made a
house which is called by my name: 34:16 But
sed every man his servant, and
his handmaid, whom ye had set at liberty at their pleasure,
them into subjection, to be unto you for
servants and for handmaids.
fore thus saith the LORD; Ye have not hearkened unto me, in
ery one to his brother, and every man to his
y for you, saith the LORD, to
to the pestilence, and to the famine; and I will make you
e kingdoms of the earth.
ll give the men that have transgressed my covenant,
rds of the covenant which they had made
efore me, when they cut the calf in twain, and passed between the
:19 The princes of Judah, and the princes of
s, and all the people of the
passed between the parts of the calf; 34:20 I will even
their enemies, and into the hand of them
that seek their life: and their dead bodies shall be for meat unto the
 heaven, and to the beasts of the earth.

 princes will I give into the
ir enemies, and into the hand of them that seek their life,
e king of Babylon's army, which are gone up
nd, saith the LORD, and cause them to return
inst it, and take it, and burn
re: and I will make the cities of Judah a desolation without
 The word which came unto Jeremiah from the LORD in the days of
f Josiah king of Judah, saying, 35:2 Go unto the
 unto them, and bring them into the
 of the LORD, into one of the chambers, and give them wine to
 took Jaazaniah the son of Jeremiah, the son of Habaziniah,
ll his sons, and the whole house of the
echabites; 35:4 And I brought them into the house of the LORD, into
the sons of Hanan, the son of Igdaliah, a man of God,
he princes, which was above the chamber
f Maaseiah the son of Shallum, the keeper of the door: 35:5 And I set
ns of the house of the Rechabites pots full of wine, and
, Drink ye wine.
 will drink no wine: for Jonadab the son of
 Ye shall drink no wine,
your sons for ever: 35:7 Neither shall ye build house,
yard, nor have any: but all your days ye
shall dwell in tents; that ye may live many days in the land where ye

Jonadab the son of Rechab our
ll that he hath charged us, to drink no wine all our days,
 nor our daughters; 35:9 Nor to build houses
neyard, nor field, nor seed:
 have dwelt in tents, and have obeyed, and done according
ather commanded us.
o pass, when Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon came up
me, and let us go to Jerusalem for fear
f the army of the Chaldeans, and for fear of the army of the Syrians:
t Jerusalem.
f the LORD unto Jeremiah, saying, 35:13 Thus
rael; Go and tell the men of
e inhabitants of Jerusalem, Will ye not receive
 saith the LORD.
adab the son of Rechab, that he commanded his
; for unto this day they drink
obey their father's commandment: notwithstanding I have
ly and speaking; but ye hearkened not unto
ll my servants the prophets, rising
rly and sending them, saying, Return ye now every man from his
your doings, and go not after other gods to serve
and which I have given to you and to
 fathers: but ye have not inclined your ear, nor hearkened unto
e the sons of Jonadab the son of Rechab have performed the
her, which he commanded them; but this people
refore thus saith the LORD God of
the God of Israel; Behold, I will bring upon Judah and upon all
Jerusalem all the evil that I have pronounced
nto them, but they have not
have called unto them, but they have not answered.
he house of the Rechabites, Thus saith
e LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Because ye have obeyed the
ab your father, and kept all his precepts, and
 commanded you: 35:19 Therefore
h the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Jonadab the son of
man to stand before me for ever.
nd it came to pass in the fourth year of Jehoiakim the son of
 that this word came unto Jeremiah from the LORD,
a book, and write therein all the
hat I have spoken unto thee against Israel, and against Judah,
nations, from the day I spake unto thee, from the
y.
ah will hear all the evil which I
 to do unto them; that they may return every man from his evil
ive their iniquity and their sin.
Then Jeremiah called Baruch the son of Neriah: and Baruch wrote
eremiah all the words of the LORD, which he had
ook.
, saying, I am shut up; I cannot go
the house of the LORD: 36:6 Therefore go thou, and read in the
t written from my mouth, the words of the LORD in
D's house upon the fasting day: and
thou shalt read them in the ears of all Judah that come out of
7 It may be they will present their supplication before the LORD,
very one from his evil way: for great is the anger
pronounced against this people.
d Baruch the son of Neriah did according to all that Jeremiah
 him, reading in the book the words of the LORD
 came to pass in the fifth year of Jehoiakim the son of
e ninth month, that they proclaimed a fast
usalem, and to all the people
rom the cities of Judah unto Jerusalem.

rds of Jeremiah in the house
 in the chamber of Gemariah the son of Shaphan the scribe,
the entry of the new gate of the LORD's house,
:11 When Michaiah the son of Gemariah, the son of Shaphan, had heard
k all the words of the LORD, 36:12 Then he went down
e scribe's chamber: and, lo, all the
ces sat there, even Elishama the scribe, and Delaiah the son of
han the son of Achbor, and Gemariah the son of
aniah, and all the princes.
Michaiah declared unto them all the words that he had
ook in the ears of the people.
erefore all the princes sent Jehudi the son of Nethaniah, the
 son of Cushi, unto Baruch, saying, Take in thine
ead in the ears of the people, and
So Baruch the son of Neriah took the roll in his hand, and came
 And they said unto him, Sit down now, and read it in our ears.
n their ears.
, when they had heard all the words, they
unto Baruch, We will surely
 of all these words.
ed Baruch, saying, Tell us now, How didst thou write
 36:18 Then Baruch answered them, He
ounced all these words unto me with his mouth, and I wrote them
k.
uch, Go, hide thee, thou and
d let no man know where ye be.
d they went in to the king into the court, but they laid up
 of Elishama the scribe, and told all the words
o the king sent Jehudi to fetch the roll: and he took it out of
's chamber. And Jehudi read it in the ears of the
princes which stood beside the king.
:22 Now the king sat in the winterhouse in the ninth month: and
 the hearth burning before him.
nd it came to pass, that when Jehudi had read three or four
the penknife, and cast it into the fire that
was consumed in the fire that
hearth.
 nor rent their garments, neither the
g, nor any of his servants that heard all these words.
n and Delaiah and Gemariah had made
cession to the king that he would not burn the roll: but he would

e son of Hammelech, and
f Azriel, and Shelemiah the son of Abdeel, to take
he prophet: but the LORD hid them.
7 Then the word of the LORD came to Jeremiah, after that the king
ll, and the words which Baruch wrote at the mouth of
hee again another roll, and write in it
ll the former words that were in the first roll, which Jehoiakim the
hath burned.
o Jehoiakim king of Judah, Thus saith the
 Why hast thou written
he king of Babylon shall certainly come and destroy
ease from thence man and beast?  36:30
erefore thus saith the LORD of Jehoiakim king of Judah; He shall
pon the throne of David: and his dead body shall be
, and in the night to the frost.
And I will punish him and his seed and his servants for their
bring upon them, and upon the inhabitants of
all the evil that I have
st them; but they hearkened not.
Then took Jeremiah another roll, and gave it to Baruch the
h; who wrote therein from the mouth of
remiah all the words of the book which Jehoiakim king of Judah had
re: and there were added besides unto them many like
ah the son of Josiah reigned instead of Coniah the
ezzar king of Babylon made king in the
nd of Judah.
is servants, nor the people of the land, did
ich he spake by the prophet
37:3 And Zedekiah the king sent Jehucal the son of Shelemiah and
of Maaseiah the priest to the prophet Jeremiah,
God for us.
nd went out among the people: for they had
araoh's army was come forth out of Egypt: and when the
salem heard tidings of them, they departed
rd of the LORD unto the prophet Jeremiah saying,
of Israel; Thus shall ye say to the
of Judah, that sent you unto me to enquire of me; Behold,
come forth to help you, shall return to Egypt
Chaldeans shall come again, and fight against this city,
ith fire.
eive not yourselves, saying, The
s shall surely depart from us: for they shall not depart.
 smitten the whole army of the Chaldeans that
 but wounded men among them, yet
hey rise up every man in his tent, and burn this city with
me to pass, that when the army of the Chaldeans was
ar of Pharaoh's army, 37:12 Then
 went forth out of Jerusalem to go into the land of Benjamin,
hence in the midst of the people.
 And when he was in the gate of Benjamin, a captain of the ward
me was Irijah, the son of Shelemiah, the son of
prophet, saying, Thou fallest away
 Chaldeans.
t is false; I fall not away to the
ans.
ijah took Jeremiah, and brought him
e princes.
were wroth with Jeremiah, and smote him,
and put him in prison in the house of Jonathan the scribe: for they
he prison.
red into the dungeon, and into the cabins,
s; 37:17 Then Zedekiah the
 took him out: and the king asked him secretly in his
 word from the LORD? And Jeremiah said,
here is: for, said he, thou shalt be delivered into the hand of the
.
g Zedekiah, What have I offended
thee, or against thy servants, or against this people, that ye
n?  37:19 Where are now your prophets which
f Babylon shall not come
 against this land?  37:20 Therefore hear now, I pray
 my supplication, I pray thee, be
d before thee; that thou cause me not to return to the house of
, lest I die there.
 the king commanded that they should commit
and that they should give him
ce of bread out of the bakers' street, until all the bread

the prison.
n of Mattan, and Gedaliah the son of
ur, and Jucal the son of Shelemiah, and Pashur the son of
 that Jeremiah had spoken unto all the
ople, saying, 38:2 Thus saith the LORD, He that remaineth in this
 the sword, by the famine, and by the pestilence: but
aldeans shall live; for he shall have his
Thus saith the LORD, This city shall surely be given into the
abylon's army, which shall take it.
4 Therefore the princes said unto the king, We beseech thee, let
 death: for thus he weakeneth the hands of the men
 and the hands of all the people, in
king such words unto them: for this man seeketh not the welfare of
 the hurt.
said, Behold, he is in your hand: for the
nst you.
and cast him into the dungeon of
 the son of Hammelech, that was in the court of the prison:
iah with cords. And in the dungeon there was no
n the mire.
e Ethiopian, one of the eunuchs which was
put Jeremiah in the dungeon;
n sitting in the gate of Benjamin; 38:8 Ebedmelech went
se, and spake to the king saying, 38:9 My
n all that they have done to
 prophet, whom they have cast into the dungeon; and he is
 the place where he is: for there is no more
ing commanded Ebedmelech the Ethiopian, saying, Take
e, and take up Jeremiah the prophet out
f the dungeon, before he die.
Ebedmelech took the men with him, and went into the house of
asury, and took thence old cast clouts and old
rds into the dungeon to Jeremiah.
 And Ebedmelech the Ethiopian said unto Jeremiah, Put now these
 rotten rags under thine armholes under the cords.
 they drew up Jeremiah with cords, and took him up out of the
 remained in the court of the prison.
8:14 Then Zedekiah the king sent, and took Jeremiah the prophet unto
hird entry that is in the house of the LORD: and the
l ask thee a thing; hide nothing from

, If I declare it unto thee,
t surely put me to death? and if I give thee counsel, wilt
?  38:16 So Zedekiah the king sware secretly
eth, that made us this soul, I
ut thee to death, neither will I give thee into the hand of
 life.
dekiah, Thus saith the LORD, the God
osts, the God of Israel; If thou wilt assuredly go forth unto the
 princes, then thy soul shall live, and this city
d thou shalt live, and thine house:
 But if thou wilt not go forth to the king of Babylon's princes,
ty be given into the hand of the Chaldeans, and they
hou shalt not escape out of their hand.

emiah, I am afraid of the
allen to the Chaldeans, lest they deliver me into their
38:20 But Jeremiah said, They shall not deliver thee. Obey, I beseech
ce of the LORD, which I speak unto thee: so it shall be
l shall live.
to go forth, this is the word that the LORD
the women that are left in the
dah's house shall be brought forth to the king of Babylon's
n shall say, Thy friends have set thee on, and
t are sunk in the mire, and they
ed away back.
 out all thy wives and thy children to the
 of their hand, but shalt be
 hand of the king of Babylon: and thou shalt cause this
.
h, Let no man know of these
ou shalt not die.
ces hear that I have talked with thee, and they
Declare unto us now what thou hast
nto the king, hide it not from us, and we will not put thee to
 king said unto thee: 38:26 Then thou shalt say
ion before the king, that he would
use me to return to Jonathan's house, to die there.
es unto Jeremiah, and asked him: and he
old them according to all these words that the king had commanded. So
 speaking with him; for the matter was not perceived.
the court of the prison until the day that
en Jerusalem was taken.
th year of Zedekiah king of Judah, in the tenth month,
Babylon and all his army against
m, and they besieged it.
e eleventh year of Zedekiah, in the fourth month, the
ity was broken up.
nces of the king of Babylon came in, and sat in
r, Samgarnebo, Sarsechim, Rabsaris,
lsharezer, Rabmag, with all the residue of the princes of the
9:4 And it came to pass, that when Zedekiah the king of Judah saw
 men of war, then they fled, and went forth out of
 the king's garden, by the gate
he two walls: and he went out the way of the plain.
pursued after them, and overtook Zedekiah
ad taken him, they brought
chadnezzar king of Babylon to Riblah in the land of
upon him.
 slew the sons of Zedekiah in Riblah
re his eyes: also the king of Babylon slew all the nobles of
r he put out Zedekiah's eyes, and bound him with chains,

 house, and the houses of the
h fire, and brake down the walls of Jerusalem.
of the guard carried away captive
bylon the remnant of the people that remained in the city, and
, that fell to him, with the rest of the people
adan the captain of the guard left of the poor of the
 the land of Judah, and gave them
ds and fields at the same time.
ow Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon gave charge concerning
e captain of the guard, saying, 39:12 Take
 harm; but do unto him even as
ay unto thee.
captain of the guard sent, and Nebushasban,
nd all the king of Babylon's
14 Even they sent, and took Jeremiah out of the court of
him unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son
me: so he dwelt among the
5 Now the word of the LORD came unto Jeremiah, while he was shut
 the prison, saying, 39:16 Go and speak to
aith the LORD of hosts, the
; Behold, I will bring my words upon this city for evil,
 shall be accomplished in that day before
 that day, saith the LORD: and thou
 not be given into the hand of the men of whom thou art afraid.
surely deliver thee, and thou shalt not fall by the
r a prey unto thee: because thou hast
 thy trust in me, saith the LORD.
The word that came to Jeremiah from the LORD, after that
 the guard had let him go from Ramah, when
mong all that were carried
f Jerusalem and Judah, which were carried away captive
e captain of the guard took Jeremiah, and said unto him,
ounced this evil upon this place.
Now the LORD hath brought it, and done according as he hath said:
inned against the LORD, and have not obeyed his
 upon you.
e thee this day from the chains which were
ee to come with me into
d I will look well unto thee: but if it seem ill unto
ylon, forbear: behold, all the land is
fore thee: whither it seemeth good and convenient for thee to go,
:5 Now while he was not yet gone back, he said, Go back also to
 Ahikam the son of Shaphan, whom the king of
ties of Judah, and dwell with
he people: or go wheresoever it seemeth convenient unto
of the guard gave him victuals and a
rd, and let him go.
miah unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam to Mizpah; and
 that were left in the land.
hen all the captains of the forces which were in the fields,
n, heard that the king of Babylon had made
he land, and had committed
and women, and children, and of the poor of the land, of
 away captive to Babylon; 40:8 Then they
came to Gedaliah to Mizpah, even Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and
than the sons of Kareah, and Seraiah the son of
e Netophathite, and Jezaniah the
 Maachathite, they and their men.
And Gedaliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan sware unto them
 saying, Fear not to serve the Chaldeans: dwell in
Babylon, and it shall be well with

 Mizpah, to serve the
ll come unto us: but ye, gather ye wine, and summer
n your vessels, and dwell in your
that ye have taken.
 all the Jews that were in Moab, and among the
e in all the countries, heard that
ng of Babylon had left a remnant of Judah, and that he had set
he son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan; 40:12 Even
aces whither they were driven, and
o the land of Judah, to Gedaliah, unto Mizpah, and gathered wine
very much.
on of Kareah, and all the captains of the
edaliah to Mizpah, 40:14 And
m, Dost thou certainly know that Baalis the king of the
 the son of Nethaniah to slay thee? But
edaliah the son of Ahikam believed them not.
 spake to Gedaliah in Mizpah
ing, Let me go, I pray thee, and I will slay Ishmael the
an shall know it: wherefore should he slay
ed unto thee should be
 remnant in Judah perish?  40:16 But Gedaliah the
he son of Kareah, Thou shalt not do
thing: for thou speakest falsely of Ishmael.
nth month, that Ishmael the son of
iah the son of Elishama, of the seed royal, and the princes of
en with him, came unto Gedaliah the son of Ahikam
 bread together in Mizpah.
ose Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, and the ten men that
aliah the son of Ahikam the son of Shaphan
ing of Babylon had made
 land.
ews that were with him, even with
h, at Mizpah, and the Chaldeans that were found there, and the
And it came to pass the second day after he had slain Gedaliah,
 41:5 That there came certain from Shechem, from
rscore men, having their beards
nd their clothes rent, and having cut themselves, with
ir hand, to bring them to the house of the
haniah went forth from Mizpah to meet
m, weeping all along as he went: and it came to pass, as he met
them, Come to Gedaliah the son of Ahikam.
 the midst of the city, that
son of Nethaniah slew them, and cast them into the midst
n that were with him.
were found among them that said unto Ishmael, Slay us
 the field, of wheat, and of barley, and
of oil, and of honey. So he forbare, and slew them not among their
9 Now the pit wherein Ishmael had cast all the dead bodies of the
slain because of Gedaliah, was it which Asa the king
ng of Israel: and Ishmael the son of
aniah filled it with them that were slain.
e all the residue of the people
 in Mizpah, even the king's daughters, and all the people
whom Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had
am: and Ishmael the son of
ied them away captive, and departed to go over to the
Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the
eard of all the evil that Ishmael the son
ok all the men, and went to
hmael the son of Nethaniah, and found him by the great

 the people which were with
ohanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the
en they were glad.
ple that Ishmael had carried away captive from
went unto Johanan the son of
1:15 But Ishmael the son of Nethaniah escaped from Johanan with eight
 to the Ammonites.
nan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of the
he remnant of the people whom he had
vered from Ishmael the son of Nethaniah, from Mizpah, after that
iah the son of Ahikam, even mighty men of war, and
 the eunuchs, whom he had brought
rom Gibeon: 41:17 And they departed, and dwelt in the
is by Bethlehem, to go to enter into
t, 41:18 Because of the Chaldeans: for they were afraid of them,
e son of Nethaniah had slain Gedaliah the son of
ade governor in the land.
 the captains of the forces, and Johanan the son of
 Hoshaiah, and all the people from the
ast even unto the greatest, came near, 42:2 And said unto Jeremiah
, we beseech thee, our supplication be accepted before
he LORD thy God, even for all this
t; (for we are left but a few of many, as thine eyes do behold
ORD thy God may shew us the way wherein we may

o them, I have heard you;
pray unto the LORD your God according to your words;
t whatsoever thing the LORD shall answer
you, I will declare it unto you; I will keep nothing back from you.
y said to Jeremiah, The LORD be a true and faithful
t even according to all things for the
ich the LORD thy God shall send thee to us.
t be evil, we will obey the voice
LORD our God, to whom we send thee; that it may be well with
oice of the LORD our God.
ame to pass after ten days, that the word of the LORD
hen called he Johanan the son of Kareah, and all the captains of
ere with him, and all the people from the least even
 unto them, Thus saith the LORD, the God
of Israel, unto whom ye sent me to present your supplication before
e will still abide in this land, then will I build you,
I will plant you, and not pluck you up: for
e unto you.
king of Babylon, of whom ye are afraid; be
 am with you to save you, and
you from his hand.
w mercies unto you, that he may have mercy upon
r own land.
l not dwell in this land, neither obey the
, No; but we will go into the
pt, where we shall see no war, nor hear the sound of the
f bread; and there will we dwell: 42:15 And
, ye remnant of Judah; Thus
D of hosts, the God of Israel; If ye wholly set your
 go to sojourn there; 42:16 Then it
 come to pass, that the sword, which ye feared, shall overtake
d of Egypt, and the famine, whereof ye were
ere in Egypt; and there ye
42:17 So shall it be with all the men that set their faces to go into
urn there; they shall die by the sword, by the famine,
one of them shall remain or escape from
he evil that I will bring upon them.
:18 For thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; As mine
hath been poured forth upon the inhabitants of
d forth upon you, when ye shall
o Egypt: and ye shall be an execration, and an astonishment,
roach; and ye shall see this place no more.
ou, O ye remnant of Judah; Go ye
 Egypt: know certainly that I have admonished you this day.
ed in your hearts, when ye sent me unto the LORD
 the LORD our God; and according
 that the LORD our God shall say, so declare unto us, and we
nd now I have this day declared it to you; but ye have not
LORD your God, nor any thing for the which he
herefore know certainly that ye shall die by the sword, by
estilence, in the place whither ye desire to
 to pass, that when Jeremiah had made an end of
e words of the LORD their God, for
the LORD their God had sent him to them, even all these words,
iah the son of Hoshaiah, and Johanan the son of
ng unto Jeremiah, Thou speakest
the LORD our God hath not sent thee to say, Go not into Egypt
3 But Baruch the son of Neriah setteth thee on
he hand of the Chaldeans, that
 put us to death, and carry us away captives into Babylon.
n of Kareah, and all the captains of the forces,
 voice of the LORD, to dwell in the
of Judah.
areah, and all the captains of the
, took all the remnant of Judah, that were returned from all
had been driven, to dwell in the land of Judah;
ren, and the king's daughters, and
person that Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard had left with
Ahikam the son of Shaphan, and Jeremiah the

t: for they obeyed not the
ORD: thus came they even to Tahpanhes.
43:8 Then came the word of the LORD unto Jeremiah in Tahpanhes,
reat stones in thine hand, and hide them in the
the entry of Pharaoh's house in
, in the sight of the men of Judah; 43:10 And say unto them,
 hosts, the God of Israel; Behold, I will send
Babylon, my servant, and will set
one upon these stones that I have hid; and he shall spread his
them.
l smite the land of Egypt, and
ch as are for death to death; and such as are for captivity
as are for the sword to the sword.
2 And I will kindle a fire in the houses of the gods of Egypt; and
em, and carry them away captives: and he shall array
, as a shepherd putteth on his garment;
nd he shall go forth from thence in peace.
f Bethshemesh, that is in the
pt; and the houses of the gods of the Egyptians shall he
e word that came to Jeremiah concerning all the Jews which
pt, which dwell at Migdol, and at Tahpanhes,
hros, saying, 44:2 Thus saith
 hosts, the God of Israel; Ye have seen all the evil that I
alem, and upon all the cities of Judah; and,
, and no man dwelleth therein,
se of their wickedness which they have committed to provoke
ey went to burn incense, and to serve other
 ye, nor your fathers.
ent unto you all my servants the prophets, rising
h, do not this abominable thing that
te.
clined their ear to turn from their
dness, to burn no incense unto other gods.
was poured forth, and was
cities of Judah and in the streets of Jerusalem; and
as at this day.
 saith the LORD, the God of hosts, the God of
t evil against your souls, to cut
m you man and woman, child and suckling, out of Judah, to leave
 44:8 In that ye provoke me unto wrath with the
e unto other gods in the land of
hither ye be gone to dwell, that ye might cut yourselves off,
a curse and a reproach among all the nations of
the wickedness of your fathers, and
ickedness of the kings of Judah, and the wickedness of their
ckedness, and the wickedness of your wives,
f Judah, and in the streets of
  44:10 They are not humbled even unto this day, neither
ed in my law, nor in my statutes, that I set

sts, the God of Israel;
t my face against you for evil, and to cut off all
the remnant of Judah, that have set their faces
ourn there, and they shall all be
d, and fall in the land of Egypt; they shall even be consumed
he famine: they shall die, from the least even
by the famine: and they shall be
ation, and an astonishment, and a curse, and a reproach.
them that dwell in the land of Egypt, as I
y the famine, and by the
4 So that none of the remnant of Judah, which are gone
journ there, shall escape or remain, that
, to the which they have a
rn to dwell there: for none shall return but such as
l the men which knew that their wives had burned incense
he women that stood by, a great multitude,
nd of Egypt, in Pathros,
h, saying, 44:16 As for the word that thou hast spoken
ORD, we will not hearken unto thee.
17 But we will certainly do whatsoever thing goeth forth out of our
urn incense unto the queen of heaven, and to pour out
we have done, we, and our fathers, our
ngs, and our princes, in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of
then had we plenty of victuals, and were well, and saw
we left off to burn incense to the queen of heaven,
 unto her, we have wanted all things,
 have been consumed by the sword and by the famine.
nse to the queen of heaven, and poured
t drink offerings unto her, did we make her cakes to worship her,
k offerings unto her, without our men?  44:20 Then
e, to the men, and to the women, and
ll the people which had given him that answer, saying, 44:21 The
rned in the cities of Judah, and in the streets of
 your kings, and your princes, and the
ople of the land, did not the LORD remember them, and came it not
4:22 So that the LORD could no longer bear, because
 because of the abominations which ye
e committed; therefore is your land a desolation, and an
 without an inhabitant, as at this day.

 because ye have sinned
 and have not obeyed the voice of the LORD, nor
tes, nor in his testimonies;
is evil is happened unto you, as at this day.
ll the people, and to all the
 the word of the LORD, all Judah that are in the land of
e LORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saying;
 your mouths, and fulfilled
d, saying, We will surely perform our vows that we have
he queen of heaven, and to pour out drink
lish your vows, and surely
ows.
f the LORD, all Judah that dwell in
and of Egypt; Behold, I have sworn by my great name, saith the
hall no more be named in the mouth of any man of
ying, The Lord GOD liveth.
, I will watch over them for evil, and not for good: and
are in the land of Egypt shall be consumed
ere be an end of them.
l number that escape the sword shall return out of the
of Judah, and all the remnant of Judah,
hat are gone into the land of Egypt to sojourn there, shall know
stand, mine, or their's.
 shall be a sign unto you, saith the LORD, that I will
at ye may know that my words shall surely
ith the LORD; Behold, I will
hophra king of Egypt into the hand of his enemies, and
eek his life; as I gave Zedekiah king of
Judah into the hand of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon, his enemy, and
is life.
e prophet spake unto Baruch the son of
riah, when he had written these words in a book at the mouth of
urth year of Jehoiakim the son of Josiah king of
 LORD, the God of Israel, unto thee,
ruch: 45:3 Thou didst say, Woe is me now! for the LORD hath added
w; I fainted in my sighing, and I find no rest.
, The LORD saith thus; Behold, that
 I have built will I break down, and that which I have planted I
n this whole land.
u great things for thyself? seek them not: for,
flesh, saith the LORD: but thy life
I give unto thee for a prey in all places whither thou goest.
e LORD which came to Jeremiah the prophet against
 against the army of Pharaohnecho
 Egypt, which was by the river Euphrates in Carchemish, which
f Babylon smote in the fourth year of Jehoiakim

 draw near to battle.
horses; and get up, ye horsemen, and stand forth with
ars, and put on the brigandines.
herefore have I seen them dismayed and turned away back? and
beaten down, and are fled apace, and look not
 the LORD.
away, nor the mighty man escape; they
ll stumble, and fall toward the north by the river Euphrates.
at cometh up as a flood, whose waters are moved as
p like a flood, and his waters are
like the rivers; and he saith, I will go up, and will cover the
oy the city and the inhabitants thereof.

ariots; and let the mighty men
; the Ethiopians and the Libyans, that handle the shield;
dle and bend the bow.
 the day of the Lord GOD of hosts, a day of
s adversaries: and the sword
, and it shall be satiate and made drunk with their blood:
s hath a sacrifice in the north country by the
 Gilead, and take balm, O virgin, the daughter of
y medicines; for thou shalt not be

ame, and thy cry hath filled the
r the mighty man hath stumbled against the mighty, and they
r.
o Jeremiah the prophet, how
r king of Babylon should come and smite the land of
gypt, and publish in Migdol, and publish in Noph
st, and prepare thee; for the sword
 devour round about thee.
 thy valiant men swept away? they stood not, because the
:16 He made many to fall, yea, one fell upon another: and they said,
 us go again to our own people, and to the land of our
g sword.
aoh king of Egypt is but a noise; he
 passed the time appointed.
live, saith the King, whose name is the LORD of hosts,
 mountains, and as Carmel by the sea, so
shall he come.
elling in Egypt, furnish thyself to go into
desolate without an inhabitant.
gypt is like a very fair heifer, but destruction cometh; it
.
idst of her like fatted bullocks;
y also are turned back, and are fled away together: they did
 day of their calamity was come upon them, and
22 The voice thereof shall go like a serpent; for they shall march
d come against her with axes, as hewers of wood.
rest, saith the LORD, though it cannot
 searched; because they are more than the grasshoppers, and are
24 The daughter of Egypt shall be confounded; she shall be
of the people of the north.
ORD of hosts, the God of Israel, saith; Behold, I will
and Pharaoh, and Egypt, with their gods,
and their kings; even Pharaoh, and all them that trust in him: 46:26
iver them into the hand of those that seek their lives,
adrezzar king of Babylon, and into the hand
 be inhabited, as in the days
th the LORD.
 my servant Jacob, and be not dismayed, O
m afar off, and thy seed from
 their captivity; and Jacob shall return, and be in rest
l make him afraid.
 O Jacob my servant, saith the LORD: for I am with
 of all the nations whither I have
 thee: but I will not make a full end of thee, but correct thee
l I not leave thee wholly unpunished.
7:1 The word of the LORD that came to Jeremiah the prophet against
 before that Pharaoh smote Gaza.
hus saith the LORD; Behold, waters rise up out of the north, and
owing flood, and shall overflow the land, and all
em that dwell therein: then the men
 cry, and all the inhabitants of the land shall howl.
amping of the hoofs of his strong horses,
e rumbling of his wheels, the
ll not look back to their children for feebleness of hands;
 that cometh to spoil all the Philistines, and
y helper that remaineth: for the
l spoil the Philistines, the remnant of the country of
 come upon Gaza; Ashkelon is cut off with the remnant
t thou cut thyself?  47:6 O thou sword of
 quiet? put up thyself into
 rest, and be still.
 quiet, seeing the LORD hath given it a charge
a shore? there hath he appointed
8:1 Against Moab thus saith the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; Woe
r it is spoiled: Kiriathaim is confounded and taken:
yed.
 of Moab: in Heshbon they have
il against it; come, and let us cut it off from being a
cut down, O Madmen; the sword shall pursue
 from Horonaim, spoiling and great
ction.
le ones have caused a cry to be heard.
48:5 For in the going up of Luhith continual weeping shall go up; for
down of Horonaim the enemies have heard a cry of
ur lives, and be like the heath in the wilderness.
sted in thy works and in thy treasures,
hou shalt also be taken: and Chemosh shall go forth into captivity
 and his princes together.
 spoiler shall come upon every city, and no city shall
l perish, and the plain shall be
d, as the LORD hath spoken.
ings unto Moab, that it may flee and get away: for the
late, without any to dwell therein.
10 Cursed be he that doeth the work of the LORD deceitfully, and
keepeth back his sword from blood.
1 Moab hath been at ease from his youth, and he hath settled on
not been emptied from vessel to vessel, neither
ore his taste remained in him, and
ent is not changed.
hold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will
l cause him to wander, and shall
s vessels, and break their bottles.
13 And Moab shall be ashamed of Chemosh, as the house of Israel was
el their confidence.
We are mighty and strong men for the war?  48:15
f her cities, and his chosen young
e gone down to the slaughter, saith the King, whose name is the
8:16 The calamity of Moab is near to come, and his affliction hasteth
7 All ye that are about him, bemoan him; and all ye that know his
 the strong staff broken, and the beautiful rod!
bit Dibon, come down from thy glory,
sit in thirst; for the spoiler of Moab shall come upon thee, and
hy strong holds.
Aroer, stand by the way, and espy; ask him that
say, What is done?  48:20 Moab is
ded; for it is broken down: howl and cry; tell ye it in Arnon,
, 48:21 And judgment is come upon the plain
and upon Mephaath, 48:22 And
and upon Nebo, and upon Bethdiblathaim, 48:23 And upon
ul, and upon Bethmeon, 48:24 And upon
ioth, and upon Bozrah, and upon all the cities of the land of Moab,

s arm is broken, saith the
 Make ye him drunken: for he magnified himself against the LORD:
llow in his vomit, and he also shall be in derision.
erision unto thee? was he found among
eves?  for since thou spakest of him, thou skippedst for joy.
ll in Moab, leave the cities, and dwell in the
th her nest in the sides of the
uth.
oab, (he is exceeding proud) his
s, and his arrogancy, and his pride, and the haughtiness of
now his wrath, saith the LORD; but it shall not be so; his
 it.
ab, and I will cry out for all Moab;
 heart shall mourn for the men of Kirheres.
or thee with the weeping of
ants are gone over the sea, they reach even to the sea of
len upon thy summer fruits and upon thy
intage.
aken from the plentiful field, and from
he land of Moab, and I have caused wine to fail from the winepresses:
ead with shouting; their shouting shall be no shouting.
hbon even unto Elealeh, and even unto Jahaz,
ar even unto Horonaim, as an
ree years old: for the waters also of Nimrim shall be
 will cause to cease in Moab, saith the LORD, him that
 and him that burneth incense to his gods.
 for Moab like pipes, and mine
l sound like pipes for the men of Kirheres: because the
are perished.
l be bald, and every beard clipped: upon all
the loins sackcloth.
be lamentation generally upon all the housetops of
: for I have broken Moab like a vessel
erein is no pleasure, saith the LORD.
8:39 They shall howl, saying, How is it broken down! how hath Moab
with shame! so shall Moab be a derision and a
8:40 For thus saith the LORD; Behold, he shall fly as an eagle, and
s wings over Moab.
en, and the strong holds are surprised, and the
 day shall be as the heart of a
her pangs.
royed from being a people, because he hath
8:43 Fear, and the pit, and the snare, shall be upon thee, O
ith the LORD.
 the fear shall fall into the pit; and he
aken in the snare: for I will
it, even upon Moab, the year of their visitation, saith the
t fled stood under the shadow of Heshbon because of the
e forth out of Heshbon, and a flame from
the midst of Sihon, and shall devour the corner of Moab, and the crown
of the tumultuous ones.
to thee, O Moab! the people of Chemosh perisheth: for
and thy daughters captives.
ill I bring again the captivity of Moab in the latter days,
r is the judgment of Moab.
ing the Ammonites, thus saith the LORD; Hath Israel no
then doth their king inherit Gad, and his
re, behold, the days come,
, that I will cause an alarm of war to be heard in
shall be a desolate heap, and her
rs shall be burned with fire: then shall Israel be heir unto
rs, saith the LORD.
n, for Ai is spoiled: cry, ye daughters of Rabbah,
 and run to and fro by the hedges; for
eir king shall go into captivity, and his priests and his princes
 Wherefore gloriest thou in the valleys, thy flowing valley, O
? that trusted in her treasures, saying, Who shall
ll bring a fear upon thee, saith the
 GOD of hosts, from all those that be about thee; and ye shall be
man right forth; and none shall gather up him that
 I will bring again the captivity of the children of
 Concerning Edom, thus saith the LORD of hosts; Is wisdom no more
sel perished from the prudent? is their wisdom
dwell deep, O inhabitants of
 will bring the calamity of Esau upon him, the time that I
If grapegatherers come to thee, would they not leave some
es by night, they will destroy till they have
 bare, I have uncovered his secret places,
: his seed is spoiled, and his
and his neighbours, and he is not.
1 Leave thy fatherless children, I will preserve them alive; and
st in me.
; Behold, they whose judgment was not to
drink of the cup have assuredly drunken; and art thou he that shall
npunished? thou shalt not go unpunished, but thou shalt
3 For I have sworn by myself, saith the LORD, that Bozrah shall
, a reproach, a waste, and a curse; and all the
astes.
 the LORD, and an ambassador is sent
 the heathen, saying, Gather ye together, and come against her,
battle.
 small among the heathen, and despised
ong men.
ceived thee, and the pride of thine
, O thou that dwellest in the clefts of the rock, that holdest
ll: though thou shouldest make thy nest as high as
n from thence, saith the LORD.
so Edom shall be a desolation: every one that goeth by it
shall hiss at all the plagues thereof.
49:18 As in the overthrow of Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbour
aith the LORD, no man shall abide there, neither

n from the swelling of Jordan
 habitation of the strong: but I will suddenly make him run
is a chosen man, that I may appoint over her?
int me the time? and who is that
 that will stand before me?  49:20 Therefore hear the counsel
hath taken against Edom; and his purposes, that
tants of Teman: Surely the least of
lock shall draw them out: surely he shall make their habitations
.
 of their fall, at the cry the
eof was heard in the Red sea.
old, he shall come up and fly as the eagle, and spread his
t that day shall the heart of the mighty men
her pangs.
amath is confounded, and Arpad: for they
have heard evil tidings: they are fainthearted; there is sorrow on the
ot be quiet.
eble, and turneth herself to flee, and fear
 have taken her, as a woman in

, the city of my joy!  49:26
r young men shall fall in her streets, and all the men of
hat day, saith the LORD of hosts.
 And I will kindle a fire in the wall of Damascus, and it shall
 of Benhadad.
nd concerning the kingdoms of Hazor, which
te, thus saith the LORD; Arise
to Kedar, and spoil the men of the east.

 they take away: they shall
elves their curtains, and all their vessels, and their
nto them, Fear is on every side.
Flee, get you far off, dwell deep, O ye inhabitants of Hazor,
ebuchadrezzar king of Babylon hath taken counsel
purpose against you.
ou up unto the wealthy nation, that dwelleth without
ve neither gates nor bars, which dwell
one.
booty, and the multitude of their
a spoil: and I will scatter into all winds them that are in the
 I will bring their calamity from all sides
azor shall be a dwelling for dragons, and a desolation for
 abide there, nor any son of man dwell in it.
e to Jeremiah the prophet against
 the beginning of the reign of Zedekiah king of Judah, saying,
 LORD of hosts; Behold, I will break the bow of
49:36 And upon Elam will I bring the four winds from the four quarters
nd will scatter them toward all those winds; and there
he outcasts of Elam shall not come.
37 For I will cause Elam to be dismayed before their enemies, and
seek their life: and I will bring evil upon them,
ORD; and I will send the sword after
, till I have consumed them: 49:38 And I will set my throne in
oy from thence the king and the princes, saith the
 to pass in the latter days, that I will bring
he LORD.
ake against Babylon and against the land
of the Chaldeans by Jeremiah the prophet.
publish, and set up a standard;
and conceal not: say, Babylon is taken, Bel is confounded,
eces; her idols are confounded, her images are
 the north there cometh up a nation against her, which
, and none shall dwell therein: they shall
beast.
time, saith the LORD, the children of
ael shall come, they and the children of Judah together, going and
all go, and seek the LORD their God.
:5 They shall ask the way to Zion with their faces thitherward,
et us join ourselves to the LORD in a perpetual
n.
 their shepherds have caused them
stray, they have turned them away on the mountains: they have
 hill, they have forgotten their restingplace.
ured them: and their adversaries
 offend not, because they have sinned against the LORD, the
even the LORD, the hope of their fathers.
, and go forth out of the land
ldeans, and be as the he goats before the flocks.
cause to come up against Babylon an
bly of great nations from the north country: and they shall set
 against her; from thence she shall be taken: their
expert man; none shall return in vain.
50:10 And Chaldea shall be a spoil: all that spoil her shall be
e LORD.
ause ye rejoiced, O ye destroyers of
 heritage, because ye are grown fat as the heifer at grass, and
:12 Your mother shall be sore confounded; she that
d, the hindermost of the nations shall
 a wilderness, a dry land, and a desert.

t shall not be inhabited, but
 wholly desolate: every one that goeth by Babylon shall be
all her plagues.
n array against Babylon round about: all ye that
no arrows: for she hath sinned
e LORD.
bout: she hath given her hand: her
tions are fallen, her walls are thrown down: for it is the
ake vengeance upon her; as she hath done, do
rom Babylon, and him that handleth the sickle
he oppressing sword they shall
 one to his people, and they shall flee every one to his own
is a scattered sheep; the lions have driven him away:
h devoured him; and last this
zar king of Babylon hath broken his bones.
 hosts, the God of Israel;
 punish the king of Babylon and his land, as I have

is habitation, and he shall
l and Bashan, and his soul shall be satisfied upon mount
20 In those days, and in that time, saith the LORD, the iniquity of
 sought for, and there shall be none; and the sins of
found: for I will pardon them whom I
rve.
rathaim, even against it, and
 inhabitants of Pekod: waste and utterly destroy after
 according to all that I have commanded
hee.
land, and of great destruction.
ow is the hammer of the whole earth cut asunder and broken! how
 desolation among the nations!  50:24 I have laid a
so taken, O Babylon, and thou wast not
are: thou art found, and also caught, because thou hast striven

and hath brought forth the
 indignation: for this is the work of the Lord GOD of
deans.
utmost border, open her storehouses:
 her up as heaps, and destroy her utterly: let nothing of her be
y all her bullocks; let them go down to the slaughter: woe
 is come, the time of their visitation.

ape out of the land of
e in Zion the vengeance of the LORD our God, the
Call together the archers against Babylon: all ye that bend the
t round about; let none thereof escape: recompense
ding to all that she hath done, do
er: for she hath been proud against the LORD, against the Holy
:30 Therefore shall her young men fall in the streets, and all her
 be cut off in that day, saith the LORD.

most proud, saith the Lord GOD
for thy day is come, the time that I will visit thee.
all stumble and fall, and none shall raise
cities, and it shall devour
ut him.
sts; The children of Israel and the
ren of Judah were oppressed together: and all that took them
t; they refused to let them go.
heir Redeemer is strong; the LORD of hosts is his name: he
eir cause, that he may give rest to the land,
on.
, saith the LORD, and upon the
s of Babylon, and upon her princes, and upon her wise men.
the liars; and they shall dote: a sword is upon
ismayed.
rses, and upon their chariots, and upon
ll the mingled people that are in the midst of her; and they shall
 a sword is upon her treasures; and they shall be
n her waters; and they shall be dried up: for it
they are mad upon their idols.
erefore the wild beasts of the desert with the wild beasts of
ll there, and the owls shall dwell therein: and
ver; neither shall it be dwelt in
neration to generation.
erthrew Sodom and Gomorrah and the neighbour cities
ll no man abide there, neither shall
son of man dwell therein.
 a people shall come from the north, and a great nation,
ised up from the coasts of the earth.
0:42 They shall hold the bow and the lance: they are cruel, and will
: their voice shall roar like the sea, and they shall
ut in array, like a man to the battle,
ainst thee, O daughter of Babylon.
3 The king of Babylon hath heard the report of them, and his hands
guish took hold of him, and pangs as of a woman in
ll come up like a lion from the swelling of Jordan
g: but I will make them suddenly run
 from her: and who is a chosen man, that I may appoint over her?
? and who will appoint me the time? and who is that
 me?  50:45 Therefore hear ye the
 of the LORD, that he hath taken against Babylon; and his
rposed against the land of the Chaldeans:
them out: surely he shall
tation desolate with them.
 noise of the taking of Babylon the earth is moved, and
nations.
ld, I will raise up against Babylon, and
against them that dwell in the midst of them that rise up against me,
wind; 51:2 And will send unto Babylon fanners, that shall
her land: for in the day of trouble they
shall be against her round about.
Against him that bendeth let the archer bend his bow, and against
himself up in his brigandine: and spare ye not her
l her host.
all in the land of the Chaldeans, and they

 nor Judah of his God, of the
ts; though their land was filled with sin against the Holy
lee out of the midst of Babylon, and deliver every man his soul:
her iniquity; for this is the time of the LORD's
 a recompence.
 golden cup in the LORD's hand, that made all
runken of her wine; therefore the
 are mad.
en and destroyed: howl for her; take balm

 she is not healed: forsake her,
us go every one into his own country: for her judgment
 lifted up even to the skies.
 LORD hath brought forth our righteousness: come, and let us
rk of the LORD our God.
ht the arrows; gather the shields: the LORD hath raised
of the Medes: for his device is against
abylon, to destroy it; because it is the vengeance of the LORD, the
s temple.
n the walls of Babylon, make the watch
rong, set up the watchmen, prepare the ambushes: for the LORD hath
 done that which he spake against the inhabitants of
dwellest upon many waters, abundant in treasures,
e of thy covetousness.
f hosts hath sworn by himself, saying, Surely I will
terpillers; and they shall lift up a
t against thee.
earth by his power, he hath established the
 out the heaven by his
51:16 When he uttereth his voice, there is a multitude of waters in
d he causeth the vapours to ascend from the ends of the
 with rain, and bringeth forth the wind out
 brutish by his knowledge; every founder is
 molten image is falsehood, and
no breath in them.
y, the work of errors: in the time of their
The portion of Jacob is not like them; for he is the former of
el is the rod of his inheritance: the LORD of
my battle axe and weapons of war: for with thee will I
 and with thee will I destroy kingdoms;
1:21 And with thee will I break in pieces the horse and his rider;
ll I break in pieces the chariot and his rider; 51:22
n pieces man and woman; and with thee
l I break in pieces old and young; and with thee will I break in
an and the maid; 51:23 I will also break in pieces
lock; and with thee will I break in
s the husbandman and his yoke of oxen; and with thee will I break
s and rulers.
nto Babylon and to all the inhabitants of
e in Zion in your sight,

roying mountain, saith the
stroyest all the earth: and I will stretch out mine hand
own from the rocks, and will make thee a
burnt mountain.
t take of thee a stone for a corner, nor a
 desolate for ever, saith the
:27 Set ye up a standard in the land, blow the trumpet among the
he nations against her, call together against her
d Ashchenaz; appoint a captain
r; cause the horses to come up as the rough caterpillers.
er the nations with the kings of the Medes, the
s thereof, and all the land of his
on.
d sorrow: for every purpose of the
hall be performed against Babylon, to make the land of Babylon a
 an inhabitant.
 Babylon have forborn to fight, they have
 failed; they became as
burned her dwellingplaces; her bars are broken.
another, and one messenger to meet
r, to shew the king of Babylon that his city is taken at one
e passages are stopped, and the reeds they have
r are affrighted.
the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel; The
oor, it is time to thresh
le while, and the time of her harvest shall come.
f Babylon hath devoured me, he hath
ed me, he hath made me an empty vessel, he hath swallowed me up
ath filled his belly with my delicates, he hath
done to me and to my flesh be upon Babylon, shall
y blood upon the inhabitants of
shall Jerusalem say.
us saith the LORD; Behold, I will plead thy cause,
 I will dry up her sea, and make her
ngs dry.
 heaps, a dwellingplace for dragons, an
stonishment, and an hissing, without an inhabitant.
r like lions: they shall yell as lions'
helps.
their feasts, and I will make them
n, that they may rejoice, and sleep a perpetual sleep, and not
.
bs to the slaughter, like rams
ats.
ow is the praise of the whole earth
ised! how is Babylon become an astonishment among the nations!
e up upon Babylon: she is covered with the
 Her cities are a desolation, a dry land, and a wilderness, a
welleth, neither doth any son of man pass
n Babylon, and I will bring forth out of
his mouth that which he hath swallowed up: and the nations shall not
any more unto him: yea, the wall of Babylon shall fall.
t of the midst of her, and deliver ye every
he LORD.
t, and ye fear for the rumour that shall
be heard in the land; a rumour shall both come one year, and after
year shall come a rumour, and violence in the land,
herefore, behold, the days come, that I will do judgment upon
Babylon: and her whole land shall be confounded,
e midst of her.
nd the earth, and all that is therein, shall
ll come unto her from the north,
e LORD.
e slain of Israel to fall, so at
shall fall the slain of all the earth.
51:50 Ye that have escaped the sword, go away, stand not still:
far off, and let Jerusalem come into your mind.
we have heard reproach: shame hath
d our faces: for strangers are come into the sanctuaries of the
:52 Wherefore, behold, the days come, saith the LORD, that I will do
her graven images: and through all her land the wounded
h Babylon should mount up to heaven, and though she should
r strength, yet from me shall spoilers come
und of a cry cometh from Babylon, and great destruction from
ans: 51:55 Because the LORD hath spoiled
Babylon, and destroyed out of her the great voice; when her waves do
t waters, a noise of their voice is uttered: 51:56
 her, even upon Babylon, and her
en are taken, every one of their bows is broken: for the LORD
all surely requite.
ke drunk her princes, and her wise men, her
y men: and they shall sleep a
leep, and not wake, saith the King, whose name is the LORD
saith the LORD of hosts; The broad walls of Babylon shall
r high gates shall be burned with fire; and
e folk in the fire, and they
ry.
rophet commanded Seraiah the son of
h, the son of Maaseiah, when he went with Zedekiah the king of
n the fourth year of his reign. And this Seraiah
remiah wrote in a book all the evil that should come upon
ords that are written against Babylon.
51:61 And Jeremiah said to Seraiah, When thou comest to Babylon, and
 shalt read all these words; 51:62 Then shalt thou say,
ainst this place, to cut it off, that none
t, but that it shall be
.
 made an end of reading this
hou shalt bind a stone to it, and cast it into the midst
ou shalt say, Thus shall Babylon sink, and
 bring upon her: and they
 Thus far are the words of Jeremiah.
:1 Zedekiah was one and twenty years old when he began to reign, and
ven years in Jerusalem. And his mother's name was
of Libnah.
as evil in the eyes of the LORD, according
For through the anger of the LORD it came to pass in Jerusalem
ad cast them out from his presence, that Zedekiah
lon.
nth year of his reign, in the tenth
, in the tenth day of the month, that Nebuchadrezzar king of
ll his army, against Jerusalem, and pitched
round about.
ged unto the eleventh year of king Zedekiah.
 ninth day of the month, the
ore in the city, so that there was no bread for the people
n the city was broken up, and all the men of war fled, and
ty by night by the way of the gate between the
arden; (now the Chaldeans were by
y round about:) and they went by the way of the plain.
haldeans pursued after the king, and
took Zedekiah in the plains of Jericho; and all his army was

 him up unto the king of
h in the land of Hamath; where he gave judgment upon
Babylon slew the sons of Zedekiah before his
Judah in Riblah.
the eyes of Zedekiah; and the king of Babylon
to Babylon, and put him in prison
e day of his death.
fth month, in the tenth day of the month, which was
rezzar king of Babylon, came
 captain of the guard, which served the king of Babylon,
burned the house of the LORD, and the king's
, and all the houses of the
rned he with fire: 52:14 And all the army of the
ain of the guard, brake down all the
s of Jerusalem round about.
Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard carried away captive
e people, and the residue of the people that
ell away, that fell to the king
n, and the rest of the multitude.
 But Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard left certain of the
vinedressers and for husbandmen.
Also the pillars of brass that were in the house of the LORD,
e brasen sea that was in the house of the LORD,
l the brass of them to Babylon.
he caldrons also, and the shovels, and the snuffers, and the
 and all the vessels of brass wherewith they
nd the basons, and the firepans, and the bowls, and the
cks, and the spoons, and the cups; that
hich was of gold in gold, and that which was of silver in silver,
of the guard away.
s, one sea, and twelve brasen bulls that were
ad made in the house of the LORD:
ss of all these vessels was without weight.
 height of one pillar was
; and a fillet of twelve cubits did compass it; and the
fingers: it was hollow.
piter of brass was upon it; and the height of one
twork and pomegranates upon the
 round about, all of brass. The second pillar also and the
nto these.
and six pomegranates on a side; and all
he pomegranates upon the network were an hundred round about.
in of the guard took Seraiah the chief priest, and
 the three keepers of the door: 52:25
took also out of the city an eunuch, which had the charge of the
ven men of them that were near the king's person,
 the principal scribe of the host,
stered the people of the land; and threescore men of the people
ere found in the midst of the city.
26 So Nebuzaradan the captain of the guard took them, and brought
of Babylon to Riblah.
g of Babylon smote them, and put them to death in
s Judah was carried away captive out
is own land.
hom Nebuchadrezzar carried away captive: in
d three and twenty: 52:29 In
th year of Nebuchadrezzar he carried away captive from
ty and two persons: 52:30 In the three and
adan the captain of the guard
y captive of the Jews seven hundred forty and five persons:
ur thousand and six hundred.
it came to pass in the seven and thirtieth year of the
 of Judah, in the twelfth month, in the
ive and twentieth day of the month, that Evilmerodach king of Babylon
year of his reign lifted up the head of Jehoiachin king
orth out of prison.
dly unto him, and set his throne above the throne
n Babylon, 52:33 And changed his
arments: and he did continually eat bread before him all the
2:34 And for his diet, there was a continual diet given him of the
 every day a portion until the day of his death, all

 doth the city sit solitary, that was full of people! how is
 she that was great among the nations, and
 become tributary!  1:2 She
in the night, and her tears are on her cheeks: among all
o comfort her: all her friends have dealt
er enemies.
ivity because of affliction, and because of
 heathen, she findeth no rest:
rsecutors overtook her between the straits.
e none come to the solemn feasts:
 gates are desolate: her priests sigh, her virgins are
terness.
ief, her enemies prosper; for the LORD
th afflicted her for the multitude of her transgressions: her
o captivity before the enemy.
rom the daughter of Zion all her beauty is departed: her
rts that find no pasture, and they are gone

er affliction and of her
 pleasant things that she had in the days of old, when
d of the enemy, and none did help her: the
 sabbaths.
y sinned; therefore she is removed: all
hat honoured her despise her, because they have seen her nakedness:
h, and turneth backward.
ness is in her skirts; she remembereth not her last end;
nderfully: she had no comforter. O LORD,
behold my affliction: for the enemy hath magnified himself.
th spread out his hand upon all her pleasant
then entered into her sanctuary,
u didst command that they should not enter into thy
eople sigh, they seek bread; they have given their
eve the soul: see, O LORD, and
for I am become vile.
g to you, all ye that pass by? behold, and see if
sorrow, which is done unto me,
the LORD hath afflicted me in the day of his fierce anger.
e sent fire into my bones, and it prevaileth
 my feet, he hath turned me
 made me desolate and faint all the day.

und by his hand: they are
ome up upon my neck: he hath made my strength to fall,
nto their hands, from whom I am not able
to rise up.
under foot all my mighty men in the midst
 me to crush my young men:
trodden the virgin, the daughter of Judah, as in a
ngs I weep; mine eye, mine eye runneth down with
should relieve my soul is far from
 children are desolate, because the enemy prevailed.
r hands, and there is none to comfort her:
, that his adversaries should
out him: Jerusalem is as a menstruous woman among them.
s; for I have rebelled against his
dment: hear, I pray you, all people, and behold my sorrow: my
men are gone into captivity.
led for my lovers, but they deceived me: my priests and mine
st in the city, while they sought their meat to
, O LORD; for I am in distress: my bowels are troubled;
 me; for I have grievously rebelled: abroad
s death.
gh: there is none to comfort me: all
 enemies have heard of my trouble; they are glad that thou hast
bring the day that thou hast called, and they shall
l their wickedness come before thee; and do unto them, as
r all my transgressions: for my sighs are
ath the LORD covered the daughter of Zion with a cloud in his
from heaven unto the earth the beauty of Israel,
n the day of his anger!  2:2 The
h swallowed up all the habitations of Jacob, and hath not
wn in his wrath the strong holds of the
aughter of Judah; he hath brought them down to the ground: he hath
gdom and the princes thereof.
th cut off in his fierce anger all the horn of Israel: he
 hand from before the enemy, and he burned
 devoureth round about.
t his bow like an enemy: he stood with his right hand
 that were pleasant to the eye in the
ernacle of the daughter of Zion: he poured out his fury like fire.
as as an enemy: he hath swallowed up Israel, he hath
he hath destroyed his strong holds, and
ath increased in the daughter of Judah mourning and lamentation.
violently taken away his tabernacle, as if it were of
is places of the assembly: the LORD hath
caused the solemn feasts and sabbaths to be forgotten in Zion, and
 the indignation of his anger the king and the priest.
 his altar, he hath abhorred his sanctuary,
nemy the walls of her palaces;
made a noise in the house of the LORD, as in the day of a
LORD hath purposed to destroy the wall of the daughter of
ut a line, he hath not withdrawn his hand
mpart and the wall to lament;
shed together.
nto the ground; he hath destroyed and broken
 among the Gentiles: the law is
her prophets also find no vision from the LORD.
f Zion sit upon the ground, and keep
nce: they have cast up dust upon their heads; they have girded
cloth: the virgins of Jerusalem hang down their
yes do fail with tears, my bowels are troubled, my liver is
for the destruction of the daughter of my
lings swoon in the streets of

 corn and wine? when they
wounded in the streets of the city, when their soul was
rs' bosom.
 to witness for thee? what thing shall I
liken to thee, O daughter of Jerusalem? what shall I equal to thee,
ort thee, O virgin daughter of Zion? for thy breach is
heal thee?  2:14 Thy prophets have seen
ain and foolish things for thee: and they have not discovered thine
rn away thy captivity; but have seen for thee false
t.
ds at thee; they hiss and wag
at the daughter of Jerusalem, saying, Is this the city that
 of beauty, The joy of the whole earth?  2:16
outh against thee: they hiss and
e teeth: they say, We have swallowed her up: certainly this is
ed for; we have found, we have seen it.

 devised; he hath fulfilled
 he had commanded in the days of old: he hath thrown
 he hath caused thine enemy to rejoice
er thee, he hath set up the horn of thine adversaries.
o the LORD, O wall of the daughter of Zion,
 night: give thyself no rest;
 apple of thine eye cease.
cry out in the night: in the beginning of the watches pour
er before the face of the LORD: lift up thy
ung children, that faint for
e top of every street.
ORD, and consider to whom thou hast done this. Shall
 children of a span long? shall the
t and the prophet be slain in the sanctuary of the Lord?  2:21
d lie on the ground in the streets: my virgins and
word; thou hast slain them in the day
thine anger; thou hast killed, and not pitied.
mn day my terrors round about, so
 the day of the LORD's anger none escaped nor remained: those
and brought up hath mine enemy consumed.

on by the rod of his wrath.
 led me, and brought me into darkness, but not into light.
is he turned; he turneth his hand against me all
in hath he made old; he hath broken my bones.
 compassed me with gall and
:6 He hath set me in dark places, as they that be dead of old.
 me about, that I cannot get out: he hath made my
ry and shout, he shutteth out my prayer.

tone, he hath made my paths
:10 He was unto me as a bear lying in wait, and as a lion in secret
 He hath turned aside my ways, and pulled me in pieces: he hath

 a mark for the arrow.
sed the arrows of his quiver to enter into my reins.
 my people; and their song all the day.

e hath made me drunken with
3:16 He hath also broken my teeth with gravel stones, he hath covered
.
r off from peace: I forgat

is perished from the LORD:
ng mine affliction and my misery, the wormwood and the
hem still in remembrance, and is humbled in me.
erefore have I hope.
LORD's mercies that we are not consumed, because his
They are new every morning: great is thy faithfulness.
n, saith my soul; therefore will I hope in
that wait for him, to the soul that
th him.
ld both hope and quietly wait for the
vation of the LORD.
 a man that he bear the yoke of his youth.
nce, because he hath borne it

f so be there may be hope.
th his cheek to him that smiteth him: he is filled full
the LORD will not cast off for ever: 3:32 But though he cause
ve compassion according to the multitude of his
flict willingly nor grieve the children of men.
the prisoners of the earth.
n aside the right of a man before the face of the most
in his cause, the LORD approveth not.
:37 Who is he that saith, and it cometh to pass, when the Lord
3:38 Out of the mouth of the most High proceedeth
e doth a living man complain, a man
he punishment of his sins?  3:40 Let us search and try our ways,
the LORD.
 with our hands unto God in the heavens.

led: thou hast not pardoned.
hast covered with anger, and persecuted us: thou hast slain,

loud, that our prayer should
ough.
scouring and refuse in the midst of
eople.
 their mouths against us.
 a snare is come upon us, desolation and destruction.
with rivers of water for the destruction of
 eye trickleth down, and ceaseth not, without any
RD look down, and behold from heaven.
:51 Mine eye affecteth mine heart because of all the daughters of my
Mine enemies chased me sore, like a bird, without cause.
y life in the dungeon, and cast a stone upon
ad; then I said, I am cut off.
alled upon thy name, O LORD, out of the low dungeon.
e: hide not thine ear at my breathing, at
day that I called upon thee: thou
 Fear not.
ed the causes of my soul; thou hast
med my life.
n my wrong: judge thou my cause.
hou hast seen all their vengeance and all their imaginations
ou hast heard their reproach, O LORD, and all their
he lips of those that rose up against
 and their device against me all the day.
ir rising up; I am their
Render unto them a recompence, O LORD, according to the work of
5 Give them sorrow of heart, thy curse unto them.
 in anger from under the heavens of the
ORD.
w is the most fine gold changed! the
es of the sanctuary are poured out in the top of every street.
ons of Zion, comparable to fine gold, how are they
e work of the hands of the potter!
en the sea monsters draw out the breast, they give suck to their
ughter of my people is become cruel, like the
he tongue of the sucking child cleaveth to the roof of his mouth
ung children ask bread, and no man breaketh it unto
 delicately are desolate in the streets: they
ce dunghills.
 the iniquity of the daughter of my people is
n of Sodom, that was overthrown
oment, and no hands stayed on her.
Her Nazarites were purer than snow, they were whiter than milk,
y in body than rubies, their polishing was of
 than a coal; they are not known
treets: their skin cleaveth to their bones; it is withered, it
ck.
rd are better than they that be
h hunger: for these pine away, stricken through for want of
.
ave sodden their own children:
their meat in the destruction of the daughter of my people.
complished his fury; he hath poured out his
n Zion, and it hath devoured
ons thereof.
h, and all the inhabitants of the world,
would not have believed that the adversary and the enemy should have
he gates of Jerusalem.
s of her prophets, and the iniquities of her priests,
he just in the midst of her, 4:14 They
ve wandered as blind men in the streets, they have polluted
so that men could not touch their garments.
 it is unclean; depart, depart,
: when they fled away and wandered, they said among the
 sojourn there.
ORD hath divided them; he will no more regard
of the priests, they favoured not
ers.
iled for our vain help: in our
e have watched for a nation that could not save us.
t we cannot go in our streets: our end is
 is come.
ter than the eagles of the heaven: they
ursued us upon the mountains, they laid wait for us in the
breath of our nostrils, the anointed of the LORD, was taken
we said, Under his shadow we shall live among
lad, O daughter of Edom, that dwellest in the
hrough unto thee: thou shalt be
and shalt make thyself naked.
punishment of thine iniquity is accomplished, O daughter of
arry thee away into captivity: he will visit
 will discover thy sins.
O LORD, what is come upon us: consider, and behold our
ance is turned to strangers, our houses to aliens.
ess, our mothers are as widows.
have drunken our water for money; our wood is sold unto us.
er persecution: we labour, and have no rest.
yptians, and to the Assyrians, to
sfied with bread.
sinned, and are not; and we have borne their
 over us: there is none that doth deliver us
read with the peril of our lives because of the sword
r skin was black like an oven because of the terrible famine.
the women in Zion, and the maids in the cities of
 up by their hand: the faces of elders were not
ng men to grind, and the children fell under the
ed from the gate, the young men from their
ceased; our dance is turned into
.
d: woe unto us, that we have
7 For this our heart is faint; for these things our eyes
f the mountain of Zion, which is desolate, the foxes
LORD, remainest for ever; thy throne from generation to
re dost thou forget us for ever, and forsake us so long
to thee, O LORD, and we shall be turned;
renew our days as of old.
 hast utterly rejected us; thou art very wroth against us.
Prophet Ezekiel
ss in the thirtieth year, in the fourth month,
was among the captives by the river
ebar, that the heavens were opened, and I saw visions of God.
y of the month, which was the fifth year of king
rd of the LORD came expressly unto
l the priest, the son of Buzi, in the land of the Chaldeans by
d the hand of the LORD was there upon him.
wind came out of the north, a
, and a fire infolding itself, and a brightness was about
thereof as the colour of amber, out of the
e midst thereof came the likeness of four living
arance; they had the likeness of a

ery one had four wings.
eet were straight feet; and the sole of their feet was
ot: and they sparkled like the colour of
burnished brass.
ands of a man under their wings on their four
and their wings.
oined one to another; they turned not when they
forward.
eir faces, they four had the face of a
n, and the face of a lion, on the right side: and they four had the
n the left side; they four also had the face of an
aces: and their wings were stretched upward; two
 to another, and two covered their
.
 forward: whither the spirit was
hey went; and they turned not when they went.
ing creatures, their appearance was
burning coals of fire, and like the appearance of lamps: it went
the living creatures; and the fire was bright, and
ning.
 and returned as the appearance of a
h of lightning.
e living creatures, behold one wheel upon the
is four faces.
he wheels and their work was like unto the
 likeness: and their
 work was as it were a wheel in the middle of a
 went upon their four sides: and they turned
ir rings, they were so high that they were dreadful;
yes round about them four.
n the living creatures went, the wheels went by them: and
 were lifted up from the earth, the wheels
e spirit was to go, they went, thither was their
lifted up over against them: for the
it of the living creature was in the wheels.
d when those stood, these stood;
 those were lifted up from the earth, the wheels were lifted
for the spirit of the living creature was in the
f the firmament upon the heads of the living
ible crystal, stretched forth
heads above.
nt were their wings straight, the one toward
vered on this side, and every
, which covered on that side, their bodies.
noise of their wings, like the
reat waters, as the voice of the Almighty, the voice of
host: when they stood, they let down their
m the firmament that was over their
, when they stood, and had let down their wings.
t was over their heads was the
f a throne, as the appearance of a sapphire stone: and upon
one was the likeness as the appearance of a man
 the colour of amber, as the appearance of fire round
earance of his loins even upward, and
m the appearance of his loins even downward, I saw as it were the
e, and it had brightness round about.
:28 As the appearance of the bow that is in the cloud in the day of
e appearance of the brightness round about. This was
 of the glory of the LORD. And when I
 it, I fell upon my face, and I heard a voice of one that spake.
unto me, Son of man, stand upon thy feet, and I will
e spirit entered into me when he spake unto me, and set me
rd him that spake unto me.
aid unto me, Son of man, I send thee to the children of
ion that hath rebelled against me: they and
 me, even unto this very day.
hey are impudent children and stiffhearted. I do send thee
t say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD.
r whether they will forbear,
e a rebellious house,) yet shall know that there hath been

f them, neither be afraid of
 though briers and thorns be with thee, and thou dost
 afraid of their words, nor be dismayed
t their looks, though they be a rebellious house.
ds unto them, whether they will hear,
whether they will forbear: for they are most rebellious.
, hear what I say unto thee; Be not thou
rebellious like that rebellious house: open thy mouth, and eat that I

s sent unto me; and, lo, a
 was therein; 2:10 And he spread it before me; and it
t: and there was written therein
ions, and mourning, and woe.
er he said unto me, Son of man, eat that thou findest; eat
unto the house of Israel.
ed my mouth, and he caused me to eat that roll.
an, cause thy belly to eat, and fill
bowels with this roll that I give thee. Then did I eat it; and it
s honey for sweetness.
unto me, Son of man, go, get thee unto the house of
 unto them.
o a people of a strange speech and of an
hard language, but to the house of Israel; 3:6 Not to many people of a
ch and of an hard language, whose words thou canst not
nt thee to them, they would have hearkened
l will not hearken unto thee; for they will
of Israel are impudent and

against their faces, and thy
ong against their foreheads.
adamant harder than flint have I made thy forehead: fear
yed at their looks, though they be a
llious house.
o me, Son of man, all my words that I shall
 and hear with thine ears.
 get thee to them of the captivity, unto the children of
 them, and tell them, Thus saith the Lord
hey will forbear.
took me up, and I heard behind me a voice of a
e glory of the LORD from his
13 I heard also the noise of the wings of the living creatures that
ther, and the noise of the wheels over against them,
.
took me away, and I went in
n the heat of my spirit; but the hand of the LORD was
I came to them of the captivity at Telabib, that dwelt by
I sat where they sat, and remained there
astonished among them seven days.
And it came to pass at the end of seven days, that the word of
e, saying, 3:17 Son of man, I have made thee a
herefore hear the word at my
ive them warning from me.
ay unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; and thou
akest to warn the wicked from his
way, to save his life; the same wicked man shall die in his
 will I require at thine hand.
 if thou warn the wicked, and he turn not from his wickedness,
way, he shall die in his iniquity; but thou hast
 When a righteous man doth turn from his righteousness, and
lay a stumbling-block before him, he shall die:
ning, he shall die in his sin, and
ghteousness which he hath done shall not be remembered; but his
e at thine hand.
hou warn the righteous man, that the righteous
ll surely live, because he is
o thou hast delivered thy soul.
d the hand of the LORD was there upon me; and he said unto me,
 the plain, and I will there talk with thee.
to the plain: and, behold, the
he LORD stood there, as the glory which I saw by the river
 my face.
into me, and set me upon my feet, and
ke with me, and said unto me, Go, shut thyself within thine house.
 O son of man, behold, they shall put bands upon thee,
m, and thou shalt not go out among them:
3:26 And I will make thy tongue cleave to the roof of thy mouth, that
 dumb, and shalt not be to them a reprover: for they are
7 But when I speak with thee, I will open thy mouth, and thou shalt
Thus saith the Lord GOD; He that heareth, let him hear;
 him forbear: for they are a rebellious
ouse.
hee a tile, and lay it before thee,
ourtray upon it the city, even Jerusalem: 4:2 And lay siege
 fort against it, and cast a mount against it;
t battering rams against it round

n pan, and set it for a wall of
een thee and the city: and set thy face against it, and it
hou shalt lay siege against it. This shall be
 Lie thou also upon thy left side, and lay the iniquity of the
 it: according to the number of the days that thou
r their iniquity.
pon thee the years of their iniquity, according
ndred and ninety days: so shalt
 the iniquity of the house of Israel.
:6 And when thou hast accomplished them, lie again on thy right side,
t bear the iniquity of the house of Judah forty days: I
y for a year.
set thy face toward the siege of Jerusalem,
hou shalt prophesy against it.
 behold, I will lay bands upon thee, and thou shalt not turn
another, till thou hast ended the days of thy
e wheat, and barley, and beans, and
les, and millet, and fitches, and put them in one vessel, and
of, according to the number of the days that thou
ndred and ninety days shalt thou eat
eof.
 eat shall be by weight, twenty
 day: from time to time shalt thou eat it.
asure, the sixth part of an hin:
e to time shalt thou drink.
ou shalt eat it as barley cakes, and thou shalt bake it
f man, in their sight.
D said, Even thus shall the children of Israel eat
ntiles, whither I will drive them.
 Then said I, Ah Lord GOD! behold, my soul hath not been polluted:
h up even till now have I not eaten of that which
eces; neither came there abominable
 into my mouth.
me, Lo, I have given thee cow's dung for man's
ad therewith.
o me, Son of man, behold, I will break the
all eat bread by weight, and
nd they shall drink water by measure, and with
t bread and water, and be astonied
th another, and consume away for their iniquity.
hee a sharp knife, take thee a
azor, and cause it to pass upon thine head and upon thy
ces to weigh, and divide the hair.
Thou shalt burn with fire a third part in the midst of the city,
he siege are fulfilled: and thou shalt take a third
 knife: and a third part thou shalt
er in the wind; and I will draw out a sword after them.
thereof a few in number, and bind them in thy
n, and cast them into the midst of the fire,
 shall a fire come forth into
se of Israel.
OD; This is Jerusalem: I have set it in the
 are round about her.
changed my judgments into wickedness more than the
an the countries that are round about
: for they have refused my judgments and my statutes, they have not

 Because ye multiplied more than
ons that are round about you, and have not walked in my
 my judgments, neither have done according
 round about you; 5:8
h the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, am against thee,
he midst of thee in the sight of the
ons.
ch I have not done, and whereunto I
not do any more the like, because of all thine abominations.
athers shall eat the sons in the midst of thee,
s; and I will execute judgments in
and the whole remnant of thee will I scatter into all the winds.
as I live, saith the Lord GOD; Surely, because thou
all thy detestable things, and with all
hine abominations, therefore will I also diminish thee; neither shall
e, neither will I have any pity.
 third part of thee shall die with the pestilence, and with
nsumed in the midst of thee: and a third part
hee; and I will scatter a third
 all the winds, and I will draw out a sword after them.
r be accomplished, and I will cause my fury
ted: and they shall know that I
have spoken it in my zeal, when I have accomplished my fury
er I will make thee waste, and a reproach among the nations
ee, in the sight of all that pass by.
:15 So it shall be a reproach and a taunt, an instruction and an
the nations that are round about thee, when I shall
ger and in fury and in furious rebukes.
 the LORD have spoken it.
hall send upon them the evil arrows of famine, which
, and which I will send to destroy you:
nd I will increase the famine upon you, and will break your staff of
 will I send upon you famine and evil beasts, and they
ilence and blood shall pass through thee;
he LORD have spoken it.
d of the LORD came unto me, saying, 6:2 Son of man, set
ns of Israel, and prophesy against them,
6:3 And say, Ye mountains of Israel, hear the word of the Lord GOD;
Lord GOD to the mountains, and to the hills, to the
old, I, even I, will bring a sword upon
ou, and I will destroy your high places.

nd your images shall be
l cast down your slain men before your idols.
s of the children of Israel before
idols; and I will scatter your bones round about your altars.
llingplaces the cities shall be laid waste, and the
that your altars may be laid waste and
de desolate, and your idols may be broken and cease, and your images
n, and your works may be abolished.
 And the slain shall fall in the midst of you, and ye shall know
.
ye may have some that shall
ord among the nations, when ye shall be scattered through
 they that escape of you shall remember me among the nations
carried captives, because I am broken with their
 from me, and with their eyes, which
 whoring after their idols: and they shall lothe themselves for
y have committed in all their abominations.
e LORD, and that I have not said
that I would do this evil unto them.
11 Thus saith the Lord GOD; Smite with thine hand, and stamp with
, Alas for all the evil abominations of the house of
 the sword, by the famine, and by the
tilence.
die of the pestilence; and he that is
r shall fall by the sword; and he that remaineth and is besieged
amine: thus will I accomplish my fury upon them.
m the LORD, when their slain men shall
 among their idols round about their altars, upon every high hill,
of the mountains, and under every green tree, and
where they did offer sweet savour to
their idols.
 my hand upon them, and make the land
olate, yea, more desolate than the wilderness toward Diblath, in
ons: and they shall know that I am the LORD.
me unto me, saying, 7:2 Also, thou
 man, thus saith the Lord GOD unto the land of Israel; An end,
 the four corners of the land.
is the end come upon thee, and I will send mine anger upon
e according to thy ways, and will recompense
:4 And mine eye shall not spare thee, neither will I have pity: but I
se thy ways upon thee, and thine abominations shall be in
 shall know that I am the LORD.
s saith the Lord GOD; An evil, an only evil, behold, is come.
 the end is come: it watcheth for thee; behold, it
ome unto thee, O thou that dwellest in the land:
le is near, and not the sounding
 the mountains.
pour out my fury upon thee, and accomplish mine
hee according to thy ways, and will
pense thee for all thine abominations.
7:9 And mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have pity: I will
according to thy ways and thine abominations that are
shall know that I am the LORD that
h.
ome: the morning is gone forth;
ath blossomed, pride hath budded.
Violence is risen up into a rod of wickedness: none of them shall
eir multitude, nor of any of their's: neither shall
:12 The time is come, the day draweth near: let not the buyer
er mourn: for wrath is upon all the multitude
 not return to that which is sold, although
touching the whole multitude
ch shall not return; neither shall any strengthen himself
fe.
ven to make all ready; but none
the battle: for my wrath is upon all the multitude thereof.
hout, and the pestilence and the famine within:
ith the sword; and he that is in
, famine and pestilence shall devour him.
 escape, and shall be on the
ke doves of the valleys, all of them mourning, every one
All hands shall be feeble, and all knees shall be weak as water.
also gird themselves with sackcloth, and horror shall
e upon all faces, and baldness upon all
heir heads.
silver in the streets, and their gold shall
 shall not be able to deliver
 day of the wrath of the LORD: they shall not satisfy their
ir bowels: because it is the stumblingblock of
eauty of his ornament, he set it in majesty: but they
inations and of their detestable things
herein: therefore have I set it far from them.
ands of the strangers for a prey,
the wicked of the earth for a spoil; and they shall pollute it.
 I turn also from them, and they shall pollute my
ll enter into it, and defile it.
ake a chain: for the land is full of bloody crimes, and the city
e.
t of the heathen, and they shall
their houses: I will also make the pomp of the strong to
es shall be defiled.
ometh; and they shall seek peace, and there shall be
ome upon mischief, and rumour shall be upon
f the prophet; but the law
rom the priest, and counsel from the ancients.
 prince shall be clothed with
 and the hands of the people of the land shall be troubled:
er their way, and according to their deserts
 that I am the LORD.
 pass in the sixth year, in the sixth month, in the
t in mine house, and the elders of
sat before me, that the hand of the Lord GOD fell there upon me.
d, and lo a likeness as the appearance of fire: from
en downward, fire; and from his loins
n upward, as the appearance of brightness, as the colour of amber.
 forth the form of an hand, and took me by a lock of
ed me up between the earth and the
, and brought me in the visions of God to Jerusalem, to the door
that looketh toward the north; where was the seat of
rovoketh to jealousy.
the glory of the God of Israel was there, according
 plain.
f man, lift up thine eyes now the way
ard the north. So I lifted up mine eyes the way toward the north,
ard at the gate of the altar this image of jealousy
rthermore unto me, Son of man, seest thou what they do?
 that the house of Israel committeth here,
ry? but turn thee yet again,
lt see greater abominations.
 brought me to the door of the court; and when I looked,

dig now in the wall: and when I
d in the wall, behold a door.
e said unto me, Go in, and behold the wicked abominations
0 So I went in and saw; and behold every form of creeping things,
asts, and all the idols of the house of Israel,
t.
enty men of the ancients of the
Israel, and in the midst of them stood Jaazaniah the son of
 his censer in his hand; and a thick cloud of
 unto me, Son of man, hast thou seen what the
 the dark, every man in the
is imagery? for they say, the LORD seeth us not; the LORD

t again, and thou shalt see
nations that they do.
ght me to the door of the gate of the LORD's house
 behold, there sat women weeping for
uz.
u seen this, O son of man? turn
again, and thou shalt see greater abominations than these.
 into the inner court of the LORD's house, and,
f the LORD, between the porch and
ar, were about five and twenty men, with their backs toward the
 and their faces toward the east; and they
:17 Then he said unto me, Hast thou seen this, O son of man? Is it a
 the house of Judah that they commit the abominations
hey have filled the land with violence,
nd have returned to provoke me to anger: and, lo, they put the branch
.
ry: mine eye shall not spare,
l I have pity: and though they cry in mine ears with a loud
ear them.
s with a loud voice, saying, Cause them
hat have charge over the city to draw near, even every man with his
on in his hand.
n came from the way of the higher gate, which
 a slaughter weapon in his hand;
man among them was clothed with linen, with a writer's inkhorn
y went in, and stood beside the brasen altar.
ael was gone up from the cherub,
n he was, to the threshold of the house. And he called to the
n, which had the writer's inkhorn by his side;
hrough the midst of the city,
 midst of Jerusalem, and set a mark upon the foreheads of
t cry for all the abominations that be done
 others he said in mine hearing, Go ye after him through
ot your eye spare, neither have ye pity: 9:6
, and little children, and
e not near any man upon whom is the mark; and begin at
n at the ancient men which were before the
ile the house, and fill the courts with
he slain: go ye forth. And they went forth, and slew in the city.
 to pass, while they were slaying them, and I was left,
nd cried, and said, Ah Lord GOD! wilt thou
 pouring out of thy fury upon
 9:9 Then said he unto me, The iniquity of the house of
ng great, and the land is full of blood,
and the city full of perverseness: for they say, The LORD hath
and the LORD seeth not.
 me also, mine eye shall not spare, neither will I have
 their way upon their head.
ehold, the man clothed with linen, which had the inkhorn by
matter, saying, I have done as thou hast
commanded me.
behold, in the firmament that was above the
er them as it were a sapphire
he appearance of the likeness of a throne.
 with linen, and said, Go in
wheels, even under the cherub, and fill thine hand with
the cherubims, and scatter them over the
city. And he went in in my sight.
Now the cherubims stood on the right side of the house, when the
he cloud filled the inner court.
hen the glory of the LORD went up from the cherub, and stood
the house; and the house was filled with the
rightness of the LORD's glory.
 the sound of the cherubims' wings was heard even to the outer
of the Almighty God when he speaketh.
0:6 And it came to pass, that when he had commanded the man clothed
ing, Take fire from between the wheels, from between
, and stood beside the wheels.
 one cherub stretched forth his hand from between the
was between the cherubims, and took
of, and put it into the hands of him that was clothed with linen:
went out.
e cherubims the form of a man's hand
r their wings.
behold the four wheels by the cherubims, one
 by another cherub: and the
 the wheels was as the colour of a beryl stone.
s, they four had one likeness, as if
eel had been in the midst of a wheel.
0:11 When they went, they went upon their four sides; they turned not
 but to the place whither the head looked they followed
 went.
their backs, and their hands, and
ings, and the wheels, were full of eyes round about, even the
 had.
ried unto them in my hearing, O

irst face was the face of a
he second face was the face of a man, and the third the
rth the face of an eagle.
 cherubims were lifted up. This is the living creature
hebar.
t, the wheels went by them: and when
cherubims lifted up their wings to mount up from the earth, the
rned not from beside them.
hey stood, these stood; and when they were lifted up,
so: for the spirit of the living creature
he LORD departed from off the threshold of

r wings, and mounted up from the
 my sight: when they went out, the wheels also were beside
d at the door of the east gate of the LORD's
ael was over them above.
the living creature that I saw under the God of Israel
I knew that they were the cherubims.
:21 Every one had four faces apiece, and every one four wings; and
the hands of a man was under their wings.
as the same faces which I saw
r of Chebar, their appearances and themselves: they went
.
, and brought me unto the east
e LORD's house, which looketh eastward: and behold at the
 twenty men; among whom I saw Jaazaniah the
naiah, princes of the people.
 said he unto me, Son of man, these are the men that devise
ed counsel in this city: 11:3 Which say, It is
city is the caldron, and we be the

prophesy, O son of man.
irit of the LORD fell upon me, and said unto me, Speak;
ave ye said, O house of Israel: for I know
ry one of them.
 your slain in this city, and ye have filled

our slain whom ye have laid
of it, they are the flesh, and this city is the caldron:
 out of the midst of it.
eared the sword; and I will bring a sword upon you,
 I will bring you out of the midst thereof, and deliver you
gers, and will execute judgments among you.
ill judge you in the border of
d ye shall know that I am the LORD.
11 This city shall not be your caldron, neither shall ye be the
thereof; but I will judge you in the border of
 I am the LORD: for ye have not
 my statutes, neither executed my judgments, but have done
 heathen that are round about you.
3 And it came to pass, when I prophesied, that Pelatiah the son of
en fell I down upon my face, and cried with a loud
lt thou make a full end of the remnant
 Israel?  11:14 Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying,
thy brethren, even thy brethren, the men of thy
l wholly, are they unto whom the
nts of Jerusalem have said, Get you far from the LORD: unto us
n possession.
 saith the Lord GOD; Although I have cast
ugh I have scattered them
ries, yet will I be to them as a little sanctuary in
 come.
the Lord GOD; I will even gather you
 the people, and assemble you out of the countries where ye have
d I will give you the land of Israel.
1:18 And they shall come thither, and they shall take away all the
s thereof and all the abominations thereof from
em one heart, and I will put a new spirit
rt out of their flesh, and
 an heart of flesh: 11:20 That they may walk in my
es, and do them: and they shall be my
ple, and I will be their God.
 as for them whose heart walketh after the heart of their
ir abominations, I will recompense their way
OD.
p their wings, and the wheels
; and the glory of the God of Israel was over them above.
the LORD went up from the midst of the city,
n the east side of the city.
rwards the spirit took me up, and brought me in a vision by
Chaldea, to them of the captivity. So the

ivity all the things that the
ewed me.
 came unto me, saying, 12:2 Son of man,
hou dwellest in the midst of a rebellious house, which have eyes to
t; they have ears to hear, and hear not: for they are a
herefore, thou son of man, prepare thee stuff for removing, and
eir sight; and thou shalt remove from thy place to
 may be they will consider, though
e a rebellious house.
hou bring forth thy stuff by day in their sight, as
alt go forth at even in their sight, as
hey that go forth into captivity.
Dig thou through the wall in their sight, and carry out thereby.
ght shalt thou bear it upon thy shoulders, and carry
 shalt cover thy face, that thou see not
the ground: for I have set thee for a sign unto the house of Israel.
id so as I was commanded: I brought forth my stuff by day,
and in the even I digged through the wall with
 twilight, and I bare it upon my
 in their sight.
g came the word of the LORD unto me, saying,
 Israel, the rebellious house,
thee, What doest thou?  12:10 Say thou unto them, Thus saith
den concerneth the prince in Jerusalem, and all
them.
s I have done, so shall it be done
hem: they shall remove and go into captivity.
them shall bear upon his shoulder
twilight, and shall go forth: they shall dig through the wall
 he shall cover his face, that he see not the
 also will I spread upon him, and he shall be taken in my
im to Babylon to the land of the Chaldeans;
l die there.
oward every wind all that are about him to
draw out the sword after them.
d they shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall scatter
and disperse them in the countries.
16 But I will leave a few men of them from the sword, from the
 pestilence; that they may declare all their
 they come; and they shall know
 the LORD.
he LORD came to me, saying, 12:18 Son of
man, eat thy bread with quaking, and drink thy water with trembling
lness; 12:19 And say unto the people of the land, Thus
habitants of Jerusalem, and of the land of
carefulness, and drink their
stonishment, that her land may be desolate from all that
 violence of all them that dwell therein.
 shall be laid waste, and the
be desolate; and ye shall know that I am the LORD.
 came unto me, saying, 12:22 Son of man,
what is that proverb that ye have in the land of Israel, saying, The
nged, and every vision faileth?  12:23 Tell them
; I will make this proverb to cease,
they shall no more use it as a proverb in Israel; but say unto
t hand, and the effect of every vision.

 vision nor flattering
the house of Israel.
 LORD: I will speak, and the word that I shall speak
e no more prolonged: for in your days, O
rebellious house, will I say the word, and will perform it, saith the
12:26 Again the word of the LORD came to me, saying.
ey of the house of Israel say, The vision
nd he prophesieth of the
ar off.
Thus saith the Lord GOD; There shall
 of my words be prolonged any more, but the word which I have
 saith the Lord GOD.
of the LORD came unto me, saying, 13:2 Son of man,
 Israel that prophesy, and say thou
them that prophesy out of their own hearts, Hear ye the word of
 saith the Lord GOD; Woe unto the foolish prophets,
nd have seen nothing!  13:4 O Israel,
 prophets are like the foxes in the deserts.
ps, neither made up the hedge for
se of Israel to stand in the battle in the day of the LORD.
anity and lying divination, saying, The LORD
: and they have made others to
they would confirm the word.
ye not seen a vain vision, and have ye not spoken a lying
y, The LORD saith it; albeit I have not
poken?  13:8 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have
seen lies, therefore, behold, I am against you,
e hand shall be upon the prophets that see vanity, and
 not be in the assembly of my people,
ther shall they be written in the writing of the house of Israel,
y enter into the land of Israel; and ye shall know
 Because, even because they have seduced my people, saying,
 peace; and one built up a wall, and, lo,
13:11 Say unto them which
tempered morter, that it shall fall: there shall be an
O great hailstones, shall fall; and a
rmy wind shall rend it.
the wall is fallen, shall it not be said unto you,
e have daubed it?  13:13 Therefore
aith the Lord GOD; I will even rend it with a stormy wind in my
ll be an overflowing shower in mine anger, and
me it.
all that ye have daubed with
orter, and bring it down to the ground, so that the
covered, and it shall fall, and ye
be consumed in the midst thereof: and ye shall know that I am
us will I accomplish my wrath upon the wall, and upon them
 untempered morter, and will say unto you, The
aubed it; 13:16 To wit, the
srael which prophesy concerning Jerusalem, and which see
and there is no peace, saith the Lord GOD.
hy face against the daughters of
le, which prophesy out of their own heart; and prophesy thou
d say, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to the women
and make kerchiefs upon the head of
 stature to hunt souls! Will ye hunt the souls of my people, and
ouls alive that come unto you?  13:19 And will ye
ndfuls of barley and for pieces of
 to slay the souls that should not die, and to save the souls
 live, by your lying to my people that hear your
the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against
illows, wherewith ye there hunt the souls to make them fly, and
om your arms, and will let the souls go, even the
ly.
ar, and deliver my people out of
d, and they shall be no more in your hand to be hunted; and ye
 the LORD.
ave made the heart of the righteous sad,
whom I have not made sad; and strengthened the hands of the wicked,
not return from his wicked way, by promising him life:
 no more vanity, nor divine divinations:
for I will deliver my people out of your hand: and ye shall know that
.
of Israel unto me, and sat before
14:2 And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 14:3 Son of man,
 set up their idols in their heart, and put the
fore their face: should I be
at all by them?  14:4 Therefore speak unto them, and say
Lord GOD; Every man of the house of Israel
and putteth the stumblingblock
quity before his face, and cometh to the prophet; I the LORD
ometh according to the multitude of his idols;
rael in their own heart, because
 all estranged from me through their idols.
Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD;
and turn yourselves from your idols; and turn away your faces
tions.
of Israel, or of the stranger that
neth in Israel, which separateth himself from me, and setteth up
eart, and putteth the stumblingblock of his iniquity
 a prophet to enquire of him concerning
e; I the LORD will answer him by myself: 14:8 And I will set my face
an, and will make him a sign and a proverb, and I will
f my people; and ye shall know that I am
the LORD.
ceived when he hath spoken a thing, I the
ll stretch out my hand upon
 destroy him from the midst of my people Israel.
nishment of their iniquity: the
t of the prophet shall be even as the punishment of him that
1 That the house of Israel may go no more astray
ore with all their transgressions;
at they may be my people, and I may be their God, saith the Lord
word of the LORD came again to me, saying, 14:13 Son of man,
against me by trespassing grievously, then will
d will break the staff of the bread
of, and will send famine upon it, and will cut off man and beast
ugh these three men, Noah, Daniel, and Job, were in
ir own souls by their righteousness,
h the Lord GOD.
e beasts to pass through the land, and they
no man may pass through because
asts: 14:16 Though these three men were in it, as I live,
shall deliver neither sons nor daughters;
d shall be desolate.
g a sword upon that land, and say, Sword, go through
n and beast from it: 14:18 Though these
hree men were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall
 nor daughters, but they only shall be delivered
a pestilence into that land, and pour out my fury
 it man and beast: 14:20 Though Noah,
iel, and Job were in it, as I live, saith the Lord GOD, they shall
son nor daughter; they shall but deliver their own

ch more when I send my four
s upon Jerusalem, the sword, and the famine, and the
nce, to cut off from it man and beast?
:22 Yet, behold, therein shall be left a remnant that shall be
sons and daughters: behold, they shall come forth
way and their doings: and ye shall be
forted concerning the evil that I have brought upon Jerusalem, even
that I have brought upon it.
they shall comfort you, when ye see their ways and their
that I have not done without cause all that

 me, saying, 15:2 Son of man,
 vine tree more than any tree, or than a branch which is
est?  15:3 Shall wood be taken thereof to do
 to hang any vessel thereon?
 it is cast into the fire for fuel; the fire devoureth
 midst of it is burned. Is it meet for any
t was meet for no work: how
ll it be meet yet for any work, when the fire hath
15:6 Therefore thus saith the Lord
s the vine tree among the trees of the forest, which I have
uel, so will I give the inhabitants of
rusalem.
ainst them; they shall go out from one
re, and another fire shall devour them; and ye shall know that I am
I set my face against them.
will make the land desolate, because they have committed a
 GOD.
ame unto me, saying, 16:2 Son of man,
se Jerusalem to know her abominations, 16:3 And say, Thus saith the
erusalem; Thy birth and thy nativity is of the land of
orite, and thy mother an Hittite.
And as for thy nativity, in the day thou wast born thy navel was
ast thou washed in water to supple thee; thou wast
at all.
o any of these unto thee, to have
ion upon thee; but thou wast cast out in the open field, to the
on, in the day that thou wast born.
6 And when I passed by thee, and saw thee polluted in thine own
thee when thou wast in thy blood, Live; yea, I said
 blood, Live.
o multiply as the bud of the field, and thou
ou art come to excellent
reasts are fashioned, and thine hair is grown, whereas

d upon thee, behold, thy time
e of love; and I spread my skirt over thee, and covered thy
 unto thee, and entered into a covenant with
amest mine.
h water; yea, I throughly washed away thy
 oil.
oidered work, and shod thee with
 skin, and I girded thee about with fine linen, and I covered
:11 I decked thee also with ornaments, and I put bracelets upon thy
ain on thy neck.
l on thy forehead, and earrings in thine ears,
d.
d and silver; and thy raiment was
 linen, and silk, and broidered work; thou didst eat fine
: and thou wast exceeding beautiful, and thou
4 And thy renown went forth among the heathen for thy beauty: for
rough my comeliness, which I had put upon thee, saith
ou didst trust in thine own beauty, and playedst the
and pouredst out thy fornications on
y one that passed by; his it was.
 And of thy garments thou didst take, and deckedst thy high
urs, and playedst the harlot thereupon: the
ll it be so.
 thy fair jewels of my gold and of my
ver, which I had given thee, and madest to thyself images of men,
whoredom with them, 16:18 And tookest thy broidered
nd thou hast set mine oil and mine
e before them.
 I gave thee, fine flour, and oil, and honey,
set it before them for a sweet
d thus it was, saith the Lord GOD.
0 Moreover thou hast taken thy sons and thy daughters, whom thou
, and these hast thou sacrificed unto them to be
 a small matter, 16:21 That thou
in my children, and delivered them to cause them to pass
  16:22 And in all thine abominations and
e days of thy youth, when
 and bare, and wast polluted in thy blood.
y wickedness, (woe, woe unto
 the LORD GOD;) 16:24 That thou hast also built unto thee
t made thee an high place in every street.
t every head of the way, and
y beauty to be abhorred, and hast opened thy feet to every
multiplied thy whoredoms.
st also committed fornication with the Egyptians thy
d hast increased thy whoredoms, to
e me to anger.
I have stretched out my hand over thee, and
d delivered thee unto the will
at hate thee, the daughters of the Philistines, which are

ith the Assyrians, because thou
tiable; yea, thou hast played the harlot with them, and yet
ed.
 thy fornication in the land of
to Chaldea; and yet thou wast not satisfied therewith.
art, saith the LORD GOD, seeing thou doest
us whorish woman; 16:31 In
dest thine eminent place in the head of every way, and
very street; and hast not been as an
ot, in that thou scornest hire; 16:32 But as a wife that
 taketh strangers instead of her husband!
thou givest thy gifts to all
and hirest them, that they may come unto thee on every
:34 And the contrary is in thee from other women in thy whoredoms,
loweth thee to commit whoredoms: and in that thou
 given unto thee, therefore thou art
rary.
he word of the LORD: 16:36 Thus saith
 Lord GOD; Because thy filthiness was poured out, and thy nakedness
ugh thy whoredoms with thy lovers, and with all the
by the blood of thy children, which
didst give unto them; 16:37 Behold, therefore I will gather all
om thou hast taken pleasure, and all them that thou
thou hast hated; I will even gather
round about against thee, and will discover thy nakedness unto
see all thy nakedness.
 judge thee, as women that break wedlock and shed
 thee blood in fury and jealousy.
 And I will also give thee into their hand, and they shall throw
 place, and shall break down thy high places: they
thes, and shall take thy fair jewels,
 leave thee naked and bare.
shall also bring up a company against thee, and they shall
and thrust thee through with their swords.
 with fire, and execute
ee in the sight of many women: and I will cause thee
ot, and thou also shalt give no hire any
more.
rd thee to rest, and my jealousy
part from thee, and I will be quiet, and will be no more
ou hast not remembered the days of thy youth, but hast
gs; behold, therefore I also will
nse thy way upon thine head, saith the Lord GOD: and thou shalt
dness above all thine abominations.
44 Behold, every one that useth proverbs shall use this proverb
g, As is the mother, so is her daughter.

at lotheth her husband and her
and thou art the sister of thy sisters, which lothed their
ren: your mother was an Hittite, and your
er sister is Samaria, she and her daughters that
unger sister, that dwelleth at thy
hand, is Sodom and her daughters.
 Yet hast thou not walked after their ways, nor done after their
 as if that were a very little thing, thou wast
 ways.
GOD, Sodom thy sister hath not done,
nor her daughters, as thou hast done, thou and thy daughters.
was the iniquity of thy sister Sodom, pride,
eness was in her and in her
ither did she strengthen the hand of the poor and needy.
hty, and committed abomination before me:

alf of thy sins; but thou hast
 thine abominations more than they, and hast justified thy
minations which thou hast done.
hou also, which hast judged thy sisters, bear thine own shame
u hast committed more abominable than they: they
 be thou confounded also, and bear
ame, in that thou hast justified thy sisters.
r captivity, the captivity of Sodom
er daughters, and the captivity of Samaria and her daughters,
in the captivity of thy captives in the midst of
thine own shame, and mayest be
 in all that thou hast done, in that thou art a comfort unto
y sisters, Sodom and her daughters, shall return to their
a and her daughters shall return to their
s shall return to your former
16:56 For thy sister Sodom was not mentioned by thy mouth in the day
16:57 Before thy wickedness was discovered, as at the
aughters of Syria, and all that are round
es, which despise thee round
:58 Thou hast borne thy lewdness and thine abominations, saith the
or thus saith the Lord GOD; I will even deal with thee as thou
t despised the oath in breaking the covenant.
my covenant with thee in the days
youth, and I will establish unto thee an everlasting covenant.
alt remember thy ways, and be ashamed, when thou
lder and thy younger: and I will
m unto thee for daughters, but not by thy covenant.
 covenant with thee; and thou shalt know
that I am the LORD: 16:63 That thou mayest remember, and be
pen thy mouth any more because of thy shame,
 that thou hast done, saith the

o me, saying, 17:2 Son of man,
a riddle, and speak a parable unto the house of Israel; 17:3
e Lord GOD; A great eagle with great wings,
 divers colours, came unto
ook the highest branch of the cedar: 17:4 He cropped off
, and carried it into a land of traffick; he
 He took also of the seed of the land, and planted it in a
d it by great waters, and set it as a willow
a spreading vine of low stature, whose
anches turned toward him, and the roots thereof were under him: so
, and brought forth branches, and shot forth sprigs.
great eagle with great wings and many
thers: and, behold, this vine did bend her roots toward him, and
nches toward him, that he might water it by the
It was planted in a good soil by great waters, that it might
and that it might bear fruit, that it might be a
s saith the Lord GOD; Shall it prosper? shall he not
 cut off the fruit thereof, that it
r? it shall wither in all the leaves of her spring, even without
y people to pluck it up by the roots thereof.
hall it prosper? shall it not
her, when the east wind toucheth it? it shall wither in the

e unto me, saying, 17:12 Say
ebellious house, Know ye not what these things mean?  tell
f Babylon is come to Jerusalem, and hath taken
ereof, and led them with him to
17:13 And hath taken of the king's seed, and made a covenant
en an oath of him: he hath also taken the mighty
m might be base, that it might not
tself up, but that by keeping of his covenant it might stand.
ed against him in sending his ambassadors into
es and much people. Shall he
ll he escape that doeth such things? or shall he break the
ed?  17:16 As I live, saith the Lord GOD,
th that made him king, whose
ised, and whose covenant he brake, even with him in the
ie.
s mighty army and great company
him in the war, by casting up mounts, and building forts, to
17:18 Seeing he despised the oath by breaking
his hand, and hath done all these
 he shall not escape.
hus saith the Lord GOD; As I live, surely mine oath
ovenant that he hath broken, even it
 I recompense upon his own head.
And I will spread my net upon him, and he shall be taken in my
ing him to Babylon, and will plead with him there
spassed against me.
ugitives with all his bands shall fall by the
scattered toward all winds: and
know that I the LORD have spoken it.
:22 Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also take of the highest branch
ar, and will set it; I will crop off from the top of
and will plant it upon an high mountain
nd eminent: 17:23 In the mountain of the height of Israel will I
hall bring forth boughs, and bear fruit, and be a
dwell all fowl of every wing; in the
ow of the branches thereof shall they dwell.
 shall know that I the LORD have
down the high tree, have exalted the low tree, have dried up
ve made the dry tree to flourish: I the LORD
The word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 18:2 What mean
s proverb concerning the land of Israel, saying,
, and the children's teeth are set
e?  18:3 As I live, saith the Lord GOD, ye shall not have
this proverb in Israel.
l souls are mine; as the soul of the father, so also
he soul that sinneth, it shall die.
5 But if a man be just, and do that which is lawful and right, 18:6
ten upon the mountains, neither hath lifted up his eyes
f Israel, neither hath defiled his
our's wife, neither hath come near to a menstruous woman, 18:7
ed any, but hath restored to the debtor his
hath given his bread to the
ath covered the naked with a garment; 18:8 He that hath
 neither hath taken any increase, that hath
executed true judgment between
n, 18:9 Hath walked in my statutes, and hath kept my
s just, he shall surely live, saith the
ord GOD.
s a robber, a shedder of blood, and that
doeth the like to any one of these things, 18:11 And that doeth not
ties, but even hath eaten upon the mountains, and
12 Hath oppressed the poor and needy,
h spoiled by violence, hath not restored the pledge, and hath
 the idols, hath committed abomination, 18:13
 taken increase: shall he then
hall not live: he hath done all these abominations; he shall
shall be upon him.
 beget a son, that seeth all his father's sins
 and doeth not such like, 18:15
 not eaten upon the mountains, neither hath lifted up his
house of Israel, hath not defiled his
ghbour's wife, 18:16 Neither hath oppressed any, hath not
ither hath spoiled by violence, but hath
given his bread to the hungry, and hath covered the naked with a
t hath taken off his hand from the poor, that hath
 hath executed my judgments, hath
in my statutes; he shall not die for the iniquity of his
ve.
 cruelly oppressed, spoiled his
y violence, and did that which is not good among his people,
in his iniquity.
 doth not the son bear the iniquity of the
ch is lawful and right, and
 my statutes, and hath done them, he shall surely live.
th, it shall die. The son shall not bear the
the father bear the iniquity of
the righteousness of the righteous shall be upon him, and the
ked shall be upon him.
 wicked will turn from all his sins that he hath
s, and do that which is lawful and
 he shall surely live, he shall not die.

h committed, they shall not be
unto him: in his righteousness that he hath done he shall
 pleasure at all that the wicked should die? saith the
ould return from his ways, and live?
4 But when the righteous turneth away from his righteousness, and
ty, and doeth according to all the abominations that
 live? All his righteousness that he
 done shall not be mentioned: in his trespass that he hath
in that he hath sinned, in them shall he die.
RD is not equal. Hear now, O house
ael; Is not my way equal? are not your ways unequal?  18:26 When
rneth away from his righteousness, and committeth
his iniquity that he hath done shall
ie.
rneth away from his wickedness that
th committed, and doeth that which is lawful and right, he shall
e.
rneth away from all his
at he hath committed, he shall surely live, he shall
e house of Israel, The way of the LORD is not equal.
ways equal? are not your ways unequal?
:30 Therefore I will judge you, O house of Israel, every one
 saith the Lord GOD. Repent, and turn yourselves
niquity shall not be your ruin.
ast away from you all your transgressions, whereby ye have
ou a new heart and a new spirit: for why will
 I have no pleasure in the death
hat dieth, saith the Lord GOD: wherefore turn yourselves, and
over take thou up a lamentation for the princes of Israel,
y mother? A lioness: she lay down among lions,
 lions.
her whelps: it became a young lion, and
t learned to catch the prey; it devoured men.
 he was taken in their pit, and
ght him with chains unto the land of Egypt.
ited, and her hope was lost, then
k another of her whelps, and made him a young lion.
among the lions, he became a young lion,
and learned to catch the prey, and devoured men.
palaces, and he laid waste their
and the land was desolate, and the fulness thereof, by the

every side from the
 their net over him: he was taken in their pit.
chains, and brought him to the king
bylon: they brought him into holds, that his voice should no more
 mountains of Israel.
is like a vine in thy blood, planted by the waters:
anches by reason of many waters.
And she had strong rods for the sceptres of them that bare rule,
s exalted among the thick branches, and she appeared
de of her branches.
lucked up in fury, she was cast down to the ground,
fruit: her strong rods were broken and
thered; the fire consumed them.
nd now she is planted in the wilderness, in a dry and thirsty
fire is gone out of a rod of her branches, which hath
he hath no strong rod to be a sceptre to
rule. This is a lamentation, and shall be for a lamentation.
pass in the seventh year, in the fifth month, the
ain of the elders of Israel came to
re of the LORD, and sat before me.
 Then came the word of the LORD unto me, saying, 20:3 Son of man,
ders of Israel, and say unto them, Thus saith the
of me? As I live, saith the Lord GOD,
ill not be enquired of by you.
t thou judge them, son of man, wilt thou judge them? cause
tions of their fathers: 20:5 And say unto
 when I chose Israel, and
hand unto the seed of the house of Jacob, and made
nd of Egypt, when I lifted up mine
nto them, saying, I am the LORD your God; 20:6 In the day that I
d unto them, to bring them forth of the land of
 for them, flowing with milk and
hich is the glory of all lands: 20:7 Then said I unto them,
the abominations of his eyes, and defile not
am the LORD your God.
elled against me, and would not hearken unto me: they
he abominations of their eyes, neither
d they forsake the idols of Egypt: then I said, I will pour out my
to accomplish my anger against them in the midst of
I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted
ong whom they were, in whose sight I made myself
forth out of the land of Egypt.
herefore I caused them to go forth out of the land of Egypt,
the wilderness.
y statutes, and shewed them my judgments, which
them.
y sabbaths, to be a sign between me
hem, that they might know that I am the LORD that sanctify them.
use of Israel rebelled against me in the wilderness:
, and they despised my judgments, which
f a man do, he shall even live in them; and my sabbaths they greatly
 I said, I would pour out my fury upon them in the
20:14 But I wrought for my name's sake, that it should not be polluted
eathen, in whose sight I brought them out.
o them in the wilderness, that I
t bring them into the land which I had given them, flowing
ch is the glory of all lands; 20:16 Because
not in my statutes, but
ths: for their heart went after their idols.
hem from destroying them, neither
ake an end of them in the wilderness.
0:18 But I said unto their children in the wilderness, Walk ye not in
of your fathers, neither observe their judgments, nor
idols: 20:19 I am the LORD your God; walk
d do them; 20:20 And hallow
and they shall be a sign between me and you, that ye may
ur God.
ren rebelled against me: they walked
in my statutes, neither kept my judgments to do them, which if a
ven live in them; they polluted my sabbaths: then I
upon them, to accomplish my anger
 them in the wilderness.
less I withdrew mine hand, and wrought for my name's
lluted in the sight of the heathen, in
ose sight I brought them forth.
 lifted up mine hand unto them also in the wilderness, that I
ong the heathen, and disperse them through the
t executed my judgments, but had
 my statutes, and had polluted my sabbaths, and their eyes
' idols.
so statutes that were not good, and
ents whereby they should not live; 20:26 And I polluted them in
 that they caused to pass through the fire all that
make them desolate, to the end that
might know that I am the LORD.
erefore, son of man, speak unto the house of Israel, and say
the Lord GOD; Yet in this your fathers have
ted a trespass against me.
en I had brought them into the land, for the which I
 to them, then they saw every high hill,
and all the thick trees, and they offered there their sacrifices, and
esented the provocation of their offering: there also
 and poured out there their drink
gs.
s the high place whereunto ye go?
 name whereof is called Bamah unto this day.
f Israel, Thus saith the Lord GOD;
 polluted after the manner of your fathers? and commit ye
inations?  20:31 For when ye offer your
ifts, when ye make your sons to pass through the fire, ye pollute
ll your idols, even unto this day: and shall I be
rael? As I live, saith the Lord GOD,
ll not be enquired of by you.
 that which cometh into your mind shall not be at all, that
he heathen, as the families of the countries,
I live, saith the Lord GOD, surely with a mighty hand, and
, and with fury poured out, will I rule over
om the people, and will gather
 the countries wherein ye are scattered, with a mighty hand,
ut arm, and with fury poured out.
 And I will bring you into the wilderness of the people, and
h you face to face.
aded with your fathers in the wilderness of the
 you, saith the Lord GOD.
ill cause you to pass under the rod, and I will bring you
nant: 20:38 And I will purge out from among
s against me: I will bring them
 of the country where they sojourn, and they shall not enter
l: and ye shall know that I am the LORD.

s saith the Lord GOD; Go ye,
ry one his idols, and hereafter also, if ye will not
e my holy name no more with your gifts,
nd with your idols.
oly mountain, in the mountain of the height of
all all the house of Israel, all
in the land, serve me: there will I accept them, and there
rings, and the firstfruits of your oblations,
 will accept you with your sweet savour, when I bring you out
gather you out of the countries wherein ye have
ified in you before the heathen.
And ye shall know that I am the LORD, when I shall bring you
l, into the country for the which I lifted up

 ways, and all your doings,
ve been defiled; and ye shall lothe yourselves in your
 that ye have committed.
hall know that I am the LORD when I have wrought with
ccording to your wicked ways, nor
ng to your corrupt doings, O ye house of Israel, saith the Lord
ver the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 20:46 Son of
d the south, and drop thy word toward the
 the south field; 20:47 And
rest of the south, Hear the word of the LORD; Thus saith
ll kindle a fire in thee, and it shall
vour every green tree in thee, and every dry tree: the flaming flame
uenched, and all faces from the south to the north shall
8 And all flesh shall see that I the LORD have kindled it: it
.
say of me, Doth he not speak
1:1 And the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 21:2
ward Jerusalem, and drop thy word toward
the holy places, and prophesy against the land of Israel, 21:3 And say
of Israel, Thus saith the LORD; Behold, I am against thee,
word out of his sheath, and will cut off from

 thee the righteous and the
fore shall my sword go forth out of his sheath against
the north: 21:5 That all flesh may know
hat I the LORD have drawn forth my sword out of his sheath: it shall
 more.
 man, with the breaking of thy loins;
 with bitterness sigh before their eyes.

 thee, Wherefore sighest thou?
shalt answer, For the tidings; because it cometh: and every
ll hands shall be feeble, and every spirit
 as water: behold, it cometh,
e brought to pass, saith the Lord GOD.
21:8 Again the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 21:9 Son of man,
d say, Thus saith the LORD; Say, A sword, a sword is
 21:10 It is sharpened to make a sore
ughter; it is furbished that it may glitter: should we then make
th the rod of my son, as every tree.
:11 And he hath given it to be furbished, that it may be handled:
rpened, and it is furbished, to give it into the hand
nd howl, son of man: for it shall be upon my people, it
es of Israel: terrors by reason of the
ord shall be upon my people: smite therefore upon thy thigh.
a trial, and what if the sword contemn even the
e Lord GOD.
f man, prophesy, and smite thine hands
gether. and let the sword be doubled the third time, the sword of
the sword of the great men that are slain, which
.
rd against all their gates, that
art may faint, and their ruins be multiplied: ah! it is made
up for the slaughter.
 way or other, either on the right hand, or on the
set.
 together, and I will cause my fury
st: I the LORD have said it.
word of the LORD came unto me again, saying, 21:19 Also,
hee two ways, that the sword of the king of
 forth out of one land: and
 place, choose it at the head of the way to the city.
he sword may come to Rabbath of the
ites, and to Judah in Jerusalem the defenced.
 at the parting of the way, at the
f the two ways, to use divination: he made his arrows bright, he
ges, he looked in the liver.
is right hand was the divination for Jerusalem, to appoint
uth in the slaughter, to lift up the voice
 against the gates, to cast a
to build a fort.
unto them as a false divination in their sight,
he will call to remembrance the
 that they may be taken.
e thus saith the Lord GOD; Because ye have made your
that your transgressions are discovered,
so that in all your doings your sins do appear; because, I say, that
 remembrance, ye shall be taken with the hand.
nce of Israel, whose day is come,
iquity shall have an end, 21:26 Thus saith the Lord GOD; Remove
e off the crown: this shall not be the same: exalt
hat is high.
rturn, overturn, it: and it shall be no
ore, until he come whose right it is; and I will give it him.
 of man, prophesy and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD
ncerning their reproach; even say
he sword, the sword is drawn: for the slaughter it is
 of the glittering: 21:29 Whiles they see
e unto thee, to bring thee
 of them that are slain, of the wicked, whose day is
l have an end.
o return into his sheath? I will judge thee in
n the land of thy nativity.
 will pour out mine indignation upon thee, I will blow
my wrath, and deliver thee into the hand
of brutish men, and skilful to destroy.

 thy blood shall be in the
and; thou shalt be no more remembered: for I the LORD
ver the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 22:2 Now,
 judge, wilt thou judge the bloody city?
yea, thou shalt shew her all her abominations.
 Lord GOD, The city sheddeth blood
 midst of it, that her time may come, and maketh idols against
rself.
hy blood that thou hast shed; and hast
filed thyself in thine idols which thou hast made; and thou hast
 draw near, and art come even unto thy years:
 unto the heathen, and a mocking
ountries.
those that be far from thee, shall mock
hee, which art infamous and much vexed.

 one were in thee to their
blood.
 by father and mother: in the midst of
ee have they dealt by oppression with the stranger: in thee have
herless and the widow.
espised mine holy things, and hast profaned my
at carry tales to shed blood: and in thee they
 of thee they commit lewdness.
 thee have they discovered their fathers' nakedness: in thee
that was set apart for pollution.
 And one hath committed abomination with his neighbour's wife;
dly defiled his daughter in law; and another in
ather's daughter.
ey taken gifts to shed blood; thou hast taken
edily gained of thy neighbours by
on, and hast forgotten me, saith the Lord GOD.
tten mine hand at thy dishonest gain
h thou hast made, and at thy blood which hath been in the midst of
an thine heart endure, or can thine hands be strong, in the
with thee? I the LORD have spoken it, and will
hee among the heathen, and disperse thee in
thiness out of thee.
lt take thine inheritance in thyself in the sight of
ow that I am the LORD.
rd of the LORD came unto me, saying, 22:18 Son of man,
 become dross: all they are brass, and
n, and iron, and lead, in the midst of the furnace; they are even
er.
 GOD; Because ye are all become
hold, therefore I will gather you into the midst of
her silver, and brass, and iron, and lead, and tin,
to blow the fire upon it, to melt it;
will I gather you in mine anger and in my fury, and I will leave
t you.
d blow upon you in the fire of my
and ye shall be melted in the midst therof.
t of the furnace, so shall ye be
n the midst thereof; and ye shall know that I the LORD have
 you.
me unto me, saying, 22:24 Son of man,
 unto her, Thou art the land that is not cleansed, nor rained upon
dignation.
of her prophets in the midst thereof, like
ave devoured souls; they have
reasure and precious things; they have made her many widows

and have profaned mine holy
have put no difference between the holy and profane,
rence between the unclean and the clean,
and have hid their eyes from my sabbaths, and I am profaned among
r princes in the midst thereof are like wolves ravening the
d to destroy souls, to get dishonest gain.
m with untempered morter, seeing
and divining lies unto them, saying, Thus saith the Lord GOD,
t spoken.
have used oppression, and exercised
ry, and have vexed the poor and needy: yea, they have oppressed
ully.
g them, that should make up the
d stand in the gap before me for the land, that I should not
d none.
ut mine indignation upon them; I have
sumed them with the fire of my wrath: their own way have I
eads, saith the Lord GOD.
 of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 23:2 Son of man,
 daughters of one mother: 23:3 And they
ommitted whoredoms in Egypt; they committed whoredoms in their youth:
eir breasts pressed, and there they bruised the teats of
nd the names of them were Aholah the elder, and Aholibah her
mine, and they bare sons and daughters. Thus
nd Jerusalem Aholibah.
played the harlot when she was mine; and she doted on
her neighbours, 23:6 Which were clothed
ith blue, captains and rulers, all of them desirable young men,
n horses.
horedoms with them, with all them that
re the chosen men of Assyria, and with all on whom she doted: with
she defiled herself.
she her whoredoms brought from Egypt: for in her
bruised the breasts of her
 poured their whoredom upon her.
herefore I have delivered her into the hand of her lovers, into
yrians, upon whom she doted.
e discovered her nakedness: they took her sons and her
 the sword: and she became famous among
omen; for they had executed judgment upon her.
 saw this, she was more corrupt in
ordinate love than she, and in her whoredoms more than her

 neighbours, captains and rulers
most gorgeously, horsemen riding upon horses, all of them
3:13 Then I saw that she was defiled, that they took both one way,
he increased her whoredoms: for when she saw men
es of the Chaldeans pourtrayed with
lion, 23:15 Girded with girdles upon their loins, exceeding in
ir heads, all of them princes to look to, after
aldea, the land of their nativity:
And as soon as she saw them with her eyes, she doted upon them,
 unto them into Chaldea.
Babylonians came to her into the bed of love, and they
dom, and she was polluted with them, and
her mind was alienated from them.
 So she discovered her whoredoms, and discovered her nakedness:
ienated from her, like as my mind was alienated
ultiplied her whoredoms, in calling to remembrance the
he had played the harlot in the land of
gypt.
ramours, whose flesh is as the flesh
sses, and whose issue is like the issue of horses.
membrance the lewdness of thy youth, in
ruising thy teats by the Egyptians for the paps of thy youth.
Aholibah, thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will
 from whom thy mind is alienated, and
ill bring them against thee on every side; 23:23 The Babylonians,
eans, Pekod, and Shoa, and Koa, and all the Assyrians
ble young men, captains and rulers, great
on horses.
ainst thee with chariots, wagons, and
els, and with an assembly of people, which shall set against thee
d and helmet round about: and I will set judgment
 thee according to their judgments.
25 And I will set my jealousy against thee, and they shall deal
: they shall take away thy nose and thine ears; and
word: they shall take thy sons and thy
ughters; and thy residue shall be devoured by the fire.
ip thee out of thy clothes, and take away thy
e thy lewdness to cease from thee, and thy
 so that thou shalt not lift
s unto them, nor remember Egypt any more.
ld, I will deliver thee into
them whom thou hatest, into the hand of them from whom thy
 And they shall deal with thee hatefully, and
hall leave thee naked and bare:
akedness of thy whoredoms shall be discovered, both thy

, because thou hast gone a
the heathen, and because thou art polluted with their
ked in the way of thy sister; therefore will I give
32 Thus saith the Lord GOD; Thou shalt drink of thy sister's cup
ou shalt be laughed to scorn and had in derision; it
 shalt be filled with drunkenness and sorrow, with the cup
lation, with the cup of thy sister Samaria.
ck it out, and thou shalt break
s thereof, and pluck off thine own breasts: for I have spoken
D.
GOD; Because thou hast forgotten
cast me behind thy back, therefore bear thou also thy lewdness

n of man, wilt thou judge
ibah? yea, declare unto them their abominations; 23:37
ltery, and blood is in their hands, and
ith their idols have they committed adultery, and have also caused
 they bare unto me, to pass for them through the fire,
eover this they have done unto me: they have defiled my
and have profaned my sabbaths.
r when they had slain their children to their idols, then they
to my sanctuary to profane it; and, lo, thus have
use.
e sent for men to come from far,
m a messenger was sent; and, lo, they came: for whom thou
edst thy eyes, and deckedst thyself with
ornaments, 23:41 And satest upon a stately bed, and a table prepared
reupon thou hast set mine incense and mine oil.
being at ease was with her: and with
men of the common sort were brought Sabeans from the wilderness,
s upon their hands, and beautiful crowns upon their
o her that was old in adulteries, Will they now
with them?  23:44 Yet they went in
er, as they go in unto a woman that playeth the harlot: so went
 and unto Aholibah, the lewd women.
45 And the righteous men, they shall judge them after the manner of
nd after the manner of women that shed blood; because
ood is in their hands.
aith the Lord GOD; I will bring up a company upon
moved and spoiled.
y shall stone them with stones, and dispatch them
y their sons and their daughters, and
n up their houses with fire.
 will I cause lewdness to cease out of the land, that all
o do after your lewdness.
y shall recompense your lewdness upon you, and ye shall
: and ye shall know that I am the Lord GOD.
tenth month, in the tenth day of
h, the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 24:2 Son of man,
of the day, even of this same day: the king of
m this same day.
le unto the rebellious house, and say unto them,
pot, set it on, and also pour water
it: 24:4 Gather the pieces thereof into it, even every good
he shoulder; fill it with the choice bones.
d burn also the bones under it,
it boil well, and let them seethe the bones of it therein.
ith the Lord GOD; Woe to the bloody city, to the
se scum is not gone out of it! bring
ut piece by piece; let no lot fall upon it.
 her; she set it upon the top of
she poured it not upon the ground, to cover it with dust; 24:8
fury to come up to take vengeance; I have set her
t it should not be covered.
ore thus saith the Lord GOD; Woe to the bloody city! I will
fire great.
the fire, consume the flesh, and spice it
11 Then set it empty upon the coals thereof, that the brass of it
ay burn, and that the filthiness of it may be molten
 be consumed.
rself with lies, and her great scum went not
 the fire.
ewdness: because I have purged thee, and
thou wast not purged, thou shalt not be purged from thy filthiness any
 have caused my fury to rest upon thee.

 come to pass, and I will do
ot go back, neither will I spare, neither will I repent;
 according to thy doings, shall they judge
the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 24:16 Son of
om thee the desire of thine eyes with a
troke: yet neither shalt thou mourn nor weep, neither shall thy tears
24:17 Forbear to cry, make no mourning for the dead, bind the tire of
on thee, and put on thy shoes upon thy feet, and cover
e bread of men.
he people in the morning: and at even my wife
as commanded.
 unto me, Wilt thou not tell us what these
4:20 Then I answered them, The
e LORD came unto me, saying, 24:21 Speak unto the house of
ord GOD; Behold, I will profane my sanctuary,
desire of your eyes, and that
soul pitieth; and your sons and your daughters whom ye have
sword.
done: ye shall not cover your lips,
at the bread of men.
es shall be upon your heads, and your shoes upon
weep; but ye shall pine away for
quities, and mourn one toward another.
24:24 Thus Ezekiel is unto you a sign: according to all that he hath
do: and when this cometh, ye shall know that I am the
 son of man, shall it not be in the day when I take
oy of their glory, the desire of their
es, and that whereupon they set their minds, their sons and their
That he that escapeth in that day shall come unto
th thine ears?  24:27 In that day
hy mouth be opened to him which is escaped, and thou shalt
mb: and thou shalt be a sign unto them; and
25:1 The word of the LORD came again unto me, saying, 25:2 Son of man,
 against the Ammonites, and prophesy against them; 25:3
 Hear the word of the Lord GOD; Thus saith
against my sanctuary, when it
d; and against the land of Israel, when it was desolate;
udah, when they went into captivity; 25:4
the men of the east for a
 they shall set their palaces in thee, and make their
 eat thy fruit, and they shall drink thy
milk.
ble for camels, and the Ammonites a
ing place for flocks: and ye shall know that I am the LORD.
he Lord GOD; Because thou hast clapped thine
rejoiced in heart with all thy
ainst the land of Israel; 25:7 Behold, therefore I will
thee, and will deliver thee for a spoil to
m the people, and I will cause
rish out of the countries: I will destroy thee; and thou
ORD.
use that Moab and Seir do say,
e house of Judah is like unto all the heathen; 25:9
the side of Moab from the cities, from
s cities which are on his frontiers, the glory of the country,
eon, and Kiriathaim, 25:10 Unto the men of the
ve them in possession, that the
 may not be remembered among the nations.
 Moab; and they shall know that
LORD.
cause that Edom hath dealt against
use of Judah by taking vengeance, and hath greatly offended, and
pon them; 25:13 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; I
d upon Edom, and will cut off man and
st from it; and I will make it desolate from Teman; and they of
 the sword.
geance upon Edom by the hand of my people
ng to mine anger and
; and they shall know my vengeance, saith the Lord
d GOD; Because the Philistines have dealt by
 a despiteful heart, to destroy
e old hatred; 25:16 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD;
ine hand upon the Philistines, and I will
emnant of the sea coast.
ll execute great vengeance upon them with furious
 I am the LORD, when I shall lay my
ance upon them.
s in the eleventh year, in the first day of the
me unto me, saying, 26:2 Son of
use that Tyrus hath said against Jerusalem, Aha, she is
f the people: she is turned unto me: I
all be replenished, now she is laid waste: 26:3 Therefore thus saith
Behold, I am against thee, O Tyrus, and will cause many
thee, as the sea causeth his waves to come
alls of Tyrus, and break down her
 I will also scrape her dust from her, and make her like the
 It shall be a place for the spreading of nets in the midst of the
spoken it, saith the Lord GOD: and it shall become a
And her daughters which are in the field shall be slain by the
l know that I am the LORD.
s saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring upon Tyrus
n, a king of kings, from the north, with
horses, and with chariots, and with horsemen, and companies, and much
:8 He shall slay with the sword thy daughters in the field: and he
t against thee, and cast a mount against thee, and
.
against thy walls, and with his
hall break down thy towers.
ason of the abundance of his horses their dust shall cover
ake at the noise of the horsemen, and of the
hall enter into thy gates, as
nto a city wherein is made a breach.
:11 With the hoofs of his horses shall he tread down all thy
 thy people by the sword, and thy strong
garrisons shall go down to the ground.
26:12 And they shall make a spoil of thy riches, and make a prey of
: and they shall break down thy walls, and destroy thy
all lay thy stones and thy timber and thy
And I will cause the noise of thy songs to cease; and the sound
be no more heard.
 thee like the top of a rock: thou shalt be a
 be built no more: for I the LORD
oken it, saith the Lord GOD.
 saith the Lord GOD to Tyrus; Shall not the isles shake at
hen the wounded cry, when the slaughter is
ll the princes of the sea
 from their thrones, and lay away their robes, and put
: they shall clothe themselves with
ling; they shall sit upon the ground, and shall tremble at every
onished at thee.
ake up a lamentation for thee, and say to thee,
nhabited of seafaring men, the
ity, which wast strong in the sea, she and her inhabitants,
r to be on all that haunt it!  26:18 Now shall
fall; yea, the isles that are in
shall be troubled at thy departure.
19 For thus saith the Lord GOD; When I shall make thee a desolate
ties that are not inhabited; when I shall bring up
ters shall cover thee; 26:20 When I
 bring thee down with them that descend into the pit, with the
and shall set thee in the low parts of the earth,
hem that go down to the pit, that
 not inhabited; and I shall set glory in the land of the
thee a terror, and thou shalt be no more:
 never be found again, saith
.
unto me, saying, 27:2 Now, thou
n, take up a lamentation for Tyrus; 27:3 And say unto Tyrus,
e at the entry of the sea, which art a merchant
saith the Lord GOD; O Tyrus, thou
id, I am of perfect beauty.
rders are in the midst of the seas, thy builders have
 They have made all thy ship boards of fir trees of Senir: they
rom Lebanon to make masts for thee.
6 Of the oaks of Bashan have they made thine oars; the company of
e made thy benches of ivory, brought out of the isles
n with broidered work from Egypt was that which thou
; blue and purple from the isles of
ah was that which covered thee.
e inhabitants of Zidon and Arvad were thy mariners: thy wise
e in thee, were thy pilots.
cients of Gebal and the wise men thereof were in thee thy
 the sea with their mariners were in thee to
of Persia and of Lud and of Phut were in thine army, thy
e shield and helmet in thee; they set forth
ad with thine army were upon thy walls round
owers: they hanged their shields
 walls round about; they have made thy beauty perfect.
chant by reason of the multitude of all kind
 lead, they traded in thy fairs.
Javan, Tubal, and Meshech, they were thy merchants: they traded
and vessels of brass in thy market.
14 They of the house of Togarmah traded in thy fairs with horses
ules.
erchants; many isles were the
 of thine hand: they brought thee for a present horns of
Syria was thy merchant by reason of the multitude of the wares
occupied in thy fairs with emeralds, purple, and
d coral, and agate.
e land of Israel, they were thy merchants: they
th, and Pannag, and honey, and oil,
alm.
 the multitude of the wares of thy
, for the multitude of all riches; in the wine of Helbon, and
Dan also and Javan going to and fro occupied in thy fairs:
 calamus, were in thy market.
an was thy merchant in precious clothes for chariots.
rinces of Kedar, they occupied with thee in
re they thy merchants.
nts of Sheba and Raamah, they were thy merchants: they
hief of all spices, and with all precious
neh, and Eden, the merchants of Sheba, Asshur, and
27:24 These were thy merchants in all sorts of things, in blue
ed work, and in chests of rich apparel, bound with
thy merchandise.
shish did sing of thee in thy market: and thou
ious in the midst of the seas.
y rowers have brought thee into great waters: the east wind
 midst of the seas.
nd thy fairs, thy merchandise, thy mariners, and
ccupiers of thy merchandise, and all
men of war, that are in thee, and in all thy company which is in
 shall fall into the midst of the seas in the day of
 shall shake at the sound of the cry of thy pilots.
 oar, the mariners, and all the pilots of
, they shall stand upon the
nd shall cause their voice to be heard against thee, and
all cast up dust upon their heads, they
hall wallow themselves in the ashes: 27:31 And they shall make
ald for thee, and gird them with sackcloth, and
rness of heart and bitter wailing.
2 And in their wailing they shall take up a lamentation for thee,
hee, saying, What city is like Tyrus, like the
27:33 When thy wares went forth
e seas, thou filledst many people; thou didst enrich the
e multitude of thy riches and of thy
handise.
alt be broken by the seas in the depths
f the waters thy merchandise and all thy company in the midst of thee

hall be astonished at thee,
gs shall be sore afraid, they shall be troubled in their
merchants among the people shall hiss at thee; thou shalt be
alt be any more.
ORD came again unto me, saying, 28:2 Son of man,
 saith the Lord GOD; Because thine
is lifted up, and thou hast said, I am a God, I sit in the seat
t of the seas; yet thou art a man, and not God,
heart of God: 28:3 Behold, thou art
 than Daniel; there is no secret that they can hide from thee:
 and with thine understanding thou hast gotten
d silver into thy treasures: 28:5
great wisdom and by thy traffick hast thou increased thy
 lifted up because of thy riches: 28:6
erefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast set thine heart
God; 28:7 Behold, therefore I will bring strangers
ations: and they shall draw their
against the beauty of thy wisdom, and they shall defile thy
y shall bring thee down to the pit, and thou shalt die the
slain in the midst of the seas.
lt thou yet say before him that slayeth thee, I am God? but
d no God, in the hand of him that slayeth thee.
f the uncircumcised by the hand of
ers: for I have spoken it, saith the Lord GOD.
D came unto me, saying, 28:12 Son of
 take up a lamentation upon the king of Tyrus, and say unto him,
d GOD; Thou sealest up the sum, full of wisdom, and
u hast been in Eden the garden of God; every precious stone
ardius, topaz, and the diamond, the beryl, the
the emerald, and the carbuncle,
 the workmanship of thy tabrets and of thy pipes was prepared
at thou wast created.
e anointed cherub that covereth; and I have set thee
untain of God; thou hast walked up and
wn in the midst of the stones of fire.
28:15 Thou wast perfect in thy ways from the day that thou wast
ity was found in thee.
titude of thy merchandise they have filled the midst
u hast sinned: therefore I will cast
 as profane out of the mountain of God: and I will destroy thee, O
 from the midst of the stones of fire.
28:17 Thine heart was lifted up because of thy beauty, thou hast
om by reason of thy brightness: I will cast thee to
ore kings, that they may behold thee.
8:18 Thou hast defiled thy sanctuaries by the multitude of thine
 iniquity of thy traffick; therefore will I bring
ee, it shall devour thee, and I will
g thee to ashes upon the earth in the sight of all them that
All they that know thee among the people shall be astonished at
 a terror, and never shalt thou be any more.
e unto me, saying, 28:21 Son of
thy face against Zidon, and prophesy against it, 28:22 And
 GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Zidon; and
hee: and they shall know that I
RD, when I shall have executed judgments in her, and shall be

, and blood into her streets;
nded shall be judged in the midst of her by the sword upon
hey shall know that I am the LORD.
4 And there shall be no more a pricking brier unto the house of
eving thorn of all that are round about them, that
ow that I am the Lord GOD.
aith the Lord GOD; When I shall have gathered the house of
mong whom they are scattered, and shall be
eathen, then shall they dwell
nd that I have given to my servant Jacob.
in, and shall build houses, and
eyards; yea, they shall dwell with confidence, when I have
all those that despise them round about them;
D their God.
 the tenth month, in the twelfth day of the
e, saying, 29:2 Son of man, set
against Pharaoh king of Egypt, and prophesy against him, and
3 Speak, and say, Thus saith the Lord GOD;
of Egypt, the great dragon
the midst of his rivers, which hath said, My river is
for myself.
n thy jaws, and I will cause the fish of
thy rivers to stick unto thy scales, and I will bring thee up out of
hy rivers, and all the fish of thy rivers shall stick
I will leave thee thrown into the wilderness, thee and all
thou shalt fall upon the open fields; thou
red: I have given thee for
asts of the field and to the fowls of the heaven.
 Egypt shall know that I am the LORD,
ause they have been a staff of reed to the house of Israel.
old of thee by thy hand, thou didst break, and
ey leaned upon thee, thou brakest,
dest all their loins to be at a stand.
29:8 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will bring a sword
 cut off man and beast out of thee.
9 And the land of Egypt shall be desolate and waste; and they shall
the LORD: because he hath said, The river is mine, and
old, therefore I am against thee, and against thy rivers, and
of Egypt utterly waste and desolate, from the
f Ethiopia.
pass through it, nor foot of beast shall
pass through it, neither shall it be inhabited forty years.
 the land of Egypt desolate in the midst of the
r cities among the cities that are
aste shall be desolate forty years: and I will scatter the
ons, and will disperse them through the
ountries.
 GOD; At the end of forty years will I
ther the Egyptians from the people whither they were scattered:
ing again the captivity of Egypt, and will cause
thros, into the land of their
 and they shall be there a base kingdom.

doms; neither shall it exalt
ore above the nations: for I will diminish them, that they
the nations.
ore the confidence of the house of Israel,
ance, when they shall look
t they shall know that I am the Lord GOD.
and twentieth year, in the
n the first day of the month, the word of the LORD came
of man, Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon
used his army to serve a great service against Tyrus: every head was
 every shoulder was peeled: yet had he no wages, nor his
ervice that he had served against it: 29:19
ld, I will give the land of
buchadrezzar king of Babylon; and he shall take her
and take her prey; and it shall be the
ges for his army.
m the land of Egypt for his labour wherewith he
ught for me, saith the Lord GOD.
In that day will I cause the horn of the house of Israel to bud
ive thee the opening of the mouth in the midst of
am the LORD.
came again unto me, saying, 30:2 Son of man,
GOD; Howl ye, Woe worth the day!
 the day is near, even the day of the LORD is near, a cloudy
ime of the heathen.
shall come upon Egypt, and great pain shall be in
ll in Egypt, and they shall take away
 multitude, and her foundations shall be broken down.
nd Lydia, and all the mingled people, and
league, shall fall with them
.
hat uphold Egypt shall fall; and
e of her power shall come down: from the tower of Syene shall
e sword, saith the Lord GOD.
hey shall be desolate in the midst of the countries that are
es shall be in the midst of the cities that are
 that I am the LORD, when I have set a fire in
l be destroyed.
messengers go forth from me in ships to make
eat pain shall come upon them,
day of Egypt: for, lo, it cometh.
 Thus saith the Lord GOD; I will also make the multitude of Egypt
and of Nebuchadrezzar king of Babylon.
30:11 He and his people with him, the terrible of the nations, shall
destroy the land: and they shall draw their swords
 with the slain.
the rivers dry, and sell the land into the hand
land waste, and all that is
he hand of strangers: I the LORD have spoken it.
 will also destroy the idols, and I
cause their images to cease out of Noph; and there shall be no
 land of Egypt: and I will put a fear in the land
e Pathros desolate, and will set fire in Zoan, and

he strength of Egypt; and I
the multitude of No.
et fire in Egypt: Sin shall have great pain, and No
 shall have distresses daily.
 young men of Aven and of Pibeseth shall fall by the sword:
go into captivity.
 also the day shall be darkened, when I shall
he pomp of her strength shall
r: as for her, a cloud shall cover her, and her daughters

Egypt: and they shall know that
LORD.
eleventh year, in the first month, in
 seventh day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me,
n of man, I have broken the arm of Pharaoh king of
bound up to be healed, to put a roller
 bind it, to make it strong to hold the sword.
d GOD; Behold, I am against Pharaoh
of Egypt, and will break his arms, the strong, and that which was
l cause the sword to fall out of his hand.
 among the nations, and will
m through the countries.
ll strengthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and put
will break Pharaoh's arms, and he shall
roan before him with the groanings of a deadly wounded man.
ngthen the arms of the king of Babylon, and the
d they shall know that I am the
n I shall put my sword into the hand of the king of Babylon,
t out upon the land of Egypt.
 I will scatter the Egyptians among the nations, and disperse
ies; and they shall know that I am the LORD.
enth year, in the third month, in
st day of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me,
n, speak unto Pharaoh king of Egypt, and to his
y greatness?  31:3 Behold, the
as a cedar in Lebanon with fair branches, and with a
gh stature; and his top was among the
ck boughs.
at, the deep set him up on high with her
rivers running round about his plants, and sent her little rivers unto
s of the field.
ht was exalted above all the trees of the
d his branches became long
 multitude of waters, when he shot forth.
 nests in his boughs, and under
hes did all the beasts of the field bring forth their young,
welt all great nations.
e fair in his greatness, in the length of his branches:
aters.
 God could not hide him: the fir trees
re not like his boughs, and the chestnut trees were not like his
tree in the garden of God was like unto him in his
fair by the multitude of his branches: so that
the garden of God, envied him.
erefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Because thou hast lifted up
 he hath shot up his top among the thick boughs,
height; 31:11 I have therefore
him into the hand of the mighty one of the heathen; he shall
I have driven him out for his wickedness.
e nations, have cut him off,
t him: upon the mountains and in all the valleys his
oughs are broken by all the rivers of
 land; and all the people of the earth are gone down from his
 him.
 fowls of the heaven remain, and all
beasts of the field shall be upon his branches: 31:14 To the end
he trees by the waters exalt themselves for their
p among the thick boughs, neither
rees stand up in their height, all that drink water: for they
o death, to the nether parts of the earth, in the
h them that go down to the pit.
hus saith the Lord GOD; In the day when he went down to the
ng: I covered the deep for him, and I
trained the floods thereof, and the great waters were stayed: and I
to mourn for him, and all the trees of the field
he nations to shake at the sound of his fall, when I
m that descend into the pit: and all the
trees of Eden, the choice and best of Lebanon, all that drink water,
rted in the nether parts of the earth.
31:17 They also went down into hell with him unto them that be slain
; and they that were his arm, that dwelt under his
en.
 glory and in greatness among the
f Eden? yet shalt thou be brought down with the trees of Eden
 of the earth: thou shalt lie in the midst of the
lain by the sword. This is Pharaoh
l his multitude, saith the Lord GOD.
:1 And it came to pass in the twelfth year, in the twelfth month, in
of the month, that the word of the LORD came unto me,
 up a lamentation for Pharaoh king of
pt, and say unto him, Thou art like a young lion of the nations,
whale in the seas: and thou camest forth with thy
 with thy feet, and fouledst their
.
therefore spread out my net over
h a company of many people; and they shall bring thee up in my
ll I leave thee upon the land, I will cast thee forth upon
 cause all the fowls of the heaven to remain
of the whole earth with thee.
I will lay thy flesh upon the mountains, and fill the valleys
2:6 I will also water with thy blood the land wherein thou swimmest,
untains; and the rivers shall be full of thee.
, I will cover the heaven, and make
tars thereof dark; I will cover the sun with a cloud, and the
er light.
 heaven will I make dark over thee, and
et darkness upon thy land, saith the Lord GOD.
 many people, when I shall bring thy
ruction among the nations, into the countries which thou hast not
ea, I will make many people amazed at thee, and their kings
d for thee, when I shall brandish my sword
very moment, every man for his
in the day of thy fall.
saith the Lord GOD; The sword of the king of Babylon
 By the swords of the mighty will I cause thy multitude to fall,
e nations, all of them: and they shall spoil the
de thereof shall be destroyed.
will destroy also all the beasts thereof from beside the great
l the foot of man trouble them any more, nor the
2:14 Then will I make their waters deep, and cause their rivers to
ith the Lord GOD.
ke the land of Egypt desolate, and the country
t was full, when I shall smite all
hat dwell therein, then shall they know that I am the LORD.
entation wherewith they shall lament her: the
 her: they shall lament for her,
 Egypt, and for all her multitude, saith the Lord GOD.
 in the twelfth year, in the fifteenth day
came unto me, saying, 32:18
ail for the multitude of Egypt, and cast them down, even
the famous nations, unto the nether parts of
 the pit.
beauty? go down, and be thou laid with
e uncircumcised.
in the midst of them that are slain by the
aw her and all her multitudes.
e strong among the mighty shall speak to him out of the midst
t help him: they are gone down, they lie
uncircumcised, slain by the sword.
2 Asshur is there and all her company: his graves are about him:
 fallen by the sword: 32:23 Whose graves are set in
ompany is round about her grave: all of
hem slain, fallen by the sword, which caused terror in the land of
2:24 There is Elam and all her multitude round about her grave, all
fallen by the sword, which are gone down uncircumcised
 earth, which caused their terror in the
land of the living; yet have they borne their shame with them that go
it.
e midst of the slain with all her
de: her graves are round about him: all of them uncircumcised,
though their terror was caused in the land of the
 shame with them that go down to the
 he is put in the midst of them that be slain.
 all her multitude: her graves are
about him: all of them uncircumcised, slain by the sword, though
terror in the land of the living.
 And they shall not lie with the mighty that are fallen of the
 are gone down to hell with their weapons of war:
nder their heads, but their
all be upon their bones, though they were the terror of
he living.
ken in the midst of the uncircumcised, and
the sword.
gs, and all her princes, which with their
 the sword: they shall lie
cumcised, and with them that go down to the pit.
e north, all of them, and all the
ns, which are gone down with the slain; with their terror they
 might; and they lie uncircumcised with them that
heir shame with them that go down to
pit.
shall be comforted over all his
, even Pharaoh and all his army slain by the sword, saith the
r I have caused my terror in the land of the living: and he
dst of the uncircumcised with them that are
all his multitude, saith the

 me, saying, 33:2 Son of man,
e children of thy people, and say unto them, When I bring
 the people of the land take a man of their
 33:3 If when he seeth the
n the land, he blow the trumpet, and warn the people;
he sound of the trumpet, and taketh not
arning; if the sword come, and take him away, his blood shall be upon

, and took not warning; his
e upon him. But he that taketh warning shall deliver his
atchman see the sword come, and blow not the trumpet,
 if the sword come, and take any person
rom among them, he is taken away in his iniquity; but his blood will
he watchman's hand.
 of man, I have set thee a watchman unto the house
hear the word at my mouth, and warn
from me.
d, O wicked man, thou shalt surely die;
f thou dost not speak to warn the wicked from his way, that wicked
 his iniquity; but his blood will I require at thine
 thou warn the wicked of his way to turn from it;
e shall die in his iniquity; but thou
t delivered thy soul.
O thou son of man, speak unto the house of Israel;
ansgressions and our sins be upon us,
 we pine away in them, how should we then live?  33:11 Say unto
ith the Lord GOD, I have no pleasure in the death
d turn from his way and live: turn
rn ye from your evil ways; for why will ye die, O house of
, thou son of man, say unto the children of
ghteous shall not deliver him
of his transgression: as for the wickedness of the wicked,
y in the day that he turneth from his
kedness; neither shall the righteous be able to live for his
ay that he sinneth.
say to the righteous, that he shall surely live; if
ss, and commit iniquity, all his
snesses shall not be remembered; but for his iniquity that he
all die for it.
 unto the wicked, Thou shalt surely die; if he
 is lawful and right; 33:15 If the
 restore the pledge, give again that he had robbed, walk in the
ithout committing iniquity; he shall surely live,
f his sins that he hath committed shall be mentioned unto
ich is lawful and right; he shall surely
live.
ple say, The way of the Lord is not
: but as for them, their way is not equal.
his righteousness, and
y, he shall even die thereby.
 if the wicked turn from his wickedness, and do that which is
shall live thereby.
he way of the Lord is not equal. O ye house of
fter his ways.
s in the twelfth year of our captivity, in the
 month, that one that had escaped
Jerusalem came unto me, saying, The city is smitten.
RD was upon me in the evening, afore he
hat was escaped came; and had opened my mouth, until he came to me in
and my mouth was opened, and I was no more dumb.
came unto me, saying, 33:24 Son of
hey that inhabit those wastes of the land of Israel speak,
 and he inherited the land: but we are many;

th the Lord GOD; Ye eat with
nd lift up your eyes toward your idols, and shed blood:
nd?  33:26 Ye stand upon your sword, ye
ork abomination, and ye defile every one his neighbour's wife: and
 the land?  33:27 Say thou thus unto them, Thus saith
ly they that are in the wastes shall fall
 field will I give to the
voured, and they that be in the forts and in the caves

olate, and the pomp of her
 cease; and the mountains of Israel shall be desolate,
.
the LORD, when I have laid the
desolate because of all their abominations which they have
, thou son of man, the children of thy people still are
 walls and in the doors of the houses, and
rother, saying, Come, I pray
r what is the word that cometh forth from the LORD.
 as the people cometh, and they sit
e thee as my people, and they hear thy words, but they will not
heir mouth they shew much love, but their heart
33:32 And, lo, thou art unto them as a very lovely song of one that
 voice, and can play well on an instrument: for they
em not.
ass, (lo, it will come,) then shall
know that a prophet hath been among them.
 me, saying, 34:2 Son of man,
ainst the shepherds of Israel, prophesy, and say unto them,
 unto the shepherds; Woe be to the shepherds of
uld not the shepherds feed the
4:3 Ye eat the fat, and ye clothe you with the wool, ye kill
 ye feed not the flock.
ed have ye not strengthened, neither have ye healed
ve ye bound up that which was broken,
ther have ye brought again that which was driven away, neither have
which was lost; but with force and with cruelty have ye
y were scattered, because there is no shepherd: and they
sts of the field, when they were scattered.
e mountains, and upon every high
a, my flock was scattered upon all the face of the earth, and
ek after them.
erds, hear the word of the LORD; 34:8 As I
 my flock became a prey, and
ame meat to every beast of the field, because there was no
 shepherds search for my flock, but the
hepherds fed themselves, and fed not my flock; 34:9 Therefore, O ye
 the word of the LORD; 34:10 Thus saith the Lord GOD;
herds; and I will require my flock at
ir hand, and cause them to cease from feeding the flock; neither
s feed themselves any more; for I will deliver my
 may not be meat for them.
us saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I, even I, will both search
out.
s flock in the day that he is among
heep that are scattered; so will I seek out my sheep, and will
all places where they have been scattered in the
I will bring them out from the people, and gather them from
 bring them to their own land, and feed them
vers, and in all the inhabited
the country.
a good pasture, and upon the high mountains
all they lie in a good fold,
 pasture shall they feed upon the mountains of Israel.
, and I will cause them to lie down, saith
which was lost, and bring again that which was
hich was broken, and will
 which was sick: but I will destroy the fat and the
udgment.
ck, thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I
dge between cattle and cattle, between the rams and the he goats.
t a small thing unto you to have eaten up the good
with your feet the residue of your
es? and to have drunk of the deep waters, but ye must foul the
et?  34:19 And as for my flock, they eat that
 and they drink that which ye
 with your feet.
aith the Lord GOD unto them; Behold, I, even I,
nd between the lean cattle.
se ye have thrust with side and with shoulder, and pushed
r horns, till ye have scattered them abroad;
and they shall no more be a
ill judge between cattle and cattle.
:23 And I will set up one shepherd over them, and he shall feed
nt David; he shall feed them, and he shall be their
RD will be their God, and my servant David a prince
ken it.
 a covenant of peace, and will cause
evil beasts to cease out of the land: and they shall dwell safely
, and sleep in the woods.
ill make them and the places round about my hill a
hower to come down in his season;
hall be showers of blessing.
the tree of the field shall yield her fruit, and the earth
, and they shall be safe in their land, and
ave broken the bands of their
elivered them out of the hand of those that served
 they shall no more be a prey to the heathen, neither shall
evour them; but they shall dwell safely, and
And I will raise up for them a plant of renown, and they shall
with hunger in the land, neither bear the shame of
hus shall they know that I the LORD their God am with them, and
 house of Israel, are my people, saith the Lord
flock of my pasture, are men, and I am your
er the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 35:2 Son of
 mount Seir, and prophesy against it, 35:3
; Behold, O mount Seir, I am
, and I will stretch out mine hand against thee, and I
.
 thou shalt be desolate, and thou
now that I am the LORD.
ou hast had a perpetual hatred, and hast shed the blood
y the force of the sword in the time of
heir calamity, in the time that their iniquity had an end: 35:6
e, saith the Lord GOD, I will prepare thee unto
 sith thou hast not hated blood,
od shall pursue thee.
make mount Seir most desolate, and cut off from it
t returneth.
ountains with his slain men: in thy hills,
s, shall they fall that are
e sword.
l desolations, and thy cities shall not
eturn: and ye shall know that I am the LORD.
two nations and these two
 be mine, and we will possess it; whereas the LORD was
 live, saith the Lord GOD, I will even do
o thine envy which thou hast
thy hatred against them; and I will make myself known
d thee.
I am the LORD, and that I have heard
thy blasphemies which thou hast spoken against the mountains of
y are laid desolate, they are given us to consume.
have boasted against me, and have
ied your words against me: I have heard them.
 the whole earth rejoiceth, I will
hee desolate.
ce at the inheritance of the house of Israel,
 unto thee: thou shalt be
nt Seir, and all Idumea, even all of it: and they shall

 the mountains of Israel, and
ntains of Israel, hear the word of the LORD: 36:2 Thus
the enemy hath said against you, Aha, even
ession: 36:3 Therefore
Thus saith the Lord GOD; Because they have made you
on every side, that ye might be a
ion unto the residue of the heathen, and ye are taken up in the
d are an infamy of the people: 36:4 Therefore, ye
d of the Lord GOD; Thus saith the
D to the mountains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the
olate wastes, and to the cities that are forsaken,
 to the residue of the heathen that
ound about; 36:5 Therefore thus saith the Lord GOD; Surely in the
sy have I spoken against the residue of the heathen,
have appointed my land into their
ion with the joy of all their heart, with despiteful minds, to
ey.
the land of Israel, and say unto
tains, and to the hills, to the rivers, and to the valleys,
; Behold, I have spoken in my jealousy and in
ame of the heathen: 36:7
aith the Lord GOD; I have lifted up mine hand, Surely
u, they shall bear their shame.
t ye, O mountains of Israel, ye shall shoot forth your
it to my people of Israel; for they are at
for you, and I will turn unto you, and ye shall
l multiply men upon you, all the
 Israel, even all of it: and the cities shall be inhabited,
 builded: 36:11 And I will multiply upon you
 and bring fruit: and I will
fter your old estates, and will do better unto you than at
shall know that I am the LORD.
a, I will cause men to walk upon you, even my people Israel;
 thee, and thou shalt be their inheritance, and
ve them of men.
rd GOD; Because they say unto you, Thou land
y nations: 36:14 Therefore thou
our men no more, neither bereave thy nations any more, saith
 Neither will I cause men to hear in thee the shame of the
r shalt thou bear the reproach of the people
 nations to fall any more, saith
 GOD.
RD came unto me, saying, 36:17 Son of
, when the house of Israel dwelt in their own land, they defiled it
y and by their doings: their way was before me as the
n.
n them for the blood that they had
pon the land, and for their idols wherewith they had polluted
ered them among the heathen, and they were
ng to their way and according
ings I judged them.
 entered unto the heathen, whither they went, they
 said to them, These are the people of
e LORD, and are gone forth out of his land.
me, which the house of Israel had
d among the heathen, whither they went.

ael, thus saith the Lord GOD;
is for your sakes, O house of Israel, but for mine holy
profaned among the heathen, whither ye
nt.
name, which was profaned among the
n, which ye have profaned in the midst of them; and the heathen
m the LORD, saith the Lord GOD, when I shall be
.
the heathen, and gather you out
untries, and will bring you into your own land.
water upon you, and ye shall be
om all your filthiness, and from all your idols, will I
 heart also will I give you, and a new spirit will I put
e away the stony heart out of your flesh,

, and cause you to walk in my
nd ye shall keep my judgments, and do them.
that I gave to your fathers; and
 be my people, and I will be your God.
36:29 I will also save you from all your uncleannesses: and I will
n, and will increase it, and lay no famine upon you.
e fruit of the tree, and the increase of
the field, that ye shall receive no more reproach of famine among the
6:31 Then shall ye remember your own evil ways, and your doings that
 and shall lothe yourselves in your own sight for your
inations.
 this, saith the Lord GOD, be it known
to you: be ashamed and confounded for your own ways, O house of
us saith the Lord GOD; In the day that I shall have cleansed
uities I will also cause you to dwell in the
d.
 tilled, whereas it lay desolate
ight of all that passed by.
hey shall say, This land that was desolate is become like
he waste and desolate and ruined cities are
:36 Then the heathen that are left round about you shall know that I
 the ruined places, and plant that that was desolate: I
d I will do it.
rd GOD; I will yet for this be enquired of by
m; I will increase them with men
lock.
lock of Jerusalem in her solemn
o shall the waste cities be filled with flocks of men: and
m the LORD.
as upon me, and carried me out in the
rit of the LORD, and set me down in the midst of the valley which
, 37:2 And caused me to pass by them round about:
 in the open valley; and, lo, they
ery dry.
of man, can these bones live? And I
red, O Lord GOD, thou knowest.
in he said unto me, Prophesy upon these bones, and say unto
ear the word of the LORD.
th the Lord GOD unto these bones; Behold, I will cause
d ye shall live: 37:6 And I will lay
ws upon you, and will bring up flesh upon you, and cover you with
ath in you, and ye shall live; and ye shall know that
rophesied as I was commanded: and as I prophesied, there
shaking, and the bones came together, bone
lo, the sinews and the flesh came up upon
t there was no breath in
en said he unto me, Prophesy unto the wind, prophesy, son of
nd, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Come from the four
hese slain, that they may live.
o I prophesied as he commanded me, and the breath came into
nd stood up upon their feet, an exceeding great
, Son of man, these bones are the whole
ouse of Israel: behold, they say, Our bones are dried, and our hope
 cut off for our parts.
 prophesy and say unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD;
pen your graves, and cause you to come up
e land of Israel.
ow that I am the LORD, when I have opened your
 up out of your graves, 37:14 And
ut my spirit in you, and ye shall live, and I shall place you
n shall ye know that I the LORD have spoken it,

to me, saying, 37:16 Moreover,
f man, take thee one stick, and write upon it, For Judah,
srael his companions: then take another
tick, and write upon it, For Joseph, the stick of Ephraim and for all
Israel his companions: 37:17 And join them one to another
shall become one in thine hand.
nd when the children of thy people shall speak unto thee,
w us what thou meanest by these?  37:19 Say
old, I will take the stick of
ch is in the hand of Ephraim, and the tribes of Israel his
em with him, even with the stick of Judah, and
be one in mine hand.
ks whereon thou writest shall be in thine hand
unto them, Thus saith the Lord GOD; Behold, I will take
 among the heathen, whither they be gone,
ring them into their own
I will make them one nation in the land upon the
shall be king to them all: and they
 be no more two nations, neither shall they be divided into two
t all.
themselves any more with their idols,
 with their detestable things, nor with any of their
e them out of all their dwellingplaces,
herein they have sinned, and will cleanse them: so shall they be my
ill be their God.
rvant shall be king over them; and they all shall
o walk in my judgments, and observe
atutes, and do them.
ll dwell in the land that I have given unto Jacob my
have dwelt; and they shall dwell
 even they, and their children, and their children's children
ant David shall be their prince for ever.
f peace with them; it shall be
ting covenant with them: and I will place them, and multiply
sanctuary in the midst of them for evermore.
th them: yea, I will be their God,
ey shall be my people.
athen shall know that I the LORD do sanctify Israel,
the midst of them for evermore.
d the word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 38:2 Son of man,
Gog, the land of Magog, the chief prince of
 him, 38:3 And say, Thus saith
OD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince of
nd I will turn thee back, and put hooks into
 and all thine army, horses and
 all of them clothed with all sorts of armour, even a great
nd shields, all of them handling swords: 38:5
; all of them with shield and
6 Gomer, and all his bands; the house of Togarmah of the
s bands: and many people with thee.
7 Be thou prepared, and prepare for thyself, thou, and all thy
embled unto thee, and be thou a guard unto them.
be visited: in the latter years thou
t come into the land that is brought back from the sword, and is
ny people, against the mountains of Israel, which
 brought forth out of the nations,
ey shall dwell safely all of them.
 Thou shalt ascend and come like a storm, thou shalt be like a
and, thou, and all thy bands, and many people with
rd GOD; It shall also come to pass, that at the
y mind, and thou shalt think an
ght: 38:11 And thou shalt say, I will go up to the land of
l go to them that are at rest, that dwell
s, and having neither bars
12 To take a spoil, and to take a prey; to turn thine
 that are now inhabited, and upon the
ple that are gathered out of the nations, which have gotten cattle
dwell in the midst of the land.
heba, and Dedan, and the merchants of Tarshish, with all the
hall say unto thee, Art thou come to take a
o take a prey? to carry away
old, to take away cattle and goods, to take a great spoil?
man, prophesy and say unto Gog, Thus saith the
 of Israel dwelleth safely, shalt
t know it?  38:15 And thou shalt come from thy place out of the
and many people with thee, all of them riding upon
ighty army: 38:16 And thou shalt come
against my people of Israel, as a cloud to cover the land; it shall
r days, and I will bring thee against my land, that the
 shall be sanctified in thee, O Gog, before
d GOD; Art thou he of whom I have spoken in
 Israel, which prophesied in
any years that I would bring thee against them?  38:18 And
 the same time when Gog shall come against the
that my fury shall come up in my

of my wrath have I spoken,
 day there shall be a great shaking in the land of
 of the sea, and the fowls of the
 and the beasts of the field, and all creeping things that
d all the men that are upon the face of the
the mountains shall be thrown
he steep places shall fall, and every wall shall fall to
 will call for a sword against him throughout all my
 every man's sword shall be against his
rother.
him with pestilence and with blood; and
 will rain upon him, and upon his bands, and upon the many people
, an overflowing rain, and great hailstones, fire,
l I magnify myself, and sanctify myself; and I will be
tions, and they shall know that I am the
LORD.
prophesy against Gog, and say, Thus
 the Lord GOD; Behold, I am against thee, O Gog, the chief prince
bal: 39:2 And I will turn thee back, and leave but
 cause thee to come up from the north
ts, and will bring thee upon the mountains of Israel: 39:3 And I
 out of thy left hand, and will cause thine arrows

of Israel, thou, and all thy
he people that is with thee: I will give thee unto the
, and to the beasts of the field to be
voured.
pen field: for I have spoken it, saith
e Lord GOD.
 on Magog, and among them that dwell
lessly in the isles: and they shall know that I am the LORD.
my holy name known in the midst of my people
e my holy name any more: and the
shall know that I am the LORD, the Holy One in Israel.
nd it is done, saith the Lord GOD; this is
nd they that dwell in the cities of Israel shall go forth, and
d burn the weapons, both the shields and the
 the handstaves, and the spears,
 shall burn them with fire seven years: 39:10 So that they
f the field, neither cut down any out of the
ns with fire: and they shall
that spoiled them, and rob those that robbed them, saith
 it shall come to pass in that day, that I will give unto Gog
es in Israel, the valley of the passengers on the
p the noses of the passengers: and
shall they bury Gog and all his multitude: and they shall call
ongog.
 house of Israel be burying of them,
 they may cleanse the land.
all the people of the land shall bury them; and it shall be
y that I shall be glorified, saith the Lord
men of continual employment, passing
ugh the land to bury with the passengers those that remain upon
th, to cleanse it: after the end of seven months
e passengers that pass through the land, when any seeth a
 set up a sign by it, till the buriers have

 be Hamonah. Thus shall they
land.
saith the Lord GOD; Speak unto every
hered fowl, and to every beast of the field, Assemble yourselves,
yourselves on every side to my sacrifice that I do
sacrifice upon the mountains of
hat ye may eat flesh, and drink blood.
39:18 Ye shall eat the flesh of the mighty, and drink the blood of the
he earth, of rams, of lambs, and of goats, of bullocks,
han.
 be full, and drink blood till ye be
ken, of my sacrifice which I have sacrificed for you.
ed at my table with horses and chariots,
with mighty men, and with all men of war, saith the Lord GOD.
t my glory among the heathen, and all the heathen
 executed, and my hand that I have
pon them.
shall know that I am the LORD their God
rom that day and forward.
 heathen shall know that the house of Israel went into
: because they trespassed against me,
refore hid I my face from them, and gave them into the hand of
ll they all by the sword.
ng to their uncleanness and according to their
, and hid my face from them.
efore thus saith the Lord GOD; Now will I bring again the
ave mercy upon the whole house of Israel, and
26 After that they have borne
, and all their trespasses whereby they have trespassed
 safely in their land, and none made them
 again from the people, and gathered
 out of their enemies' lands, and am sanctified in them in the
s; 39:28 Then shall they know that I am the LORD
 led into captivity among the
t I have gathered them unto their own land, and have left
re.
ny more from them: for I have
my spirit upon the house of Israel, saith the Lord GOD.
tieth year of our captivity, in the beginning
month, in the fourteenth year
the city was smitten, in the selfsame day the hand of the
ught me thither.
 God brought he me into the land of Israel, and
y which was as the frame of a city
 south.
 and, behold, there was a man, whose
arance was like the appearance of brass, with a line of flax in
suring reed; and he stood in the gate.
40:4 And the man said unto me, Son of man, behold with thine eyes, and
ine ears, and set thine heart upon all that I shall shew
at I might shew them unto thee art thou
rought hither: declare all that thou seest to the house of Israel.
d a wall on the outside of the house round about, and in
 reed of six cubits long by the cubit and an
th of the building, one reed;
ght, one reed.
he gate which looketh toward the east, and
 the threshold of the gate,
 reed broad; and the other threshold of the gate, which
 And every little chamber was one reed long, and one reed broad;
ttle chambers were five cubits; and the threshold of
ate within was one reed.
ed also the porch of the gate within, one reed.
f the gate, eight cubits; and the
hereof, two cubits; and the porch of the gate was inward.
ambers of the gate eastward were three on this
hree were of one measure: and the
ad one measure on this side and on that side.
f the entry of the gate, ten
the length of the gate, thirteen cubits.

hambers was one cubit on this
he space was one cubit on that side: and the little
s side, and six cubits on that side.
:13 He measured then the gate from the roof of one little chamber to
other: the breadth was five and twenty cubits, door
also posts of threescore cubits, even unto the post of
te.
 of the entrance unto the face of
ch of the inner gate were fifty cubits.

e little chambers, and to
hin the gate round about, and likewise to the arches:
inward: and upon each post were palm
s.
tward court, and, lo, there were
, and a pavement made for the court round about: thirty
ment.
e of the gates over against the
 the gates was the lower pavement.
9 Then he measured the breadth from the forefront of the lower
ont of the inner court without, an hundred cubits
And the gate of the outward court that looked toward the north,
gth thereof, and the breadth thereof.
0:21 And the little chambers thereof were three on this side and
; and the posts thereof and the arches thereof were
gate: the length thereof was fifty
, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.
es, and their palm trees, were
measure of the gate that looketh toward the east; and they
 steps; and the arches thereof were before
 court was over against the gate toward
he north, and toward the east; and he measured from gate to gate an

the south, and behold a gate
outh: and he measured the posts thereof and the arches
easures.
n it and in the arches thereof round
t, like those windows: the length was fifty cubits, and the
 cubits.
ps to go up to it, and the arches
 were before them: and it had palm trees, one on this side, and
e, upon the posts thereof.
ere was a gate in the inner court toward the south: and he
te toward the south an hundred cubits.
40:28 And he brought me to the inner court by the south gate: and he
outh gate according to these measures; 40:29 And the
he posts thereof, and the arches
 according to these measures: and there were windows in it and
f round about: it was fifty cubits long, and five
 And the arches round about were five and twenty cubits long, and
.
ard the utter court; and palm
upon the posts thereof: and the going up to it had eight
ught me into the inner court toward the east: and he
 these measures.
hambers thereof, and the posts thereof, and the
hese measures: and there were
rein and in the arches thereof round about: it was fifty
twenty cubits broad.
es thereof were toward the outward court; and palm
f, on this side, and on that side: and
e going up to it had eight steps.
 And he brought me to the north gate, and measured it according
40:36 The little chambers thereof, the posts
he windows to it round about:
was fifty cubits, and the breadth five and twenty cubits.
reof were toward the utter court; and palm
is side, and on that side: and
up to it had eight steps.
 chambers and the entries thereof were by the posts of
 the burnt offering.
orch of the gate were two tables on this side, and
 thereon the burnt offering and the
ffering and the trespass offering.
0 And at the side without, as one goeth up to the entry of the
 tables; and on the other side, which was at the
.
and four tables on that side, by
 of the gate; eight tables, whereupon they slew their
four tables were of hewn stone for the burnt offering,
 and a cubit and an half broad, and one
ubit high: whereupon also they laid the instruments wherewith they
ffering and the sacrifice.
thin were hooks, an hand broad, fastened round about: and
lesh of the offering.
 the inner gate were the chambers of the singers in
he side of the north gate; and their
pect was toward the south: one at the side of the east gate having
ard the north.
e, This chamber, whose prospect is toward the
s of the charge of the house.
 the chamber whose prospect is toward the north is for the
the charge of the altar: these are the sons of
come near to the LORD to minister
m.
undred cubits long, and an hundred
 broad, foursquare; and the altar that was before the house.
 me to the porch of the house, and measured each
this side, and five cubits on that
and the breadth of the gate was three cubits on this side, and
 side.
s twenty cubits, and the breadth
ubits, and he brought me by the steps whereby they went up to
llars by the posts, one on this side, and another
e brought me to the temple, and measured the posts,
e, and six cubits broad on the other
, which was the breadth of the tabernacle.
en cubits; and the sides of the
 five cubits on the one side, and five cubits on the other
e length thereof, forty cubits: and the
readth, twenty cubits.
e inward, and measured the post of the door, two
and the breadth of the door, seven
.
f, twenty cubits; and the
 cubits, before the temple: and he said unto me, This
:5 After he measured the wall of the house, six cubits; and the
de chamber, four cubits, round about the house on
chambers were three, one over another, and thirty in
he wall which was of the house for the
de chambers round about, that they might have hold, but they had not
ll of the house.
enlarging, and a winding about still upward to
bout of the house went still
 about the house: therefore the breadth of the house was
ased from the lowest chamber to the highest
ight of the house round about: the foundations
d of six great cubits.
ss of the wall, which was for the side chamber
hich was left was the place of the
hambers that were within.
ween the chambers was the wideness of twenty cubits round
side.
hambers were toward the place that
ft, one door toward the north, and another door toward the
f the place that was left was five cubits
at was before the separate place at the end
d; and the wall of the building
cubits thick round about, and the length thereof ninety
ured the house, an hundred cubits long; and the
ith the walls thereof, an hundred
long; 41:14 Also the breadth of the face of the house, and of
ward the east, an hundred cubits.
 And he measured the length of the building over against the
as behind it, and the galleries thereof on the
undred cubits, with the inner
 the porches of the court; 41:16 The door posts, and the
lleries round about on their three stories,
 round about, and from the
he windows, and the windows were covered; 41:17 To that
he inner house, and without, and by all the
 measure.
erubims and palm trees, so that a palm
ee was between a cherub and a cherub; and every cherub had two
 the face of a man was toward the palm tree on the
g lion toward the palm tree on the
side: it was made through all the house round about.
bove the door were cherubims and palm
es made, and on the wall of the temple.

d, and the face of the
earance of the one as the appearance of the other.
ree cubits high, and the length thereof
wo cubits; and the corners thereof, and the length thereof, and the
were of wood: and he said unto me, This is the table
:23 And the temple and the sanctuary had two doors.
eaves apiece, two turning leaves; two
ves for the one door, and two leaves for the other door.
e on them, on the doors of the temple,
erubims and palm trees, like as were made upon the walls; and there
ks upon the face of the porch without.
41:26 And there were narrow windows and palm trees on the one side and
 side, on the sides of the porch, and upon the side
k planks.
 into the utter court, the way toward the
 that was over against the
, and which was before the building toward the north.
n hundred cubits was the north door, and
the breadth was fifty cubits.
 against the twenty cubits which were for the inner court,
ement which was for the utter court, was
gallery against gallery in three stories.
 to ten cubits breadth inward,
ne cubit; and their doors toward the north.
ter: for the galleries were
hese, than the lower, and than the middlemost of the
e in three stories, but had not pillars as the
 building was straitened more than
west and the middlemost from the ground.

against the chambers, toward
urt on the forepart of the chambers, the length thereof
or the length of the chambers that were in the utter court was
o, before the temple were an hundred cubits.
as the entry on the east side, as
th into them from the utter court.
0 The chambers were in the thickness of the wall of the court
 against the separate place, and over against the
fore them was like the appearance of the chambers
ong as they, and as broad as they:
l their goings out were both according to their fashions, and
ors.
f the chambers that were toward the
 was a door in the head of the way, even the way directly before
e east, as one entereth into them.
3 Then said he unto me, The north chambers and the south chambers,
 the separate place, they be holy chambers, where the
e LORD shall eat the most holy things:
ere shall they lay the most holy things, and the meat offering, and
g, and the trespass offering; for the place is holy.
 therein, then shall they not go out of
he holy place into the utter court, but there they shall lay their
 they minister; for they are holy; and shall put on
ach to those things which are for the
ple.
of measuring the inner house, he
me forth toward the gate whose prospect is toward the east,
bout.
ith the measuring reed, five hundred
s, with the measuring reed round about.

ndred reeds, with the
d about.
de, five hundred reeds, with the
g reed.
st side, and measured five hundred
with the measuring reed.
red it by the four sides: it had a wall round about,
ive hundred broad, to make a separation
etween the sanctuary and the profane place.
ate, even the gate that looketh
e east: 43:2 And, behold, the glory of the God of Israel came
ast: and his voice was like a noise of many
lory.
appearance of the vision which I saw,
n according to the vision that I saw when I came to destroy the
ns were like the vision that I saw by the river

the house by the way of the
ospect is toward the east.
spirit took me up, and brought me into the inner court;
he LORD filled the house.
ard him speaking unto me out of the house; and the man
said unto me, Son of man, the place of my throne, and the
feet, where I will dwell in the midst of the
ly name, shall the house of
e defile, neither they, nor their kings, by their
their kings in their high places.
In their setting of their threshold by my thresholds, and their
nd the wall between me and them, they have even
nations that they have committed:
re I have consumed them in mine anger.
43:9 Now let them put away their whoredom, and the carcases of their
m me, and I will dwell in the midst of them for ever.
 the house to the house of Israel, that
hey may be ashamed of their iniquities: and let them measure the
And if they be ashamed of all that they have done, shew them the
 and the fashion thereof, and the goings out
nd all the forms thereof, and
inances thereof, and all the forms thereof, and all the
in their sight, that they may keep the
ole form thereof, and all the ordinances thereof, and do them.
law of the house; Upon the top of the mountain the
shall be most holy. Behold, this is
aw of the house.
e measures of the altar after the cubits: The
 even the bottom shall be a
e breadth a cubit, and the border thereof by the edge
a span: and this shall be the higher
e of the altar.
om upon the ground even to the lower settle
e cubit; and from the lesser
to the greater settle shall be four cubits, and the
the altar shall be four cubits; and from the altar and upward

its long, twelve broad, square
r squares thereof.
 shall be fourteen cubits long and fourteen broad
the border about it shall be half a
; and the bottom thereof shall be a cubit about; and his stairs
he east.
 of man, thus saith the Lord GOD; These
re the ordinances of the altar in the day when they shall make it, to
fferings thereon, and to sprinkle blood thereon.
 priests the Levites that be of the
of Zadok, which approach unto me, to minister unto me, saith the
bullock for a sin offering.
hou shalt take of the blood thereof, and put it on the four
 four corners of the settle, and upon the
se and purge it.
the bullock also of the sin offering, and he
f the house, without the
:22 And on the second day thou shalt offer a kid of the goats
 sin offering; and they shall cleanse the altar,
llock.
 of cleansing it, thou shalt offer a
g bullock without blemish, and a ram out of the flock without
 thou shalt offer them before the LORD, and the priests shall
and they shall offer them up for a burnt offering
s shalt thou prepare every day a goat for a sin
 young bullock, and a ram out of
k, without blemish.
all they purge the altar and purify it; and they
:27 And when these days are expired, it shall be, that upon the
forward, the priests shall make your burnt
 offerings; and I will accept
the Lord GOD.
ack the way of the gate of the outward
nctuary which looketh toward the east; and it was shut.
nto me; This gate shall be shut, it shall not
by it; because the LORD, the God
l, hath entered in by it, therefore it shall be shut.
the prince, he shall sit in it to eat bread
way of the porch of that gate,
go out by the way of the same.
n brought he me the way of the north gate before the house:
ld, the glory of the LORD filled the house of

n, mark well, and behold with
 and hear with thine ears all that I say unto thee
 the house of the LORD, and all the
thereof; and mark well the entering in of the house, with every
sanctuary.
he rebellious, even to the house of
l, Thus saith the Lord GOD; O ye house of Israel, let it suffice
ominations, 44:7 In that ye have brought into my
 in heart, and uncircumcised in
 be in my sanctuary, to pollute it, even my house, when ye
and the blood, and they have broken my
venant because of all your abominations.

mine holy things: but ye have
 of my charge in my sanctuary for yourselves.
ranger, uncircumcised in heart, nor
cumcised in flesh, shall enter into my sanctuary, of any stranger
 children of Israel.
tes that are gone away far from me, when Israel went
 from me after their idols; they shall
en bear their iniquity.
shall be ministers in my sanctuary, having charge at
nistering to the house: they shall slay
he burnt offering and the sacrifice for the people, and they shall
m to minister unto them.
they ministered unto them before their idols, and caused
l into iniquity; therefore have I lifted up
GOD, and they shall bear their

 me, to do the office of a
, nor to come near to any of my holy things, in the most
 bear their shame, and their abominations
 will make them keepers of the charge of the house, for all
d for all that shall be done therein.
4:15 But the priests the Levites, the sons of Zadok, that kept the
ctuary when the children of Israel went astray from
to minister unto me, and they shall
 before me to offer unto me the fat and the blood, saith the Lord
hall enter into my sanctuary, and they shall come
o me, and they shall keep my charge.
:17 And it shall come to pass, that when they enter in at the gates
urt, they shall be clothed with linen garments; and no
hiles they minister in the gates of the
nner court, and within.
l have linen bonnets upon their heads, and shall have
ns; they shall not gird themselves with
ny thing that causeth sweat.
when they go forth into the utter court, even into the utter
hey shall put off their garments wherein they
chambers, and they shall put on
ments; and they shall not sanctify the people with their
 shall they shave their heads, nor suffer their locks to
 poll their heads.
any priest drink wine, when they enter into the
 they take for their wives a widow, nor her that is
aidens of the seed of the house of
, or a widow that had a priest before.
44:23 And they shall teach my people the difference between the holy
nd cause them to discern between the unclean and the
ersy they shall stand in judgment; and they shall
s: and they shall keep my laws and my
tutes in all mine assemblies; and they shall hallow my sabbaths.
hall come at no dead person to defile themselves: but
 for son, or for daughter, for brother,
r for sister that hath had no husband, they may defile themselves.
r he is cleansed, they shall reckon unto him seven days.
t he goeth into the sanctuary, unto the inner
he shall offer his sin offering,
e Lord GOD.
them for an inheritance: I am their
itance: and ye shall give them no possession in Israel: I am
4:29 They shall eat the meat offering, and the sin offering, and the
ing: and every dedicated thing in Israel shall be
 all the firstfruits of all things, and every
r oblations, shall be the
all also give unto the priest the first of your dough,
ng to rest in thine house.
iests shall not eat of any thing that is dead of itself,
l or beast.
l divide by lot the land for inheritance,
 an holy portion of the land:
shall be the length of five and twenty thousand reeds, and
 thousand. This shall be holy in all the
borders thereof round about.
is there shall be for the sanctuary five hundred in length,
eadth, square round about; and fifty cubits

re the length of five and
, and the breadth of ten thousand: and in it shall be
ly place.
land shall be for the priests the
rs of the sanctuary, which shall come near to minister unto the
be a place for their houses, and an holy place for
ive and twenty thousand of length, and the ten thousand
evites, the ministers of the house, have
for themselves, for a possession for twenty chambers.
he possession of the city five thousand
road, and five and twenty thousand long, over against the oblation of
ion: it shall be for the whole house of Israel.
he prince on the one side and on the
r side of the oblation of the holy portion, and of the possession
re the oblation of the holy portion, and before the
e west side westward, and from the east
ide eastward: and the length shall be over against one of the
st border unto the east border.
 the land shall be his possession in Israel: and my princes
y people; and the rest of the land shall they
 to their tribes.
ord GOD; Let it suffice you, O princes of Israel:
ecute judgment and justice, take away
r exactions from my people, saith the Lord GOD.
, and a just ephah, and a just bath.
:11 The ephah and the bath shall be of one measure, that the bath
enth part of an homer, and the ephah the tenth part
f shall be after the homer.
he shekel shall be twenty gerahs: twenty shekels, five and
shekels, shall be your maneh.
s is the oblation that ye shall offer; the sixth part of an
eat, and ye shall give the sixth part of an
erning the ordinance of oil,
oil, ye shall offer the tenth part of a bath out of the
en baths; for ten baths are an homer: 45:15
wo hundred, out of the fat
rael; for a meat offering, and for a burnt offering, and
ke reconciliation for them, saith the Lord
 shall give this oblation for the
in Israel.
ince's part to give burnt offerings, and
meat offerings, and drink offerings, in the feasts, and in the new
e sabbaths, in all solemnities of the house of Israel:
ering, and the meat offering, and the
nt offering, and the peace offerings, to make reconciliation for
l.
e first month, in the first day of
nth, thou shalt take a young bullock without blemish, and
:19 And the priest shall take of the blood of
 posts of the house, and upon the
rners of the settle of the altar, and upon the posts of the
.
h day of the month for every one
eth, and for him that is simple: so shall ye reconcile the
irst month, in the fourteenth day of the month, ye shall
 of seven days; unleavened bread shall be
he prince prepare for himself and for
 the people of the land a bullock for a sin offering.
 feast he shall prepare a burnt offering to
 without blemish daily the
d a kid of the goats daily for a sin offering.
offering of an ephah for a bullock,
n ephah for a ram, and an hin of oil for an ephah.
 the fifteenth day of the month, shall
 do the like in the feast of the seven days, according to the sin
ng to the burnt offering, and according to the meat
oil.
gate of the inner court that looketh
rd the east shall be shut the six working days; but on the sabbath
ed, and in the day of the new moon it shall be opened.
enter by the way of the porch of that gate
the gate, and the priests
is burnt offering and his peace offerings, and he shall
 the gate: then he shall go forth; but the
.
shall worship at the door of this
fore the LORD in the sabbaths and in the new moons.
hat the prince shall offer unto the LORD
in the sabbath day shall be six lambs without blemish, and a ram

phah for a ram, and the meat
 the lambs as he shall be able to give, and an hin of oil
in the day of the new moon it shall be a young bullock
bs, and a ram: they shall be without
ish.
ffering, an ephah for a bullock, and
phah for a ram, and for the lambs according as his hand shall
in of oil to an ephah.
e prince shall enter, he shall go in by the way of the
hall go forth by the way thereof.
But when the people of the land shall come before the LORD in the
 that entereth in by the way of the north gate to
f the south gate; and he that
 the way of the south gate shall go forth by the way of the
t return by the way of the gate whereby he came
 it.
of them, when they go in, shall go
d when they go forth, shall go forth.
6:11 And in the feasts and in the solemnities the meat offering shall
o a bullock, and an ephah to a ram, and to the lambs as
hin of oil to an ephah.
the prince shall prepare a voluntary burnt offering or
unto the LORD, one shall then open him the
e shall prepare his burnt
s peace offerings, as he did on the sabbath day: then
his going forth one shall shut the gate.

ffering unto the LORD of a
rst year without blemish: thou shalt prepare it every
alt prepare a meat offering for it every morning, the
he third part of an hin of oil, to temper
inually by a perpetual
 LORD.
e lamb, and the meat offering, and the
l, every morning for a continual burnt offering.
f the prince give a gift unto any of
sons, the inheritance thereof shall be his sons'; it shall be
nheritance.
 of his inheritance to one of his servants,
erty; after it shall return to
: but his inheritance shall be his sons' for them.
l not take of the people's inheritance
 oppression, to thrust them out of their possession; but he shall
eritance out of his own possession: that my people be
his possession.
me through the entry, which was at the side of
the priests, which looked toward
h: and, behold, there was a place on the two sides westward.
nto me, This is the place where the priests shall
e sin offering, where they shall bake
 meat offering; that they bear them not out into the utter court,
eople.
nto the utter court, and caused me to
s by the four corners of the court; and, behold, in every corner of
 was a court.
 of the court there were courts joined of
 four corners were of one
23 And there was a row of building round about in them, round about
it was made with boiling places under the rows round
nto me, These are the places of them that boil,
all boil the sacrifice of the
47:1 Afterward he brought me again unto the door of the house; and,
issued out from under the threshold of the house
 house stood toward the east, and
ers came down from under from the right side of the house, at
 altar.
the way of the gate northward, and led
 about the way without unto the utter gate by the way that looketh
ehold, there ran out waters on the right side.
 line in his hand went forth
 measured a thousand cubits, and he brought me through the
to the ankles.
 thousand, and brought me through the waters;
e measured a thousand, and
ough; the waters were to the loins.
5 Afterward he measured a thousand; and it was a river that I could
for the waters were risen, waters to swim in, a river
.
 hast thou seen this? Then he
 and caused me to return to the brink of the river.
 behold, at the bank of the river were
ry many trees on the one side and on the other.
waters issue out toward the east
 and go down into the desert, and go into the sea: which being
he sea, the waters shall be healed.
9 And it shall come to pass, that every thing that liveth, which
ver the rivers shall come, shall live: and there
 fish, because these waters shall
ither: for they shall be healed; and every thing shall live
h.
t the fishers shall stand upon it
gedi even unto Eneglaim; they shall be a place to spread forth
ll be according to their kinds, as the fish of the
:11 But the miry places thereof and the marishes thereof shall not
shall be given to salt.
e river upon the bank thereof, on this side and on that
for meat, whose leaf shall not fade,
her shall the fruit thereof be consumed: it shall bring forth new
o his months, because their waters they issued out of
thereof shall be for meat, and the leaf
hereof for medicine.
he Lord GOD; This shall be the border, whereby ye
to the twelve tribes of Israel:
all have two portions.
ll inherit it, one as well as another: concerning the
o give it unto your fathers: and this
d shall fall unto you for inheritance.
47:15 And this shall be the border of the land toward the north side,
t sea, the way of Hethlon, as men go to Zedad; 47:16
ch is between the border of Damascus and
the border of Hamath; Hazarhatticon, which is by the coast of Hauran.
he border from the sea shall be Hazarenan, the border of
rthward, and the border of Hamath. And this
t side ye shall measure from Hauran, and from
he land of Israel by Jordan, from
der unto the east sea. And this is the east side.
ard, from Tamar even to the waters of
ife in Kadesh, the river to the great sea. And this is the south

at sea from the border, till
ver against Hamath. This is the west side.
o you according to the tribes of

e shall divide it by lot for an
ce unto you, and to the strangers that sojourn among you,
n among you: and they shall be unto you as
f Israel; they shall have
h you among the tribes of Israel.
 And it shall come to pass, that in what tribe the stranger
 ye give him his inheritance, saith the Lord
f the tribes. From the north end to the
oast of the way of Hethlon, as one goeth to Hamath, Hazarenan, the
us northward, to the coast of Hamath; for these are
ion for Dan.
Dan, from the east side unto the west side,
 border of Asher, from the east side even unto the west
i.
from the east side unto the west
portion for Manasseh.
order of Manasseh, from the east side unto the west

he east side even unto the
ortion for Reuben.
er of Reuben, from the east side unto the west
nd by the border of Judah, from the east side unto the west
ring which ye shall offer of five and twenty
th as one of the other parts,
st side unto the west side: and the sanctuary shall be in
The oblation that ye shall offer unto the LORD shall be of five
 in length, and of ten thousand in breadth.
sts, shall be this holy oblation;
the north five and twenty thousand in length, and toward the
readth, and toward the east ten thousand in
twenty thousand in length: and
ary of the LORD shall be in the midst thereof.
that are sanctified of the sons of
 which have kept my charge, which went not astray when the
astray, as the Levites went astray.
12 And this oblation of the land that is offered shall be unto them
ly by the border of the Levites.
And over against the border of the priests the Levites shall
housand in length, and ten thousand in breadth:
enty thousand, and the breadth ten
nd.
, neither exchange, nor alienate
tfruits of the land: for it is holy unto the LORD.
hat are left in the breadth over against
the five and twenty thousand, shall be a profane place for the city,
and for suburbs: and the city shall be in the midst
ll be the measures thereof; the north side four
south side four thousand and five
, and on the east side four thousand and five hundred, and the
and and five hundred.
urbs of the city shall be toward the north two
uth two hundred and fifty, and
 east two hundred and fifty, and toward the west two hundred
d the residue in length over against the oblation of the holy
thousand eastward, and ten thousand westward: and
tion of the holy portion; and the
e thereof shall be for food unto them that serve the city.
rve the city shall serve it out of all the
ion shall be five and twenty thousand by five and
he holy oblation foursquare, with the
session of the city.
due shall be for the prince, on the one side and on
 and of the possession of the city,
against the five and twenty thousand of the oblation toward the
stward over against the five and twenty thousand
st the portions for the prince: and
all be the holy oblation; and the sanctuary of the house shall be
eof.
 of the Levites, and from the
of the city, being in the midst of that which is the
f Judah and the border of Benjamin,
 be for the prince.
st of the tribes, from the east side unto the west
ion.
n, from the east side unto the west
 Simeon shall have a portion.
 by the border of Simeon, from the east side unto the west
.
from the east side unto the west
bulun a portion.
r of Zebulun, from the east side unto the west
 the border of Gad, at the south side southward, the
r unto the waters of strife in Kadesh,
d to the river toward the great sea.
:29 This is the land which ye shall divide by lot unto the tribes of
eritance, and these are their portions, saith the Lord
the goings out of the city on the north side, four
es.
ll be after the names of the tribes
rael: three gates northward; one gate of Reuben, one gate of
i.
sand and five hundred: and three
nd one gate of Joseph, one gate of Benjamin, one gate of Dan.
uth side four thousand and five hundred measures:
on, one gate of Issachar, one gate of
ulun.
and and five hundred, with their
tes; one gate of Gad, one gate of Asher, one gate of Naphtali.
 about eighteen thousand measures: and the name of
 The LORD is there.
aniel
ign of Jehoiakim king of Judah came
hadnezzar king of Babylon unto Jerusalem, and besieged it.
Jehoiakim king of Judah into his hand, with part
: which he carried into the land of
r to the house of his god; and he brought the vessels into the
s god.
enaz the master of his eunuchs, that
hould bring certain of the children of Israel, and of the king's
rinces; 1:4 Children in whom was no blemish, but
wisdom, and cunning in knowledge,
erstanding science, and such as had ability in them to stand in
and whom they might teach the learning and the
the king appointed them a daily provision of the king's meat,
 he drank: so nourishing them three years, that
 before the king.
ere of the children of Judah, Daniel, Hananiah,
 the prince of the eunuchs gave
r he gave unto Daniel the name of Belteshazzar; and to
o Mishael, of Meshach; and to Azariah, of
is heart that he would not defile himself
with the wine which he drank:
e requested of the prince of the eunuchs that he might not
ow God had brought Daniel into favour and tender love with the
s.
aid unto Daniel, I fear my lord
 who hath appointed your meat and your drink: for why should
e liking than the children which are of your
y head to the king.
el to Melzar, whom the prince of the eunuchs had
, and Azariah, 1:12 Prove thy
 beseech thee, ten days; and let them give us pulse to eat,
1:13 Then let our countenances be looked upon before thee, and the
he children that eat of the portion of the king's
h thy servants.
 them in this matter, and proved them ten days.
heir countenances appeared fairer and
ter in flesh than all the children which did eat the portion of the

 their meat, and the wine
d drink; and gave them pulse.
or these four children, God gave them knowledge and skill in
m: and Daniel had understanding in all visions
f the days that the king had said he should bring
unuchs brought them in before
zar.
em; and among them all was found
e Daniel, Hananiah, Mishael, and Azariah: therefore stood they
1:20 And in all matters of wisdom and understanding, that the king
, he found them ten times better than all the
n all his realm.
ued even unto the first year of king Cyrus.
gn of Nebuchadnezzar
ed dreams, wherewith his spirit was troubled, and
Then the king commanded to call the magicians, and the
rs, and the Chaldeans, for to shew the
ng his dreams. So they came and stood before the king.
 them, I have dreamed a dream, and my spirit
 Then spake the Chaldeans to the king in Syriack, O king, live for
ervants the dream, and we will shew the
nterpretation.
d said to the Chaldeans, The thing is gone
me the dream, with the
reof, ye shall be cut in pieces, and your houses
ut if ye shew the dream, and the interpretation thereof, ye shall
ts and rewards and great honour: therefore shew me
n thereof.
said, Let the king tell his servants the
dream, and we will shew the interpretation of it.
 I know of certainty that ye would gain
he time, because ye see the thing is gone from me.
own unto me the dream, there is but one
ecree for you: for ye have prepared lying and corrupt words to speak
l the time be changed: therefore tell me the dream, and
ew me the interpretation thereof.
The Chaldeans answered before the king, and said, There is not a
 that can shew the king's matter: therefore there is
 asked such things at any magician, or
trologer, or Chaldean.
 rare thing that the king requireth, and there is none
e the king, except the gods, whose
ng is not with flesh.
se the king was angry and very furious, and commanded
f Babylon.
th that the wise men should be slain; and
slain.
ounsel and wisdom to Arioch the
f the king's guard, which was gone forth to slay the wise men
nswered and said to Arioch the king's captain,
king? Then Arioch made the thing
 Daniel.
desired of the king that he would give
m time, and that he would shew the king the interpretation.
 to his house, and made the thing known to
anions: 2:18 That they would
es of the God of heaven concerning this secret; that
not perish with the rest of the wise men
of Babylon.
vealed unto Daniel in a night vision. Then
0 Daniel answered and said, Blessed be the name of God for ever and
m and might are his: 2:21 And he changeth the times and
ngs, and setteth up kings: he giveth wisdom
at know understanding: 2:22 He
the deep and secret things: he knoweth what is in the
eth with him.
aise thee, O thou God of my fathers, who hast
ade known unto me now what we
thee: for thou hast now made known unto us the king's
iel went in unto Arioch, whom the king had ordained
lon: he went and said thus unto him;
roy not the wise men of Babylon: bring me in before the king, and
the king the interpretation.
Arioch brought in Daniel before the king in haste, and said
ound a man of the captives of Judah, that will
etation.
d to Daniel, whose name was
 Art thou able to make known unto me the dream which I
ation thereof?  2:27 Daniel answered in
he presence of the king, and said, The secret which the king hath
he wise men, the astrologers, the magicians, the
:28 But there is a God in heaven
ealeth secrets, and maketh known to the king Nebuchadnezzar
tter days. Thy dream, and the visions of thy
for thee, O king, thy thoughts
thy mind upon thy bed, what should come to pass hereafter:
crets maketh known to thee what shall come to
ret is not revealed to me for any wisdom
that I have more than any living, but for their sakes that shall make
erpretation to the king, and that thou mightest know the
2:31 Thou, O king, sawest, and behold a great image. This great image,
ness was excellent, stood before thee; and the form
his image's head was of fine gold, his breast and his arms of
 his thighs of brass, 2:33 His legs of iron, his
.
s cut out without hands, which
image upon his feet that were of iron and clay, and brake
hen was the iron, the clay, the brass, the silver, and the gold,
ogether, and became like the chaff of the summer
ied them away, that no place was
r them: and the stone that smote the image became a great
whole earth.
d we will tell the interpretation thereof
t a king of kings: for the God of heaven hath
ngth, and glory.
he children of men dwell, the beasts of the
he given into thine hand, and
hee ruler over them all. Thou art this head of gold.
ise another kingdom inferior to thee, and
ll bear rule over all the
And the fourth kingdom shall be strong as iron: forasmuch as iron
s and subdueth all things: and as iron that breaketh
ieces and bruise.
 sawest the feet and toes, part of potters' clay,
ll be divided; but there shall be in
f the strength of the iron, forasmuch as thou sawest the iron

part of iron, and part of clay,
ngdom shall be partly strong, and partly broken.
n mixed with miry clay, they shall
 themselves with the seed of men: but they shall not cleave one
 iron is not mixed with clay.
in the days of these kings shall the God of heaven set up a
ver be destroyed: and the kingdom shall not be
reak in pieces and consume all
doms, and it shall stand for ever.
 Forasmuch as thou sawest that the stone was cut out of the
 and that it brake in pieces the iron, the
d; the great God hath made
ing what shall come to pass hereafter: and the dream is
tion thereof sure.
ebuchadnezzar fell upon his face, and worshipped
ould offer an oblation and sweet
nto him.
niel, and said, Of a truth it is, that
ur God is a God of gods, and a Lord of kings, and a revealer of
u couldest reveal this secret.
n the king made Daniel a great man, and gave him many great
er over the whole province of Babylon, and
 men of Babylon.
sted of the king, and he set Shadrach, Meshach,
he province of Babylon: but Daniel
 the gate of the king.
ar the king made an image of gold, whose height was
dth thereof six cubits: he set it up in
he plain of Dura, in the province of Babylon.
nt to gather together the princes,
vernors, and the captains, the judges, the treasurers, the
s, and all the rulers of the provinces, to
h Nebuchadnezzar the king had
3:3 Then the princes, the governors, and captains, the judges, the
counsellors, the sheriffs, and all the rulers of the
her unto the dedication of the image
 Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up; and they stood before the
ezzar had set up.
ied aloud, To you it is commanded, O people,
at time ye hear the sound of the
flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, dulcimer, and all kinds of
 worship the golden image that Nebuchadnezzar
alleth not down and worshippeth
 same hour be cast into the midst of a burning fiery furnace.
at time, when all the people heard the sound of the
saltery, and all kinds of musick, all
 people, the nations, and the languages, fell down and worshipped
that Nebuchadnezzar the king had set up.

eans came near, and accused
3:9 They spake and said to the king Nebuchadnezzar, O king, live for
Thou, O king, hast made a decree, that every man that shall hear
ornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and dulcimer,
 fall down and worship the golden image:
3:11 And whoso falleth not down and worshippeth, that he should be
dst of a burning fiery furnace.
ere are certain Jews whom thou hast set over the affairs of the
, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego; these men, O
serve not thy gods, nor worship the
n image which thou hast set up.
en Nebuchadnezzar in his rage and fury commanded to bring
ednego. Then they brought these men before
nd said unto them, Is it true, O Shadrach,
y gods, nor worship the golden
h I have set up?  3:15 Now if ye be ready that at what time
e cornet, flute, harp, sackbut, psaltery, and
 fall down and worship the image
have made; well: but if ye worship not, ye shall be cast the
st of a burning fiery furnace; and who is that
 hands?  3:16 Shadrach, Meshach,
nego, answered and said to the king, O Nebuchadnezzar, we are
 thee in this matter.
 our God whom we serve is able to deliver us from the
 will deliver us out of thine hand, O
g.
ee, O king, that we will not serve
ds, nor worship the golden image which thou hast set up.
zzar full of fury, and the form of his visage
, and Abednego: therefore he
ommanded that they should heat the furnace one seven times
 be heated.
ost mighty men that were in his army to
ind Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, and to cast them into the
e.
eir coats, their hosen, and their
nd their other garments, and were cast into the midst of the

andment was urgent, and the
ding hot, the flames of the fire slew those men that took
 Abednego.
adrach, Meshach, and Abednego, fell down
bound into the midst of the burning fiery furnace.
ing was astonied, and rose up in haste,
nd spake, and said unto his counsellors, Did not we cast three men
idst of the fire? They answered and said unto the
swered and said, Lo, I see four men loose, walking in the
ey have no hurt; and the form of the fourth
buchadnezzar came near to the mouth of the burning fiery
id, Shadrach, Meshach, and Abednego, ye
ervants of the most high God, come forth, and come hither. Then
and Abednego, came forth of the midst of the fire.
s, and captains, and the king's
rs, being gathered together, saw these men, upon whose bodies
, nor was an hair of their head singed, neither
mell of fire had passed on them.
hen Nebuchadnezzar spake, and said, Blessed be the God of
ednego, who hath sent his angel, and
vered his servants that trusted in him, and have changed the
ed their bodies, that they might not serve nor
d.
 every people, nation, and
h speak any thing amiss against the God of Shadrach,
e cut in pieces, and their houses shall
e made a dunghill: because there is no other God that can deliver

eshach, and Abednego, in the
Babylon.
nto all people, nations, and languages,
hat dwell in all the earth; Peace be multiplied unto you.
o shew the signs and wonders that the high God
reat are his signs! and how mighty are his wonders! his
ingdom, and his dominion is from generation
was at rest in mine house, and flourishing in my
de me afraid, and the thoughts upon
d and the visions of my head troubled me.
in all the wise men of Babylon
 that they might make known unto me the interpretation of
me in the magicians, the astrologers, the Chaldeans, and
d the dream before them; but they did not
reof.
n before me, whose name was
 according to the name of my God, and in whom is the
efore him I told the dream, saying, 4:9
 Belteshazzar, master of the magicians, because I know that the
gods is in thee, and no secret troubleth thee, tell
 I have seen, and the interpretation
eof.
 head in my bed; I saw, and behold a
 in the midst of the earth, and the height thereof was great.
 and was strong, and the height thereof reached
to the end of all the earth: 4:12
ves thereof were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in it
beasts of the field had shadow under it, and the
oughs thereof, and all flesh was fed
t.
 upon my bed, and, behold, a
an holy one came down from heaven; 4:14 He cried aloud,
 tree, and cut off his branches, shake off
he beasts get away from under
 fowls from his branches: 4:15 Nevertheless leave the stump
th, even with a band of iron and brass, in the
t be wet with the dew of heaven,
his portion be with the beasts in the grass of the earth: 4:16
nged from man's, and let a beast's heart be given
s over him.
decree of the watchers, and the demand by
that the living may know that
gh ruleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to
p over it the basest of men.
dream I king Nebuchadnezzar have seen. Now thou, O
retation thereof, forasmuch as all the
se men of my kingdom are not able to make known unto me the
u art able; for the spirit of the holy gods is
name was Belteshazzar, was astonied for one
e king spake, and said,
 not the dream, or the interpretation thereof,
and said, My lord, the dream be to
hat hate thee, and the interpretation thereof to thine enemies.
t thou sawest, which grew, and was strong, whose
d the sight thereof to all the
1 Whose leaves were fair, and the fruit thereof much, and in
nder which the beasts of the field dwelt, and
heaven had their habitation: 4:22
hou, O king, that art grown and become strong: for thy
heth unto heaven, and thy dominion to the
 king saw a watcher and an holy one coming down
ee down, and destroy it; yet leave
ump of the roots thereof in the earth, even with a band of iron
ender grass of the field; and let it be wet with
tion be with the beasts of the
l seven times pass over him; 4:24 This is the
he decree of the most High, which
 upon my lord the king: 4:25 That they shall drive thee from
shall be with the beasts of the field, and they
n, and they shall wet thee with the
f heaven, and seven times shall pass over thee, till thou know
uleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to
as they commanded to leave the stump of the tree roots;
nto thee, after that thou shalt have known
ore, O king, let my counsel be acceptable unto thee, and
teousness, and thine iniquities by shewing
ening of thy tranquillity.
s came upon the king Nebuchadnezzar.
29 At the end of twelve months he walked in the palace of the

is great Babylon, that I have
he house of the kingdom by the might of my power, and for
  4:31 While the word was in the king's
outh, there fell a voice from heaven, saying, O king Nebuchadnezzar,
spoken; The kingdom is departed from thee.
n, and thy dwelling shall be
sts of the field: they shall make thee to eat grass as
pass over thee, until thou know that the
most High ruleth in the kingdom of men, and giveth it to whomsoever he
3 The same hour was the thing fulfilled upon Nebuchadnezzar: and he
 men, and did eat grass as oxen, and his body was wet
his hairs were grown like eagles'
s, and his nails like birds' claws.
4 And at the end of the days I Nebuchadnezzar lifted up mine eyes
mine understanding returned unto me, and I blessed
 honoured him that liveth for ever,
 dominion is an everlasting dominion, and his kingdom is from
ion: 4:35 And all the inhabitants of the earth
 according to his will in the army
ven, and among the inhabitants of the earth: and none can stay
o him, What doest thou?  4:36 At the same time my
the glory of my kingdom, mine honour
brightness returned unto me; and my counsellors and my lords
was established in my kingdom, and excellent
 I Nebuchadnezzar praise and extol and honour the King of
re truth, and his ways judgment: and those

ast to a thousand of his lords,
 wine before the thousand.
ar, whiles he tasted the wine, commanded to bring the
ch his father Nebuchadnezzar had taken
t of the temple which was in Jerusalem; that the king, and his
and his concubines, might drink therein.

 that were taken out of the
 house of God which was at Jerusalem; and the king, and
 his concubines, drank in them.
y drank wine, and praised the gods of gold, and of silver, of
od, and of stone.
came forth fingers of a man's hand, and wrote
 plaister of the wall of the
e: and the king saw the part of the hand that wrote.
nce was changed, and his thoughts troubled
e loosed, and his knees smote
 another.
ring in the astrologers, the Chaldeans,
nd the soothsayers. And the king spake, and said to the wise men of
ver shall read this writing, and shew me the
ed with scarlet, and have a
 about his neck, and shall be the third ruler in the
ll the king's wise men: but they could not read the
king the interpretation thereof.
en was king Belshazzar greatly troubled, and his countenance was
d his lords were astonied.
 queen by reason of the words of the king and his lords
: and the queen spake and said, O king,
ive for ever: let not thy thoughts trouble thee, nor let thy
: 5:11 There is a man in thy kingdom, in whom is
n the days of thy father light and
tanding and wisdom, like the wisdom of the gods, was found in
buchadnezzar thy father, the king, I say, thy
 astrologers, Chaldeans, and
 5:12 Forasmuch as an excellent spirit, and knowledge, and
ing of dreams, and shewing of hard sentences,
in the same Daniel, whom the king
elteshazzar: now let Daniel be called, and he will shew the
 Then was Daniel brought in before the king. And the king spake
l, Art thou that Daniel, which art of the children
the king my father brought out of
 5:14 I have even heard of thee, that the spirit of the gods is
ight and understanding and excellent wisdom is
ise men, the astrologers, have been brought in
s writing, and make known unto me
erpretation thereof: but they could not shew the interpretation
And I have heard of thee, that thou canst make
: now if thou canst read the
 make known to me the interpretation thereof, thou shalt
nd have a chain of gold about thy neck, and
.
fore the king, Let thy gifts be
f, and give thy rewards to another; yet I will read the
make known to him the interpretation.
:18 O thou king, the most high God gave Nebuchadnezzar thy father a
jesty, and glory, and honour: 5:19 And for the majesty
, nations, and languages, trembled and
ared before him: whom he would he slew; and whom he would he kept
e would he set up; and whom he would he put down.
ted up, and his mind hardened in pride,
e was deposed from his kingly throne, and they took his glory from
 was driven from the sons of men; and his heart was
welling was with the wild asses: they
 him with grass like oxen, and his body was wet with the dew of
w that the most high God ruled in the kingdom of
t whomsoever he will.
 son, O Belshazzar, hast not humbled thine heart,
3 But hast lifted up thyself against
Lord of heaven; and they have brought the vessels of his house
u, and thy lords, thy wives, and thy concubines,
hast praised the gods of silver, and
, of brass, iron, wood, and stone, which see not, nor hear, nor
n whose hand thy breath is, and whose are all thy
24 Then was the part of the hand sent
m him; and this writing was written.
25 And this is the writing that was written, MENE, MENE, TEKEL,
his is the interpretation of the thing: MENE; God hath numbered
nished it.
 in the balances, and art found wanting.

given to the Medes and
Then commanded Belshazzar, and they clothed Daniel with scarlet,
 gold about his neck, and made a proclamation
 third ruler in the kingdom.
at night was Belshazzar the king of the Chaldeans slain.
an took the kingdom, being about threescore
rius to set over the kingdom an hundred and twenty
e whole kingdom; 6:2 And over these
 presidents; of whom Daniel was first: that the princes might
em, and the king should have no damage.

the presidents and princes,
cellent spirit was in him; and the king thought to set

t to find occasion against
ing the kingdom; but they could find none occasion nor
aithful, neither was there any error or
ault found in him.
men, We shall not find any occasion against this
him concerning the law of his God.
Then these presidents and princes assembled together to the king,
o him, King Darius, live for ever.
All the presidents of the kingdom, the governors, and the princes,
 and the captains, have consulted together to
e a firm decree, that whosoever
 a petition of any God or man for thirty days, save of thee,
st into the den of lions.
ng, establish the decree, and sign the writing, that it
o the law of the Medes and Persians, which
us signed the writing and the decree.
:10 Now when Daniel knew that the writing was signed, he went into
is windows being open in his chamber toward Jerusalem,
ree times a day, and prayed, and gave
nks before his God, as he did aforetime.

 Daniel praying and making
efore his God.
, and spake before the king concerning the
cree, that every man that
ition of any God or man within thirty days, save of
o the den of lions? The king answered
 said, The thing is true, according to the law of the Medes and
ereth not.
said before the king, That Daniel, which
is of the children of the captivity of Judah, regardeth not thee, O
ecree that thou hast signed, but maketh his petition
n the king, when he heard these words, was sore displeased
s heart on Daniel to deliver him: and he
laboured till the going down of the sun to deliver him.
bled unto the king, and said unto the king,
 and Persians is, That no
ute which the king establisheth may be changed.
 they brought Daniel, and cast him
he den of lions. Now the king spake and said unto Daniel, Thy
 continually, he will deliver thee.
7 And a stone was brought, and laid upon the mouth of the den; and
it with his own signet, and with the signet of his
t be changed concerning Daniel.
en the king went to his palace, and passed the night fasting:
nts of musick brought before him: and his sleep
g arose very early in the morning, and went in haste
 And when he came to the den, he cried with a lamentable voice
 king spake and said to Daniel, O Daniel, servant
om thou servest continually, able to
ver thee from the lions?  6:21 Then said Daniel unto the king, O
r.
 hath shut the lions' mouths, that
ave not hurt me: forasmuch as before him innocency was found in
 thee, O king, have I done no hurt.
3 Then was the king exceedingly glad for him, and commanded that
aniel up out of the den. So Daniel was taken up out
rt was found upon him, because he
d in his God.
ed, and they brought those men which had
accused Daniel, and they cast them into the den of lions, them, their
 their wives; and the lions had the mastery of them, and
ieces or ever they came at the bottom of the
to all people, nations, and languages,
at dwell in all the earth; Peace be multiplied unto you.
at in every dominion of my kingdom men tremble
or he is the living God, and
 ever, and his kingdom that which shall not be destroyed,
 even unto the end.
and rescueth, and he worketh signs and wonders in
ivered Daniel from the power of the
.
reign of Darius, and in the reign
s the Persian.
 Belshazzar king of Babylon Daniel had a dream
: then he wrote the dream, and
um of the matters.
 said, I saw in my vision by night, and, behold,
e upon the great sea.
t beasts came up from the sea, diverse one from
a lion, and had eagle's wings: I beheld till
 was lifted up from the earth,
tand upon the feet as a man, and a man's heart was given to
nother beast, a second, like to a bear, and it raised
 had three ribs in the mouth of it
n the teeth of it: and they said thus unto it, Arise, devour
er this I beheld, and lo another, like a leopard, which had
r wings of a fowl; the beast had also four
7:7 After this I saw in the night visions, and behold a fourth beast,
terrible, and strong exceedingly; and it had great iron
e in pieces, and stamped the residue with
ll the beasts that were
 had ten horns.
rns, and, behold, there came up among them
ere three of the first horns
y the roots: and, behold, in this horn were eyes like the
speaking great things.
l the thrones were cast down, and the Ancient of days
ite as snow, and the hair of his head
e the pure wool: his throne was like the fiery flame, and his
e.
forth from before him: thousand
 ministered unto him, and ten thousand times ten thousand
gment was set, and the books were opened.
 of the great words which the
 I beheld even till the beast was slain, and his body
urning flame.
st of the beasts, they had their dominion
d for a season and time.
the night visions, and, behold, one like the Son of man
ven, and came to the Ancient of days, and
 And there was given him dominion, and glory, and a kingdom, that
ns, and languages, should serve him: his dominion is
 shall not pass away, and his kingdom
t which shall not be destroyed.
Daniel was grieved in my spirit in the midst of my body, and
 troubled me.
 of them that stood by, and asked him the
e me know the interpretation
s.
our, are four kings, which shall
t of the earth.
the most High shall take the kingdom, and
er and ever.
 truth of the fourth beast, which was
erse from all the others, exceeding dreadful, whose teeth were of
ls of brass; which devoured, brake in pieces, and
; 7:20 And of the ten horns that were
his head, and of the other which came up, and before whom three
horn that had eyes, and a mouth that spake very
tout than his fellows.
nd the same horn made war with the saints, and
he Ancient of days came, and
 given to the saints of the most High; and the time came
the kingdom.
rth beast shall be the fourth kingdom upon
ingdoms, and shall devour the
, and shall tread it down, and break it in pieces.
this kingdom are ten kings that shall
se: and another shall rise after them; and he shall be diverse from
he shall subdue three kings.
e shall speak great words against the most High, and shall
he most High, and think to change times and
hand until a time and times and
ing of time.
l sit, and they shall take away his
ion, to consume and to destroy it unto the end.
, and the greatness of the kingdom
the whole heaven, shall be given to the people of the saints of
e kingdom is an everlasting kingdom, and all

s for me Daniel, my
bled me, and my countenance changed in me: but I
1 In the third year of the reign of king Belshazzar a vision
 unto me Daniel, after that which appeared unto
n a vision; and it came to pass, when I saw, that I was
hich is in the province of Elam; and I saw
lai.
d saw, and, behold, there stood
e river a ram which had two horns: and the two horns were
than the other, and the higher came up last.
and northward, and southward; so
beasts might stand before him, neither was there any that
hand; but he did according to his will, and
dering, behold, an he goat came from the west on
ouched not the ground: and the goat
 notable horn between his eyes.
 he came to the ram that had two horns, which I had seen
 and ran unto him in the fury of his power.
 ram, and he was moved with
t him, and smote the ram, and brake his two horns: and
m to stand before him, but he cast him
wn to the ground, and stamped upon him: and there was none that
am out of his hand.
e goat waxed very great: and when he was strong,
 it came up four notable ones toward
four winds of heaven.
e of them came forth a little horn, which waxed
and toward the east, and toward the
ant land.
 to the host of heaven; and it cast down
some of the host and of the stars to the ground, and stamped upon
, he magnified himself even to the prince of the host, and by
ce was taken away, and the place of the sanctuary
t was given him against the daily sacrifice by reason
 down the truth to the ground; and it
ctised, and prospered.
d one saint speaking, and another saint said unto that
ow long shall be the vision concerning the
f desolation, to give both the
and the host to be trodden under foot?  8:14 And he said
 and three hundred days; then shall the
anctuary be cleansed.
to pass, when I, even I Daniel, had seen the vision,
en, behold, there stood before me as the
appearance of a man.
 man's voice between the banks of Ulai, which
man to understand the vision.
e came near where I stood: and when he came, I was afraid,
ut he said unto me, Understand, O son of man:
he vision.
with me, I was in a deep sleep on my face
 set me upright.
ld, I will make thee know what shall be in the
the time appointed the end shall
:20 The ram which thou sawest having two horns are the kings of Media

recia: and the great horn that
 his eyes is the first king.
hat being broken, whereas four stood up for it, four
 the nation, but not in his power.
 And in the latter time of their kingdom, when the transgressors
ll, a king of fierce countenance, and understanding

t not by his own power: and he
roy wonderfully, and shall prosper, and practise, and shall
the holy people.
olicy also he shall cause craft to prosper in
f in his heart, and by peace
y many: he shall also stand up against the Prince of
n without hand.
the evening and the morning which was told is
on; for it shall be for many
7 And I Daniel fainted, and was sick certain days; afterward I rose
 king's business; and I was astonished at the vision,
1 In the first year of Darius the son of Ahasuerus, of the seed of
 was made king over the realm of the Chaldeans; 9:2 In
I Daniel understood by books the number of
came to Jeremiah the prophet,
ld accomplish seventy years in the desolations of
ce unto the Lord God, to seek by prayer and
oth, and ashes: 9:4 And I
 LORD my God, and made my confession, and said, O Lord,
 keeping the covenant and mercy to them
hat love him, and to them that keep his commandments; 9:5 We have
committed iniquity, and have done wickedly, and have
om thy precepts and from thy judgments:
:6 Neither have we hearkened unto thy servants the prophets, which
e to our kings, our princes, and our fathers, and to

thee, but unto us confusion
at this day; to the men of Judah, and to the inhabitants
 Israel, that are near, and that are far
off, through all the countries whither thou hast driven them, because
pass that they have trespassed against thee.
n of face, to our kings, to our
and to our fathers, because we have sinned against thee.
belong mercies and forgivenesses, though we
 have we obeyed the voice of
 God, to walk in his laws, which he set before us by his
9:11 Yea, all Israel have transgressed thy law, even by departing,
not obey thy voice; therefore the curse is poured upon
tten in the law of Moses the servant of
od, because we have sinned against him.

ch he spake against us, and
udges that judged us, by bringing upon us a great evil:
hath not been done as hath been done upon
e law of Moses, all this evil is come upon
e LORD our God, that we might
ur iniquities, and understand thy truth.

n the evil, and brought it
he LORD our God is righteous in all his works which he
 voice.
hat hast brought thy people forth out
the land of Egypt with a mighty hand, and hast gotten thee renown,
we have sinned, we have done wickedly.
9:16 O LORD, according to all thy righteousness, I beseech thee, let
d thy fury be turned away from thy city Jerusalem, thy
ur sins, and for the iniquities of our
thers, Jerusalem and thy people are become a reproach to all that
9:17 Now therefore, O our God, hear the prayer of thy servant, and his
s, and cause thy face to shine upon thy sanctuary that is
sake.
 and hear; open thine eyes, and
r desolations, and the city which is called by thy name: for
supplications before thee for our
usnesses, but for thy great mercies.
19 O Lord, hear; O Lord, forgive; O Lord, hearken and do; defer not,
sake, O my God: for thy city and thy people are called
les I was speaking, and praying, and confessing my sin and
ael, and presenting my supplication before the
 my God; 9:21 Yea, whiles I was
in prayer, even the man Gabriel, whom I had seen in the
ing caused to fly swiftly, touched me about
22 And he informed me, and talked with me, and said, O Daniel, I am
to give thee skill and understanding.
:23 At the beginning of thy supplications the commandment came forth,
 to shew thee; for thou art greatly beloved: therefore
onsider the vision.
are determined upon thy people and upon thy holy
 and to make an end of sins, and to
reconciliation for iniquity, and to bring in everlasting
 up the vision and prophecy, and to anoint
d understand, that from the going forth of the
Jerusalem unto the Messiah the
ll be seven weeks, and threescore and two weeks: the street
nd the wall, even in troublous times.
:26 And after threescore and two weeks shall Messiah be cut off, but
f: and the people of the prince that shall come shall
tuary; and the end thereof shall be with
a flood, and unto the end of the war desolations are determined.
l confirm the covenant with many for one week: and in
l cause the sacrifice and the oblation to
nations he shall make it
ntil the consummation, and that determined shall be
:1 In the third year of Cyrus king of Persia a thing was revealed
e name was called Belteshazzar; and the thing was
long: and he understood the thing,
d understanding of the vision.
those days I Daniel was mourning three full weeks.
neither came flesh nor wine in my mouth,
neither did I anoint myself at all, till three whole weeks were
And in the four and twentieth day of the first month, as I was by
reat river, which is Hiddekel; 10:5 Then I lifted up
old a certain man clothed in linen,
 loins were girded with fine gold of Uphaz: 10:6 His body also
and his face as the appearance of lightning, and
 arms and his feet like in colour to
shed brass, and the voice of his words like the voice of a
 Daniel alone saw the vision: for the men that were with me
 a great quaking fell upon them, so that they
efore I was left alone, and saw this great vision, and there
n me: for my comeliness was turned in me into
h.
rds: and when I heard the voice of
rds, then was I in a deep sleep on my face, and my face toward
 And, behold, an hand touched me, which set me upon my knees and
my hands.
Daniel, a man greatly beloved, understand
nd upright: for unto thee am

e, I stood trembling.
e unto me, Fear not, Daniel: for from the first day
 to understand, and to chasten thyself
fore thy God, thy words were heard, and I am come for thy words.
ince of the kingdom of Persia withstood me one and
ne of the chief princes, came to help
 and I remained there with the kings of Persia.
understand what shall befall thy
n the latter days: for yet the vision is for many days.
ken such words unto me, I set my face toward
6 And, behold, one like the similitude of the sons of men touched
pened my mouth, and spake, and said unto him that
e vision my sorrows are turned upon
nd I have retained no strength.
or how can the servant of this my lord talk with this my lord?
ghtway there remained no strength in me, neither
18 Then there came again and touched me one like the appearance of
rengthened me, 10:19 And said, O man greatly beloved,
 be strong, yea, be strong. And when he
ad spoken unto me, I was strengthened, and said, Let my lord speak;
trengthened me.
west thou wherefore I come unto thee? and now
e of Persia: and when I am gone
, the prince of Grecia shall come.
1 But I will shew thee that which is noted in the scripture of
none that holdeth with me in these things, but
in the first year of Darius the Mede, even I, stood to
m.
uth. Behold, there shall stand up
ee kings in Persia; and the fourth shall be far richer than
rength through his riches he shall stir up all
 And a mighty king shall stand up, that shall rule with great
rding to his will.
ll stand up, his kingdom shall be broken, and
s of heaven; and not to his
r according to his dominion which he ruled: for his
en for others beside those.
e king of the south shall be strong, and one of his
 above him, and have dominion; his
on shall be a great dominion.
in the end of years they shall join themselves together; for
 the south shall come to the king of the north
not retain the power of the arm;
shall he stand, nor his arm: but she shall be given up, and
and he that begat her, and he that strengthened
 of a branch of her roots shall one stand up in his
n army, and shall enter into the
 of the king of the north, and shall deal against them, and
 shall also carry captives into Egypt their
r precious vessels of silver
 and he shall continue more years than the king of the
f the south shall come into his kingdom, and shall
10 But his sons shall be stirred up, and shall assemble a multitude
: and one shall certainly come, and overflow, and pass
n, and be stirred up, even to his
s.
l be moved with choler, and shall
rth and fight with him, even with the king of the north: and he
reat multitude; but the multitude shall be given
e hath taken away the multitude, his heart shall be
wn many ten thousands: but he shall not
e strengthened by it.
g of the north shall return, and shall set forth a
r, and shall certainly come after
 years with a great army and with much riches.
ll many stand up against the king of
south: also the robbers of thy people shall exalt themselves to
n; but they shall fall.
ng of the north shall come, and cast up a mount, and
nd the arms of the south shall not
and, neither his chosen people, neither shall there be any

ll do according to his own
 shall stand before him: and he shall stand in the
 shall be consumed.
 set his face to enter with the strength of his
h him; thus shall he do: and he
e him the daughter of women, corrupting her: but she shall
either be for him.
ll he turn his face unto the isles, and shall take
ehalf shall cause the reproach offered
 him to cease; without his own reproach he shall cause it to turn
9 Then he shall turn his face toward the fort of his own land: but
 and fall, and not be found.
 shall stand up in his estate a raiser of taxes in the glory
thin few days he shall be destroyed, neither in
in his estate shall stand up a vile person, to whom they
of the kingdom: but he shall come in
eably, and obtain the kingdom by flatteries.
hall they be overflown from before
nd shall be broken; yea, also the prince of the covenant.
gue made with him he shall work deceitfully:
 strong with a small people.
hall enter peaceably even upon the fattest places of the
that which his fathers have not done, nor
ong them the prey, and spoil,
 yea, and he shall forecast his devices against the strong

d his courage against the king
th with a great army; and the king of the south shall be
a very great and mighty army; but he shall
es against him.
ed of the portion of his meat shall destroy
any shall fall down slain.
th of these kings' hearts shall be to do mischief, and
 table; but it shall not prosper: for yet

 with great riches; and his
e against the holy covenant; and he shall do exploits,

turn, and come toward the
hall not be as the former, or as the latter.
 come against him: therefore he
grieved, and return, and have indignation against the holy
; he shall even return, and have intelligence
ant.
part, and they shall pollute the
y of strength, and shall take away the daily sacrifice, and
omination that maketh desolate.
nd such as do wickedly against the covenant shall he corrupt by
 people that do know their God shall be strong, and
that understand among the people shall instruct many:
ord, and by flame, by captivity, and by
poil, many days.
all fall, they shall be holpen with a little
th flatteries.
f understanding shall fall, to try them, and
 to the time of the end: because
t for a time appointed.
ing shall do according to his will; and he shall exalt
 above every god, and shall speak
ous things against the God of gods, and shall prosper till the
plished: for that that is determined shall be
d the God of his fathers, nor the desire
of women, nor regard any god: for he shall magnify himself above all.
n his estate shall he honour the God of forces: and a god
 shall he honour with gold, and silver, and
gs.
strong holds with a strange god,
shall acknowledge and increase with glory: and he shall cause
y, and shall divide the land for gain.
11:40 And at the time of the end shall the king of the south push at
ing of the north shall come against him like a
orsemen, and with many ships; and
l enter into the countries, and shall overflow and pass over.
r also into the glorious land, and many countries
all escape out of his hand, even
d Moab, and the chief of the children of Ammon.
hand also upon the countries: and the
d of Egypt shall not escape.
he shall have power over the treasures of gold and of
ious things of Egypt: and the Libyans and
11:44 But tidings out of the east and out of the north shall trouble
 he shall go forth with great fury to destroy, and
:45 And he shall plant the tabernacles of his palace between the
us holy mountain; yet he shall come to his end, and
d at that time shall Michael stand up, the great prince which
dren of thy people: and there shall be a time of
here was a nation even to that same
 and at that time thy people shall be delivered, every one that
ten in the book.
that sleep in the dust of the earth shall awake,
 to shame and everlasting contempt.
3 And they that be wise shall shine as the brightness of the
at turn many to righteousness as the stars for
aniel, shut up the words, and seal the book, even to
l run to and fro, and knowledge shall be
increased.
nd, behold, there stood other two, the one
nd the other on that side of
the river.
 clothed in linen, which was upon the
ers of the river, How long shall it be to the end of these wonders?
d the man clothed in linen, which was upon the waters
 his right hand and his left hand unto
aven, and sware by him that liveth for ever that it shall be for a
 an half; and when he shall have accomplished to
le, all these things shall be

then said I, O my Lord, what
 end of these things?  12:9 And he said, Go thy way,
ed up and sealed till the time of the
.
e white, and tried; but the
do wickedly: and none of the wicked shall understand; but
.
y sacrifice shall be taken away,
abomination that maketh desolate set up, there shall be a
ninety days.
aiteth, and cometh to the thousand three
hundred and five and thirty days.
 But go thou thy way till the end be: for thou shalt rest,
the end of the days.
:1 The word of the LORD that came unto Hosea, the son of Beeri, in
ah, Jotham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, and in
 of Joash, king of Israel.
nning of the word of the LORD by Hosea. And the LORD said
hee a wife of whoredoms and children of
horedoms: for the land hath committed great whoredom, departing from
:3 So he went and took Gomer the daughter of Diblaim; which
 a son.
 Call his name Jezreel; for yet a
while, and I will avenge the blood of Jezreel upon the house of
e to cease the kingdom of the house of Israel.
hat day, that I will break the bow
ael, in the valley of Jezreel.
she conceived again, and bare a daughter. And God said unto
hamah: for I will no more have mercy upon the
ake them away.
y upon the house of Judah, and will save them
ave them by bow, nor by sword,
tle, by horses, nor by horsemen.
w when she had weaned Loruhamah, she conceived, and bare a son.
, Call his name Loammi: for ye are not my people, and
10 Yet the number of the children of Israel shall be as the sand of
cannot be measured nor numbered; and it shall come to
 it was said unto them, Ye are not my
ple, there it shall be said unto them, Ye are the sons of the
hen shall the children of Judah and the children of Israel be
d appoint themselves one head, and they shall
all be the day of Jezreel.
nto your brethren, Ammi; and to your sisters, Ruhamah.
, plead: for she is not my wife, neither am
ay her whoredoms out of her
r adulteries from between her breasts; 2:3 Lest I strip
n the day that she was born, and make her
and, and slay her with
 I will not have mercy upon her children; for they be the

ot: she that conceived them
mefully: for she said, I will go after my lovers, that
r, my wool and my flax, mine oil and my
rink.
ge up thy way with thorns, and make a
l, that she shall not find her paths.
:7 And she shall follow after her lovers, but she shall not overtake
shall seek them, but shall not find them: then shall she
to my first husband; for then was it better
t know that I gave her corn, and wine, and oil, and
 which they prepared for Baal.
efore will I return, and take away my corn in the time
season thereof, and will recover my wool
and my flax given to cover her nakedness.
ss in the sight of her lovers,
hall deliver her out of mine hand.
 I will also cause all her mirth to cease, her feast days, her new
abbaths, and all her solemn feasts.
2 And I will destroy her vines and her fig trees, whereof she hath
my rewards that my lovers have given me: and I will
sts of the field shall eat them.
nd I will visit upon her the days of Baalim, wherein she burned
d she decked herself with her earrings and her
s, and forgat me, saith the LORD.
Therefore, behold, I will allure her, and bring her into the
comfortably unto her.
ive her her vineyards from thence, and the valley of
she shall sing there, as in the days of
er youth, and as in the day when she came up out of the land of
it shall be at that day, saith the LORD, that thou shalt call
ll me no more Baali.
ke away the names of Baalim out of her mouth, and
by their name.
l I make a covenant for them with the beasts
ven, and with the creeping
ground: and I will break the bow and the sword and the
 will make them to lie down safely.
9 And I will betroth thee unto me for ever; yea, I will betroth
hteousness, and in judgment, and in lovingkindness,
even betroth thee unto me in faithfulness: and thou shalt
d it shall come to pass in that day, I will hear, saith the
eavens, and they shall hear the earth; 2:22 And
the wine, and the oil; and they
r Jezreel.
 me in the earth; and I will have mercy
pon her that had not obtained mercy; and I will say to them which
e, Thou art my people; and they shall say, Thou art
RD unto me, Go yet, love a woman beloved of her
g to the love of the LORD toward
dren of Israel, who look to other gods, and love flagons of
t her to me for fifteen pieces of silver, and for an
omer of barley: 3:3 And I said unto her,
Thou shalt abide for me many days; thou shalt not play the harlot, and
ot be for another man: so will I also be for thee.
 shall abide many days without a king,
d without a prince, and without a sacrifice, and without an image,
phod, and without teraphim: 3:5 Afterward shall the
seek the LORD their God, and David
king; and shall fear the LORD and his goodness in the latter
word of the LORD, ye children of Israel: for the LORD
nhabitants of the land, because there is
no truth, nor mercy, nor knowledge of God in the land.
, and killing, and stealing, and committing
cheth blood.
nd mourn, and every one that dwelleth
rein shall languish, with the beasts of the field, and with the
a, the fishes of the sea also shall be taken away.
 reprove another: for thy people are as
hey that strive with the priest.
erefore shalt thou fall in the day, and the prophet also shall
e night, and I will destroy thy mother.

nowledge: because thou hast
ledge, I will also reject thee, that thou shalt be no
t forgotten the law of thy God, I will
so forget thy children.
e increased, so they sinned against me: therefore will
ame.
le, and they set their heart on
quity.
ple, like priest: and I will punish
for their ways, and reward them their doings.
ve enough: they shall commit
d shall not increase: because they have left off to take
Whoredom and wine and new wine take away the heart.
 their stocks, and their staff declareth
unto them: for the spirit of whoredoms hath caused them to err, and
a whoring from under their God.
ey sacrifice upon the tops of the mountains, and burn incense
 oaks and poplars and elms, because the shadow
hters shall commit whoredom, and
uses shall commit adultery.
 not punish your daughters when they commit whoredom, nor
mmit adultery: for themselves are separated
rlots: therefore the people
 understand shall fall.
u, Israel, play the harlot, yet let not Judah offend;
neither go ye up to Bethaven, nor swear,
The LORD liveth.
h back as a backsliding heifer: now the LORD
ace.
et him alone.
 they have committed whoredom continually:

wings, and they shall be
of their sacrifices.
O priests; and hearken, ye house of Israel; and give
or judgment is toward you, because ye
e been a snare on Mizpah, and a net spread upon Tabor.
profound to make slaughter, though I have
 Ephraim, and Israel is not hid from me: for now, O Ephraim,
om, and Israel is defiled.
l not frame their doings to turn unto their God: for the
the midst of them, and they have not known
 doth testify to his face: therefore shall
y: Judah also shall fall with
6 They shall go with their flocks and with their herds to seek the
hall not find him; he hath withdrawn himself from
cherously against the LORD: for they have
nth devour them with their
:8 Blow ye the cornet in Gibeah, and the trumpet in Ramah: cry aloud
fter thee, O Benjamin.
l be desolate in the day of rebuke: among the tribes
at which shall surely be.
ces of Judah were like them that remove the bound:
th upon them like water.
s oppressed and broken in judgment, because he willingly
nt.
im as a moth, and to the house of
s rottenness.
 sickness, and Judah saw his wound, then went
king Jareb: yet could he not heal
r cure you of your wound.
ll be unto Ephraim as a lion, and as a young lion to the
 will tear and go away; I will take away,
 go and return to my place, till they acknowledge their
in their affliction they will seek me
ly.
e LORD: for he hath torn, and he
l us; he hath smitten, and he will bind us up.
us: in the third day he will raise
 and we shall live in his sight.
en shall we know, if we follow on to know the LORD: his going
the morning; and he shall come unto us as the
nto the earth.
l I do unto thee? O Judah, what shall I do
ning cloud, and as the early
 away.
by the prophets; I have slain them by
 words of my mouth: and thy judgments are as the light that goeth
 I desired mercy, and not sacrifice; and the knowledge of God
ings.
ressed the covenant: there have they
t treacherously against me.
is a city of them that work iniquity, and is polluted with
ops of robbers wait for a man, so the company of priests
nt: for they commit lewdness.
ve seen an horrible thing in the house of Israel: there is
 Israel is defiled.
 he hath set an harvest for thee, when I returned
1 When I would have healed Israel, then the iniquity of Ephraim was
 the wickedness of Samaria: for they commit falsehood;
 the troop of robbers spoileth without.

 that I remember all their
w their own doings have beset them about; they are
 the king glad with their wickedness, and the princes
are all adulterers, as an oven heated by the baker, who
he hath kneaded the dough, until it be
avened.
princes have made him sick with bottles
f wine; he stretched out his hand with scorners.
ir heart like an oven, whiles they lie
 wait: their baker sleepeth all the night; in the morning it burneth
ire.
nd have devoured their judges; all
kings are fallen: there is none among them that calleth unto me.
hath mixed himself among the people; Ephraim is a cake
 have devoured his strength, and he knoweth it not: yea,
ere upon him, yet he knoweth not.
And the pride of Israel testifieth to his face: and they do not
their God, nor seek him for all this.
:11 Ephraim also is like a silly dove without heart: they call to
 Assyria.
ll spread my net upon them; I will bring
them down as the fowls of the heaven; I will chastise them, as their
ath heard.
 have fled from me: destruction unto them!
e: though I have redeemed
have spoken lies against me.
hey have not cried unto me with their heart, when they
 assemble themselves for corn and wine,
nd they rebel against me.
 have bound and strengthened their arms, yet do they

gh: they are like a deceitful
princes shall fall by the sword for the rage of their
erision in the land of Egypt.
he trumpet to thy mouth. He shall come as an eagle against
ecause they have transgressed my covenant, and
rael shall cry unto me, My God, we know thee.
that is good: the enemy shall

 me: they have made princes, and
t not: of their silver and their gold have they made them
ut off.
ast thee off; mine anger is kindled
st them: how long will it be ere they attain to innocency?  8:6
 it also: the workman made it; therefore it is not
ll be broken in pieces.
ve sown the wind, and they shall reap the whirlwind: it
l yield no meal: if so be it yield, the
trangers shall swallow it up.
l is swallowed up: now shall they be among the Gentiles as a
leasure.
syria, a wild ass alone by himself:
im hath hired lovers.
they have hired among the nations, now will I gather
little for the burden of the king of
ces.
y altars to sin, altars shall be
 to sin.
 great things of my law, but they were
unted as a strange thing.
rifice flesh for the sacrifices of mine offerings, and
th them not; now will he remember their
niquity, and visit their sins: they shall return to Egypt.
orgotten his Maker, and buildeth temples; and
but I will send a fire upon his
nd it shall devour the palaces thereof.

her people: for thou hast
from thy God, thou hast loved a reward upon every
he winepress shall not feed them, and the new wine
hall not dwell in the LORD's land; but Ephraim shall return
l eat unclean things in Assyria.
ey shall not offer wine offerings to the LORD, neither shall
him: their sacrifices shall be unto them as the
reof shall be polluted: for their
or their soul shall not come into the house of the LORD.
he solemn day, and in the day of the feast of
 because of destruction: Egypt
er them up, Memphis shall bury them: the pleasant places for
shall possess them: thorns shall be in their
tion are come, the days of recompence are come;
s a fool, the spiritual man is mad,
he multitude of thine iniquity, and the great hatred.
 was with my God: but the prophet is a
are of a fowler in all his ways, and hatred in the house of his God.
e deeply corrupted themselves, as in the days of Gibeah:
 their iniquity, he will visit their sins.
 wilderness; I saw your fathers
rstripe in the fig tree at her first time: but they went to
 themselves unto that shame; and their
ominations were according as they loved.

ly away like a bird, from the
from the womb, and from the conception.

 yet will I bereave them,
l not be a man left: yea, woe also to them when I
as I saw Tyrus, is planted in a
place: but Ephraim shall bring forth his children to the
m, O LORD: what wilt thou give? give them a miscarrying
15 All their wickedness is in Gilgal: for there I hated them: for
 their doings I will drive them out of mine house, I
eir princes are revolters.
 is smitten, their root is dried up, they shall bear no
ng forth, yet will I slay even the beloved
 cast them away, because they did not hearken unto
 among the nations.
mpty vine, he bringeth forth fruit unto himself:
fruit he hath increased the altars;
ding to the goodness of his land they have made goodly images.
s divided; now shall they be found faulty: he shall
ll spoil their images.
y shall say, We have no king, because we feared not
ng do to us?  10:4 They have spoken
, swearing falsely in making a covenant: thus judgment springeth
he furrows of the field.
itants of Samaria shall fear because of the calves of
eof shall mourn over it, and the priests
thereof that rejoiced on it, for the glory thereof, because it is

yria for a present to king
 shall receive shame, and Israel shall be ashamed of his
r Samaria, her king is cut off as the foam upon the water.
lso of Aven, the sin of Israel, shall be
destroyed: the thorn and the thistle shall come up on their altars;
say to the mountains, Cover us; and to the hills, Fall
u hast sinned from the days of Gibeah: there they
st the children of iniquity did not
ake them.
 I should chastise them; and the people
hall be gathered against them, when they shall bind themselves in
.
t is taught, and loveth to tread
corn; but I passed over upon her fair neck: I will make
l plow, and Jacob shall break his clods.

, reap in mercy; break up your
und: for it is time to seek the LORD, till he come and rain

ve reaped iniquity; ye have
it of lies: because thou didst trust in thy way, in the
.
among thy people, and all thy
shall be spoiled, as Shalman spoiled Betharbel in the day
 dashed in pieces upon her children.
:15 So shall Bethel do unto you because of your great wickedness: in
l the king of Israel utterly be cut off.

ed him, and called my son out

rom them: they sacrificed unto
d burned incense to graven images.
 I taught Ephraim also to go, taking them by their arms; but they
ealed them.
 of a man, with bands of love: and I was to
their jaws, and I laid meat

 Egypt, and the Assyrian
g, because they refused to return.
 And the sword shall abide on his cities, and shall consume his
r them, because of their own counsels.
11:7 And my people are bent to backsliding from me: though they called
most High, none at all would exalt him.

ow shall I deliver thee,
ll I make thee as Admah? how shall I set thee as
n me, my repentings are kindled

 of mine anger, I will not
roy Ephraim: for I am God, and not man; the Holy One in
ll not enter into the city.
shall walk after the LORD: he shall roar like a lion: when
children shall tremble from the west.
1:11 They shall tremble as a bird out of Egypt, and as a dove out of
syria: and I will place them in their houses, saith the
asseth me about with lies, and the house of Israel
h with God, and is faithful with the
ts.
olloweth after the east wind: he
creaseth lies and desolation; and they do make a covenant with
il is carried into Egypt.
 hath also a controversy with Judah, and will punish
ccording to his doings will he
 him.
eel in the womb, and by his strength
ad power with God: 12:4 Yea, he had power over the angel, and
nd made supplication unto him: he found him in
12:5 Even the LORD God of hosts;
 is his memorial.
hou to thy God: keep mercy and judgment and wait
 is a merchant, the balances of deceit are in his hand: he
:8 And Ephraim said, Yet I am become rich, I have found me out
 labours they shall find none iniquity in me that
he LORD thy God from the land of Egypt will yet
as in the days of the solemn feast.
10 I have also spoken by the prophets, and I have multiplied
litudes, by the ministry of the prophets.
ly they are vanity: they
ks in Gilgal; yea, their altars are as heaps in the
 And Jacob fled into the country of Syria, and Israel served for
wife he kept sheep.
het the LORD brought Israel out of Egypt, and by a
14 Ephraim provoked him to anger most bitterly: therefore shall he
upon him, and his reproach shall his LORD return unto
ke trembling, he exalted himself in Israel; but

d have made them molten images
ilver, and idols according to their own understanding, all
aftsmen: they say of them, Let the men that
efore they shall be as the morning cloud and as the early dew
 the chaff that is driven with the whirlwind out
 of the chimney.
 thy God from the land of Egypt, and thou shalt
 saviour beside me.
e in the wilderness, in the land of great drought.
e, so were they filled; they were
 and their heart was exalted; therefore have they forgotten me.
will be unto them as a lion: as a leopard by the way
ll meet them as a bear that is bereaved
f her whelps, and will rend the caul of their heart, and there will I
ike a lion: the wild beast shall tear them.
yself; but in me is thine help.
 will be thy king: where is any other that may save thee in all
 judges of whom thou saidst, Give me a king and
in mine anger, and took him away in
ath.
ound up; his sin is hid.
ows of a travailing woman shall come upon him: he is an
ot stay long in the place of the breaking
 them from the power of the grave; I will redeem
e thy plagues; O grave, I will be
truction: repentance shall be hid from mine eyes.
ng his brethren, an east wind shall
 the wind of the LORD shall come up from the wilderness, and his
e dry, and his fountain shall be dried up: he shall
ant vessels.
 desolate; for she hath rebelled against her
ir infants shall be dashed in
 their women with child shall be ripped up.
hy God; for thou hast fallen by
quity.
rn to the LORD: say unto him, Take
ll iniquity, and receive us graciously: so will we render the

ot ride upon horses: neither
any more to the work of our hands, Ye are our gods: for in
eth mercy.
liding, I will love them freely: for mine
will be as the dew unto Israel: he shall grow as the lily, and
 as Lebanon.
read, and his beauty shall be as the olive
They that dwell under his shadow shall return; they shall revive
row as the vine: the scent thereof shall be as the
 shall say, What have I to do any more with idols? I have
im: I am like a green fir tree. From me is
d he shall understand these things? prudent, and
f the LORD are right, and the just
walk in them: but the transgressors shall fall therein.
ord of the LORD that came to Joel the son of Pethuel.
and give ear, all ye inhabitants of the land.
n in the days of your fathers?  1:3
ye your children of it, and let your children tell their
en another generation.
he palmerworm hath left hath the locust eaten; and
hath the cankerworm eaten; and that
 the cankerworm hath left hath the caterpiller eaten.
d weep; and howl, all ye drinkers of wine,
ff from your mouth.
 come up upon my land, strong, and without number,
ion, and he hath the cheek teeth of a
at lion.
, and barked my fig tree: he hath made
 clean bare, and cast it away; the branches thereof are made white.
ke a virgin girded with sackcloth for the husband of her
ering and the drink offering is cut off from the house
e LORD's ministers, mourn.
ld is wasted, the land mourneth; for the corn is wasted:
the oil languisheth.
, O ye husbandmen; howl, O ye vinedressers, for the
se the harvest of the field is

tree languisheth; the
he palm tree also, and the apple tree, even all the
d: because joy is withered away from
sons of men.
lament, ye priests: howl, ye ministers of
th, ye ministers of my God:
offering and the drink offering is withholden from the
anctify ye a fast, call a solemn assembly, gather the elders and
s of the land into the house of the LORD your God,
 for the day! for the day of the LORD
at hand, and as a destruction from the Almighty shall it come.
at cut off before our eyes, yea, joy and gladness
The seed is rotten under their clods,
 garners are laid desolate, the barns are broken down; for the corn

f cattle are perplexed,
 no pasture; yea, the flocks of sheep are made
ll I cry: for the fire hath devoured the
pastures of the wilderness, and the flame hath burned all the trees of

to thee: for the rivers of
ed up, and the fire hath devoured the pastures of the
e trumpet in Zion, and sound an alarm in my holy
of the land tremble: for the day of
ORD cometh, for it is nigh at hand; 2:2 A day of darkness and of
of clouds and of thick darkness, as the morning
people and a strong; there hath not
ever the like, neither shall be any more after it, even to the
tions.
; and behind them a flame burneth: the
nd is as the garden of Eden before them, and behind them a desolate
, and nothing shall escape them.
e appearance of them is as the appearance of horses; and as
 run.
 the tops of mountains shall they
ike the noise of a flame of fire that devoureth the stubble, as
 in battle array.
 the people shall be much pained: all faces shall
ll run like mighty men; they shall climb the wall like men
arch every one on his ways, and they shall not
 one thrust another; they shall
y one in his path: and when they fall upon the sword, they

; they shall run upon the
l climb up upon the houses; they shall enter in at the
0 The earth shall quake before them; the heavens shall tremble: the
n shall be dark, and the stars shall withdraw their
l utter his voice before his army: for
s camp is very great: for he is strong that executeth his word: for
LORD is great and very terrible; and who can abide it?
th the LORD, turn ye even to me with all
your heart, and with fasting, and with weeping, and with mourning:
ur heart, and not your garments, and turn unto the
s and merciful, slow to anger, and of
at kindness, and repenteth him of the evil.
d repent, and leave a blessing
; even a meat offering and a drink offering unto the LORD
trumpet in Zion, sanctify a fast, call a
solemn assembly: 2:16 Gather the people, sanctify the congregation,
ders, gather the children, and those that suck the
orth of his chamber, and the bride out
 her closet.
ministers of the LORD, weep between the
orch and the altar, and let them say, Spare thy people, O LORD, and
heritage to reproach, that the heathen should rule over
 say among the people, Where is their God?
is land, and pity his people.
 the LORD will answer and say unto his people, Behold, I will
ne, and oil, and ye shall be satisfied therewith:
roach among the heathen: 2:20 But I
remove far off from you the northern army, and will drive him
d desolate, with his face toward the east sea,
t sea, and his stink shall come
is ill savour shall come up, because he hath done great
 land; be glad and rejoice: for the LORD will do great
d, ye beasts of the field: for the pastures of the
ee beareth her fruit, the fig tree and
e vine do yield their strength.
 glad then, ye children of Zion, and rejoice in the LORD your
n you the former rain moderately, and he will
the former rain, and the latter
he first month.
ll be full of wheat, and the vats shall
verflow with wine and oil.
ill restore to you the years that the locust hath eaten,
terpiller, and the palmerworm, my great army
 shall eat in plenty, and be satisfied, and praise the name
hat hath dealt wondrously with you: and my
nd ye shall know that I am in the midst of Israel, and that I am
 and none else: and my people shall never be
pass afterward, that I will pour out my
pirit upon all flesh; and your sons and your daughters shall
 shall dream dreams, your young men shall see
nts and upon the handmaids in
will I pour out my spirit.
ill shew wonders in the heavens and in the earth, blood,
moke.
 darkness, and the moon into blood,
e the great and terrible day of the LORD come.
at whosoever shall call on the name
e LORD shall be delivered: for in mount Zion and in Jerusalem
 as the LORD hath said, and in the remnant whom
hold, in those days, and in that time, when I shall bring
dah and Jerusalem, 3:2 I will also gather all
o the valley of Jehoshaphat, and
ad with them there for my people and for my heritage Israel,
ed among the nations, and parted my land.
le; and have given a boy for an
nd sold a girl for wine, that they might drink.
ith me, O Tyre, and Zidon, and all
asts of Palestine? will ye render me a recompence? and if ye
 and speedily will I return your recompence upon
 taken my silver and my gold, and
rried into your temples my goodly pleasant things: 3:6 The
nd the children of Jerusalem have ye sold unto
hem far from their border.
I will raise them out of the place whither ye have sold
recompence upon your own head: 3:8 And I
will sell your sons and your daughters into the hand of the children
they shall sell them to the Sabeans, to a people far
it.
iles; Prepare war, wake up the
, let all the men of war draw near; let them come up: 3:10
o swords and your pruninghooks into spears:
Assemble yourselves, and come, all ye heathen, and gather
 about: thither cause thy mighty ones to come
 be wakened, and come up to the valley of
e all the heathen round
t ye in the sickle, for the harvest is ripe: come, get you
ull, the fats overflow; for their wickedness
es in the valley of decision: for the day of
sion.
e darkened, and the stars shall
their shining.
 roar out of Zion, and utter his voice from
h shall shake: but the LORD
ope of his people, and the strength of the children of
know that I am the LORD your God dwelling in Zion, my
usalem be holy, and there shall no
ers pass through her any more.
 it shall come to pass in that day, that the mountains shall
d the hills shall flow with milk, and all the
s, and a fountain shall come
 the house of the LORD, and shall water the valley of
be a desolation, and Edom shall be a desolate
the children of Judah, because
shed innocent blood in their land.
 But Judah shall dwell for ever, and Jerusalem from generation to
21 For I will cleanse their blood that I have not cleansed: for the
n Zion.
f Amos, who was among the herdmen of Tekoa, which he
ays of Uzziah king of Judah, and in the
ays of Jeroboam the son of Joash king of Israel, two years before the

 Zion, and utter his voice
; and the habitations of the shepherds shall mourn, and
her.
 transgressions of Damascus, and for
, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because they have
th threshing instruments of iron: 1:4 But I will
el, which shall devour the palaces
hadad.
 Damascus, and cut off the inhabitant
m the plain of Aven, and him that holdeth the sceptre from the
he people of Syria shall go into captivity unto
ith the LORD; For three transgressions of Gaza, and for
the punishment thereof; because they
ied away captive the whole captivity, to deliver them up to Edom:
nd a fire on the wall of Gaza, which shall devour the
ll cut off the inhabitant from Ashdod,
d him that holdeth the sceptre from Ashkelon, and I will turn mine
on: and the remnant of the Philistines shall perish,
s saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Tyrus, and for
away the punishment thereof; because they
 and remembered not the
t: 1:10 But I will send a fire on the wall of Tyrus,
 thereof.
 three transgressions of Edom, and for
ur, I will not turn away the punishment thereof; because he did
with the sword, and did cast off all pity, and his
he kept his wrath for ever: 1:12 But I
ll send a fire upon Teman, which shall devour the palaces of Bozrah.
ith the LORD; For three transgressions of the children of
ll not turn away the punishment thereof;
because they have ripped up the women with child of Gilead, that they
 their border: 1:14 But I will kindle a fire in the wall
vour the palaces thereof, with shouting in
 day of the whirlwind: 1:15
g shall go into captivity, he and his princes together,
 saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Moab, and for
ay the punishment thereof; because he burned
e: 2:2 But I will send a fire
and it shall devour the palaces of Kirioth: and Moab shall
outing, and with the sound of the trumpet: 2:3
e midst thereof, and will slay all
inces thereof with him, saith the LORD.

ressions of Judah, and for
ot turn away the punishment thereof; because they have
, and have not kept his commandments, and
which their fathers have
I will send a fire upon Judah, and it shall devour the
 Thus saith the LORD; For three transgressions of Israel, and for
turn away the punishment thereof; because they sold
he poor for a pair of shoes; 2:7 That
t after the dust of the earth on the head of the poor, and turn
e meek: and a man and his father will go in unto
name: 2:8 And they lay themselves
on clothes laid to pledge by every altar, and they drink the
in the house of their god.
royed I the Amorite before them, whose height was like the
d he was strong as the oaks; yet I destroyed
om beneath.
from the land of Egypt, and led you forty
the land of the Amorite.
sed up of your sons for prophets, and of your young men
en thus, O ye children of Israel? saith the
 wine to drink; and commanded the
s, saying, Prophesy not.
 am pressed under you, as a cart is pressed that is full
ore the flight shall perish from the swift, and the strong
 force, neither shall the mighty deliver
himself: 2:15 Neither shall he stand that handleth the bow; and he
 foot shall not deliver himself: neither shall he that
self.
ong the mighty shall flee away naked
hat day, saith the LORD.
word that the LORD hath spoken against you, O children
 family which I brought up from the land
of Egypt, saying, 3:2 You only have I known of all the families of the
fore I will punish you for all your iniquities.
 they be agreed?  3:4 Will a lion
 the forest, when he hath no prey? will a young lion cry out of
 taken nothing?  3:5 Can a bird fall in a snare
 him?  shall one take up a snare
 earth, and have taken nothing at all?  3:6 Shall a trumpet be
nd the people not be afraid?  shall there be evil
done it?  3:7 Surely the Lord GOD
 nothing, but he revealeth his secret unto his servants the
on hath roared, who will not fear? the Lord GOD hath spoken,
 3:9 Publish in the palaces at Ashdod, and in
 say, Assemble yourselves upon
ins of Samaria, and behold the great tumults in the midst
d in the midst thereof.
now not to do right, saith the LORD, who store up
aces.
d GOD; An adversary there shall be
ound about the land; and he shall bring down thy strength from
s shall be spoiled.
 LORD; As the shepherd taketh out of the mouth of
an ear; so shall the children of
e taken out that dwell in Samaria in the corner of a bed, and
h.
se of Jacob, saith the Lord GOD,
of hosts, 3:14 That in the day that I shall visit the
 him I will also visit the altars of
el: and the horns of the altar shall be cut off, and fall to the
d I will smite the winter house with the summer house; and the
l perish, and the great houses shall have an end,
word, ye kine of Bashan, that are in the mountain of
r, which crush the needy, which say to
eir masters, Bring, and let us drink.
:2 The Lord GOD hath sworn by his holiness, that, lo, the days shall
 that he will take you away with hooks, and your
nd ye shall go out at the breaches, every cow at that which is
hall cast them into the palace, saith the LORD.
s; at Gilgal multiply transgression;
bring your sacrifices every morning, and your tithes after three
er a sacrifice of thanksgiving with leaven, and
ings: for this liketh you, O ye
of Israel, saith the Lord GOD.
I also have given you cleanness of teeth in all your cities,
ll your places: yet have ye not returned unto
 have withholden the rain from you, when there were yet
: and I caused it to rain upon one city,
and caused it not to rain upon another city: one piece was rained
ce whereupon it rained not withered.
8 So two or three cities wandered unto one city, to drink water; but
satisfied: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the
you with blasting and mildew: when your gardens and
es and your olive trees increased, the
lmerworm devoured them: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the
 have sent among you the pestilence after the manner of Egypt:
I slain with the sword, and have taken away your
of your camps to come up unto your
ls: yet have ye not returned unto me, saith the LORD.
 of you, as God overthrew Sodom and
rah, and ye were as a firebrand plucked out of the burning: yet
d unto me, saith the LORD.
re thus will I do unto thee, O Israel: and because I will
e to meet thy God, O Israel.
lo, he that formeth the mountains, and createth the wind,
at is his thought, that maketh the morning
ces of the earth, The LORD,
sts, is his name.
 which I take up against you, even a lamentation,
gin of Israel is fallen; she shall no more rise: she is
re is none to raise her up.
s saith the Lord GOD; The city that went out by a thousand
and that which went forth by an hundred shall

e of Israel, Seek ye me, and
e: 5:5 But seek not Bethel, nor enter into Gilgal, and
ilgal shall surely go into captivity, and
the LORD, and ye shall live; lest he break out like fire in
d devour it, and there be none to quench it in
to wormwood, and leave off righteousness in
 seven stars and Orion, and
hadow of death into the morning, and maketh the day dark
or the waters of the sea, and poureth them
 is his name: 5:9 That
spoiled against the strong, so that the spoiled

ate, and they abhor him that
ightly.
r treading is upon the poor, and ye
from him burdens of wheat: ye have built houses of hewn stone,
ll in them; ye have planted pleasant vineyards,
.
essions and your mighty sins:
t the just, they take a bribe, and they turn aside the poor
right.
 keep silence in that time; for it is
evil time.
, that ye may live: and so the LORD, the
God of hosts, shall be with you, as ye have spoken.
the good, and establish judgment in the
ate: it may be that the LORD God of hosts will be gracious unto the
ph.
 hosts, the LORD, saith thus;
ll be in all streets; and they shall say in all the
 shall call the husbandman to mourning,
nd such as are skilful of lamentation to wailing.
 be wailing: for I will pass through
, saith the LORD.
t desire the day of the LORD! to what end is it
kness, and not light.
did flee from a lion, and a bear met him; or went
nd on the wall, and a serpent bit

kness, and not light? even
 no brightness in it?  5:21 I hate, I despise your feast
 in your solemn assemblies.
 ye offer me burnt offerings and your meat offerings, I
er will I regard the peace offerings of
our fat beasts.
m me the noise of thy songs; for I will not
ut let judgment run down as waters, and righteousness as a
ave ye offered unto me sacrifices and offerings in the
use of Israel?  5:26 But ye have borne the
 images, the star of your god,
ade to yourselves.
I cause you to go into captivity beyond Damascus,
 God of hosts.
 at ease in Zion, and trust in the mountain of
e nations, to whom the house of
me!  6:2 Pass ye unto Calneh, and see; and from thence go ye
hen go down to Gath of the Philistines: be they
r border greater than your border?
 that put far away the evil day, and cause the seat of violence
hat lie upon beds of ivory, and stretch themselves
lambs out of the flock, and the calves
t of the midst of the stall; 6:5 That chant to the sound of the
 themselves instruments of musick, like David; 6:6
oint themselves with the chief
 but they are not grieved for the affliction of Joseph.
hey go captive with the first that go
tive, and the banquet of them that stretched themselves shall be
e Lord GOD hath sworn by himself, saith the LORD the God of
llency of Jacob, and hate his palaces:
erefore will I deliver up the city with all that is therein.
e to pass, if there remain ten men in one house,
 man's uncle shall take him up, and he that burneth him, to
 of the house, and shall say unto him that is
et any with thee? and he shall
hen shall he say, Hold thy tongue: for we may not make
ORD.
eth, and he will smite the great
th breaches, and the little house with clefts.
k? will one plow there with oxen?
have turned judgment into gall, and the fruit of righteousness
e which rejoice in a thing of nought, which say,
ur own strength?  6:14 But, behold,
l raise up against you a nation, O house of Israel, saith the
; and they shall afflict you from the entering in
ilderness.
hewed unto me; and, behold, he formed
sshoppers in the beginning of the shooting up of the latter growth;
 the latter growth after the king's mowings.
hey had made an end of eating the
f the land, then I said, O Lord GOD, forgive, I beseech thee:
rise? for he is small.
ented for this: It shall not be, saith the LORD.
d unto me: and, behold, the Lord GOD
ed to contend by fire, and it devoured the great deep, and did eat
5 Then said I, O Lord GOD, cease, I beseech thee: by whom shall
 is small.
is: This also shall not be, saith the Lord
ld, the LORD stood upon a wall made by
plumbline, with a plumbline in his hand.

t seest thou? And I said, A
en said the LORD, Behold, I will set a plumbline in the
I will not again pass by them any more: 7:9
esolate, and the sanctuaries of
all be laid waste; and I will rise against the house of

nt to Jeroboam king of
os hath conspired against thee in the midst of the
 able to bear all his words.
hus Amos saith, Jeroboam shall die by the sword, and Israel
y captive out of their own land.
lso Amaziah said unto Amos, O thou seer, go, flee thee away into
 and there eat bread, and prophesy there: 7:13 But
ethel: for it is the king's chapel,
t is the king's court.
ed Amos, and said to Amaziah, I was no prophet,
I was an herdman, and a gatherer of
ore fruit: 7:15 And the LORD took me as I followed the flock, and
o me, Go, prophesy unto my people Israel.
f the LORD: Thou sayest,
inst Israel, and drop not thy word against the house
us saith the LORD; Thy wife shall be an harlot in the
ughters shall fall by the sword, and thy
land shall be divided by line; and thou shalt die in a polluted land:
all surely go into captivity forth of his land.
 unto me: and behold a basket of
ruit.
 thou? And I said, A basket of summer
it. Then said the LORD unto me, The end is come upon my people of
t again pass by them any more.
the songs of the temple shall be howlings in that day, saith
all be many dead bodies in every place; they

eedy, even to make the poor
o fail, 8:5 Saying, When will the new moon be gone, that
sabbath, that we may set forth wheat, making
 and falsifying the balances by
8:6 That we may buy the poor for silver, and the needy for a
d sell the refuse of the wheat?  8:7 The LORD
, Surely I will never forget any
 works.
for this, and every one mourn that
th therein? and it shall rise up wholly as a flood; and it shall
owned, as by the flood of Egypt.
d it shall come to pass in that day, saith the Lord GOD, that I
to go down at noon, and I will darken the earth in
urn your feasts into mourning, and all
ur songs into lamentation; and I will bring up sackcloth upon all
ss upon every head; and I will make it as the
thereof as a bitter day.
he days come, saith the Lord GOD, that I will send a
ne of bread, nor a thirst for water, but
of hearing the words of the LORD: 8:12 And they shall wander from sea
rom the north even to the east, they shall run to and fro
ORD, and shall not find it.
t day shall the fair virgins and young men faint for
r by the sin of Samaria, and say, Thy god, O Dan,
eba liveth; even they shall fall, and
er rise up again.
anding upon the altar: and he said, Smite the
y shake: and cut them in the
 them; and I will slay the last of them with the sword: he
l not flee away, and he that escapeth of them
 they dig into hell, thence shall mine hand take them;
en, thence will I bring them down: 9:3 And
f Carmel, I will search and
 thence; and though they be hid from my sight in the
 I command the serpent, and he shall
 them: 9:4 And though they go into captivity before their enemies,
mmand the sword, and it shall slay them: and I will
l, and not for good.
OD of hosts is he that toucheth the land, and it
rein shall mourn: and it shall rise
olly like a flood; and shall be drowned, as by the flood of
that buildeth his stories in the heaven, and hath founded
e that calleth for the waters of the sea, and
 earth: The LORD is his name.
e not as children of the Ethiopians unto me, O children of
Have not I brought up Israel out of the land
htor, and the Syrians from Kir?
d, the eyes of the Lord GOD are upon the sinful kingdom, and
 off the face of the earth; saving that I will
ob, saith the LORD.
 command, and I will sift the house of Israel among
fted in a sieve, yet shall not the
grain fall upon the earth.
 sinners of my people shall die by the sword, which say,
e nor prevent us.
 I raise up the tabernacle of David that is
of; and I will raise up his
will build it as in the days of old: 9:12 That they may
, and of all the heathen, which are called
is.
he LORD, that the plowman shall
the reaper, and the treader of grapes him that soweth seed;
 drop sweet wine, and all the hills shall melt.
aptivity of my people of Israel, and
 shall build the waste cities, and inhabit them; and they shall
d drink the wine thereof; they shall also make

and, and they shall no more be
out of their land which I have given them, saith the LORD

h the Lord GOD concerning Edom;
eard a rumour from the LORD, and an ambassador is sent among
 and let us rise up against her in battle.
ng the heathen: thou art greatly
.
eived thee, thou that dwellest in
fts of the rock, whose habitation is high; that saith in his
 me down to the ground?  1:4 Though thou exalt
u set thy nest among the stars,
ll I bring thee down, saith the LORD.
:5 If thieves came to thee, if robbers by night, (how art thou cut
y not have stolen till they had enough? if the
hey not leave some grapes?  1:6
he things of Esau searched out! how are his hidden things
en of thy confederacy have brought thee even
ace with thee have deceived
vailed against thee; that they eat thy bread have laid a
 none understanding in him.
 not in that day, saith the LORD, even destroy the wise men
tanding out of the mount of Esau?  1:9 And thy
ed, to the end that every one of
t of Esau may be cut off by slaughter.
1:10 For thy violence against thy brother Jacob shame shall cover
alt be cut off for ever.
y that thou stoodest on the other side, in the day that
captive his forces, and foreigners entered
alem, even thou wast as one of
:12 But thou shouldest not have looked on the day of thy brother in
 became a stranger; neither shouldest thou have
 in the day of their destruction;
 shouldest thou have spoken proudly in the day of distress.
ot have entered into the gate of my people in the
shouldest not have looked on their
tion in the day of their calamity, nor have laid hands on their
y of their calamity; 1:14 Neither shouldest thou
 off those of his that did escape;
r shouldest thou have delivered up those of his that did remain
ess.
ar upon all the heathen: as thou
e, it shall be done unto thee: thy reward shall return upon
 For as ye have drunk upon my holy mountain, so shall all the
ally, yea, they shall drink, and they shall
gh they had not been.
nt Zion shall be deliverance, and there shall be
hall possess their possessions.
d the house of Jacob shall be a fire, and the house of Joseph a
e of Esau for stubble, and they shall kindle in
all not be any remaining of the
Esau; for the LORD hath spoken it.
 And they of the south shall possess the mount of Esau; and they
hilistines: and they shall possess the fields of
: and Benjamin shall possess Gilead.
20 And the captivity of this host of the children of Israel shall
he Canaanites, even unto Zarephath; and the captivity
harad, shall possess the cities of the
uth.
 mount Zion to judge the mount of
nd the kingdom shall be the LORD's.

 came unto Jonah the son of Amittai,
ng, 1:2 Arise, go to Nineveh, that great city, and cry against it;
ness is come up before me.
h rose up to flee unto Tarshish from the presence of the
pa; and he found a ship going to Tarshish:
wn into it, to go with them
 from the presence of the LORD.
 the LORD sent out a great wind into the sea, and there was a
 sea, so that the ship was like to be broken.
and cried every man unto his god,
t forth the wares that were in the ship into the sea, to
nah was gone down into the sides of the
hip; and he lay, and was fast asleep.
:6 So the shipmaster came to him, and said unto him, What meanest
arise, call upon thy God, if so be that God will

low, Come, and let us cast lots,
may know for whose cause this evil is upon us. So they cast
upon Jonah.
, Tell us, we pray thee, for whose cause
this evil is upon us; What is thine occupation? and whence comest
 country? and of what people art thou?  1:9 And he
and I fear the LORD, the God of
hich hath made the sea and the dry land.

d, and said unto him. Why hast
this? For the men knew that he fled from the presence of the
old them.
 What shall we do unto thee, that the sea
 and was tempestuous.
unto them, Take me up, and cast me forth into the
o you: for I know that for my sake
reat tempest is upon you.
less the men rowed hard to bring it to the land; but they
ought, and was tempestuous against them.

 and said, We beseech thee, O
seech thee, let us not perish for this man's life, and lay
od: for thou, O LORD, hast done as it pleased
and cast him forth into the sea: and the
sea ceased from her raging.
he men feared the LORD exceedingly, and offered a sacrifice
 vows.
 great fish to swallow up Jonah. And
h was in the belly of the fish three days and three nights.
 unto the LORD his God out of the fish's belly,
mine affliction unto the LORD, and
rd me; out of the belly of hell cried I, and thou heardest my
u hadst cast me into the deep, in the midst of the seas;
e about: all thy billows and thy waves
ssed over me.
t out of thy sight; yet I will look again
 compassed me about, even to the soul: the depth closed
ere wrapped about my head.
own to the bottoms of the mountains; the earth with her
 yet hast thou brought up my life from
rruption, O LORD my God.
ul fainted within me I remembered the LORD: and my
hine holy temple.
 lying vanities forsake their own mercy.

the voice of thanksgiving; I
t that I have vowed. Salvation is of the LORD.
ish, and it vomited out Jonah upon
y land.
me unto Jonah the second time, saying,
2 Arise, go unto Nineveh, that great city, and preach unto it the
bid thee.
unto Nineveh, according to the word of
e LORD. Now Nineveh was an exceeding great city of three days'
Jonah began to enter into the city a day's journey, and he
ty days, and Nineveh shall be overthrown.
od, and proclaimed a fast, and
kcloth, from the greatest of them even to the least of them.
to the king of Nineveh, and he arose from his
, and covered him with sackcloth,
 in ashes.
roclaimed and published through Nineveh by
aying, Let neither man nor
r flock, taste any thing: let them not feed, nor drink
east be covered with sackcloth, and cry
ightily unto God: yea, let them turn every one from his evil way, and
ence that is in their hands.
n tell if God will turn and repent, and turn away from his
rish not?  3:10 And God saw their works, that
God repented of the evil, that he
d that he would do unto them; and he did it not.
edingly, and he was very angry.
 he prayed unto the LORD, and said, I pray thee, O LORD, was
en I was yet in my country? Therefore I fled
thou art a gracious God, and
ow to anger, and of great kindness, and repentest thee of
e now, O LORD, take, I beseech thee, my life from me; for
e than to live.
 Doest thou well to be angry?  4:5 So Jonah
st side of the city, and there
 booth, and sat under it in the shadow, till he might see
city.
ourd, and made it to come up over
that it might be a shadow over his head, to deliver him from
s exceeding glad of the gourd.
God prepared a worm when the morning rose the next day, and it
 it withered.
when the sun did arise, that God prepared a
on the head of Jonah, that he
d wished in himself to die, and said, It is better for me
:9 And God said to Jonah, Doest thou well to be angry for the gourd?
 do well to be angry, even unto death.
4:10 Then said the LORD, Thou hast had pity on the gourd, for the
ot laboured, neither madest it grow; which came up in
ght: 4:11 And should not I spare Nineveh,
xscore thousand persons that
rn between their right hand and their left hand; and also
ah
 to Micah the Morasthite in the
otham, Ahaz, and Hezekiah, kings of Judah, which he saw
salem.
, O earth, and all that therein is:
et the Lord GOD be witness against you, the LORD from his holy
behold, the LORD cometh forth out of his place, and will come
the high places of the earth.
he mountains shall be molten under him, and the valleys shall
re the fire, and as the waters that are poured
ransgression of Jacob is all this, and for the sins of
 the transgression of Jacob? is it not
maria? and what are the high places of Judah? are they not
e I will make Samaria as an heap of the field,
I will pour down the stones
the valley, and I will discover the foundations thereof.
mages thereof shall be beaten to pieces, and
with the fire, and all the idols
will I lay desolate: for she gathered it of the hire of an
eturn to the hire of an harlot.
refore I will wail and howl, I will go stripped and naked: I
ke the dragons, and mourning as the owls.
is come unto Judah; he is come
ate of my people, even to Jerusalem.
10 Declare ye it not at Gath, weep ye not at all: in the house of
lf in the dust.
 inhabitant of Saphir, having thy shame naked:
rth in the mourning of Bethezel;
 receive of you his standing.
the inhabitant of Maroth waited carefully for good: but evil
D unto the gate of Jerusalem.
ou inhabitant of Lachish, bind the chariot to the swift
 of the sin to the daughter of Zion: for
the transgressions of Israel were found in thee.
resents to Moreshethgath: the houses
chzib shall be a lie to the kings of Israel.
hee, O inhabitant of Mareshah: he
ome unto Adullam the glory of Israel.
:16 Make thee bald, and poll thee for thy delicate children; enlarge
s the eagle; for they are gone into captivity from thee.
ise iniquity, and work evil upon their beds!
se it, because it is in the
r hand.
take them by violence; and houses, and
ke them away: so they oppress a man and his house, even a man and
2:3 Therefore thus saith the LORD; Behold, against this family do I
 from which ye shall not remove your necks; neither
 time is evil.
e take up a parable against you, and lament
 be utterly spoiled: he hath
portion of my people: how hath he removed it from me!
our fields.
ve none that shall cast a cord by lot in
the congregation of the LORD.
esy ye not, say they to them that prophesy: they shall not
hey shall not take shame.
at art named the house of Jacob, is the spirit of the
s doings? do not my words do good to him
that walketh uprightly?  2:8 Even of late my people is risen up as an
l off the robe with the garment from them that pass by
war.
 cast out from their pleasant
m their children have ye taken away my glory for ever.
 for this is not your rest: because it is
 a sore destruction.
ing in the spirit and falsehood do lie, saying, I
nd of strong drink; he shall even be
prophet of this people.
ely assemble, O Jacob, all of thee; I will surely
ill put them together as the sheep of
rah, as the flock in the midst of their fold: they shall make great
 of the multitude of men.
ker is come up before them: they have broken up, and have
and are gone out by it: and their king shall
head of them.
ray you, O heads of Jacob, and ye princes of
 to know judgment?  3:2 Who hate
, and love the evil; who pluck off their skin from off them,
ff their bones; 3:3 Who also eat the flesh of my
ff them; and they break their bones,
chop them in pieces, as for the pot, and as flesh within the
hall they cry unto the LORD, but he will not hear them: he
from them at that time, as they have behaved
 Thus saith the LORD concerning the prophets that make my people
h their teeth, and cry, Peace; and he that putteth
 prepare war against him.
 night shall be unto you, that ye shall not have a
o you, that ye shall not divine; and
sun shall go down over the prophets, and the day shall be dark
en shall the seers be ashamed, and the diviners confounded: yea,
er their lips; for there is no answer of God.
 the spirit of the LORD, and of
 and of might, to declare unto Jacob his transgression, and
:9 Hear this, I pray you, ye heads of the house of Jacob, and princes
of Israel, that abhor judgment, and pervert all equity.
ith blood, and Jerusalem with iniquity.

and the priests thereof teach
nd the prophets thereof divine for money: yet will they
, Is not the LORD among us? none evil can
n for your sake be plowed as a field, and
ntain of the house as the
the forest.
 shall come to pass, that the mountain of
d in the top of the
ll be exalted above the hills; and people shall
ns shall come, and say, Come, and let us go up to
the house of the God of Jacob; and he
l teach us of his ways, and we will walk in his paths: for the law
f Zion, and the word of the LORD from Jerusalem.
y people, and rebuke strong nations
off; and they shall beat their swords into plowshares, and their
ghooks: nation shall not lift up a sword against
ar any more.
ry man under his vine and under his fig
ree; and none shall make them afraid: for the mouth of the LORD of
n it.
y one in the name of his god, and we
 walk in the name of the LORD our God for ever and ever.
he LORD, will I assemble her that halteth, and
, and her that I have afflicted;
I will make her that halted a remnant, and her that was cast
n: and the LORD shall reign over them in mount

e strong hold of the daughter of
to thee shall it come, even the first dominion; the kingdom
ter of Jerusalem.
 cry out aloud? is there no king in thee? is thy
e taken thee as a woman in travail.
0 Be in pain, and labour to bring forth, O daughter of Zion, like a
l: for now shalt thou go forth out of the city, and
and thou shalt go even to Babylon;
shalt thou be delivered; there the LORD shall redeem thee from
emies.
athered against thee, that say, Let
e defiled, and let our eye look upon Zion.
 the LORD, neither understand
unsel: for he shall gather them as the sheaves into the
resh, O daughter of Zion: for I will make thine horn
s brass: and thou shalt beat in pieces
ny people: and I will consecrate their gain unto the LORD, and their
 the Lord of the whole earth.
ather thyself in troops, O daughter of troops: he hath laid
shall smite the judge of Israel with a rod upon
em Ephratah, though thou be little among the
all he come forth unto me that
uler in Israel; whose goings forth have been from of old,
Therefore will he give them up, until the time that she which
ht forth: then the remnant of his brethren shall
.
e strength of the LORD, in the
 the name of the LORD his God; and they shall abide: for now
 the ends of the earth.
n shall be the peace, when the Assyrian shall come into
 tread in our palaces, then shall we raise
rincipal men.
the land of Assyria with the sword, and the
: thus shall he deliver us from
ian, when he cometh into our land, and when he treadeth
And the remnant of Jacob shall be in the midst of many people as a
D, as the showers upon the grass, that tarrieth not
ns of men.
 shall be among the Gentiles in the midst
 of the forest, as a young
 flocks of sheep: who, if he go through, both treadeth
 and none can deliver.
hall be lifted up upon thine adversaries, and all

ay, saith the LORD, that I
hy horses out of the midst of thee, and I will destroy
l cut off the cities of thy land, and
ow down all thy strong holds: 5:12 And I will cut off witchcrafts
; and thou shalt have no more soothsayers: 5:13 Thy
ff, and thy standing images out of the
dst of thee; and thou shalt no more worship the work of thine hands.
ill pluck up thy groves out of the midst of thee: so will
5:15 And I will execute vengeance in anger and fury upon the heathen,
have not heard.
e LORD saith; Arise, contend thou before the
voice.
RD's controversy, and ye strong
ns of the earth: for the LORD hath a controversy with his
 with Israel.
e I done unto thee? and wherein have I
aried thee? testify against me.
 I brought thee up out of the land of Egypt, and redeemed thee
servants; and I sent before thee Moses, Aaron, and
mber now what Balak king of Moab consulted, and
d him from Shittim unto Gilgal;
ay know the righteousness of the LORD.
6:6 Wherewith shall I come before the LORD, and bow myself before the
ll I come before him with burnt offerings, with calves of
 LORD be pleased with thousands of rams, or
all I give my firstborn for my
ion, the fruit of my body for the sin of my soul?  6:8 He
what is good; and what doth the LORD require
 mercy, and to walk humbly with
 6:9 The LORD's voice crieth unto the city, and the man of
e: hear ye the rod, and who hath appointed it.
f wickedness in the house of the
and the scant measure that is abominable?  6:11 Shall I count
cked balances, and with the bag of deceitful
f are full of violence, and the
ts thereof have spoken lies, and their tongue is deceitful in
Therefore also will I make thee sick in smiting thee, in making
se of thy sins.
t not be satisfied; and thy casting down shall
alt take hold, but shalt not
 that which thou deliverest will I give up to the sword.
 thou shalt not reap; thou shalt tread the
ith oil; and sweet wine, but
ink wine.
 are kept, and all the works of the house
hat I should make thee a
the inhabitants thereof an hissing: therefore ye shall
le.
y have gathered the summer fruits,
 grapegleanings of the vintage: there is no cluster to eat: my
stripe fruit.
hed out of the earth: and there is none
pright among men: they all lie in wait for blood; they hunt every man
ith a net.
th both hands earnestly, the prince
h, and the judge asketh for a reward; and the great man, he
s desire: so they wrap it up.
est of them is as a brier: the most upright is sharper than a
of thy watchmen and thy visitation cometh; now
ust ye not in a friend, put ye not confidence in a guide: keep
th from her that lieth in thy bosom.
6 For the son dishonoureth the father, the daughter riseth up
he daughter in law against her mother in law; a
n house.
 the LORD; I will wait for the God of my
salvation: my God will hear me.
oice not against me, O mine enemy: when I fall, I shall arise;
ss, the LORD shall be a light unto me.
7:9 I will bear the indignation of the LORD, because I have sinned
il he plead my cause, and execute judgment for me: he
ght, and I shall behold his
.
l see it, and shame shall cover
 said unto me, Where is the LORD thy God? mine eyes shall
 be trodden down as the mire of the streets.
o be built, in that day shall the
be far removed.
e shall come even to thee from Assyria, and
 fortress even to the river,
 to sea, and from mountain to mountain.

solate because of them that
, for the fruit of their doings.
eed thy people with thy rod, the flock of thine heritage, which
 the wood, in the midst of Carmel: let them feed in
ys of old.
f thy coming out of the land of Egypt will
16 The nations shall see and be confounded at all their might: they
 hand upon their mouth, their ears shall be deaf.
ike a serpent, they shall move out of
ir holes like worms of the earth: they shall be afraid of the LORD
ll fear because of thee.
God like unto thee, that pardoneth iniquity, and passeth
e remnant of his heritage? he retaineth not
th in mercy.
e will have compassion upon us; he will
ubdue our iniquities; and thou wilt cast all their sins into the

cob, and the mercy to Abraham,
 hast sworn unto our fathers from the days of old.
n of Nineveh. The book of the vision of Nahum the Elkoshite.
and the LORD revengeth; the LORD revengeth, and is
eance on his adversaries, and he
h wrath for his enemies.
s slow to anger, and great in power, and will not at all
D hath his way in the whirlwind and in the
s feet.
keth it dry, and drieth up all the
: Bashan languisheth, and Carmel, and the flower of Lebanon
 mountains quake at him, and the hills melt, and the earth is
e, yea, the world, and all that dwell therein.
nation? and who can abide in the
ss of his anger? his fury is poured out like fire, and the
 him.
ld in the day of trouble; and he
them that trust in him.
 overrunning flood he will make an utter end of the
ll pursue his enemies.
magine against the LORD? he will make an utter end:
e second time.
olden together as thorns, and while they are
voured as stubble fully dry.
 is one come out of thee, that imagineth evil against the
.
 be quiet, and likewise many, yet
all they be cut down, when he shall pass through. Though I have
ill afflict thee no more.
will I break his yoke from off thee, and will burst thy
d the LORD hath given a commandment concerning thee, that no
wn: out of the house of thy gods will I cut off
ge: I will make thy grave; for thou
ile.
 feet of him that bringeth good
that publisheth peace! O Judah, keep thy solemn feasts,
icked shall no more pass through thee; he
h in pieces is come up before thy face: keep the
loins strong, fortify thy power

excellency of Jacob, as the
 Israel: for the emptiers have emptied them out, and

red, the valiant men are in
chariots shall be with flaming torches in the day of his
rees shall be terribly shaken.
chariots shall rage in the streets, they shall justle one
oad ways: they shall seem like torches, they
He shall recount his worthies: they shall stumble in their walk;
ste to the wall thereof, and the defence shall be
 rivers shall be opened, and the palace shall be
 be led away captive, she shall be brought up, and
 the voice of doves, tabering upon
breasts.
 a pool of water: yet they shall flee
y.
ne shall look back.
il of silver, take the spoil of gold: for there is
out of all the pleasant furniture.
 She is empty, and void, and waste: and the heart melteth, and the
ther, and much pain is in all loins, and the faces of

and the feedingplace of the
where the lion, even the old lion, walked, and the lion's
 afraid?  2:12 The lion did tear in pieces
 his lionesses, and filled his
 prey, and his dens with ravin.
hold, I am against thee, saith the LORD of hosts, and I will
he smoke, and the sword shall devour thy young
rom the earth, and the voice of
ngers shall no more be heard.
o the bloody city! it is all full of lies and robbery; the
The noise of a whip, and the noise of the
ng horses, and of the jumping

ght sword and the glittering
here is a multitude of slain, and a great number of
 of their corpses; they stumble upon
r corpses: 3:4 Because of the multitude of the whoredoms of the
, the mistress of witchcrafts, that selleth nations
lies through her witchcrafts.
d, I am against thee, saith the LORD of hosts; and I will
thy face, and I will shew the nations thy

 thee, and make thee vile,
hee as a gazingstock.
come to pass, that all they that look upon thee shall
veh is laid waste: who will bemoan her?
hence shall I seek comforters for thee?  3:8 Art thou better than
 was situate among the rivers, that had the waters
s the sea, and her wall was from the
  3:9 Ethiopia and Egypt were her strength, and it was infinite;
 thy helpers.
away, she went into captivity: her young
children also were dashed in pieces at the top of all the streets: and
ts for her honourable men, and all her great men were
 also shalt be drunken: thou shalt be hid, thou also shalt
 the enemy.
hall be like fig trees with the firstripe
fall into the mouth of the
 Behold, thy people in the midst of thee are women: the gates of
set wide open unto thine enemies: the fire shall
 waters for the siege, fortify thy strong holds: go into
, make strong the brickkiln.
 shall the fire devour thee; the sword shall cut thee off,
e the cankerworm: make thyself many as the
usts.
chants above the stars of heaven: the
kerworm spoileth, and fleeth away.
 Thy crowned are as the locusts, and thy captains as the great
camp in the hedges in the cold day, but when the
eir place is not known where they

yria: thy nobles shall dwell
 thy people is scattered upon the mountains, and no man
re is no healing of thy bruise; thy wound is grievous: all
hee shall clap the hands over thee: for upon
ntinually?
burden which Habakkuk the prophet did see.
thou wilt not hear! even cry out
e of violence, and thou wilt not save!  1:3 Why dost thou shew
se me to behold grievance? for spoiling and
hat raise up strife and
4 Therefore the law is slacked, and judgment doth never go forth:
th compass about the righteous; therefore wrong
ye among the heathen, and regard, and wonder marvelously:
 your days which ye will not believe, though
e up the Chaldeans, that bitter and hasty nation,
adth of the land, to possess the
places that are not their's.
re terrible and dreadful: their judgment and their dignity
ves.
than the leopards, and are more
an the evening wolves: and their horsemen shall spread
en shall come from far; they shall fly as
y shall come all for violence: their faces shall sup up as the
shall gather the captivity as the sand.

nd the princes shall be a
: they shall deride every strong hold; for they shall
11 Then shall his mind change, and he shall pass over, and offend,
s power unto his god.
 from everlasting, O LORD my God, mine Holy One? we
t ordained them for judgment; and, O
ty God, thou hast established them for correction.
an to behold evil, and canst not look on
iniquity: wherefore lookest thou upon them that deal treacherously,
 tongue when the wicked devoureth the man that is more
 makest men as the fishes of the sea, as
the creeping things, that have no ruler over them?  1:15 They take up
ith the angle, they catch them in their net, and gather
re they rejoice and are glad.
efore they sacrifice unto their net, and burn incense unto
hem their portion is fat, and their meat
plenteous.
pty their net, and not spare continually
to slay the nations?  2:1 I will stand upon my watch, and set me upon
d will watch to see what he will say unto me, and what I
roved.
d said, Write the vision, and make it
in upon tables, that he may run that readeth it.
 appointed time, but at the end it
speak, and not lie: though it tarry, wait for it; because it
ill not tarry.
ch is lifted up is not upright in him: but the
 Yea also, because he transgresseth by wine, he is a proud man,
home, who enlargeth his desire as hell, and is as
ut gathereth unto him all nations,
apeth unto him all people: 2:6 Shall not all these take up a
nd a taunting proverb against him, and say, Woe
s not his! how long? and to him
th himself with thick clay!  2:7 Shall they not rise up
ee, and awake that shall vex thee, and thou
cause thou hast spoiled many
 the remnant of the people shall spoil thee; because of
olence of the land, of the city, and of all
hat coveteth an evil covetousness to his house, that
hat he may be delivered from the power
 evil!  2:10 Thou hast consulted shame to thy house by cutting off
 hast sinned against thy soul.
 the stone shall cry out of the wall, and the beam out of the
t.
 with blood, and stablisheth a
iquity!  2:13 Behold, is it not of the LORD of hosts that
n the very fire, and the people shall weary
he earth shall be filled with
ge of the glory of the LORD, as the waters cover the sea.
giveth his neighbour drink, that puttest thy
also, that thou mayest look on
dness!  2:16 Thou art filled with shame for glory: drink
eskin be uncovered: the cup of the LORD's
 shameful spewing shall be on

cover thee, and the spoil of
h made them afraid, because of men's blood, and for the
e city, and of all that dwell therein.
2:18 What profiteth the graven image that the maker thereof hath
ten image, and a teacher of lies, that the maker of
ake dumb idols?  2:19 Woe unto him that
aith to the wood, Awake; to the dumb stone, Arise, it shall teach!
id over with gold and silver, and there is no breath
2:20 But the LORD is in his holy temple: let all the earth keep

pon Shigionoth.
d thy speech, and was afraid: O LORD, revive
 the midst of the years make
ath remember mercy.
eman, and the Holy One from mount Paran. Selah. His
the earth was full of his praise.
nd his brightness was as the light; he had horns coming out of
was the hiding of his power.
 him went the pestilence, and burning coals went forth at
, and measured the earth: he beheld, and drove asunder the
ting mountains were scattered, the perpetual
g.
liction: and the curtains of the
Midian did tremble.
spleased against the rivers? was thine anger
nst the sea, that thou didst
ine horses and thy chariots of salvation?  3:9 Thy bow was
ing to the oaths of the tribes, even thy word.
ith rivers.
, and they trembled: the overflowing of the
oice, and lifted up his hands

r habitation: at the light of
s they went, and at the shining of thy glittering spear.
rough the land in indignation, thou didst
 wentest forth for the salvation of thy people, even for
ted; thou woundedst the head out of the
ouse of the wicked, by discovering the foundation unto the neck.
u didst strike through with his staves the head of his
 whirlwind to scatter me: their rejoicing
15 Thou didst walk through the sea with thine horses, through the
ers.
ed; my lips quivered at the voice:
ness entered into my bones, and I trembled in myself, that I
of trouble: when he cometh up unto the people,

lossom, neither shall fruit be
es; the labour of the olive shall fail, and the fields shall
ck shall be cut off from the fold, and there
et I will rejoice in the LORD, I
 in the God of my salvation.
ORD God is my strength, and he will make my feet like hinds'
 me to walk upon mine high places. To the chief

e LORD which came unto Zephaniah the son of Cushi,
Amariah, the son of Hizkiah, in the
of Josiah the son of Amon, king of Judah.
rom off the land, saith the
I will consume man and beast; I will consume the fowls of the
s of the sea, and the stumbling blocks with the
 off the land, saith the LORD.
ll also stretch out mine hand upon Judah, and upon all the
; and I will cut off the remnant of Baal from
rims with the priests; 1:5 And
worship the host of heaven upon the housetops; and them that
 by the LORD, and that swear by Malcham; 1:6 And
 LORD; and those that have not
 LORD, nor enquired for him.
hy peace at the presence of the Lord GOD: for the day of the
he LORD hath prepared a sacrifice, he hath bid
 to pass in the day of the LORD's sacrifice, that
e king's children, and all such as
othed with strange apparel.
same day also will I punish all those that leap on the
masters' houses with violence and deceit.
day, saith the LORD, that there
the noise of a cry from the fish gate, and an howling from
crashing from the hills.
inhabitants of Maktesh, for all the merchant people are
r silver are cut off.
 come to pass at that time, that I will search
he men that are settled on their
at say in their heart, The LORD will not do good, neither will
Therefore their goods shall become a booty, and their houses a
ll also build houses, but not inhabit them; and
 drink the wine thereof.
 day of the LORD is near, it is near, and hasteth
y of the LORD: the mighty man shall
here bitterly.
f wrath, a day of trouble and distress, a day
 darkness and gloominess, a day
 and thick darkness, 1:16 A day of the trumpet and alarm
 and against the high towers.
I will bring distress upon men, that they shall walk like
ave sinned against the LORD: and their blood
 flesh as the dung.
silver nor their gold shall be able to deliver them
 but the whole land shall be devoured
the fire of his jealousy: for he shall make even a speedy riddance
 dwell in the land.
es together, yea, gather together, O nation not
g forth, before the day pass as the
, before the fierce anger of the LORD come upon you, before the
nger come upon you.
D, all ye meek of the earth, which have wrought his
eek meekness: it may be ye shall be hid
n the day of the LORD's anger.
Gaza shall be forsaken, and Ashkelon a desolation: they shall
he noon day, and Ekron shall be rooted up.
a coast, the nation of the
he word of the LORD is against you; O Canaan, the land
ven destroy thee, that there shall be no
inhabitant.
 be dwellings and cottages for shepherds,
t shall be for the remnant of the house of Judah; they
 houses of Ashkelon shall they lie down in
l visit them, and turn away
ty.
ab, and the revilings of the
Ammon, whereby they have reproached my people, and
ir border.
th the LORD of hosts, the God of Israel,
Surely Moab shall be as Sodom, and the children of Ammon as Gomorrah,
ding of nettles, and saltpits, and a perpetual
 shall spoil them, and the remnant
people shall possess them.
all they have for their pride, because they have
s against the people of the LORD of
.
hem: for he will famish all the
he earth; and men shall worship him, every one from his
f the heathen.
 ye shall be slain by my sword.
d he will stretch out his hand against the north, and destroy
e Nineveh a desolation, and dry like a
lderness.
n in the midst of her, all the beasts of
the nations: both the cormorant and the bittern shall lodge in the
 it; their voice shall sing in the windows; desolation
for he shall uncover the cedar work.
15 This is the rejoicing city that dwelt carelessly, that said in
and there is none beside me: how is she become a
lie down in! every one that passeth
r shall hiss, and wag his hand.
 to her that is filthy and polluted, to the oppressing city!
 voice; she received not correction; she trusted
 to her God.
 are roaring lions; her judges are evening
 morrow.
 treacherous persons: her priests have
lluted the sanctuary, they have done violence to the law.
 the midst thereof; he will not do iniquity:
nt to light, he faileth not; but
st knoweth no shame.
 the nations: their towers are desolate; I made
eth by: their cities are destroyed,
at there is no man, that there is none inhabitant.
ear me, thou wilt receive instruction;
 their dwelling should not be cut off, howsoever I punished them:
ly, and corrupted all their doings.
 Therefore wait ye upon me, saith the LORD, until the day that I
y: for my determination is to gather the nations,
 to pour upon them mine indignation,
 all my fierce anger: for all the earth shall be devoured with the
usy.
ople a pure language, that they may
all upon the name of the LORD, to serve him with one consent.
e rivers of Ethiopia my suppliants, even the
mine offering.
hou not be ashamed for all thy doings, wherein
or then I will take away out of
 of thee them that rejoice in thy pride, and thou shalt no
of my holy mountain.
eave in the midst of thee an afflicted and poor
 name of the LORD.
Israel shall not do iniquity, nor speak lies;
ound in their mouth: for they
and lie down, and none shall make them afraid.
ut, O Israel; be glad and rejoice
l the heart, O daughter of Jerusalem.
:15 The LORD hath taken away thy judgments, he hath cast out thine
of Israel, even the LORD, is in the midst of thee:
.
Jerusalem, Fear thou not: and to
t not thine hands be slack.
RD thy God in the midst of thee is mighty; he will save, he
with joy; he will rest in his love, he will joy
ill gather them that are sorrowful for the solemn assembly,
m the reproach of it was a burden.
 Behold, at that time I will undo all that afflict thee: and I
alteth, and gather her that was driven out; and I
every land where they have been put
ame.
 again, even in the time that I
u: for I will make you a name and a praise among all people
rn back your captivity before your eyes,
saith the LORD.
n the second year of Darius the king, in the sixth month, in the
onth, came the word of the LORD by Haggai the
ealtiel, governor of Judah, and
 the son of Josedech, the high priest, saying, 1:2 Thus
 saying, This people say, The time is not
ld be built.
the LORD by Haggai the prophet, saying, 1:4
our cieled houses, and this
te?  1:5 Now therefore thus saith the LORD of hosts;
have sown much, and bring in little; ye eat, but ye have not
ye are not filled with drink; ye clothe you, but
rneth wages earneth wages to put it
a bag with holes.
RD of hosts; Consider your ways.
 up to the mountain, and bring wood, and build the house; and I
in it, and I will be glorified, saith the LORD.
t came to little; and when ye brought
home, I did blow upon it. Why? saith the LORD of hosts. Because of
is waste, and ye run every man unto his own house.
 you is stayed from dew, and the earth
 stayed from her fruit.
ed for a drought upon the land, and upon the mountains,
 the new wine, and upon the oil, and upon
 upon men, and upon cattle,
the labour of the hands.
bbabel the son of Shealtiel, and Joshua the son of
all the remnant of the people, obeyed
 voice of the LORD their God, and the words of Haggai the prophet,
r God had sent him, and the people did fear before the
gai the LORD's messenger in the LORD's message unto
ou, saith the LORD.
tirred up the spirit of Zerubbabel the son of
 spirit of Joshua the son of
e high priest, and the spirit of all the remnant of the
id work in the house of the LORD of hosts,
h day of the sixth month, in
ear of Darius the king.
nth month, in the one and twentieth day of the month,
the prophet Haggai, saying, 2:2 Speak now
nor of Judah, and to Joshua
sedech, the high priest, and to the residue of the
among you that saw this house in her
t glory? and how do ye see it now? is it not in your eyes in
thing?  2:4 Yet now be strong, O Zerubbabel,
a, son of Josedech, the high
be strong, all ye people of the land, saith the LORD, and
saith the LORD of hosts: 2:5 According to the
ye came out of Egypt, so my
eth among you: fear ye not.
s saith the LORD of hosts; Yet once, it is a little while,
vens, and the earth, and the sea, and the dry
s, and the desire of all nations
me: and I will fill this house with glory, saith the LORD of
er is mine, and the gold is mine, saith the LORD of hosts.
latter house shall be greater than of the
his place will I give peace,
RD of hosts.
ieth day of the ninth month, in the second
D by Haggai the prophet,
s saith the LORD of hosts; Ask now the priests
one bear holy flesh in the skirt
arment, and with his skirt do touch bread, or pottage, or
, shall it be holy? And the priests answered
, If one that is unclean by a dead body touch any
d the priests answered and said, It
 be unclean.
 and said, So is this people, and so is this
so is every work of their hands;
 which they offer there is unclean.
5 And now, I pray you, consider from this day and upward, from
aid upon a stone in the temple of the LORD: 2:16
me to an heap of twenty measures,
ere but ten: when one came to the pressfat for to draw out
 press, there were but twenty.
mote you with blasting and with mildew and with hail in all
ds; yet ye turned not to me, saith the LORD.
upward, from the four and
f the ninth month, even from the day that the
aid, consider it.
in the barn? yea, as yet the vine, and the fig
live tree, hath not brought forth:
his day will I bless you.
n the word of the LORD came unto Haggai in the four and
 saying, 2:21 Speak to Zerubbabel, governor
ens and the earth; 2:22 And I
row the throne of kingdoms, and I will destroy the strength
heathen; and I will overthrow the chariots, and
rses and their riders shall come
ery one by the sword of his brother.
23 In that day, saith the LORD of hosts, will I take thee, O
, the son of Shealtiel, saith the LORD, and will
chosen thee, saith the LORD of hosts.

h, in the second year of Darius, came the word
of Berechiah, the son of Iddo the
, saying, 1:2 The LORD hath been sore displeased with your
e say thou unto them, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; Turn
 of hosts, and I will turn unto you, saith
our fathers, unto whom the former prophets have
of hosts; Turn ye now from your
, and from your evil doings: but they did not hear, nor
LORD.
 and the prophets, do they live for
  1:6 But my words and my statutes, which I commanded my servants
 they not take hold of your fathers? and they
f hosts thought to do unto us,
to our ways, and according to our doings, so hath he dealt
 four and twentieth day of the eleventh month, which is
ond year of Darius, came the word of the
LORD unto Zechariah, the son of Berechiah, the son of Iddo the
 I saw by night, and behold a man riding upon a
yrtle trees that were in the
behind him were there red horses, speckled, and white.
, what are these? And the angel that talked
what these be.
ood among the myrtle trees answered and said,
t to walk to and fro through the

LORD that stood among the
nd said, We have walked to and fro through the earth,
tteth still, and is at rest.
the angel of the LORD answered and said, O LORD of hosts,
ve mercy on Jerusalem and on the cities of
nation these threescore and
:13 And the LORD answered the angel that talked with me
able words.
uned with me said unto me, Cry thou,
ng, Thus saith the LORD of hosts; I am jealous for Jerusalem and
eat jealousy.
ispleased with the heathen that are at ease:
 they helped forward the
:16 Therefore thus saith the LORD; I am returned to Jerusalem with
e shall be built in it, saith the LORD of hosts, and a
h upon Jerusalem.
 Thus saith the LORD of hosts; My cities through
oad; and the LORD shall yet comfort
 and shall yet choose Jerusalem.
hen lifted I up mine eyes, and saw, and behold four horns.
he angel that talked with me, What be these? And
s which have scattered Judah,
 Jerusalem.
 four carpenters.
t come these to do? And he spake, saying, These
Judah, so that no man did lift up
d: but these are come to fray them, to cast out the horns of
fted up their horn over the land of Judah to
es again, and looked, and behold a man with a
en said I, Whither goest thou? And he said unto me, To measure
at is the breadth thereof, and what is the length
angel that talked with me went forth, and another
nd said unto him, Run, speak to this
g man, saying, Jerusalem shall be inhabited as towns without walls
e of men and cattle therein: 2:5 For I, saith the
fire round about, and will be the
n the midst of her.
rth, and flee from the land of the north, saith the
oad as the four winds of the heaven,
h the LORD.
, that dwellest with the daughter of
lon.
ts; After the glory hath he sent me
the nations which spoiled you: for he that toucheth you toucheth
ye.
hand upon them, and they shall be a
 to their servants: and ye shall know that the LORD of hosts hath
Sing and rejoice, O daughter of Zion: for, lo, I come, and I will
t of thee, saith the LORD.
y nations shall be joined to the LORD in that day, and
ll dwell in the midst of thee, and thou
halt know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto thee.
inherit Judah his portion in the holy land,
13 Be silent, O all flesh, before the LORD: for he is raised up out
itation.
e high priest standing before the angel
f the LORD, and Satan standing at his right hand to resist him.
said unto Satan, The LORD rebuke thee, O Satan; even
salem rebuke thee: is not this a brand
ucked out of the fire?  3:3 Now Joshua was clothed with filthy
before the angel.
nd spake unto those that stood before him,
om him. And unto him he said,
ave caused thine iniquity to pass from thee, and I will
raiment.
 fair mitre upon his head. So they set a
fair mitre upon his head, and clothed him with garments. And the angel
stood by.
 protested unto Joshua, saying, 3:7 Thus
saith the LORD of hosts; If thou wilt walk in my ways, and if thou
rge, then thou shalt also judge my house, and shalt
 give thee places to walk among these
t stand by.
high priest, thou, and thy fellows that sit
at: for, behold, I will bring
rvant the BRANCH.
one that I have laid before Joshua; upon one
ill engrave the graving thereof,
e LORD of hosts, and I will remove the iniquity of that land
 that day, saith the LORD of hosts, shall ye call every man his
 vine and under the fig tree.
he angel that talked with me came again, and waked me, as a
 of his sleep.
at seest thou? And I said, I have looked, and
h a bowl upon the top of it, and
n lamps thereon, and seven pipes to the seven lamps, which are
: 4:3 And two olive trees by it, one upon the
 upon the left side thereof.
nswered and spake to the angel that talked with me, saying,
?  4:5 Then the angel that talked with me
ot what these be? And I said,
.
e, saying, This is the word of
nto Zerubbabel, saying, Not by might, nor by power, but by
D of hosts.
ountain? before Zerubbabel thou shalt
ome a plain: and he shall bring forth the headstone thereof with
 Grace, grace unto it.
 word of the LORD came unto me, saying, 4:9 The hands
oundation of this house; his hands shall
also finish it; and thou shalt know that the LORD of hosts hath sent

all things? for they shall
hall see the plummet in the hand of Zerubbabel with
of the LORD, which run to and fro
 the whole earth.
 and said unto him, What are these two olive
estick and upon the left side
:12 And I answered again, and said unto him, What be these
 through the two golden pipes empty the golden
answered me and said, Knowest thou
at these be? And I said, No, my lord.
:14 Then said he, These are the two anointed ones, that stand by the
ole earth.
d up mine eyes, and looked, and behold a
flying roll.
hat seest thou? And I answered, I see a
lying roll; the length thereof is twenty cubits, and the breadth
.
 curse that goeth forth over the
the whole earth: for every one that stealeth shall be cut off
ding to it; and every one that sweareth shall be
to it.
 the LORD of hosts, and it shall enter
to the house of the thief, and into the house of him that sweareth
me: and it shall remain in the midst of his house, and
mber thereof and the stones thereof.
5 Then the angel that talked with me went forth, and said unto me,
e eyes, and see what is this that goeth forth.
 said, This is an ephah that goeth
 He said moreover, This is their resemblance through all the
old, there was lifted up a talent of lead: and this is a
midst of the ephah.
is is wickedness. And he cast it into the midst of
t of lead upon the mouth thereof.
hen lifted I up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold, there came
he wind was in their wings; for they had wings
lifted up the ephah between the
 the heaven.
gel that talked with me, Whither do these
, To build it an house in the
nar: and it shall be established, and set there upon her
ned, and lifted up mine eyes, and looked, and, behold,
 from between two mountains; and the
tains were mountains of brass.
he first chariot were red horses; and in the second chariot
n the third chariot white horses; and in the

angel that talked with me, What
, my lord?  6:5 And the angel answered and said unto me,
 of the heavens, which go forth from
ding before the LORD of all the earth.
6:6 The black horses which are therein go forth into the north
te go forth after them; and the grisled go forth
nd the bay went forth, and sought to go that they might walk to
 earth: and he said, Get you hence, walk to and fro
ed to and fro through the earth.
en cried he upon me, and spake unto me, saying, Behold, these
rth country have quieted my spirit in the north
 LORD came unto me, saying, 6:10 Take of them
Tobijah, and of Jedaiah, which
rom Babylon, and come thou the same day, and go into the
 Zephaniah; 6:11 Then take silver and gold,
head of Joshua the son of
igh priest; 6:12 And speak unto him, saying, Thus
g, Behold the man whose name is The
H; and he shall grow up out of his place, and he shall build the
: 6:13 Even he shall build the temple of the LORD;
 shall sit and rule upon his throne;
he shall be a priest upon his throne: and the counsel of peace
m both.
 Helem, and to Tobijah, and to Jedaiah,
nd to Hen the son of Zephaniah, for a memorial in the temple of the
nd they that are far off shall come and build in the temple of
ll know that the LORD of hosts hath sent me unto
if ye will diligently obey the voice
he LORD your God.
ss in the fourth year of king Darius, that the
 in the fourth day of the ninth
en in Chisleu; 7:2 When they had sent unto the house of God
h, and their men, to pray before the LORD, 7:3
were in the house of the LORD of
nd to the prophets, saying, Should I weep in the fifth month,
 I have done these so many years?  7:4 Then came
 me, saying, 7:5 Speak unto all the
e of the land, and to the priests, saying, When ye fasted and
and seventh month, even those seventy years, did
?  7:6 And when ye did eat, and when
id drink, did not ye eat for yourselves, and drink for yourselves?
t hear the words which the LORD hath cried by the
as inhabited and in prosperity, and
ities thereof round about her, when men inhabited the south and
 the word of the LORD came unto Zechariah, saying,
sts, saying, Execute true judgment,
hew mercy and compassions every man to his brother: 7:10 And
 nor the fatherless, the stranger, nor the poor;
gainst his brother in your heart.
But they refused to hearken, and pulled away the shoulder, and
that they should not hear.
ey made their hearts as an adamant stone, lest they should
rds which the LORD of hosts hath sent in his
re came a great wrath from the
sts.
 that as he cried, and they would
r; so they cried, and I would not hear, saith the LORD of
ed them with a whirlwind among all the
tions whom they knew not. Thus the land was desolate after them,
 through nor returned: for they laid the pleasant
ord of the LORD of hosts came to me, saying, 8:2 Thus
s jealous for Zion with great jealousy,
nd I was jealous for her with great fury.
unto Zion, and will dwell in
 Jerusalem: and Jerusalem shall be called a city of truth;
LORD of hosts the holy mountain.
us saith the LORD of hosts; There shall yet old men and old
ets of Jerusalem, and every man with his staff
 the streets of the city shall be full of boys and girls
reof.
 If it be marvellous in the eyes of
emnant of this people in these days, should it also be marvellous
th the LORD of hosts.
e LORD of hosts; Behold, I will save my people from
west country; 8:8 And I will bring
and they shall dwell in the midst of Jerusalem: and they shall
will be their God, in truth and in righteousness.
s; Let your hands be strong, ye that
 in these days these words by the mouth of the prophets, which
 the foundation of the house of the LORD of hosts
e built.
re was no hire for man, nor any hire for
beast; neither was there any peace to him that went out or came in
ffliction: for I set all men every one against his
l not be unto the residue of this people as in the
osts.
rous; the vine shall give her fruit,
the ground shall give her increase, and the heavens shall give
l cause the remnant of this people to possess all
l come to pass, that as ye were a curse among the
use of Israel; so will I save you,
 shall be a blessing: fear not, but let your hands be strong.
 the LORD of hosts; As I thought to punish you,
ath, saith the LORD of hosts, and I
ted not: 8:15 So again have I thought in these days to do well
o the house of Judah: fear ye not.
 These are the things that ye shall do; Speak ye every man the
ur; execute the judgment of truth and peace in
 imagine evil in your hearts
neighbour; and love no false oath: for all these are
LORD.
hosts came unto me, saying, 8:19 Thus
th the LORD of hosts; The fast of the fourth month, and the fast of
the fast of the seventh, and the fast of the tenth,
joy and gladness, and cheerful feasts;
erefore love the truth and peace.
Thus saith the LORD of hosts; It shall yet come to pass, that
le, and the inhabitants of many cities: 8:21 And
go to another, saying, Let us go
 to pray before the LORD, and to seek the LORD of hosts: I
a, many people and strong nations shall come to seek the LORD
, and to pray before the LORD.
s saith the LORD of hosts; In those days it shall come to
take hold out of all languages of the
ions, even shall take hold of the skirt of him that is a Jew,
th you: for we have heard that God is with you.
 LORD in the land of Hadrach, and
s shall be the rest thereof: when the eyes of man, as of all
shall be toward the LORD.
h also shall border thereby; Tyrus, and Zidon, though it
yrus did build herself a strong hold, and heaped up silver as
ld as the mire of the streets.
ld, the LORD will cast her out, and he will smite her power in
ll be devoured with fire.
shall see it, and fear; Gaza also shall see it, and be
or her expectation shall be ashamed; and
the king shall perish from Gaza, and Ashkelon shall not be inhabited.
astard shall dwell in Ashdod, and I will cut off the pride
:7 And I will take away his blood out of his mouth, and his
en his teeth: but he that remaineth, even he,
 as a governor in Judah, and
ebusite.
ne house because of the army, because of
him that passeth by, and because of him that returneth: and no
 through them any more: for now have I seen with
 O daughter of Zion; shout, O daughter of
hee: he is just, and having
wly, and riding upon an ass, and upon a colt the foal of
 cut off the chariot from Ephraim, and the horse from
 shall be cut off: and he shall speak
ce unto the heathen: and his dominion shall be from sea even to
iver even to the ends of the earth.
1 As for thee also, by the blood of thy covenant I have sent forth
t of the pit wherein is no water.
Turn you to the strong hold, ye prisoners of hope: even to day do
will render double unto thee; 9:13 When I have bent
th Ephraim, and raised up thy sons, O
n, against thy sons, O Greece, and made thee as the sword of a
And the LORD shall be seen over them, and his arrow shall go
: and the LORD God shall blow the trumpet, and
h.
them; and they shall devour, and
ith sling stones; and they shall drink, and make a noise as
shall be filled like bowls, and as the corners
heir God shall save them in that day as the flock
as the stones of a crown, lifted up
 ensign upon his land.
at is his goodness, and how great is his beauty! corn
rful, and new wine the maids.
ye of the LORD rain in the time of the latter rain; so the
louds, and give them showers of rain, to every
the idols have spoken vanity, and the diviners have seen a
 dreams; they comfort in vain: therefore they
troubled, because there was no

 shepherds, and I punished the
 the LORD of hosts hath visited his flock the house of
 his goodly horse in the battle.
ut of him came forth the corner, out of him the nail, out of him
t of him every oppressor together.
 And they shall be as mighty men, which tread down their enemies
 streets in the battle: and they shall fight,
e riders on horses shall be

Judah, and I will save the
h, and I will bring them again to place them; for I have
shall be as though I had not cast them off:
ear them.
l be like a mighty man, and their heart
hall rejoice as through wine: yea, their children shall see it, and
heart shall rejoice in the LORD.
 will hiss for them, and gather them; for I have redeemed them:
ease as they have increased.
 will sow them among the people: and they shall remember me
hey shall live with their children, and turn
n also out of the land of Egypt, and
er them out of Assyria; and I will bring them into the land of
and place shall not be found for them.
10:11 And he shall pass through the sea with affliction, and shall
in the sea, and all the deeps of the river shall dry
hall be brought down, and the sceptre of
Egypt shall depart away.
ll strengthen them in the LORD; and they shall walk up
the LORD.
n, that the fire may devour thy cedars.

len; because the mighty are
, O ye oaks of Bashan; for the forest of the vintage is
 a voice of the howling of the shepherds; for their glory
e roaring of young lions; for the pride of
e LORD my God; Feed the flock of the slaughter; 11:5
d hold themselves not guilty: and they
at sell them say, Blessed be the LORD; for I am rich: and their own
them not.
the inhabitants of the land, saith the
RD: but, lo, I will deliver the men every one into his neighbour's
he hand of his king: and they shall smite the land,
t deliver them.
e flock of slaughter, even you, O poor of the
 the one I called Beauty, and the
 called Bands; and I fed the flock.
8 Three shepherds also I cut off in one month; and my soul lothed
oul also abhorred me.
 I will not feed you: that that dieth, let it die;
let it be cut off; and let the rest
very one the flesh of another.
d I took my staff, even Beauty, and cut it asunder, that I
which I had made with all the people.
1:11 And it was broken in that day: and so the poor of the flock that
e knew that it was the word of the LORD.

good, give me my price; and if
ar. So they weighed for my price thirty pieces of silver.
 unto me, Cast it unto the potter: a goodly
 I took the thirty pieces of
cast them to the potter in the house of the LORD.
ther staff, even Bands, that I might
k the brotherhood between Judah and Israel.
 unto thee yet the instruments of
sh shepherd.
e up a shepherd in the land, which shall not
hall seek the young one, nor
at is broken, nor feed that that standeth still: but he
fat, and tear their claws in pieces.
:17 Woe to the idol shepherd that leaveth the flock! the sword shall
m, and upon his right eye: his arm shall be clean dried
 be utterly darkened.
f the word of the LORD for Israel, saith the LORD,
ns, and layeth the foundation of the
h, and formeth the spirit of man within him.
 cup of trembling unto all the
nd about, when they shall be in the siege both against Judah

alem a burdensome stone for all
ll that burden themselves with it shall be cut in pieces,
the earth be gathered together against it.
ll smite every horse with
nd his rider with madness: and I will open mine eyes
ill smite every horse of the people with
blindness.
dah shall say in their heart, The
ants of Jerusalem shall be my strength in the LORD of hosts
hat day will I make the governors of Judah like an hearth of
nd like a torch of fire in a sheaf; and they
t, on the right hand and on the
 Jerusalem shall be inhabited again in her own place, even in
e LORD also shall save the tents of Judah first, that the glory
id and the glory of the inhabitants of Jerusalem do
Judah.
defend the inhabitants of Jerusalem;
he that is feeble among them at that day shall be as David; and
shall be as God, as the angel of the LORD before
 pass in that day, that I will seek to
stroy all the nations that come against Jerusalem.
 house of David, and upon the
 of Jerusalem, the spirit of grace and of supplications:
e whom they have pierced, and they shall
mourn for him, as one mourneth for his only son, and shall be in
, as one that is in bitterness for his firstborn.
e a great mourning in Jerusalem, as the
ourning of Hadadrimmon in the valley of Megiddon.
 every family apart; the family of the
use of David apart, and their wives apart; the family of the house
 and their wives apart; 12:13 The family of the house
s apart; the family of Shimei apart, and
their wives apart; 12:14 All the families that remain, every family
r wives apart.
hall be a fountain opened to the house of
 for sin and for uncleanness.
it shall come to pass in that day, saith the LORD of hosts,
 names of the idols out of the land, and they
 I will cause the prophets and
n spirit to pass out of the land.
And it shall come to pass, that when any shall yet prophesy, then
s mother that begat him shall say unto him, Thou
lies in the name of the LORD: and
her and his mother that begat him shall thrust him through when
13:4 And it shall come to pass in that day, that the prophets shall be
y one of his vision, when he hath prophesied; neither
nt to deceive: 13:5 But he shall say, I
m no prophet, I am an husbandman; for man taught me to keep cattle

e these wounds in thine hands?
all answer, Those with which I was wounded in the house of
e, O sword, against my shepherd, and against the man that is
ORD of hosts: smite the shepherd, and the sheep
 mine hand upon the little ones.
nd it shall come to pass, that in all the land, saith the LORD,
hall be cut off and die; but the third shall be
ing the third part through the fire, and will refine
 will try them as gold is tried: they
ll call on my name, and I will hear them: I will say, It is my
ll say, The LORD is my God.
, the day of the LORD cometh, and thy spoil shall be

nst Jerusalem to battle; and
ll be taken, and the houses rifled, and the women
all go forth into captivity, and the
due of the people shall not be cut off from the city.
 forth, and fight against those nations, as

 upon the mount of Olives,
e Jerusalem on the east, and the mount of Olives shall
toward the east and toward the west, and
there shall be a very great valley; and half of the mountain shall
e north, and half of it toward the south.
 the mountains; for the valley
ntains shall reach unto Azal: yea, ye shall flee, like as ye
arthquake in the days of Uzziah king of Judah:
all the saints with thee.
hall come to pass in that day, that the light shall not
t it shall be one day which shall be known
shall come to pass, that at
it shall be light.
 in that day, that living waters shall go out from
he former sea, and half of them toward
e hinder sea: in summer and in winter shall it be.
g over all the earth: in that day shall
here be one LORD, and his name one.
10 All the land shall be turned as a plain from Geba to Rimmon
and it shall be lifted up, and inhabited in her
e place of the first gate, unto the
r gate, and from the tower of Hananeel unto the king's
n shall dwell in it, and there shall be no more utter
all be safely inhabited.
 shall be the plague wherewith the LORD will smite all
against Jerusalem; Their flesh shall
ume away while they stand upon their feet, and their eyes shall
ir holes, and their tongue shall consume away in
 come to pass in that day, that a great tumult from
nd they shall lay hold every one on the
and of his neighbour, and his hand shall rise up against the hand of

rusalem; and the wealth of all
n round about shall be gathered together, gold, and silver,
bundance.
gue of the horse, of the mule, of the
el, and of the ass, and of all the beasts that shall be in these
gue.
hat every one that is left of all
ions which came against Jerusalem shall even go up from year to
 King, the LORD of hosts, and to keep the feast of
ll be, that whoso will not come up of all the families
to worship the King, the LORD of hosts,
ven upon them shall be no rain.
nd if the family of Egypt go not up, and come not, that have no
e the plague, wherewith the LORD will smite the
e feast of tabernacles.
l be the punishment of Egypt, and the punishment of all
 keep the feast of tabernacles.
n that day shall there be upon the bells of the horses,
 the pots in the LORD's house shall be like
a, every pot in Jerusalem and in Judah shall be holiness unto
d all they that sacrifice shall come and take of
hat day there shall be no more the
ite in the house of the LORD of hosts.

ord of the LORD to Israel by Malachi.
:2 I have loved you, saith the LORD. Yet ye say, Wherein hast thou
t Esau Jacob's brother? saith the LORD: yet I loved
d laid his mountains and his heritage
te for the dragons of the wilderness.
:4 Whereas Edom saith, We are impoverished, but we will return and
te places; thus saith the LORD of hosts, They shall
nd they shall call them, The border of
ckedness, and, The people against whom the LORD hath indignation for
nd your eyes shall see, and ye shall say, The LORD will be
r of Israel.
ther, and a servant his master: if then I be
 I be a master, where is my
he LORD of hosts unto you, O priests, that despise my
e we despised thy name?  1:7 Ye offer
luted bread upon mine altar; and ye say, Wherein have we polluted
say, The table of the LORD is contemptible.
rifice, is it not evil? and if ye
he lame and sick, is it not evil? offer it now unto thy
d with thee, or accept thy person? saith
the LORD of hosts.
you, beseech God that he will be gracious unto us:
ll he regard your persons? saith the
 of hosts.
 you that would shut the doors for nought?
for nought. I have no pleasure
ith the LORD of hosts, neither will I accept an offering at
from the rising of the sun even unto the going down of the
eat among the Gentiles; and in every place
nd a pure offering: for my
great among the heathen, saith the LORD of hosts.
n that ye say, The table of the LORD is
olluted; and the fruit thereof, even his meat, is contemptible.
, Behold, what a weariness is it! and ye have snuffed
s; and ye brought that which was torn,
d the lame, and the sick; thus ye brought an offering: should I
 hand? saith the LORD.
be the deceiver, which hath in his flock a male, and
he LORD a corrupt thing: for I am a
 King, saith the LORD of hosts, and my name is dreadful among the
nd now, O ye priests, this commandment is for you.
f ye will not lay it to heart, to give
ory unto my name, saith the LORD of hosts, I will even send a curse
 will curse your blessings: yea, I have cursed them
it to heart.
 your seed, and spread dung upon your faces,
nd one shall take you away with
4 And ye shall know that I have sent this commandment unto you, that
ght be with Levi, saith the LORD of hosts.
nd peace; and I gave them to him
fear wherewith he feared me, and was afraid before my name.
was in his mouth, and iniquity was not found in
e and equity, and did turn many
 iniquity.
ould keep knowledge, and they should seek
nger of the LORD of hosts.
re departed out of the way; ye have caused many to stumble
upted the covenant of Levi, saith the LORD of
ade you contemptible and base before all
the people, according as ye have not kept my ways, but have been
.
 not one God created us? why do
reacherously every man against his brother, by profaning the
s?  2:11 Judah hath dealt treacherously, and an
and in Jerusalem; for Judah hath
 the holiness of the LORD which he loved, and hath married the
e god.
an that doeth this, the master and the
holar, out of the tabernacles of Jacob, and him that offereth an
LORD of hosts.
ne again, covering the altar of the LORD with
out, insomuch that he regardeth
ffering any more, or receiveth it with good will at your
Wherefore? Because the LORD hath been witness between
h, against whom thou hast dealt
usly: yet is she thy companion, and the wife of thy covenant.
 make one? Yet had he the residue of the spirit.
eek a godly seed. Therefore take
your spirit, and let none deal treacherously against the wife
 For the LORD, the God of Israel, saith that he hateth putting
th violence with his garment, saith the LORD of
spirit, that ye deal not

words. Yet ye say, Wherein
d him? When ye say, Every one that doeth evil is good in
 he delighteth in them; or, Where is the God
my messenger, and he shall
y before me: and the LORD, whom ye seek, shall suddenly
e messenger of the covenant, whom ye
ght in: behold, he shall come, saith the LORD of hosts.
 day of his coming? and who shall stand when
's fire, and like fullers' soap:
he shall sit as a refiner and purifier of silver: and he shall
evi, and purge them as gold and silver, that they
ng in righteousness.
 offering of Judah and Jerusalem be pleasant unto
and as in former years.
come near to you to judgment; and I will be a swift
and against the adulterers, and against
alse swearers, and against those that oppress the hireling in his
 and the fatherless, and that turn aside the stranger
me, saith the LORD of hosts.
am the LORD, I change not; therefore ye sons of Jacob are
 from the days of your fathers ye are gone away from mine
kept them. Return unto me, and I will return
 ye said, Wherein shall we
ill a man rob God? Yet ye have robbed me. But ye say,
In tithes and offerings.
sed with a curse: for ye have robbed me, even this whole
ll the tithes into the storehouse, that there may be
me now herewith, saith the LORD of
 if I will not open you the windows of heaven, and pour you out
ere shall not be room enough to receive it.
or your sakes, and he shall not
he fruits of your ground; neither shall your vine cast her
 the field, saith the LORD of hosts.
12 And all nations shall call you blessed: for ye shall be a
h the LORD of hosts.
ve been stout against me, saith the LORD. Yet ye
gainst thee?  3:14 Ye have said, It
in to serve God: and what profit is it that we have kept his
 have walked mournfully before the LORD of
appy; yea, they that work
set up; yea, they that tempt God are even delivered.
he LORD spake often one to another: and
he LORD hearkened, and heard it, and a book of remembrance was
or them that feared the LORD, and that thought
l be mine, saith the LORD of hosts, in that day when
l spare them, as a man spareth his own
n that serveth him.
return, and discern between the righteous and the
God and him that serveth him not.
or, behold, the day cometh, that shall burn as an oven; and all
 all that do wickedly, shall be stubble: and the
, saith the LORD of hosts, that it
leave them neither root nor branch.
 But unto you that fear my name shall the Sun of righteousness
n his wings; and ye shall go forth, and grow up as
ye shall tread down the wicked; for they shall be ashes under
t in the day that I shall do this, saith the LORD
law of Moses my servant, which I commanded unto
he statutes and judgments.
I will send you Elijah the prophet before the coming of
of the LORD: 4:6 And he shall turn the
art of the fathers to the children, and the heart of the children to
 lest I come and smite the earth with a curse.
f the King James Bible
 According to Saint Matthew
ook of the generation of Jesus Christ, the son of David, the
 Abraham begat Isaac; and Isaac begat Jacob; and Jacob begat Judas
; 1:3 And Judas begat Phares and Zara of Thamar; and
begat Aram; 1:4 And Aram begat Aminadab;
and Aminadab begat Naasson; and Naasson begat Salmon; 1:5 And Salmon
Rachab; and Booz begat Obed of Ruth; and Obed begat
d the king; and David the king begat
mon of her that had been the wife of Urias; 1:7 And Solomon begat
m begat Abia; and Abia begat Asa; 1:8 And Asa begat
ram; and Joram begat Ozias; 1:9 And
 begat Joatham; and Joatham begat Achaz; and Achaz begat Ezekias;
begat Manasses; and Manasses begat Amon; and Amon
at Jechonias and his brethren, about
time they were carried away to Babylon: 1:12 And after they were
, Jechonias begat Salathiel; and Salathiel begat
t Abiud; and Abiud begat Eliakim;
akim begat Azor; 1:14 And Azor begat Sadoc; and Sadoc begat
Eliud; 1:15 And Eliud begat Eleazar; and
Eleazar begat Matthan; and Matthan begat Jacob; 1:16 And Jacob begat
band of Mary, of whom was born Jesus, who is called
rations from Abraham to David are fourteen
rrying away into Babylon are
erations; and from the carrying away into Babylon unto
ons.
 was on this wise: When as his
y was espoused to Joseph, before they came together, she was
e Holy Ghost.
and, being a just man, and not willing to
 put her away privily.
e thought on these things, behold, the angel of the
am, saying, Joseph, thou son of David,
ar not to take unto thee Mary thy wife: for that which is conceived
e Holy Ghost.
forth a son, and thou shalt call his name
their sins.
 that it might be fulfilled which was
ken of the Lord by the prophet, saying, 1:23 Behold, a virgin shall
and shall bring forth a son, and they shall call his
erpreted is, God with us.
eph being raised from sleep did as the angel of the Lord
nto him his wife: 1:25 And knew her not till
n: and he called his name JESUS.
w when Jesus was born in Bethlehem of Judaea in the days of
 there came wise men from the east to
usalem, 2:2 Saying, Where is he that is born King of the Jews? for
 star in the east, and are come to worship him.
 these things, he was troubled, and
erusalem with him.
gathered all the chief priests and scribes of the
hem where Christ should be born.
d they said unto him, In Bethlehem of Judaea: for thus it is
, 2:6 And thou Bethlehem, in the land of Juda,
of Juda: for out of thee shall
ernor, that shall rule my people Israel.

ed the wise men, enquired of
tly what time the star appeared.
d he sent them to Bethlehem, and said, Go and search diligently
; and when ye have found him, bring me word again,
also.
 they departed; and, lo, the star,
they saw in the east, went before them, till it came and stood
 child was.
, they rejoiced with exceeding great joy.
ouse, they saw the young child
his mother, and fell down, and worshipped him: and when they
ures, they presented unto him gifts; gold, and
being warned of God in a dream that they should not return to
into their own country another way.
3 And when they were departed, behold, the angel of the Lord
 a dream, saying, Arise, and take the young
pt, and be thou there until I
word: for Herod will seek the young child to destroy him.
took the young child and his mother by night,
 there until the death of Herod:
might be fulfilled which was spoken of the Lord by the
t have I called my son.
, when he saw that he was mocked of the wise men, was
th, and slew all the children that were
n Bethlehem, and in all the coasts thereof, from two years old and
 to the time which he had diligently enquired of the
filled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet,
a voice heard, lamentation, and
and great mourning, Rachel weeping for her children, and
cause they are not.
 was dead, behold, an angel of the Lord appeareth
20 Saying, Arise, and take the young
d and his mother, and go into the land of Israel: for they are
e young child's life.
, and took the young child and his mother, and came
2 But when he heard that Archelaus did reign in Judaea in the room
rod, he was afraid to go thither: notwithstanding,
he turned aside into the parts of
: 2:23 And he came and dwelt in a city called Nazareth: that it
which was spoken by the prophets, He shall be
ys came John the Baptist, preaching in the wilderness
pent ye: for the kingdom of heaven is at
hand.
n of by the prophet Esaias, saying,
oice of one crying in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the
s straight.
is raiment of camel's hair, and a leathern
 locusts and wild honey.
out to him Jerusalem, and all Judaea, and all the region
d were baptized of him in Jordan, confessing
y of the Pharisees and Sadducees come to his
on of vipers, who hath warned
 from the wrath to come?  3:8 Bring forth therefore fruits
 And think not to say within yourselves, We
nto you, that God is able of
 to raise up children unto Abraham.
0 And now also the axe is laid unto the root of the trees:
ch bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down,
deed baptize you with water unto repentance. but he that
r than I, whose shoes I am not worthy to
bear: he shall baptize you with the Holy Ghost, and with fire: 3:12
 his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor, and
ner; but he will burn up the chaff with
nquenchable fire.
s from Galilee to Jordan unto John, to be
him, saying, I have need to be baptized of thee,
esus answering said unto him, Suffer
o be so now: for thus it becometh us to fulfil all righteousness.
him.
ed, went up straightway out of the
 and, lo, the heavens were opened unto him, and he saw the
 like a dove, and lighting upon him: 3:17 And
is my beloved Son, in whom I am
sed.
pirit into the wilderness to be
f the devil.
 forty days and forty nights, he was
rward an hungred.
ter came to him, he said, If thou be the Son of
ade bread.
, It is written, Man shall not live by
ead alone, but by every word that proceedeth out of the mouth of
he devil taketh him up into the holy city, and setteth him
ple, 4:6 And saith unto him, If thou be the
s written, He shall give his
e concerning thee: and in their hands they shall bear thee
u dash thy foot against a stone.
sus said unto him, It is written again, Thou shalt not tempt the
:8 Again, the devil taketh him up into an exceeding high mountain,
all the kingdoms of the world, and the glory of them;
hese things will I give thee, if thou
t fall down and worship me.
aith Jesus unto him, Get thee hence, Satan: for it is
he Lord thy God, and him only shalt thou
serve.
 and, behold, angels came and
unto him.
 that John was cast into prison, he
ted into Galilee; 4:13 And leaving Nazareth, he came and dwelt in
is upon the sea coast, in the borders of Zabulon and
 be fulfilled which was spoken by Esaias
the prophet, saying, 4:15 The land of Zabulon, and the land of
ay of the sea, beyond Jordan, Galilee of the
 darkness saw great light; and
ich sat in the region and shadow of death light is sprung
e Jesus began to preach, and to say, Repent: for the

alilee, saw two brethren, Simon
ter, and Andrew his brother, casting a net into the sea: for
4:19 And he saith unto them, Follow me, and I will make you fishers of
 And they straightway left their nets, and followed him.
hence, he saw other two brethren, James the
n a ship with Zebedee their
ng their nets; and he called them.
 And they immediately left the ship and their father, and followed
 Jesus went about all Galilee, teaching in their synagogues,
el of the kingdom, and healing all manner of
ng the people.
hroughout all Syria: and they brought unto him
 divers diseases and torments, and
which were possessed with devils, and those which were lunatick,
 the palsy; and he healed them.
d there followed him great multitudes of people from Galilee,
nd from Jerusalem, and from Judaea, and from
ultitudes, he went up into a mountain: and when he
 him: 5:2 And he opened his mouth, and
ught them, saying, 5:3 Blessed are the poor in spirit: for theirs is
 heaven.
n: for they shall be comforted.
ssed are the meek: for they shall inherit the earth.
o hunger and thirst after righteousness:
for they shall be filled.
re the merciful: for they shall obtain mercy.
for they shall see God.
 the peacemakers: for they shall be called the children
 they which are persecuted for righteousness' sake:
aven.
ll revile you, and persecute you, and
ll say all manner of evil against you falsely, for my sake.
exceeding glad: for great is your reward in
hets which were before you.
 the salt of the earth: but if the salt have lost his
 salted? it is thenceforth good for
ng, but to be cast out, and to be trodden under foot of men.
t of the world. A city that is set on an hill
 light a candle, and put it under a bushel, but on
ht unto all that are in the house.
 Let your light so shine before men, that they may see your good
 your Father which is in heaven.
hink not that I am come to destroy the law, or the prophets: I
oy, but to fulfil.
y unto you, Till heaven and earth pass, one jot or
 from the law, till all be fulfilled.
:19 Whosoever therefore shall break one of these least commandments,
h men so, he shall be called the least in the kingdom of
l do and teach them, the same shall be
lled great in the kingdom of heaven.
20 For I say unto you, That except your righteousness shall exceed
s of the scribes and Pharisees, ye shall in no case
n.
by them of old time, Thou shalt
 and whosoever shall kill shall be in danger of the judgment:
ou, That whosoever is angry with his brother
the judgment: and whosoever
his brother, Raca, shall be in danger of the council: but
 fool, shall be in danger of hell fire.

the altar, and there
 brother hath ought against thee; 5:24 Leave there
o thy way; first be reconciled to thy
ther, and then come and offer thy gift.

whiles thou art in the way
 at any time the adversary deliver thee to the judge,
 the officer, and thou be cast into
n.
alt by no means come out thence,
u hast paid the uttermost farthing.
7 Ye have heard that it was said by them of old time, Thou shalt
y: 5:28 But I say unto you, That whosoever looketh
h committed adultery with her already
his heart.
fend thee, pluck it out, and cast it from
one of thy members should
 that thy whole body should be cast into hell.
thee, cut it off, and cast it from
for it is profitable for thee that one of thy members should
hy whole body should be cast into hell.

ut away his wife, let him
ing of divorcement: 5:32 But I say unto you, That
, saving for the cause of
useth her to commit adultery: and whosoever shall marry
teth adultery.
d that it hath been said by them of old time,
shalt perform unto the Lord thine
5:34 But I say unto you, Swear not at all; neither by heaven;
e: 5:35 Nor by the earth; for it is his
ootstool: neither by Jerusalem; for it is the city of the great King.
r shalt thou swear by thy head, because thou canst not make
.
ea, yea; Nay, nay: for whatsoever
 than these cometh of evil.
e heard that it hath been said, An eye for an eye, and a
t I say unto you, That ye resist not evil:
ght cheek, turn to him the

law, and take away thy coat,
 thy cloak also.
ll compel thee to go a mile, go with him twain.
, and from him that would borrow of
turn not thou away.
that it hath been said, Thou shalt love thy
4 But I say unto you, Love your enemies, bless them that curse you,
 that hate you, and pray for them which despitefully
45 That ye may be the children of your
ther which is in heaven: for he maketh his sun to rise on the evil
 and sendeth rain on the just and on the unjust.
ove you, what reward have ye? do not
 the publicans the same?  5:47 And if ye salute your brethren
 than others? do not even the publicans so?  5:48
your Father which is in heaven is
.
s before men, to be seen of them:
se ye have no reward of your Father which is in heaven.
oest thine alms, do not sound a trumpet
efore thee, as the hypocrites do in the synagogues and in the
y have glory of men. Verily I say unto you, They
 thou doest alms, let not thy left hand know what thy
ine alms may be in secret: and thy Father
d thee openly.
t, thou shalt not be as the hypocrites are:
ynagogues and in the corners of
ts, that they may be seen of men. Verily I say unto you, They

to thy closet, and when thou
y door, pray to thy Father which is in secret; and thy
 shall reward thee openly.
 ye pray, use not vain repetitions, as the heathen do: for
ll be heard for their much speaking.
8 Be not ye therefore like unto them: for your Father knoweth what
eed of, before ye ask him.
is manner therefore pray ye: Our Father which art in

 in earth, as it is in heaven.
e us this day our daily bread.
 forgive us our debts, as we forgive our debtors.
ation, but deliver us from evil: For
e is the kingdom, and the power, and the glory, for ever. Amen.
rgive men their trespasses, your heavenly Father will
 ye forgive not men their trespasses,
ther will your Father forgive your trespasses.
, as the hypocrites, of a sad
: for they disfigure their faces, that they may appear unto
ay unto you, They have their reward.
17 But thou, when thou fastest, anoint thine head, and wash thy
u appear not unto men to fast, but unto thy Father
er, which seeth in secret, shall
hee openly.
ves treasures upon earth, where moth and
rust doth corrupt, and where thieves break through and steal: 6:20 But
ourselves treasures in heaven, where neither moth nor rust
thieves do not break through nor steal: 6:21
 your heart be also.
the body is the eye: if therefore thine eye be
 of light.
l, thy whole body shall be full of
ss.
hee be darkness, how great is that
ss!  6:24 No man can serve two masters: for either he will hate
he other; or else he will hold to the one, and
od and mammon.
o you, Take no thought for your life, what ye
r yet for your body, what ye
. Is not the life more than meat, and the body than
 of the air: for they sow not, neither
 they reap, nor gather into barns; yet your heavenly Father feedeth
t much better than they?  6:27 Which of you by taking
o his stature?  6:28 And why take ye
ght for raiment? Consider the lilies of the field, how they grow;
ither do they spin: 6:29 And yet I say unto you, That
 was not arrayed like one of these.
0 Wherefore, if God so clothe the grass of the field, which to day
w is cast into the oven, shall he not much more clothe
6:31 Therefore take no thought, saying,
hat shall we eat? or, What shall we drink? or, Wherewithal shall we
32 (For after all these things do the Gentiles seek:)
eth that ye have need of all these
.
 God, and his righteousness; and
e things shall be added unto you.
Take therefore no thought for the morrow: for the morrow shall
 things of itself. Sufficient unto the day is the
hat ye be not judged.
 judgment ye judge, ye shall be judged: and with what
measured to you again.
ldest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but
 is in thine own eye?  7:4 Or how wilt
ou say to thy brother, Let me pull out the mote out of thine eye;
am is in thine own eye?  7:5 Thou hypocrite, first
wn eye; and then shalt thou see
o cast out the mote out of thy brother's eye.
o the dogs, neither cast ye your
efore swine, lest they trample them under their feet, and turn

k, and ye shall find; knock,
 be opened unto you: 7:8 For every one that asketh
indeth; and to him that knocketh it
 be opened.
 you, whom if his son ask bread, will he
give him a stone?  7:10 Or if he ask a fish, will he give him a
e then, being evil, know how to give good gifts
hall your Father which is in heaven
good things to them that ask him?  7:12 Therefore all things
at men should do to you, do ye even so to them:
s.
 for wide is the gate, and broad
ay, that leadeth to destruction, and many there be which go in
e strait is the gate, and narrow is the way, which
 be that find it.
prophets, which come to you in sheep's clothing,
ves.
ruits. Do men gather grapes of
 figs of thistles?  7:17 Even so every good tree bringeth
orrupt tree bringeth forth evil fruit.
7:18 A good tree cannot bring forth evil fruit, neither can a corrupt
rth good fruit.
ingeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and
 by their fruits ye shall know them.
21 Not every one that saith unto me, Lord, Lord, shall enter into
aven; but he that doeth the will of my Father which
 say to me in that day, Lord, Lord, have we not
name have cast out devils? and in
e done many wonderful works?  7:23 And then will I profess unto
you: depart from me, ye that work iniquity.
e sayings of mine, and doeth
 liken him unto a wise man, which built his house upon a
scended, and the floods came, and the winds
fell not: for it was founded

sayings of mine, and doeth them
l be likened unto a foolish man, which built his house upon
rain descended, and the floods came, and the
and it fell: and great was the
.
had ended these sayings, the
astonished at his doctrine: 7:29 For he taught them as one
t as the scribes.
down from the mountain, great multitudes followed
me a leper and worshipped him, saying, Lord,
.
 touched him, saying, I will; be
an. And immediately his leprosy was cleansed.
hou tell no man; but go thy way,
self to the priest, and offer the gift that Moses commanded,
hem.
o Capernaum, there came unto him a
ion, beseeching him, 8:6 And saying, Lord, my servant lieth at
sy, grievously tormented.
 saith unto him, I will come and heal him.
ord, I am not worthy that thou
come under my roof: but speak the word only, and my servant
 For I am a man under authority, having soldiers under me: and I
o, and he goeth; and to another, Come, and he
nd he doeth it.
t, he marvelled, and said to them that
llowed, Verily I say unto you, I have not found so great faith, no,

l come from the east and west,
sit down with Abraham, and Isaac, and Jacob, in the kingdom
the children of the kingdom shall be cast out into outer
eeping and gnashing of teeth.
Jesus said unto the centurion, Go thy way; and as thou hast
 unto thee. And his servant was healed in the
 was come into Peter's house, he saw his wife's

ver left her: and she arose,
ed unto them.
me, they brought unto him many that were
possessed with devils: and he cast out the spirits with his word, and
at were sick: 8:17 That it might be fulfilled which was
t, saying, Himself took our infirmities,
and bare our sicknesses.
Jesus saw great multitudes about him, he gave
side.
nd said unto him, Master, I will
hee whithersoever thou goest.
Jesus saith unto him, The foxes have holes, and the birds of
t the Son of man hath not where to lay his head.
s said unto him, Lord, suffer me first
 go and bury my father.
said unto him, Follow me; and let the dead bury their
 entered into a ship, his disciples followed him.
 great tempest in the sea, insomuch
the ship was covered with the waves: but he was asleep.
me to him, and awoke him, saying, Lord, save
to them, Why are ye fearful, O ye of little faith?
inds and the sea; and there was a
alm.
, What manner of man is this, that
he winds and the sea obey him!  8:28 And when he was come to the
e country of the Gergesenes, there met him two
 the tombs, exceeding fierce, so
man might pass by that way.
ehold, they cried out, saying, What have we to do with
? art thou come hither to torment us
re the time?  8:30 And there was a good way off from them an herd
ding.
saying, If thou cast us out, suffer
 go away into the herd of swine.
nd he said unto them, Go. And when they were come out, they went
wine: and, behold, the whole herd of swine ran
e sea, and perished in the waters.
 And they that kept them fled, and went their ways into the city,
ing, and what was befallen to the possessed of the
 whole city came out to meet Jesus: and when they
e would depart out of their coasts.
 And he entered into a ship, and passed over, and came into his own
d, behold, they brought to him a man sick of the palsy, lying on
eeing their faith said unto the sick of the palsy;
be forgiven thee.
ain of the scribes said within themselves, This
nowing their thoughts said, Wherefore think ye evil in
r is easier, to say, Thy sins be forgiven
t that ye may know that the
th power on earth to forgive sins, (then saith he to the
 take up thy bed, and go unto thine house.
house.
it, they marvelled, and glorified God,
ich had given such power unto men.
And as Jesus passed forth from thence, he saw a man, named
receipt of custom: and he saith unto him,
.
t at meat in the house, behold,
icans and sinners came and sat down with him and his
e Pharisees saw it, they said unto his disciples, Why
cans and sinners?  9:12 But when Jesus
ard that, he said unto them, They that be whole need not a
 are sick.
t that meaneth, I will have mercy, and not
 righteous, but sinners to

hn, saying, Why do we and the
ast oft, but thy disciples fast not?  9:15 And Jesus said
en of the bridechamber mourn, as long as the
will come, when the bridegroom
aken from them, and then shall they fast.
h unto an old garment, for that
put in to fill it up taketh from the garment, and the rent is
either do men put new wine into old bottles: else the bottles
unneth out, and the bottles perish: but they put
h are preserved.
ese things unto them, behold, there came a
g, My daughter is even now
 and lay thy hand upon her, and she shall live.
d him, and so did his disciples.
nd, behold, a woman, which was diseased with an issue of blood
ehind him, and touched the hem of his garment:
 I may but touch his garment, I
whole.
 and when he saw her, he said,
be of good comfort; thy faith hath made thee whole. And the
om that hour.
into the ruler's house, and saw the minstrels
e said unto them, Give place: for
d is not dead, but sleepeth. And they laughed him to scorn.
ple were put forth, he went in, and took her by
26 And the fame hereof went abroad into all that land.
ed thence, two blind men followed him,
ying, and saying, Thou son of David, have mercy on us.
into the house, the blind men came to him:
at I am able to do this? They
im, Yea, Lord.
ir eyes, saying, According to your faith be it
e opened; and Jesus straitly charged them,
 But they, when they were departed, spread abroad his fame in all
9:32 As they went out, behold, they brought to him a dumb man
l.
, the dumb spake: and the
elled, saying, It was never so seen in Israel.
steth out devils through the prince
e devils.
 the cities and villages, teaching in
ir synagogues, and preaching the gospel of the kingdom, and healing
and every disease among the people.
6 But when he saw the multitudes, he was moved with compassion on
y fainted, and were scattered abroad, as sheep having
th he unto his disciples, The harvest truly is plenteous,
; 9:38 Pray ye therefore the Lord of the
harvest, that he will send forth labourers into his harvest.
 called unto him his twelve disciples, he gave
to cast them out, and to heal all
of sickness and all manner of disease.
10:2 Now the names of the twelve apostles are these; The first, Simon,
d Peter, and Andrew his brother; James the son of Zebedee,
:3 Philip, and Bartholomew; Thomas, and
atthew the publican; James the son of Alphaeus, and Lebbaeus, whose
ddaeus; 10:4 Simon the Canaanite, and Judas Iscariot,
5 These twelve Jesus sent forth, and commanded them, saying, Go not
 the Gentiles, and into any city of the Samaritans
 to the lost sheep of the house of
.
e kingdom of heaven is at hand.
al the sick, cleanse the lepers, raise the dead, cast out
ceived, freely give.
er gold, nor silver, nor brass in your purses, 10:10
ither two coats, neither shoes, nor yet
taves: for the workman is worthy of his meat.
own ye shall enter, enquire who in
worthy; and there abide till ye go thence.
salute it.
rthy, let your peace come upon it: but if
o you.
ceive you, nor hear your words, when
epart out of that house or city, shake off the dust of your feet.
say unto you, It shall be more tolerable for the land
day of judgment, than for that city.
:16 Behold, I send you forth as sheep in the midst of wolves: be ye
as serpents, and harmless as doves.
17 But beware of men: for they will deliver you up to the councils,
courge you in their synagogues; 10:18 And ye shall be
kings for my sake, for a testimony
t them and the Gentiles.
 they deliver you up, take no thought how or what ye
iven you in that same hour what ye shall
speak.
k, but the Spirit of your Father which
eaketh in you.
all deliver up the brother to death, and the
ll rise up against their
se them to be put to death.
e shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that
ll be saved.
ute you in this city, flee ye into another:
 have gone over the cities of
l the Son of man be come.
ciple is not above his master, nor the servant above his
h for the disciple that he be as his master, and the
ave called the master of the house
bub, how much more shall they call them of his household?  10:26
efore: for there is nothing covered, that shall not
l not be known.
n darkness, that speak ye in light: and what ye
n the housetops.
m which kill the body, but are not able to kill
 is able to destroy both soul and
 hell.
for a farthing? and one of them shall
 fall on the ground without your Father.

e all numbered.
fore, ye are of more value than many sparrows.
nfess me before men, him will I
lso before my Father which is in heaven.

 men, him will I also deny
er which is in heaven.
that I am come to send peace on earth: I came not to
:35 For I am come to set a man at variance against his father, and
inst her mother, and the daughter in law against her
man's foes shall be they of his own household.
her more than me is not worthy of
 he that loveth son or daughter more than me is not worthy of
hat taketh not his cross, and followeth after me, is not
that findeth his life shall lose it: and he that loseth his
find it.
ceiveth me, and he that receiveth me
iveth him that sent me.
eceiveth a prophet in the name of a prophet shall
e that receiveth a righteous man in
ame of a righteous man shall receive a righteous man's reward.
r shall give to drink unto one of these little ones
 name of a disciple, verily I say unto
u, he shall in no wise lose his reward.

made an end of commanding his
iples, he departed thence to teach and to preach in their
John had heard in the prison the works of Christ, he
3 And said unto him, Art thou he that
uld come, or do we look for another?  11:4 Jesus answered and said
d shew John again those things which ye do hear and
ir sight, and the lame walk, the lepers
re cleansed, and the deaf hear, the dead are raised up, and the poor
l preached to them.
 he, whosoever shall not be offended in me.
n to say unto the multitudes
ohn, What went ye out into the wilderness to see? A reed
8 But what went ye out for to see? A man
clothed in soft raiment?  behold, they that wear soft clothing are in
.
 A prophet? yea, I say unto you,
 than a prophet.
of whom it is written, Behold, I send my
messenger before thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee.
I say unto you, Among them that are born of women there
an John the Baptist: notwithstanding he
hat is least in the kingdom of heaven is greater than he.
 of John the Baptist until now the kingdom of
olent take it by force.
he prophets and the law prophesied until John.
his is Elias, which was for to come.
:15 He that hath ears to hear, let him hear.
is generation? It is like unto
itting in the markets, and calling unto their fellows, 11:17
ped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have
ented.
ng nor drinking, and they say, He hath
devil.
 and drinking, and they say, Behold a
 gluttonous, and a winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners.
tified of her children.
n he to upbraid the cities wherein most of his mighty
 repented not: 11:21 Woe unto thee,
zin! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the mighty works, which
 been done in Tyre and Sidon, they would have
hes.
 be more tolerable for Tyre and
the day of judgment, than for you.
3 And thou, Capernaum, which art exalted unto heaven, shalt be
: for if the mighty works, which have been done in
 would have remained until this day.
:24 But I say unto you, That it shall be more tolerable for the land
e day of judgment, than for thee.
 At that time Jesus answered and said, I thank thee, O Father,
arth, because thou hast hid these things from the
ed them unto babes.
er: for so it seemed good in thy sight.

 my Father: and no man
ut the Father; neither knoweth any man the Father,
er the Son will reveal him.
unto me, all ye that labour and are heavy laden, and I will
 Take my yoke upon you, and learn of me; for I am meek and lowly
hall find rest unto your souls.
or my yoke is easy, and my burden is light.
abbath day through the corn; and
iples were an hungred, and began to pluck the ears of corn and
when the Pharisees saw it, they said unto him, Behold, thy
is not lawful to do upon the sabbath day.
 read what David did, when he
red, and they that were with him; 12:4 How he entered into
d eat the shewbread, which was not lawful for
re with him, but only for the
2:5 Or have ye not read in the law, how that on the sabbath
 temple profane the sabbath, and are blameless?
is place is one greater than the

eth, I will have mercy, and not
, ye would not have condemned the guiltless.
 of the sabbath day.
as departed thence, he went into their synagogue:
n which had his hand withered. And
sked him, saying, Is it lawful to heal on the sabbath days? that
him.
man shall there be among you, that
have one sheep, and if it fall into a pit on the sabbath day,
on it, and lift it out?  12:12 How much then is a
e it is lawful to do well on the
days.
tretch forth thine hand. And he
 it forth; and it was restored whole, like as the other.
 went out, and held a council against him, how
 when Jesus knew it, he withdrew himself from thence: and
 him, and he healed them all; 12:16 And
harged them that they should not make him known: 12:17 That it might
hich was spoken by Esaias the prophet, saying, 12:18
 chosen; my beloved, in whom my soul is
ell pleased: I will put my spirit upon him, and he shall shew
les.
; neither shall any man hear his
 the streets.
l he not break, and smoking flax shall he not
nto victory.
l the Gentiles trust.
ought unto him one possessed with a devil, blind, and
much that the blind and dumb both spake
nd saw.
mazed, and said, Is not this the son of
avid?  12:24 But when the Pharisees heard it, they said, This fellow
out devils, but by Beelzebub the prince of the devils.
 thoughts, and said unto them, Every kingdom
esolation; and every city or
d against itself shall not stand: 12:26 And if Satan cast
against himself; how shall then his kingdom
t out devils, by whom do your
st them out? therefore they shall be your judges.
by the Spirit of God, then the kingdom
 God is come unto you.
w can one enter into a strong man's house, and spoil
d the strong man? and then he will spoil
his house.
 is against me; and he that gathereth not
fore I say unto you, All manner of sin and blasphemy shall
t the blasphemy against the Holy Ghost shall
 whosoever speaketh a word against the Son of man, it shall
osoever speaketh against the Holy Ghost, it
his world, neither in the world

s fruit good; or else make the
pt, and his fruit corrupt: for the tree is known by his
n of vipers, how can ye, being evil, speak good
f the heart the mouth speaketh.
 good man out of the good treasure of the heart bringeth forth
evil man out of the evil treasure bringeth forth
to you, That every idle word that men shall speak,
in the day of judgment.
y words thou shalt be justified, and by thy words thou
 Then certain of the scribes and of the Pharisees answered,
d see a sign from thee.
swered and said unto them, An evil and adulterous
and there shall no sign be given to
ut the sign of the prophet Jonas: 12:40 For as Jonas was three
s in the whale's belly; so shall the Son of man be
he heart of the earth.
 Nineveh shall rise in judgment with this generation,
 they repented at the preaching of Jonas;
.
se up in the judgment with this
n, and shall condemn it: for she came from the uttermost
 the wisdom of Solomon; and, behold, a
eater than Solomon is here.
the unclean spirit is gone out of a man, he walketh through
t, and findeth none.
h, I will return into my house from whence I came
eth it empty, swept, and garnished.
45 Then goeth he, and taketh with himself seven other spirits more
elf, and they enter in and dwell there: and the last
n the first. Even so shall it be also
o this wicked generation.
e yet talked to the people, behold, his mother and his
ring to speak with him.
said unto him, Behold, thy mother and thy brethren
 with thee.
aid unto him that told him, Who is my
her?  and who are my brethren?  12:49 And he stretched forth his
sciples, and said, Behold my mother and my brethren!
he will of my Father which is in heaven,
the same is my brother, and sister, and mother.
of the house, and sat by the sea

ogether unto him, so that he
ship, and sat; and the whole multitude stood on the shore.
 things unto them in parables, saying, Behold, a
when he sowed, some seeds fell by
 side, and the fowls came and devoured them up: 13:5 Some fell
here they had not much earth: and forthwith they
pness of earth: 13:6 And when the
 up, they were scorched; and because they had no root, they
And some fell among thorns; and the thorns sprung up, and choked
er fell into good ground, and brought forth fruit,
old, some thirtyfold.
s to hear, let him hear.
disciples came, and said unto him, Why speakest thou
He answered and said unto them, Because
t is given unto you to know the mysteries of the kingdom of heaven,
is not given.
 to him shall be given, and he shall have
rom him shall be taken away
hath.
n parables: because they seeing see
and hearing they hear not, neither do they understand.
lled the prophecy of Esaias, which saith, By
nderstand; and seeing ye shall
hall not perceive: 13:15 For this people's heart is waxed
 dull of hearing, and their eyes they have
 with their eyes and hear with
, and should understand with their heart, and should be
l them.
, for they see: and your ears, for they
ear.
hat many prophets and righteous men
desired to see those things which ye see, and have not seen them;
 things which ye hear, and have not heard them.
le of the sower.
reth the word of the kingdom, and understandeth
 and catcheth away that which was
 his heart. This is he which received seed by the way side.
eived the seed into stony places, the same is he
th joy receiveth it; 13:21 Yet hath
t root in himself, but dureth for a while: for when tribulation
eth because of the word, by and by he is offended.
ed among the thorns is he that heareth
e word; and the care of this world, and the deceitfulness of riches,
, and he becometh unfruitful.
 he that received seed into the good ground is he that
tandeth it; which also beareth fruit, and
 sixty, some thirty.
ble put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom of
ch sowed good seed in his field: 13:25
t while men slept, his enemy came and sowed tares among the wheat,
.
p, and brought forth fruit, then
 the tares also.
of the householder came and said unto him, Sir,
 field? from whence then hath it
13:28 He said unto them, An enemy hath done this. The servants
thou then that we go and gather them up?  13:29
her up the tares, ye root up also
at with them.
her until the harvest: and in the time of
 ye together first the tares,
em in bundles to burn them: but gather the wheat into my
able put he forth unto them, saying, The kingdom of
stard seed, which a man took, and sowed
n his field: 13:32 Which indeed is the least of all seeds: but when
 is the greatest among herbs, and becometh a tree, so
e and lodge in the branches thereof.
:33 Another parable spake he unto them; The kingdom of heaven is
which a woman took, and hid in three measures of

o the multitude in parables; and
a parable spake he not unto them: 13:35 That it might be
 by the prophet, saying, I will open my
outh in parables; I will utter things which have been kept secret
on of the world.
the multitude away, and went into the house: and
g, Declare unto us the parable of
es of the field.
said unto them, He that soweth the good seed is
the world; the good seed are the
 of the kingdom; but the tares are the children of the wicked
that sowed them is the devil; the harvest is the
are the angels.
tares are gathered and burned in the fire; so

his angels, and they shall
his kingdom all things that offend, and them which do
t them into a furnace of fire: there
l be wailing and gnashing of teeth.
43 Then shall the righteous shine forth as the sun in the kingdom
Who hath ears to hear, let him hear.
:44 Again, the kingdom of heaven is like unto treasure hid in a
en a man hath found, he hideth, and for joy thereof
ath, and buyeth that field.
, the kingdom of heaven is like unto a merchant man,
ho, when he had found one pearl of great
price, went and sold all that he had, and bought it.
heaven is like unto a net, that was cast
into the sea, and gathered of every kind: 13:48 Which, when it was
to shore, and sat down, and gathered the good into

world: the angels shall come
ever the wicked from among the just, 13:50 And shall cast
fire: there shall be wailing and gnashing of
 Have ye understood all these things? They
aid he unto them, Therefore every scribe which is
aven is like unto a man that is an
older, which bringeth forth out of his treasure things new and
 came to pass, that when Jesus had finished these
13:54 And when he was come into his own country, he taught them in
 insomuch that they were astonished, and said, Whence
d these mighty works?  13:55 Is not this
the carpenter's son? is not his mother called Mary? and his brethren,
ses, and Simon, and Judas?  13:56 And his sisters, are
 then hath this man all these things?
57 And they were offended in him. But Jesus said unto them, A
t honour, save in his own country, and in his own
ny mighty works there because of their
belief.
rarch heard of the fame of Jesus, 14:2
d said unto his servants, This is John the Baptist; he is risen from
therefore mighty works do shew forth themselves in him.
old on John, and bound him, and put him in
hilip's wife.
im, It is not lawful for thee to have her.
 death, he feared the multitude,
they counted him as a prophet.
 when Herod's birthday was kept, the daughter of Herodias
leased Herod.
d with an oath to give her whatsoever she
instructed of her mother, said, Give me
ere John Baptist's head in a charger.
4:9 And the king was sorry: nevertheless for the oath's sake, and
th him at meat, he commanded it to be given her.
John in the prison.
was brought in a charger, and given to the damsel:
.
k up the body, and buried it, and
d told Jesus.
 it, he departed thence by ship into a desert
heard thereof, they followed him
out of the cities.
 forth, and saw a great multitude, and was moved
e healed their sick.
was evening, his disciples came to him, saying, This
e is now past; send the multitude away,
hat they may go into the villages, and buy themselves victuals.
aid unto them, They need not depart; give ye them to
o him, We have here but five loaves, and two
ither to me.
 multitude to sit down on the grass, and
took the five loaves, and the two fishes, and looking up to heaven, he
 brake, and gave the loaves to his disciples, and the

led: and they took up of the
at remained twelve baskets full.
And they that had eaten were about five thousand men, beside

is disciples to get into a
o before him unto the other side, while he sent the
hen he had sent the multitudes away, he went up into a
when the evening was come, he was there
lone.
 midst of the sea, tossed with waves:
 the wind was contrary.
e fourth watch of the night Jesus went unto them,
when the disciples saw him walking on the sea, they were
spirit; and they cried out for fear.
:27 But straightway Jesus spake unto them, saying, Be of good cheer;
t afraid.
and said, Lord, if it be thou, bid me
e unto thee on the water.
said, Come. And when Peter was come down out of the ship,
o go to Jesus.
e wind boisterous, he was afraid; and
inning to sink, he cried, saying, Lord, save me.
tched forth his hand, and caught him,
 said unto him, O thou of little faith, wherefore didst thou doubt?
they were come into the ship, the wind ceased.
hip came and worshipped him, saying,
 truth thou art the Son of God.
nd when they were gone over, they came into the land of
en the men of that place had knowledge of him, they sent
round about, and brought unto him all that
at they might only touch the
arment: and as many as touched were made perfectly whole.
 scribes and Pharisees, which were of
usalem, saying, 15:2 Why do thy disciples transgress the tradition
or they wash not their hands when they eat bread.
nto them, Why do ye also transgress the
ommandment of God by your tradition?  15:4 For God commanded, saying,
ther and mother: and, He that curseth father or mother,
5:5 But ye say, Whosoever shall say to his father or his mother, It
hatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; 15:6 And
ther, he shall be free. Thus have ye
 the commandment of God of none effect by your tradition.
l did Esaias prophesy of you, saying, 15:8 This
eir mouth, and honoureth me with
ps; but their heart is far from me.
9 But in vain they do worship me, teaching for doctrines the

aid unto them, Hear, and
1 Not that which goeth into the mouth defileth a man;
the mouth, this defileth a man.
hen came his disciples, and said unto him, Knowest thou that
ended, after they heard this saying?  15:13 But
which my heavenly Father hath not
, shall be rooted up.
one: they be blind leaders of the blind. And if the
l fall into the ditch.
red Peter and said unto him, Declare unto us this
 Are ye also yet without understanding?  15:17 Do
oever entereth in at the mouth goeth
 the belly, and is cast out into the draught?  15:18 But those
 out of the mouth come forth from the heart; and
out of the heart proceed evil thoughts, murders, adulteries,
false witness, blasphemies: 15:20 These are the
at with unwashen hands defileth not
.
arted into the coasts of Tyre and

me out of the same coasts, and
 him, saying, Have mercy on me, O Lord, thou son of David;
y vexed with a devil.
ered her not a word. And his disciples came and
; for she crieth after us.
 answered and said, I am not sent but unto the lost sheep

saying, Lord, help me.
wered and said, It is not meet to take the children's
.
the dogs eat of the crumbs which
m their masters' table.
s answered and said unto her, O woman, great is thy
thou wilt. And her daughter was made
e from that very hour.
departed from thence, and came nigh unto the sea of
ntain, and sat down there.
eat multitudes came unto him, having with them those that
aimed, and many others, and cast them down at
1 Insomuch that the multitude
hen they saw the dumb to speak, the maimed to be whole, the
lind to see: and they glorified the God of
isciples unto him, and said, I have
ssion on the multitude, because they continue with me now three
ing to eat: and I will not send them away fasting,
5:33 And his disciples say unto him, Whence should we have so much
derness, as to fill so great a multitude?  15:34 And
y loaves have ye? And they said, Seven,
nd a few little fishes.
mmanded the multitude to sit down on the ground.
es and the fishes, and gave thanks,
rake them, and gave to his disciples, and the disciples to the
And they did all eat, and were filled: and they took up of the
 left seven baskets full.
y that did eat were four thousand men, beside women and
ent away the multitude, and took ship, and came into the
 The Pharisees also with the Sadducees came, and tempting desired
 shew them a sign from heaven.
answered and said unto them, When it is evening, ye say, It
or the sky is red.
ing, It will be foul weather to day: for the sky
es, ye can discern the face of the
ut can ye not discern the signs of the times?  16:4 A wicked and
ion seeketh after a sign; and there shall no sign be
 the prophet Jonas. And he left them,
 departed.
were come to the other side, they had
gotten to take bread.
aid unto them, Take heed and beware of the leaven of
cees.
selves, saying, It is because we have
en no bread.
eived, he said unto them, O ye of little
faith, why reason ye among yourselves, because ye have brought no
e not yet understand, neither remember the five
w many baskets ye took up?  16:10
 the seven loaves of the four thousand, and how many baskets ye
 is it that ye do not understand that I spake it
ye should beware of the leaven of
risees and of the Sadducees?  16:12 Then understood they how
beware of the leaven of bread, but of the
ucees.
oasts of Caesarea Philippi, he asked
disciples, saying, Whom do men say that I the Son of man am?
ome say that thou art John the Baptist: some,
f the prophets.
m, But whom say ye that I am?  16:16 And Simon
e Christ, the Son of the living
6:17 And Jesus answered and said unto him, Blessed art thou, Simon
sh and blood hath not revealed it unto thee, but my
6:18 And I say also unto thee, That thou art Peter, and upon this
 my church; and the gates of hell shall not prevail
 give unto thee the keys of the kingdom of heaven: and
n earth shall be bound in heaven: and
tsoever thou shalt loose on earth shall be loosed in heaven.
e his disciples that they should tell no man that
 From that time forth began Jesus to shew unto his disciples, how
nto Jerusalem, and suffer many things of the elders
and be killed, and be raised again the
ird day.
 began to rebuke him, saying, Be it far
rom thee, Lord: this shall not be unto thee.
eter, Get thee behind me, Satan:
 an offence unto me: for thou savourest not the things that be
at be of men.
o his disciples, If any man will come after
is cross, and follow me.
oever will save his life shall lose it: and whosoever
e shall find it.
n profited, if he shall gain the whole world,
a man give in exchange for his
27 For the Son of man shall come in the glory of his Father
en he shall reward every man according to his
, There be some standing here, which shall
n of man coming in his
nd after six days Jesus taketh Peter, James, and John his
m up into an high mountain apart, 17:2 And
ce did shine as the sun, and
was white as the light.
d, there appeared unto them Moses and Elias talking
 Peter, and said unto Jesus, Lord, it is good for us
us make here three tabernacles; one for
hee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias.
ght cloud overshadowed them: and
 voice out of the cloud, which said, This is my beloved Son,
sed; hear ye him.
ciples heard it, they fell on their face, and
ame and touched them, and said, Arise, and be not
 lifted up their eyes, they saw no man, save
own from the mountain, Jesus charged them,
 the Son of man be risen again
ead.
 saying, Why then say the scribes
ias must first come?  17:11 And Jesus answered and said unto
l first come, and restore all things.
7:12 But I say unto you, That Elias is come already, and they knew
e done unto him whatsoever they listed. Likewise shall
f them.
tood that he spake unto them of John
Baptist.
to the multitude, there came to him a
tain man, kneeling down to him, and saying, 17:15 Lord, have mercy
e is lunatick, and sore vexed: for ofttimes he falleth
the water.
hy disciples, and they could not cure him.
faithless and perverse
ng shall I be with you? how long shall I suffer you?
18 And Jesus rebuked the devil; and he departed out of him: and the
 from that very hour.
he disciples to Jesus apart, and said, Why could not
sus said unto them, Because of your
ief: for verily I say unto you, If ye have faith as a grain of
ll say unto this mountain, Remove hence to yonder
othing shall be impossible unto you.
:21 Howbeit this kind goeth not out but by prayer and fasting.
ey abode in Galilee, Jesus said unto them, The Son
e hands of men: 17:23 And they shall
 him, and the third day he shall be raised again.

aum, they that received tribute
e to Peter, and said, Doth not your master pay tribute?
en he was come into the house, Jesus
ented him, saying, What thinkest thou, Simon? of whom do the kings
e custom or tribute? of their own children, or of
o him, Of strangers. Jesus saith unto
, Then are the children free.
withstanding, lest we should offend them, go thou to the sea,
 take up the fish that first cometh up; and when
halt find a piece of money: that
d give unto them for me and thee.
At the same time came the disciples unto Jesus, saying, Who is
kingdom of heaven?  18:2 And Jesus called a little
he midst of them, 18:3 And said,
 say unto you, Except ye be converted, and become as little
enter into the kingdom of heaven.
Whosoever therefore shall humble himself as this little child,
 in the kingdom of heaven.
so shall receive one such little child in my name
hall offend one of these little ones which believe in
at a millstone were hanged about his
, and that he were drowned in the depth of the sea.
se of offences! for it must needs be that
m the offence cometh!  18:8
thy hand or thy foot offend thee, cut them off, and cast
er for thee to enter into life halt or
imed, rather than having two hands or two feet to be cast into

it out, and cast it from
er for thee to enter into life with one eye, rather
 into hell fire.
e despise not one of these little ones; for I
gels do always behold the face of
er which is in heaven.
n of man is come to save that which was lost.
n hundred sheep, and one of them be
astray, doth he not leave the ninety and nine, and goeth into the
eketh that which is gone astray?  18:13 And if so be
unto you, he rejoiceth more of that
, than of the ninety and nine which went not astray.
will of your Father which is in heaven,
hat one of these little ones should perish.
respass against thee, go and tell
 fault between thee and him alone: if he shall hear thee, thou
her.
, then take with thee one or two
at in the mouth of two or three witnesses every word may be
nd if he shall neglect to hear them, tell it unto the church:
hear the church, let him be unto thee as an
rily I say unto you, Whatsoever ye shall bind on earth shall
d whatsoever ye shall loose on earth shall be
y unto you, That if two of you shall agree on earth as
 shall ask, it shall be done for them of
my Father which is in heaven.
 where two or three are gathered together in my name, there
em.
aid, Lord, how oft shall my brother
gainst me, and I forgive him? till seven times?  18:22 Jesus
not unto thee, Until seven times: but, Until
e is the kingdom of heaven likened unto a certain king,
 his servants.
gun to reckon, one was brought unto him, which
:25 But forasmuch as he had not to pay, his lord commanded him to be
wife, and children, and all that he had, and payment to
nt therefore fell down, and worshipped him, saying,
d I will pay thee all.
ord of that servant was moved with compassion, and
debt.
ut, and found one of his
which owed him an hundred pence: and he laid hands on
at, saying, Pay me that thou owest.
29 And his fellowservant fell down at his feet, and besought him,
ence with me, and I will pay thee all.
18:30 And he would not: but went and cast him into prison, till he
ebt.
aw what was done, they were very
nd came and told unto their lord all that was done.
at he had called him, said unto him, O
ou wicked servant, I forgave thee all that debt, because thou
houldest not thou also have had compassion on thy
 on thee?  18:34 And his lord was
and delivered him to the tormentors, till he should pay all

her do also unto you, if ye
rts forgive not every one his brother their trespasses.
 that when Jesus had finished these sayings,
o the coasts of Judaea beyond
2 And great multitudes followed him; and he healed them
s also came unto him, tempting him, and saying unto
put away his wife for every cause?
nd he answered and said unto them, Have ye not read, that he
 beginning made them male and female, 19:5 And
ve father and mother, and shall
 his wife: and they twain shall be one flesh?  19:6 Wherefore
n, but one flesh. What therefore God hath joined

then command to give a writing
ment, and to put her away?  19:8 He saith unto them, Moses
of your hearts suffered you to put away your
ot so.
er shall put away his wife, except it
for fornication, and shall marry another, committeth adultery: and
er which is put away doth commit adultery.
he case of the man be so with
t is not good to marry.
id unto them, All men cannot receive this saying, save

ere so born from their
 there are some eunuchs, which were made eunuchs of
h have made themselves eunuchs for the
ngdom of heaven's sake. He that is able to receive it, let him
 Then were there brought unto him little children, that he should
them, and pray: and the disciples rebuked them.
le children, and forbid them not, to
 unto me: for of such is the kingdom of heaven.
em, and departed thence.
old, one came and said unto him, Good Master, what good
y have eternal life?  19:17 And he said
nto him, Why callest thou me good? there is none good but one, that
 thou wilt enter into life, keep the commandments.
? Jesus said, Thou shalt do no murder,
ou shalt not commit adultery, Thou shalt not steal, Thou shalt not
ss, 19:19 Honour thy father and thy mother: and, Thou
hyself.
him, All these things have I kept from
 youth up: what lack I yet?  19:21 Jesus said unto him, If thou wilt
 and sell that thou hast, and give to the poor, and thou
ven: and come and follow me.
when the young man heard that saying, he went away
essions.
 disciples, Verily I say unto you, That
 rich man shall hardly enter into the kingdom of heaven.
to you, It is easier for a camel to go through
 man to enter into the kingdom of

ere exceedingly amazed,
can be saved?  19:26 But Jesus beheld them, and said
possible; but with God all things are
sible.
id unto him, Behold, we have forsaken
, and followed thee; what shall we have therefore?  19:28 And Jesus
 Verily I say unto you, That ye which have followed me,
e Son of man shall sit in the throne of his
rones, judging the twelve
l.
en houses, or brethren, or
ther, or mother, or wife, or children, or lands, for my
an hundredfold, and shall inherit
ting life.
t shall be last; and the last shall be
rst.
like unto a man that is an
hich went out early in the morning to hire labourers
 when he had agreed with the labourers for a penny a day, he
eyard.
hird hour, and saw others standing
n the marketplace, 20:4 And said unto them; Go ye also into the
oever is right I will give you. And they went their
about the sixth and ninth hour, and did
ikewise.
ur he went out, and found others
 idle, and saith unto them, Why stand ye here all the day
 him, Because no man hath hired us. He saith
d; and whatsoever is right, that
 receive.
he lord of the vineyard saith unto his
eward, Call the labourers, and give them their hire, beginning from
he first.
were hired about the eleventh hour, they
received every man a penny.
hen the first came, they supposed that they should have
ewise received every man a penny.
 And when they had received it, they murmured against the goodman
12 Saying, These last have wrought but one hour, and
 us, which have borne the burden and
 of the day.
of them, and said, Friend, I do thee no
rong: didst not thou agree with me for a penny?  20:14 Take that
hy way: I will give unto this last, even as unto
r me to do what I will with mine own? Is
thine eye evil, because I am good?  20:16 So the last shall be first,
 last: for many be called, but few chosen.
took the twelve disciples apart
y, and said unto them, 20:18 Behold, we go up to Jerusalem;
l be betrayed unto the chief priests and unto
im to death, 20:19 And shall
to the Gentiles to mock, and to scourge, and to crucify
hall rise again.
 the mother of Zebedees children with her sons,
tain thing of him.
to her, What wilt thou? She saith unto him, Grant
he one on thy right hand, and the
n the left, in thy kingdom.
esus answered and said, Ye know not what ye ask. Are ye
at I shall drink of, and to be baptized
ith the baptism that I am baptized with? They say unto him, We are
nd he saith unto them, Ye shall drink indeed of my cup, and be
ptism that I am baptized with: but to sit on my
mine to give, but it shall be given
em for whom it is prepared of my Father.

re moved with indignation
 brethren.
unto him, and said, Ye know that the
ces of the Gentiles exercise dominion over them, and they that are
uthority upon them.
not be so among you: but whosoever will be great
r; 20:27 And whosoever will be chief
g you, let him be your servant: 20:28 Even as the Son of man came
red unto, but to minister, and to give his life a
they departed from Jericho, a great multitude followed
wo blind men sitting by the way side, when they
ut, saying, Have mercy on us, O
u son of David.
 rebuked them, because they should hold their
g, Have mercy on us, O Lord, thou
David.
 called them, and said, What will ye
 I shall do unto you?  20:33 They say unto him, Lord, that our

and touched their eyes: and
heir eyes received sight, and they followed him.
o Jerusalem, and were come to
unto the mount of Olives, then sent Jesus two disciples,
into the village over against you, and
raightway ye shall find an ass tied, and a colt with her: loose
m unto me.
t unto you, ye shall say, The Lord hath
eed of them; and straightway he will send them.
ight be fulfilled which was spoken by
 prophet, saying, 21:5 Tell ye the daughter of Sion, Behold, thy
hee, meek, and sitting upon an ass, and a colt the
disciples went, and did as Jesus commanded them, 21:7 And
colt, and put on them their clothes, and they
reat multitude spread their garments in the way;
trees, and strawed them in the way.
9 And the multitudes that went before, and that followed, cried,
 the son of David: Blessed is he that cometh in the
e highest.
nto Jerusalem, all the city was moved,
ying, Who is this?  21:11 And the multitude said, This is Jesus the
reth of Galilee.
nto the temple of God, and cast out all them
d overthrew the tables of the
rs, and the seats of them that sold doves, 21:13 And said
 My house shall be called the house of
ayer; but ye have made it a den of thieves.
 to him in the temple; and he
.
scribes saw the wonderful things
did, and the children crying in the temple, and saying,
; they were sore displeased, 21:16 And said
And Jesus saith unto them, Yea;
ever read, Out of the mouth of babes and sucklings thou hast
17 And he left them, and went out of the city

nto the city, he hungered.
en he saw a fig tree in the way, he came to it, and found
es only, and said unto it, Let no fruit grow
sently the fig tree withered
20 And when the disciples saw it, they marvelled, saying, How soon
withered away!  21:21 Jesus answered and said unto
ye have faith, and doubt not, ye shall
t only do this which is done to the fig tree, but also if ye shall
untain, Be thou removed, and be thou cast into the
And all things, whatsoever ye shall ask in prayer, believing, ye
21:23 And when he was come into the temple, the chief priests and the
 people came unto him as he was teaching, and said, By
ese things? and who gave thee this
ity?  21:24 And Jesus answered and said unto them, I also will
hich if ye tell me, I in like wise will tell you
s.
s it? from heaven, or of men? And
asoned with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From heaven;
Why did ye not then believe him?  21:26 But if we
ople; for all hold John as a prophet.
1:27 And they answered Jesus, and said, We cannot tell. And he said
her tell I you by what authority I do these things.
rtain man had two sons; and he came to
e first, and said, Son, go work to day in my vineyard.
, I will not: but afterward he repented, and
nd, and said likewise. And he answered
d said, I go, sir: and went not.
Whether of them twain did the will of his father? They say unto
us saith unto them, Verily I say unto you, That the
to the kingdom of God before you.
 For John came unto you in the way of righteousness, and ye
he publicans and the harlots believed him: and
t afterward, that ye might believe

certain householder, which
yard, and hedged it round about, and digged a winepress
nd let it out to husbandmen, and went into
f the fruit drew near, he sent
ts to the husbandmen, that they might receive the fruits of
sbandmen took his servants, and beat one, and killed

 than the first: and they did
ikewise.
unto them his son, saying, They will
rence my son.
dmen saw the son, they said among themselves,
im, and let us seize on his

 out of the vineyard, and slew
:40 When the lord therefore of the vineyard cometh, what will he do
andmen?  21:41 They say unto him, He will miserably
ill let out his vineyard unto other
ndmen, which shall render him the fruits in their seasons.
 them, Did ye never read in the scriptures, The
the same is become the head of the
: this is the Lord's doing, and it is marvellous in our eyes?
 unto you, The kingdom of God shall be taken from
ng forth the fruits thereof.
whosoever shall fall on this stone shall be broken: but on
, it will grind him to powder.
d when the chief priests and Pharisees had heard his parables,
he spake of them.
ought to lay hands on him, they feared the
rophet.
ke unto them again by parables, and
 22:2 The kingdom of heaven is like unto a certain king, which
his son, 22:3 And sent forth his servants to call
ing: and they would not come.
n, he sent forth other servants, saying, Tell them which are
 prepared my dinner: my oxen and my fatlings are
come unto the marriage.
ade light of it, and went their ways, one to his farm,
22:6 And the remnant took his servants,
nd entreated them spitefully, and slew them.
, he was wroth: and he sent forth
ies, and destroyed those murderers, and burned up their city.
to his servants, The wedding is ready, but they

 and as many as ye shall find,
 marriage.
 out into the highways, and gathered
ther all as many as they found, both bad and good: and the wedding
th guests.
 in to see the guests, he saw there a man
 And he saith unto him,
t thou in hither not having a wedding garment? And he
 said the king to the servants, Bind him hand and foot, and
 him into outer darkness, there shall be
weeping and gnashing of teeth.
r many are called, but few are chosen.
22:15 Then went the Pharisees, and took counsel how they might
talk.
their disciples with the Herodians,
g, Master, we know that thou art true, and teachest the way of
r carest thou for any man: for thou regardest not
us therefore, What thinkest thou? Is it lawful to give
  22:18 But Jesus perceived their
ess, and said, Why tempt ye me, ye hypocrites?  22:19 Shew me
d they brought unto him a penny.
And he saith unto them, Whose is this image and superscription?
 him, Caesar's. Then saith he unto them, Render
ich are Caesar's; and unto God the
 that are God's.
ard these words, they marvelled, and left him,
e day came to him the Sadducees, which say that there is
 him, 22:24 Saying, Master, Moses said, If a
er shall marry his wife, and
d unto his brother.
e with us seven brethren: and the first, when he
 having no issue, left his wife unto
brother: 22:26 Likewise the second also, and the third, unto the
And last of all the woman died also.
:28 Therefore in the resurrection whose wife shall she be of the
ll had her.
id unto them, Ye do err, not knowing the
scriptures, nor the power of God.
 For in the resurrection they neither marry, nor are given in
the angels of God in heaven.
as touching the resurrection of the dead, have ye not read
to you by God, saying, 22:32 I am the God of
 God of Jacob?  God is not the
 dead, but of the living.
n the multitude heard this, they were astonished at his
 the Pharisees had heard that he had put the Sadducees
ed together.
ich was a lawyer, asked him a question,
empting him, and saying, 22:36 Master, which is the great commandment
22:37 Jesus said unto him, Thou shalt love the Lord thy
 with all thy soul, and with all thy mind.
andment.
nto it, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as
thyself.
s hang all the law and the prophets.
:41 While the Pharisees were gathered together, Jesus asked them,
t think ye of Christ? whose son is he? They say unto
3 He saith unto them, How then doth David in spirit call him Lord,
e LORD said unto my Lord, Sit thou on my right hand,
footstool?  22:45 If David then call him
Lord, how is he his son?  22:46 And no man was able to answer him a
urst any man from that day forth ask him any more
us to the multitude, and to his disciples, 23:2
s sit in Moses' seat: 23:3 All
whatsoever they bid you observe, that observe and do; but do
ks: for they say, and do not.
they bind heavy burdens and grievous to be borne, and lay
but they themselves will not move them with
heir works they do for to be seen of men: they make
nlarge the borders of their garments,
6 And love the uppermost rooms at feasts, and the chief seats in
:7 And greetings in the markets, and to be called of
 be not ye called Rabbi: for one is your Master, even Christ;
en.
on the earth: for one is your
ch is in heaven.
lled masters: for one is your Master, even
 among you shall be your servant.
 And whosoever shall exalt himself shall be abased; and he that
f shall be exalted.
you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye shut
t men: for ye neither go in yourselves,
either suffer ye them that are entering to go in.
 Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye devour
ows' houses, and for a pretence make long prayer: therefore ye
eater damnation.
ribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye compass
 and when he is made, ye make him
 more the child of hell than yourselves.

ch say, Whosoever shall swear
le, it is nothing; but whosoever shall swear by the gold of
tor!  23:17 Ye fools and blind: for whether is
t sanctifieth the gold?  23:18
ever shall swear by the altar, it is nothing; but whosoever
at is upon it, he is guilty.
ools and blind: for whether is greater, the gift, or the
 gift?  23:20 Whoso therefore shall swear by
things thereon.
wear by the temple, sweareth by it, and by him
he that shall swear by heaven, sweareth by the throne of
th thereon.
 and Pharisees, hypocrites! for ye pay
the of mint and anise and cummin, and have omitted the weightier
, judgment, mercy, and faith: these ought ye to have
er undone.
 strain at a gnat, and swallow a camel.

, hypocrites! for ye make
de of the cup and of the platter, but within they are

st that which is within the cup
er, that the outside of them may be clean also.
harisees, hypocrites! for ye are like
o whited sepulchres, which indeed appear beautiful outward, but are
dead men's bones, and of all uncleanness.
righteous unto men, but within
l of hypocrisy and iniquity.
unto you, scribes and Pharisees, hypocrites! because ye
hets, and garnish the sepulchres of the
ighteous, 23:30 And say, If we had been in the days of our fathers,
ve been partakers with them in the blood of the
witnesses unto yourselves, that ye are the
ts.
f your fathers.
eneration of vipers, how can ye escape the
old, I send unto you prophets,
en, and scribes: and some of them ye shall kill and crucify;
 ye scourge in your synagogues, and persecute
on you may come all the righteous
hed upon the earth, from the blood of righteous Abel unto the
n of Barachias, whom ye slew between the temple
y unto you, All these things shall come upon this
 Jerusalem, thou that killest the prophets, and
ee, how often would I have gathered
hildren together, even as a hen gathereth her chickens under her
d not!  23:38 Behold, your house is left unto you
 you, Ye shall not see me henceforth, till ye
in the name of the Lord.
 went out, and departed from the temple: and his
him the buildings of the temple.
nd Jesus said unto them, See ye not all these things? verily I
shall not be left here one stone upon another,
:3 And as he sat upon the mount of Olives, the disciples came unto
aying, Tell us, when shall these things be? and what
g, and of the end of the world?  24:4
 Jesus answered and said unto them, Take heed that no man deceive
many shall come in my name, saying, I am Christ; and shall
d ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars: see that ye be not
hese things must come to pass, but the end is not
e against nation, and kingdom against
gdom: and there shall be famines, and pestilences, and earthquakes,
s.
sorrows.
ou up to be afflicted, and shall kill
: and ye shall be hated of all nations for my name's sake.
any be offended, and shall betray one another,
 And many false prophets shall rise, and shall deceive many.
iquity shall abound, the love of many shall wax
dure unto the end, the same shall be saved.
shall be preached in all the
witness unto all nations; and then shall the end come.
all see the abomination of desolation,
oken of by Daniel the prophet, stand in the holy place, (whoso
erstand:) 24:16 Then let them which be in Judaea
 him which is on the housetop not
wn to take any thing out of his house: 24:18 Neither let him
return back to take his clothes.
And woe unto them that are with child, and to them that give
4:20 But pray ye that your flight be not in the
 24:21 For then shall be great
n, such as was not since the beginning of the world to this
l be.
d be shortened, there should no flesh
saved: but for the elect's sake those days shall be shortened.
man shall say unto you, Lo, here is Christ, or
there shall arise false Christs, and false prophets, and
 wonders; insomuch that, if it were
ble, they shall deceive the very elect.

24:26 Wherefore if they shall say unto you, Behold, he is in the
th: behold, he is in the secret chambers; believe it
ning cometh out of the east, and shineth even
ng of the Son of man be.
esoever the carcase is, there will the eagles be
ately after the tribulation of those days shall the sun be
hall not give her light, and the stars shall
e heavens shall be shaken: 24:30
 shall appear the sign of the Son of man in heaven: and then
f the earth mourn, and they shall see the Son of
 with power and great glory.
he shall send his angels with a great sound of a trumpet,
ether his elect from the four winds, from one
Now learn a parable of the fig tree; When his branch is yet
th leaves, ye know that summer is nigh: 24:33
 these things, know that it is
 at the doors.
you, This generation shall not pass, till all
eaven and earth shall pass away, but my words shall not pass
that day and hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels of

shall also the coming of the Son
e.
efore the flood they were eating
king, marrying and giving in marriage, until the day that Noe
 24:39 And knew not until the flood came, and
 coming of the Son of man be.
n shall two be in the field; the one shall be taken, and the
wo women shall be grinding at the mill; the one shall be taken,

 what hour your Lord doth come.
ut know this, that if the goodman of the house had known in
uld come, he would have watched, and would not
 up.
for in such an hour as ye think not
on of man cometh.
aithful and wise servant, whom his lord hath made
 them meat in due season?  24:46
is that servant, whom his lord when he cometh shall find so
I say unto you, That he shall make him ruler over all his
f that evil servant shall say in his heart, My lord
shall begin to smite his
and to eat and drink with the drunken; 24:50 The lord
 a day when he looketh not for him, and
n an hour that he is not aware of, 24:51 And shall cut him asunder,
 his portion with the hypocrites: there shall be
25:1 Then shall the kingdom of heaven be likened unto ten virgins,
 lamps, and went forth to meet the bridegroom.
nd five were foolish.
re foolish took their lamps, and took no oil with
in their vessels with their lamps.
 While the bridegroom tarried, they all slumbered and slept.
 there was a cry made, Behold, the bridegroom
7 Then all those virgins arose, and trimmed their lamps.
d unto the wise, Give us of your oil; for our
ise answered, saying, Not so; lest there be not enough
ther to them that sell, and buy for
elves.
, the bridegroom came; and they that
 ready went in with him to the marriage: and the door was shut.
ame also the other virgins, saying, Lord, Lord, open
d and said, Verily I say unto you, I know you not.
know neither the day nor the hour
 the Son of man cometh.
ingdom of heaven is as a man travelling into a far
ants, and delivered unto them his

, to another two, and to
every man according to his several ability; and
:16 Then he that had received the five talents went and traded with
ade them other five talents.
likewise he that had received two, he also gained other two.
d received one went and digged in the earth, and
er a long time the lord of those servants cometh, and
 And so he that had received five talents came and brought other
ng, Lord, thou deliveredst unto me five talents:
five talents more.
unto him, Well done, thou good and faithful
 few things, I will make thee
many things: enter thou into the joy of thy lord.
 two talents came and said, Lord, thou
liveredst unto me two talents: behold, I have gained two other

e, good and faithful servant;
een faithful over a few things, I will make thee ruler over
 into the joy of thy lord.
e which had received the one talent came and said, Lord, I
an hard man, reaping where thou hast not sown,
rawed: 25:25 And I was afraid, and
nd hid thy talent in the earth: lo, there thou hast that is
d answered and said unto him, Thou wicked and slothful
 reap where I sowed not, and gather where
herefore to have put my money
angers, and then at my coming I should have received mine
Take therefore the talent from him, and give it unto him which

be given, and he shall have
t from him that hath not shall be taken away even that
cast ye the unprofitable servant into outer darkness: there
ashing of teeth.
man shall come in his glory, and all the holy
on the throne of his glory: 25:32
ore him shall be gathered all nations: and he shall separate
 as a shepherd divideth his sheep from the
on his right hand, but the
eft.
 them on his right hand, Come, ye
 of my Father, inherit the kingdom prepared for you from the
d: 25:35 For I was an hungred, and ye gave me
rink: I was a stranger, and ye
: 25:36 Naked, and ye clothed me: I was sick, and ye visited
nd ye came unto me.
e righteous answer him, saying, Lord, when saw we
 thirsty, and gave thee drink?  25:38
n saw we thee a stranger, and took thee in? or naked, and clothed
hen saw we thee sick, or in prison, and came unto
nswer and say unto them, Verily I say
o you, Inasmuch as ye have done it unto one of the least of these
ave done it unto me.
e say also unto them on the left hand, Depart from
fire, prepared for the devil and his
ls: 25:42 For I was an hungred, and ye gave me no meat: I was
me no drink: 25:43 I was a stranger, and ye took
e not: sick, and in prison, and ye
d me not.
swer him, saying, Lord, when saw we thee
an hungred, or athirst, or a stranger, or naked, or sick, or in
 minister unto thee?  25:45 Then shall he answer
u, Inasmuch as ye did it not to one
e least of these, ye did it not to me.
25:46 And these shall go away into everlasting punishment: but the
ife eternal.
when Jesus had finished all these sayings,
 that after two days is the
passover, and the Son of man is betrayed to be crucified.
ether the chief priests, and the scribes, and
lace of the high priest, who was
aiaphas, 26:4 And consulted that they might take Jesus by

, lest there be an uproar
e.
in the house of Simon the leper,
re came unto him a woman having an alabaster box of very
red it on his head, as he sat at meat.
26:8 But when his disciples saw it, they had indignation, saying, To
s this waste?  26:9 For this ointment might have been
he poor.
, he said unto them, Why trouble ye the
oman? for she hath wrought a good work upon me.
 with you; but me ye have not always.
6:12 For in that she hath poured this ointment on my body, she did it
.
ver this gospel shall be preached
whole world, there shall also this, that this woman hath done,
al of her.
, called Judas Iscariot, went unto the
ief priests, 26:15 And said unto them, What will ye give me, and I
 unto you? And they covenanted with him for thirty
rom that time he sought opportunity to betray him.
 feast of unleavened bread the disciples
came to Jesus, saying unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare for
 passover?  26:18 And he said, Go into the city to such
e Master saith, My time is at hand; I will
isciples.
s Jesus had appointed them; and they made
 even was come, he sat down with the twelve.
Verily I say unto you, that one of
all betray me.
eding sorrowful, and began every one of them
 And he answered and said, He
h his hand with me in the dish, the same shall betray me.
eth as it is written of him: but woe unto that
ed! it had been good for that man
ad not been born.
ch betrayed him, answered and said, Master, is it
aid.
us took bread, and blessed it, and
it, and gave it to the disciples, and said, Take, eat; this is
d he took the cup, and gave thanks, and gave it to them,
; 26:28 For this is my blood of the new
estament, which is shed for many for the remission of sins.
you, I will not drink henceforth of this fruit of
rink it new with you in my Father's
om.
n, they went out into the mount of
.
 ye shall be offended because of
night: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the
ll be scattered abroad.
 I am risen again, I will go before you into Galilee.
id unto him, Though all men shall be
nded because of thee, yet will I never be offended.
rily I say unto thee, That this night,
fore the cock crow, thou shalt deny me thrice.
I should die with thee, yet will I
ny thee. Likewise also said all the disciples.
unto a place called Gethsemane, and
 unto the disciples, Sit ye here, while I go and pray yonder.
ith him Peter and the two sons of Zebedee, and
.
l is exceeding sorrowful, even
: tarry ye here, and watch with me.
39 And he went a little farther, and fell on his face, and prayed,
her, if it be possible, let this cup pass from me:
as thou wilt.
the disciples, and findeth them asleep, and
tch with me one hour?  26:41
ay, that ye enter not into temptation: the spirit indeed
is weak.
econd time, and prayed, saying, O my
er, if this cup may not pass away from me, except I drink it, thy
26:43 And he came and found them asleep again: for their eyes were
And he left them, and went away again, and prayed the third
ords.
ples, and saith unto them, Sleep on
and take your rest: behold, the hour is at hand, and the Son of
o the hands of sinners.
 us be going: behold, he is at hand that doth betray
spake, lo, Judas, one of the twelve, came, and
ds and staves, from the chief
 elders of the people.
t betrayed him gave them a sign, saying, Whomsoever I
hold him fast.
ame to Jesus, and said, Hail, master; and
him, Friend, wherefore art thou come? Then
ook him.
 which were with Jesus stretched out his
hand, and drew his sword, and struck a servant of the high priest's,
his ear.
, Put up again thy sword into his place:
for all they that take the sword shall perish with the sword.
 that I cannot now pray to my Father, and he shall
ve legions of angels?  26:54 But how
 shall the scriptures be fulfilled, that thus it must be?  26:55
said Jesus to the multitudes, Are ye come out as
aves for to take me? I sat daily
 teaching in the temple, and ye laid no hold on me.
that the scriptures of the prophets might
ook him, and fled.
had laid hold on Jesus led him away to Caiaphas
and the elders were assembled.
t Peter followed him afar off unto the high priest's palace,
ith the servants, to see the end.
 Now the chief priests, and elders, and all the council, sought
st Jesus, to put him to death; 26:60 But found
es came, yet found they none. At
 came two false witnesses, 26:61 And said, This fellow said, I
he temple of God, and to build it in three days.
 and said unto him, Answerest thou
g? what is it which these witness against thee?  26:63 But Jesus
d the high priest answered and said unto him, I
 thou tell us whether thou be the
 the Son of God.
 him, Thou hast said: nevertheless I say unto
f man sitting on the right hand
 and coming in the clouds of heaven.
:65 Then the high priest rent his clothes, saying, He hath spoken
urther need have we of witnesses? behold, now ye have
 What think ye? They answered and said, He is guilty of death.
y spit in his face, and buffeted him; and others
hands, 26:68 Saying, Prophesy unto
ou Christ, Who is he that smote thee?  26:69 Now Peter sat
nd a damsel came unto him, saying, Thou also
ut he denied before them all, saying, I know not what thou
n he was gone out into the porch, another maid saw him,
e there, This fellow was also with Jesus of
with an oath, I do not know the man.
:73 And after a while came unto him they that stood by, and said to
hou also art one of them; for thy speech bewrayeth
curse and to swear, saying, I know not the man.
6:75 And Peter remembered the word of Jesus, which said unto him,
row, thou shalt deny me thrice. And he went out, and
e morning was come, all the chief priests and elders of
inst Jesus to put him to death: 27:2 And
when they had bound him, they led him away, and delivered him to
 governor.
etrayed him, when he saw that he was
emned, repented himself, and brought again the thirty pieces of
 priests and elders, 27:4 Saying, I have sinned in
t blood. And they said, What is that
s? see thou to that.
own the pieces of silver in the temple, and

ver pieces, and said, It is not
r to put them into the treasury, because it is the price of
 took counsel, and bought with them the potter's field,
:8 Wherefore that field was called, The field of blood, unto this
 was fulfilled that which was spoken by Jeremy the prophet,
he thirty pieces of silver, the price of him
dren of Israel did value; 27:10
them for the potter's field, as the Lord appointed me.
re the governor: and the governor asked him,
 And Jesus said unto him, Thou

f priests and elders, he
.
est thou not how many things they
 against thee?  27:14 And he answered him to never a word;
or marvelled greatly.
 feast the governor was wont to release unto the
.
soner, called Barabbas.
 when they were gathered together, Pilate said unto
se unto you? Barabbas, or Jesus which
called Christ?  27:18 For he knew that for envy they had delivered
en he was set down on the judgment seat, his wife sent unto
nothing to do with that just man: for I have
am because of him.
priests and elders persuaded the multitude that
oy Jesus.
nd said unto them, Whether of the twain
ill ye that I release unto you? They said, Barabbas.
, What shall I do then with Jesus which is
t him be crucified.
nor said, Why, what evil hath he done? But they
 be crucified.
at he could prevail nothing, but that rather a
washed his hands before the
ying, I am innocent of the blood of this just person: see
nswered all the people, and said, His blood be on us, and
 Then released he Barabbas unto them: and when he had scourged
him to be crucified.
diers of the governor took Jesus into the common
ole band of soldiers.
ripped him, and put on him a scarlet robe.
n of thorns, they put it upon
nd a reed in his right hand: and they bowed the knee before
ying, Hail, King of the Jews!  27:30 And they
 smote him on the head.
 that they had mocked him, they took the robe off from
 on him, and led him away to crucify him.
a man of Cyrene, Simon by name:
compelled to bear his cross.
when they were come unto a place called Golgotha, that is to
l, 27:34 They gave him vinegar to drink mingled
hereof, he would not drink.
hey crucified him, and parted his garments, casting lots:
d which was spoken by the prophet, They
arted my garments among them, and upon my vesture did they cast lots.
itting down they watched him there; 27:37 And set up over
ritten, THIS IS JESUS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
cified with him, one on the right
nd another on the left.
that passed by reviled him, wagging their heads, 27:40
yest the temple, and buildest it in three
 God, come down from the
Likewise also the chief priests mocking him, with the scribes
42 He saved others; himself he cannot save. If he
w come down from the cross, and we
elieve him.
t him deliver him now, if he will have him:
:44 The thieves also, which were crucified with him, cast the same

arkness over all the land
hour.
sus cried with a loud voice, saying,
 Eli, lama sabachthani? that is to say, My God, my God, why hast
 27:47 Some of them that stood there, when they
for Elias.
 them ran, and took a spunge, and filled
it with vinegar, and put it on a reed, and gave him to drink.
, Let be, let us see whether Elias will come to
ad cried again with a loud voice, yielded up the
eil of the temple was rent in twain from the
uake, and the rocks rent; 27:52
raves were opened; and many bodies of the saints which slept
out of the graves after his resurrection, and
 unto many.
n, and they that were with him, watching
Jesus, saw the earthquake, and those things that were done, they
ying, Truly this was the Son of God.
:55 And many women were there beholding afar off, which followed
, ministering unto him: 27:56 Among which was Mary
f James and Joses, and the mother of
dees children.
come, there came a rich man of Arimathaea,
' disciple: 27:58 He went to
begged the body of Jesus. Then Pilate commanded the body
And when Joseph had taken the body, he wrapped it in a clean
 laid it in his own new tomb, which he had hewn
eat stone to the door of the
nd departed.
agdalene, and the other Mary, sitting over
next day, that followed the day of the preparation, the
 came together unto Pilate, 27:63 Saying,
 while he was yet alive,
 I will rise again.
fore that the sepulchre be made sure until the
y night, and steal him away, and
 the people, He is risen from the dead: so the last error
irst.
ave a watch: go your way, make it as
 as ye can.
e the sepulchre sure, sealing the stone,
and setting a watch.
 the sabbath, as it began to dawn toward the first
lene and the other Mary to see the
hre.
t earthquake: for the angel of the
escended from heaven, and came and rolled back the stone from
n it.
htning, and his raiment white as
:4 And for fear of him the keepers did shake, and became as
he angel answered and said unto the women, Fear not ye: for
us, which was crucified.
 here: for he is risen, as he said. Come, see the place
 And go quickly, and tell his disciples that he is risen from the
, he goeth before you into Galilee; there shall ye

epulchre with fear and great
 run to bring his disciples word.
And as they went to tell his disciples, behold, Jesus met them,
nd they came and held him by the feet, and
 unto them, Be not afraid: go tell my brethren
 shall they see me.
 were going, behold, some of the watch came into
f priests all the things that were

 the elders, and had taken
gave large money unto the soldiers, 28:13 Saying, Say
ht, and stole him away while we slept.
28:14 And if this come to the governor's ears, we will persuade him,
.
 as they were taught: and this
commonly reported among the Jews until this day.
went away into Galilee, into a
here Jesus had appointed them.
d when they saw him, they worshipped him: but some doubted.
and spake unto them, saying, All power is given
28:19 Go ye therefore, and teach all nations, baptizing them in the
her, and of the Son, and of the Holy Ghost: 28:20
gs whatsoever I have commanded you:
lo, I am with you alway, even unto the end of the world. Amen.
ccording to Saint Mark
ing of the gospel of Jesus Christ, the Son of God; 1:2
hets, Behold, I send my messenger before
thy face, which shall prepare thy way before thee.
 the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of
e Lord, make his paths straight.
hn did baptize in the wilderness, and preach the baptism of
ssion of sins.
nto him all the land of Judaea, and they of
 in the river of Jordan,
 sins.
mel's hair, and with a girdle of a
bout his loins; and he did eat locusts and wild honey; 1:7 And
ere cometh one mightier than I after me, the
 to stoop down and unloose.
d have baptized you with water: but he shall baptize you
9 And it came to pass in those days, that Jesus came from Nazareth
was baptized of John in Jordan.
d straightway coming up out of the water, he saw the heavens
 like a dove descending upon him: 1:11 And there
Thou art my beloved Son, in whom I
l pleased.
rit driveth him into the wilderness.
13 And he was there in the wilderness forty days, tempted of Satan;
e wild beasts; and the angels ministered unto him.
ut in prison, Jesus came into Galilee,
eaching the gospel of the kingdom of God, 1:15 And saying, The time
nd the kingdom of God is at hand: repent ye, and
 he walked by the sea of Galilee, he saw Simon and Andrew
 into the sea: for they were fishers.
:17 And Jesus said unto them, Come ye after me, and I will make you
rs of men.
rsook their nets, and followed him.
9 And when he had gone a little farther thence, he saw James the
d John his brother, who also were in the ship
ghtway he called them: and they left their father
d servants, and went after him.
d they went into Capernaum; and straightway on the sabbath day
synagogue, and taught.
re astonished at his doctrine: for he taught them as
t as the scribes.
 their synagogue a man with an unclean spirit;
s alone; what have we to do with
ou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou come to destroy us? I know thee
ly One of God.
im, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of
t had torn him, and cried with a loud
ce, he came out of him.
ere all amazed, insomuch that they questioned among
is this? what new doctrine is this? for
ith authority commandeth he even the unclean spirits, and they do
 And immediately his fame spread abroad throughout all the region
ee.
come out of the synagogue, they
nto the house of Simon and Andrew, with James and John.
other lay sick of a fever, and anon they tell
ook her by the hand, and lifted her up; and
 ministered unto them.
, when the sun did set, they brought unto him all that
 were possessed with devils.
ll the city was gathered together at the door.
sick of divers diseases, and cast
y devils; and suffered not the devils to speak, because they
in the morning, rising up a great while before day, he went
a solitary place, and there prayed.
6 And Simon and they that were with him followed after him.
d found him, they said unto him, All men seek for
em, Let us go into the next towns, that I may
 I forth.
 synagogues throughout all Galilee, and
ast out devils.
eper to him, beseeching him, and kneeling down
 wilt, thou canst make me clean.
nd Jesus, moved with compassion, put forth his hand, and touched
o him, I will; be thou clean.
as soon as he had spoken, immediately the leprosy departed
ansed.
, and forthwith sent him away; 1:44
aith unto him, See thou say nothing to any man: but go thy way,
 priest, and offer for thy cleansing those things
imony unto them.
and began to publish it much, and to blaze
ould no more openly enter into
but was without in desert places: and they came to him from
nd again he entered into Capernaum after some days; and it was
n the house.
ere gathered together, insomuch that there
much as about the door: and he
he word unto them.
to him, bringing one sick of the palsy, which was
ey could not come nigh unto him for the press, they
: and when they had broken it up, they
t down the bed wherein the sick of the palsy lay.
 he said unto the sick of the palsy,
 thy sins be forgiven thee.
re was certain of the scribes sitting there, and reasoning
 doth this man thus speak blasphemies? who can
immediately when Jesus perceived
pirit that they so reasoned within themselves, he said unto
se things in your hearts?  2:9 Whether is it
, Thy sins be forgiven thee; or
rise, and take up thy bed, and walk?  2:10 But that ye may
 hath power on earth to forgive sins, (he
ay unto thee, Arise, and take
 and go thy way into thine house.
And immediately he arose, took up the bed, and went forth before
 that they were all amazed, and glorified God,
ion.
e sea side; and all the multitude
d unto him, and he taught them.
d as he passed by, he saw Levi the son of Alphaeus sitting at
, and said unto him, Follow me. And he arose and
to pass, that, as Jesus sat at meat in his house,
so together with Jesus and his
 for there were many, and they followed him.
ees saw him eat with publicans and
s, they said unto his disciples, How is it that he eateth and
ns and sinners?  2:17 When Jesus heard it, he
have no need of the physician,
hat are sick: I came not to call the righteous, but sinners
And the disciples of John and of the Pharisees used to fast: and
unto him, Why do the disciples of John and of the
 fast not?  2:19 And Jesus said unto
, Can the children of the bridechamber fast, while the bridegroom
long as they have the bridegroom with them, they
will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken away
ast in those days.
eth a piece of new cloth on an old garment: else
keth away from the old, and the rent
ade worse.
wine into old bottles: else the new wine
doth burst the bottles, and the wine is spilled, and the bottles will
t new wine must be put into new bottles.

hrough the corn fields on the
; and his disciples began, as they went, to pluck the ears
 Pharisees said unto him, Behold, why do they on the
lawful?  2:25 And he said unto them,
 ye never read what David did, when he had need, and was an
hat were with him?  2:26 How he went into the
the high priest, and did eat the
d, which is not lawful to eat but for the priests, and gave
 with him?  2:27 And he said unto them, The
or the sabbath: 2:28 Therefore
 man is Lord also of the sabbath.
nd he entered again into the synagogue; and there was a man there
red hand.
ther he would heal him on the sabbath
; that they might accuse him.
e saith unto the man which had the withered hand, Stand
unto them, Is it lawful to do good on the sabbath
, or to kill? But they held their

on them with anger, being
 hardness of their hearts, he saith unto the man,
stretched it out: and his hand was
ed whole as the other.
isees went forth, and straightway took counsel with
they might destroy him.
ithdrew himself with his disciples to the sea: and a
ollowed him, and from Judaea, 3:8 And
m Jerusalem, and from Idumaea, and from beyond Jordan; and they
n, a great multitude, when they had heard what

 a small ship should wait on
of the multitude, lest they should throng him.
uch that they pressed upon him for
ch him, as many as had plagues.
d unclean spirits, when they saw him, fell down before him, and
 art the Son of God.
ly charged them that they should not make him known.
mountain, and calleth unto him whom he
uld: and they came unto him.
e ordained twelve, that they should be with him, and that he
to preach, 3:15 And to have power to heal
And Simon he surnamed Peter;
es the son of Zebedee, and John the brother of James; and
s, which is, The sons of thunder: 3:18 And
 Matthew, and Thomas, and
f Alphaeus, and Thaddaeus, and Simon the Canaanite,
also betrayed him: and they went into
house.
gether again, so that they could not
uch as eat bread.
ends heard of it, they went out to lay hold on
self.
own from Jerusalem said, He hath
b, and by the prince of the devils casteth he out devils.
 unto him, and said unto them in parables, How
if a kingdom be divided against
hat kingdom cannot stand.
 house be divided against itself, that house cannot
e up against himself, and be divided, he cannot
man can enter into a strong man's house, and spoil his goods,
bind the strong man; and then he will spoil his
u, All sins shall be forgiven unto the sons
r they shall blaspheme: 3:29
shall blaspheme against the Holy Ghost hath never
eternal damnation.
id, He hath an unclean spirit.
re came then his brethren and his mother, and, standing
ling him.
out him, and they said unto him, Behold,
thy mother and thy brethren without seek for thee.
ing, Who is my mother, or my brethren?
34 And he looked round about on them which sat about him, and said,
r and my brethren!  3:35 For whosoever shall do the
ther, and my sister, and mother.
d he began again to teach by the sea side: and there was
multitude, so that he entered into a ship,
ude was by the sea on the
d he taught them many things by parables, and said unto them in
earken; Behold, there went out a sower to sow: 4:4
, some fell by the way side, and the
s of the air came and devoured it up.
:5 And some fell on stony ground, where it had not much earth; and
prang up, because it had no depth of earth: 4:6 But
rched; and because it had no root, it
hered away.
rns, and the thorns grew up, and choked it,
er fell on good ground, and did yield fruit that sprang up
ht forth, some thirty, and some sixty, and
 them, He that hath ears to hear, let him hear.
that were about him with the twelve
 of him the parable.
nto them, Unto you it is given to know the mystery
them that are without, all these
re done in parables: 4:12 That seeing they may see, and not
hey may hear, and not understand; lest at any
eir sins should be forgiven them.
And he said unto them, Know ye not this parable? and how then
bles?  4:14 The sower soweth the word.
4:15 And these are they by the way side, where the word is sown; but
 heard, Satan cometh immediately, and taketh away the
earts.
 which are sown on stony ground; who,
n they have heard the word, immediately receive it with gladness;
root in themselves, and so endure but for a time:
secution ariseth for the word's sake,
ediately they are offended.
ese are they which are sown among thorns; such as hear the
 of this world, and the deceitfulness of
riches, and the lusts of other things entering in, choke the word, and
unfruitful.
ch are sown on good ground; such as hear
the word, and receive it, and bring forth fruit, some thirtyfold, some
ome an hundred.
hem, Is a candle brought to be put under a
t on a candlestick?  4:22 For
thing hid, which shall not be manifested; neither was any
at it should come abroad.
an have ears to hear, let him hear.
4 And he said unto them, Take heed what ye hear: with what measure
l be measured to you: and unto you that hear shall
at hath, to him shall be given: and he that hath not,
that which he hath.
o is the kingdom of God, as if a man should cast
uld sleep, and rise night and day,
e seed should spring and grow up, he knoweth not how.
 forth fruit of herself; first the blade,
 the ear.
ought forth, immediately he putteth in
e sickle, because the harvest is come.
4:30 And he said, Whereunto shall we liken the kingdom of God? or with
son shall we compare it?  4:31 It is like a grain of
s sown in the earth, is less than all
 seeds that be in the earth: 4:32 But when it is sown, it groweth
greater than all herbs, and shooteth out great
ir may lodge under the shadow of
:33 And with many such parables spake he the word unto them, as they
ear it.
e he not unto them: and when they were
one, he expounded all things to his disciples.
en was come, he saith unto them, Let
ass over unto the other side.
when they had sent away the multitude, they took him even as
d there were also with him other little ships.
 of wind, and the waves beat into
p, so that it was now full.
 was in the hinder part of the ship, asleep on a pillow:
y unto him, Master, carest thou not that we
 the wind, and said unto the
be still. And the wind ceased, and there was a great calm.
them, Why are ye so fearful? how is it that ye
 exceedingly, and said one to
at manner of man is this, that even the wind and the sea
me over unto the other side of the sea, into
nd when he was come out of the ship, immediately there met him
an with an unclean spirit, 5:3 Who had his
ld bind him, no, not with
ause that he had been often bound with fetters and
plucked asunder by him, and the
roken in pieces: neither could any man tame him.
e was in the mountains, and in the
 crying, and cutting himself with stones.
ran and worshipped him, 5:7 And
h a loud voice, and said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus,
high God? I adjure thee by God, that thou torment
im, Come out of the man, thou unclean spirit.
ame? And he answered, saying, My
Legion: for we are many.
sought him much that he would not send them away out of
ere was there nigh unto the mountains a great herd of swine
l the devils besought him, saying, Send us into the swine,
hem.
 leave. And the unclean spirits went
 and entered into the swine: and the herd ran violently down a
 sea, (they were about two thousand;) and were
that fed the swine fled, and told it in the city, and in
 out to see what it was that was done.
5:15 And they come to Jesus, and see him that was possessed with the
 the legion, sitting, and clothed, and in his right
5:16 And they that saw it told them how it befell to him that was
e devil, and also concerning the swine.

 out of their coasts.
was come into the ship, he that had been possessed
e might be with him.
 suffered him not, but saith unto him, Go home to
eat things the Lord hath done for
nd hath had compassion on thee.
d he departed, and began to publish in Decapolis how great
r him: and all men did marvel.
 when Jesus was passed over again by ship unto the other side,
 unto him: and he was nigh unto the sea.

e rulers of the synagogue,
; and when he saw him, he fell at his feet, 5:23 And
My little daughter lieth at the point of
death: I pray thee, come and lay thy hands on her, that she may be
shall live.
m; and much people followed him, and
nged him.
ch had an issue of blood twelve years,
26 And had suffered many things of many physicians, and had spent
 and was nothing bettered, but rather grew worse,
 came in the press behind, and
s garment.
touch but his clothes, I shall be whole.

 blood was dried up; and she
body that she was healed of that plague.

imself that virtue had gone
urned him about in the press, and said, Who touched my
ples said unto him, Thou seest the
ude thronging thee, and sayest thou, Who touched me?  5:32 And
t to see her that had done this thing.
5:33 But the woman fearing and trembling, knowing what was done in
ll down before him, and told him all the truth.
er, thy faith hath made thee whole;
 peace, and be whole of thy plague.
5 While he yet spake, there came from the ruler of the synagogue's
ich said, Thy daughter is dead: why troublest thou the
 soon as Jesus heard the word that was
oken, he saith unto the ruler of the synagogue, Be not afraid, only
7 And he suffered no man to follow him, save Peter, and James, and
 of James.
use of the ruler of the synagogue, and
eth the tumult, and them that wept and wailed greatly.
in, he saith unto them, Why make ye this
ado, and weep? the damsel is not dead, but sleepeth.
 scorn. But when he had put them all out,
e damsel, and them that were
d entereth in where the damsel was lying.
, and said unto her, Talitha
is, being interpreted, Damsel, I say unto thee, arise.
amsel arose, and walked; for she was of the
nished with a great
 And he charged them straitly that no man should know it; and
ing should be given her to eat.
 he went out from thence, and came into his own country; and
im.
me, he began to teach in the
nd many hearing him were astonished, saying, From whence
? and what wisdom is this which is given
unto him, that even such mighty works are wrought by his hands?  6:3
e carpenter, the son of Mary, the brother of James, and
on? and are not his sisters here with us?
 Jesus, said unto them, A prophet is not without honour, but in
d among his own kin, and in his own house.
rk, save that he laid his hands
w sick folk, and healed them.
e marvelled because of their unbelief. And he went round
ng.
ve, and began to send them forth by
nd two; and gave them power over unclean spirits; 6:8 And
should take nothing for their journey, save a
ney in their purse: 6:9 But be
sandals; and not put on two coats.
 And he said unto them, In what place soever ye enter into an
ll ye depart from that place.
whosoever shall not receive you, nor hear you, when ye depart
 dust under your feet for a testimony against
all be more tolerable for Sodom and
rha in the day of judgment, than for that city.
hed that men should repent.
ey cast out many devils, and anointed with oil many that
.
r his name was spread abroad:)
d, That John the Baptist was risen from the dead, and
w forth themselves in him.
said, That it is Elias. And others said, That it is a
phets.
f, he said, It is John, whom I
he is risen from the dead.
od himself had sent forth and laid hold upon John, and
dias' sake, his brother Philip's wife: for
 said unto Herod, It is not lawful for thee to have
refore Herodias had a quarrel against him, and would have
 not: 6:20 For Herod feared John, knowing
bserved him; and when he
d many things, and heard him gladly.
21 And when a convenient day was come, that Herod on his birthday
his lords, high captains, and chief estates of
of the said Herodias came in, and
 and pleased Herod and them that sat with him, the king said
f me whatsoever thou wilt, and I will give it
Whatsoever thou shalt ask of me, I will
ive it thee, unto the half of my kingdom.
her mother, What shall I ask?
d, The head of John the Baptist.
nd she came in straightway with haste unto the king, and asked,
 thou give me by and by in a charger the head of
king was exceeding sorry; yet for his oath's sake, and
th him, he would not reject her.
nd immediately the king sent an executioner, and commanded his
and he went and beheaded him in the prison, 6:28
 and gave it to the damsel: and the
l gave it to her mother.
his disciples heard of it, they came and took up his

ves together unto Jesus, and
 things, both what they had done, and what they had
o them, Come ye yourselves apart into a desert
ere many coming and going, and
o leisure so much as to eat.
hey departed into a desert place by ship privately.
departing, and many knew him, and ran
ot thither out of all cities, and outwent them, and came together
 And Jesus, when he came out, saw much people, and was moved with
 them, because they were as sheep not having a
 many things.
 now far spent, his disciples came unto him,
now the time is far passed: 6:36
m away, that they may go into the country round about, and
uy themselves bread: for they have nothing to
o them, Give ye them to eat. And they say
 pennyworth of bread, and
t?  6:38 He saith unto them, How many loaves have ye?
w, they say, Five, and two fishes.
 And he commanded them to make all sit down by companies upon the
:40 And they sat down in ranks, by hundreds, and by fifties.
 taken the five loaves and the two fishes, he
 brake the loaves, and gave them
isciples to set before them; and the two fishes divided he
And they did all eat, and were filled.
6:43 And they took up twelve baskets full of the fragments, and of the
:44 And they that did eat of the loaves were about five thousand men.
raightway he constrained his disciples to get into the
 side before unto Bethsaida, while he sent
 sent them away, he departed into a mountain to
e, the ship was in the midst of the sea, and
aw them toiling in rowing; for the wind was contrary unto
h watch of the night he cometh unto them,
ed by them.
walking upon the sea, they supposed it had
hey all saw him, and were
mmediately he talked with them, and saith unto them, Be
not afraid.
em into the ship; and the wind ceased: and
nd measure, and wondered.
 considered not the miracle of the loaves: for their
d when they had passed over, they came into the land of
 shore.
t of the ship, straightway they knew
 6:55 And ran through that whole region round about, and began to
ds those that were sick, where they heard he was.
ed, into villages, or cities, or
 they laid the sick in the streets, and besought him that they
re but the border of his garment: and as many as
1 Then came together unto him the Pharisees, and certain of the
 from Jerusalem.
some of his disciples eat bread with defiled,
 they found fault.
s, and all the Jews, except they wash their hands
on of the elders.
e from the market, except they wash, they eat
e, which they have received to hold, as
he washing of cups, and pots, brasen vessels, and of tables.
es and scribes asked him, Why walk not thy
the elders, but eat bread with
ands?  7:6 He answered and said unto them, Well hath Esaias
rites, as it is written, This people honoureth
is far from me.
they worship me, teaching for doctrines the
aside the commandment of God, ye hold the tradition of
and cups: and many other such like things
 well ye reject the commandment of God,
hat ye may keep your own tradition.
0 For Moses said, Honour thy father and thy mother; and, Whoso
ther, let him die the death: 7:11 But ye say, If a
other, It is Corban, that is to say, a
ft, by whatsoever thou mightest be profited by me; he shall be free.
suffer him no more to do ought for his father or his
f God of none effect through your
on, which ye have delivered: and many such like things do ye.
d called all the people unto him, he said unto
ou, and understand: 7:15 There is
 from without a man, that entering into him can defile him: but
me out of him, those are they that defile the man.
ear, let him hear.
 entered into the house from the people, his
able.
ye so without understanding also? Do
ot perceive, that whatsoever thing from without entereth into the
file him; 7:19 Because it entereth not into his
h out into the draught, purging all
?  7:20 And he said, That which cometh out of the man, that
21 For from within, out of the heart of men, proceed evil thoughts,
nications, murders, 7:22 Thefts, covetousness,
an evil eye, blasphemy, pride,
s: 7:23 All these evil things come from within, and defile
m thence he arose, and went into the borders of Tyre and
 house, and would have no man know it: but
in woman, whose young daughter had an unclean spirit,
ll at his feet: 7:26 The woman was a
k, a Syrophenician by nation; and she besought him that he would
il out of her daughter.
said unto her, Let the children first be filled: for it
ldren's bread, and to cast it unto the
gs.
 him, Yes, Lord: yet the dogs under
able eat of the children's crumbs.
 And he said unto her, For this saying go thy way; the devil is
ghter.
r house, she found the devil gone out,
d her daughter laid upon the bed.
And again, departing from the coasts of Tyre and Sidon, he came
ilee, through the midst of the coasts of Decapolis.
one that was deaf, and had an impediment
in his speech; and they beseech him to put his hand upon him.
m aside from the multitude, and put his fingers
ched his tongue; 7:34 And looking
eaven, he sighed, and saith unto him, Ephphatha, that is, Be
raightway his ears were opened, and the string of his
ke plain.
 they should tell no man: but the more he
al they published it; 7:37
d measure astonished, saying, He hath done all things
 to hear, and the dumb to speak.
 those days the multitude being very great, and having nothing
 his disciples unto him, and saith unto them, 8:2
e, because they have now been with me
ee days, and have nothing to eat: 8:3 And if I send them away
houses, they will faint by the way: for divers of
s disciples answered him, From whence can a man satisfy
n the wilderness?  8:5 And he asked them,
even.
o sit down on the ground: and he took
 seven loaves, and gave thanks, and brake, and gave to his
them; and they did set them before the people.
s: and he blessed, and commanded to
hem also before them.
at, and were filled: and they took up of the broken
s.
ut four thousand: and he sent them

ship with his disciples, and
e parts of Dalmanutha.
risees came forth, and began to question with him,
n, tempting him.
ply in his spirit, and saith, Why doth this
say unto you, There shall no
n unto this generation.
t them, and entering into the ship again departed to
e disciples had forgotten to take bread, neither had they
e than one loaf.
em, saying, Take heed, beware of the leaven of
Herod.
mselves, saying, It is because we have
 bread.
 saith unto them, Why reason ye,
ye have no bread? perceive ye not yet, neither understand?
ardened?  8:18 Having eyes, see ye not? and
 remember?  8:19 When I brake
aves among five thousand, how many baskets full of
nto him, Twelve.
n among four thousand, how many baskets full of
, Seven.
w is it that ye do not understand?  8:22
And he cometh to Bethsaida; and they bring a blind man unto him, and
o touch him.
 man by the hand, and led him out of the
town; and when he had spit on his eyes, and put his hands upon him, he
 he saw ought.
nd said, I see men as trees, walking.
:25 After that he put his hands again upon his eyes, and made him
as restored, and saw every man clearly.

aying, Neither go into the
 it to any in the town.
went out, and his disciples, into the towns of Caesarea
 asked his disciples, saying unto them,
hom do men say that I am?  8:28 And they answered, John the Baptist;
Elias; and others, One of the prophets.

 ye that I am? And Peter
ith unto him, Thou art the Christ.
 And he charged them that they should tell no man of him.
ach them, that the Son of man must suffer many
s, and of the chief priests, and
 and be killed, and after three days rise again.
enly. And Peter took him, and began to
buke him.
bout and looked on his disciples, he
ked Peter, saying, Get thee behind me, Satan: for thou savourest
t be of God, but the things that be of men.
e unto him with his disciples
id unto them, Whosoever will come after me, let him deny
ross, and follow me.
 will save his life shall lose it; but whosoever
d the gospel's, the same shall save

he shall gain the whole world,
is own soul?  8:37 Or what shall a man give in exchange for
er therefore shall be ashamed of me and of my
eneration; of him also shall the
an be ashamed, when he cometh in the glory of his Father with
:1 And he said unto them, Verily I say unto you, That there be some
and here, which shall not taste of death, till they
me with power.
esus taketh with him Peter, and James, and
ountain apart by themselves:
ransfigured before them.
iment became shining, exceeding white as snow; so as no
hem.
lias with Moses: and they were
th Jesus.
id to Jesus, Master, it is good for us to
s; one for thee, and one for
ne for Elias.
to say; for they were sore afraid.
And there was a cloud that overshadowed them: and a voice came out
ying, This is my beloved Son: hear him.

und about, they saw no man
 Jesus only with themselves.
 they came down from the mountain, he charged them that they
t things they had seen, till the Son of man were
hey kept that saying with themselves, questioning one with
from the dead should mean.
y asked him, saying, Why say the scribes that Elias must
nswered and told them, Elias verily cometh
 it is written of the Son of
 must suffer many things, and be set at nought.
as is indeed come, and they have done
o him whatsoever they listed, as it is written of him.
is disciples, he saw a great multitude about
 them.
ple, when they beheld him, were
mazed, and running to him saluted him.
9:16 And he asked the scribes, What question ye with them?  9:17 And
titude answered and said, Master, I have brought unto
b spirit; 9:18 And wheresoever he taketh
him, he teareth him: and he foameth, and gnasheth with his teeth, and
and I spake to thy disciples that they should cast him
9:19 He answereth him, and saith, O faithless generation, how long
you? how long shall I suffer you? bring him unto me.
to him: and when he saw him, straightway
the spirit tare him; and he fell on the ground, and wallowed foaming.
 asked his father, How long is it ago since this came unto
child.
im into the fire, and into the waters,
 destroy him: but if thou canst do any thing, have compassion on us,

believe, all things are
hat believeth.
 father of the child cried out, and said with
e unbelief.
e people came running together, he rebuked
umb and deaf spirit, I charge
out of him, and enter no more into him.

ore, and came out of him: and
ne dead; insomuch that many said, He is dead.
, and lifted him up; and he arose.
 And when he was come into the house, his disciples asked him
not we cast him out?  9:29 And he said unto them,
ng, but by prayer and fasting.
 they departed thence, and passed through Galilee; and he
ould know it.
sciples, and said unto them, The Son of man
 they shall kill him; and after
s killed, he shall rise the third day.
9:32 But they understood not that saying, and were afraid to ask him.
 came to Capernaum: and being in the house he asked them,
ted among yourselves by the way?  9:34 But
ey had disputed among
uld be the greatest.
wn, and called the twelve, and saith unto them, If
same shall be last of all, and servant
 all.
 him in the midst of them: and when
d taken him in his arms, he said unto them, 9:37 Whosoever shall
h children in my name, receiveth me: and whosoever
me, but him that sent me.
 answered him, saying, Master, we saw one casting out
lloweth not us: and we forbad him,
e he followeth not us.
aid, Forbid him not: for there is no man which shall
can lightly speak evil of me.
he that is not against us is on our part.
 of water to drink in my name,
 belong to Christ, verily I say unto you, he shall not lose
 whosoever shall offend one of these little ones that believe
or him that a millstone were hanged about his

t off: it is better for thee to
o life maimed, than having two hands to go into hell, into
l be quenched: 9:44 Where their worm dieth
45 And if thy foot offend thee, cut it off: it is better for thee to
o life, than having two feet to be cast into hell, into
e quenched: 9:46 Where their worm dieth
ot, and the fire is not quenched.
And if thine eye offend thee, pluck it out: it is better for thee
 kingdom of God with one eye, than having two eyes to
Where their worm dieth not, and the fire
is not quenched.
ll be salted with fire, and every sacrifice
 is good: but if the salt have lost his saltness, wherewith
 salt in yourselves, and have peace one with
nce, and cometh into the coasts of Judaea by
ople resort unto him again; and,
s wont, he taught them again.
the Pharisees came to him, and asked him, Is it lawful for a
fe? tempting him.
and said unto them, What did Moses command you?
to write a bill of divorcement, and
t her away.
 said unto them, For the hardness of your
But from the beginning of the creation God made them male and
his cause shall a man leave his father and mother, and
 they twain shall be one flesh: so then
hey are no more twain, but one flesh.
0:9 What therefore God hath joined together, let not man put asunder.
n the house his disciples asked him again of the same
 unto them, Whosoever shall put away his wife, and
ry against her.
all put away her husband, and be married to
:13 And they brought young children to him, that he should touch
iples rebuked those that brought them.
10:14 But when Jesus saw it, he was much displeased, and said unto
 little children to come unto me, and forbid them not:
f God.
soever shall not receive the kingdom
od as a little child, he shall not enter therein.
s arms, put his hands upon them, and
sed them.
rth into the way, there came one running,
aster, what shall I do that I
 eternal life?  10:18 And Jesus said unto him, Why callest
one good but one, that is, God.
hou knowest the commandments, Do not commit adultery, Do not
 not bear false witness, Defraud not, Honour thy
nswered and said unto him, Master,
ese have I observed from my youth.
1 Then Jesus beholding him loved him, and said unto him, One thing
 thy way, sell whatsoever thou hast, and give to the
sure in heaven: and come, take up the
ss, and follow me.
 at that saying, and went away grieved: for he had
Jesus looked round about, and saith unto his disciples, How
have riches enter into the kingdom of God!
at his words. But Jesus
and saith unto them, Children, how hard is it for
r into the kingdom of God!  10:25 It
asier for a camel to go through the eye of a needle, than for a
nto the kingdom of God.
were astonished out of measure, saying among
:27 And Jesus looking upon them
th men it is impossible, but not with God: for with God all

o, we have left all, and have
ee.
Verily I say unto you, There is no
at hath left house, or brethren, or sisters, or father, or
dren, or lands, for my sake, and the gospel's,
dfold now in this time, houses,
ren, and sisters, and mothers, and children, and lands, with
he world to come eternal life.
t many that are first shall be last; and the last first.
he way going up to Jerusalem; and Jesus went
 as they followed, they were
nd he took again the twelve, and began to tell them what things
him, 10:33 Saying, Behold, we go up to Jerusalem;
ered unto the chief priests, and unto
 scribes; and they shall condemn him to death, and shall deliver
s: 10:34 And they shall mock him, and shall scourge
nd shall kill him: and the third day he
hall rise again.
hn, the sons of Zebedee, come unto him, saying,
t do for us whatsoever we shall

ye that I should do for you?
aid unto him, Grant unto us that we may sit, one on thy
n thy left hand, in thy glory.
t Jesus said unto them, Ye know not what ye ask: can ye drink
nk of? and be baptized with the baptism that I am
id unto him, We can. And Jesus said
them, Ye shall indeed drink of the cup that I drink of; and with
 am baptized withal shall ye be baptized: 10:40 But
my left hand is not mine to give; but
shall be given to them for whom it is prepared.
they began to be much displeased with
es and John.
m to him, and saith unto them, Ye know that
he Gentiles exercise lordship
and their great ones exercise authority upon them.
mong you: but whosoever will be great
ng you, shall be your minister: 10:44 And whosoever of you will be
all be servant of all.
he Son of man came not to be ministered unto, but to
 a ransom for many.
 to Jericho: and as he went out of Jericho with his
 people, blind Bartimaeus, the son of
aeus, sat by the highway side begging.
10:47 And when he heard that it was Jesus of Nazareth, he began to cry
, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on me.
should hold his peace: but he cried
ore a great deal, Thou son of David, have mercy on me.
l, and commanded him to be called. And they
 of good comfort, rise; he

 rose, and came to Jesus.
us answered and said unto him, What wilt thou that I
 man said unto him, Lord, that I might
ceive my sight.
to him, Go thy way; thy faith hath made thee
his sight, and followed Jesus in the way.
em, unto Bethphage and Bethany,
unt of Olives, he sendeth forth two of his disciples, 11:2
your way into the village over against you:
e shall find a colt tied,
an sat; loose him, and bring him.
And if any man say unto you, Why do ye this? say ye that the Lord
 and straightway he will send him hither.
 the colt tied by the door
lace where two ways met; and they loose him.
there said unto them, What do ye,
 the colt?  11:6 And they said unto them even as Jesus had
them go.
 to Jesus, and cast their garments on
; and he sat upon him.
read their garments in the way: and others cut down
awed them in the way.
t went before, and they that followed, cried, saying,
ometh in the name of the Lord: 11:10
sed be the kingdom of our father David, that cometh in the name of
a in the highest.
ed into Jerusalem, and into the temple: and when
 things, and now the eventide was
e went out unto Bethany with the twelve.

come from Bethany, he was
nd seeing a fig tree afar off having leaves, he came,
ing thereon: and when he came to it, he
ound nothing but leaves; for the time of figs was not yet.
ed and said unto it, No man eat fruit of thee
 heard it.
alem: and Jesus went into the temple, and
ht in the temple, and
s of the moneychangers, and the seats of them that
suffer that any man should carry any
el through the temple.
ght, saying unto them, Is it not written, My house
he house of prayer? but ye have made
 den of thieves.
and chief priests heard it, and sought how they
him, because all the people was
d at his doctrine.
was come, he went out of the city.
0 And in the morning, as they passed by, they saw the fig tree
ots.
ance saith unto him, Master, behold,
fig tree which thou cursedst is withered away.
to them, Have faith in God.
erily I say unto you, That whosoever shall say unto this
 and be thou cast into the sea; and shall
 that those things which he
ome to pass; he shall have whatsoever he saith.
hat things soever ye desire, when ye
, believe that ye receive them, and ye shall have them.
raying, forgive, if ye have ought against
aven may forgive you your
11:26 But if ye do not forgive, neither will your Father which is in
 your trespasses.
gain to Jerusalem: and as he was walking in the
 priests, and the scribes, and the
, 11:28 And say unto him, By what authority doest thou these
hee this authority to do these things?  11:29
, I will also ask of you one
d answer me, and I will tell you by what authority I do
baptism of John, was it from heaven, or of men? answer me.
d with themselves, saying, If we shall say, From
ye not believe him?  11:32 But if we
l say, Of men; they feared the people: for all men counted John,
het indeed.
 said unto Jesus, We cannot tell. And Jesus
 tell you by what authority I
ings.
hem by parables. A certain man
vineyard, and set an hedge about it, and digged a place for
a tower, and let it out to husbandmen, and went
the season he sent to the husbandmen a servant, that he
andmen of the fruit of the vineyard.
:3 And they caught him, and beat him, and sent him away empty.
sent unto them another servant; and at him they cast
 head, and sent him away shamefully
ed.
 him they killed, and many others;
g some, and killing some.
et therefore one son, his wellbeloved, he sent him also
y will reverence my son.
 husbandmen said among themselves, This is the heir;
 inheritance shall be our's.
hey took him, and killed him, and cast him out of the
therefore the lord of the vineyard do? he will come
 will give the vineyard unto others.
:10 And have ye not read this scripture; The stone which the
ecome the head of the corner: 12:11 This was the
 in our eyes?  12:12 And they sought
ay hold on him, but feared the people: for they knew that he had
 against them: and they left him, and went their
im certain of the Pharisees and of the
rodians, to catch him in his words.
14 And when they were come, they say unto him, Master, we know that
and carest for no man: for thou regardest not the
ay of God in truth: Is it lawful to
tribute to Caesar, or not?  12:15 Shall we give, or shall we not
ing their hypocrisy, said unto them, Why tempt ye
see it.
he saith unto them, Whose is this image
nd superscription? And they said unto him, Caesar's.
id unto them, Render to Caesar the things
that are God's. And they
.
s, which say there is no
d they asked him, saying, 12:19 Master, Moses wrote
, and leave his wife behind him, and
e no children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up
other.
ren: and the first took a wife, and
 left no seed.
k her, and died, neither left he any seed: and
 seven had her, and left no seed: last of all the woman
resurrection therefore, when they shall rise, whose wife
the seven had her to wife.
sus answering said unto them, Do ye not therefore err,
ptures, neither the power of God?  12:25
For when they shall rise from the dead, they neither marry, nor are
ge; but are as the angels which are in heaven.
at they rise: have ye not read in
k of Moses, how in the bush God spake unto him, saying, I am
d the God of Isaac, and the God of Jacob?  12:27
 the God of the living: ye therefore
reatly err.
s came, and having heard them reasoning
ogether, and perceiving that he had answered them well, asked him,
st commandment of all?  12:29 And Jesus answered him,
ents is, Hear, O Israel; The Lord our God
e Lord thy God with all thy
th all thy soul, and with all thy mind, and with all thy
t commandment.
like, namely this, Thou shalt love thy
ighbour as thyself. There is none other commandment greater than
d the scribe said unto him, Well, Master, thou hast said the
e God; and there is none other but he: 12:33 And
d with all the understanding, and
l the soul, and with all the strength, and to love his
e than all whole burnt offerings and
ifices.
e answered discreetly, he said unto
Thou art not far from the kingdom of God. And no man after that
uestion.
aid, while he taught in the temple, How
ay the scribes that Christ is the son of David?  12:36 For David
e Holy Ghost, The LORD said to my Lord, Sit thou on
e enemies thy footstool.
erefore himself calleth him Lord; and whence is he then
ple heard him gladly.
 unto them in his doctrine, Beware of the scribes,
g, and love salutations in the
es, 12:39 And the chief seats in the synagogues, and the
 12:40 Which devour widows' houses, and for
ll receive greater damnation.
 Jesus sat over against the treasury, and beheld how the
 treasury: and many that were rich cast in
poor widow, and she threw in two mites,
hich make a farthing.
ed unto him his disciples, and saith unto them,
or widow hath cast more in, than
 which have cast into the treasury: 12:44 For all they did
ce; but she of her want did cast in all that
And as he went out of the temple, one of his disciples saith unto
what manner of stones and what buildings are here!
to him, Seest thou these great
  there shall not be left one stone upon another, that shall

es over against the temple,
es and John and Andrew asked him privately, 13:4 Tell us,
e? and what shall be the sign when all these
esus answering them began to
ed lest any man deceive you: 13:6 For many shall come in
st; and shall deceive many.
en ye shall hear of wars and rumours of wars, be ye not
ust needs be; but the end shall not be yet.
tion, and kingdom against
ere shall be earthquakes in divers places, and there
 these are the beginnings of sorrows.
3:9 But take heed to yourselves: for they shall deliver you up to
the synagogues ye shall be beaten: and ye shall be
for my sake, for a testimony against
.
blished among all nations.
en they shall lead you, and deliver you up, take no
l speak, neither do ye premeditate: but
hatsoever shall be given you in that hour, that speak ye: for it is
ak, but the Holy Ghost.
rother shall betray the brother to death, and the
l rise up against their parents, and
l cause them to be put to death.
And ye shall be hated of all men for my name's sake: but he that
the end, the same shall be saved.
 But when ye shall see the abomination of desolation, spoken of
et, standing where it ought not, (let him that
hat be in Judaea flee to the
3:15 And let him that is on the housetop not go down into
therein, to take any thing out of his house:
 not turn back again for to take
arment.
with child, and to them that give suck
 those days!  13:18 And pray ye that your flight be not in the
 in those days shall be affliction, such as was not from the
ion which God created unto this time, neither
e Lord had shortened those days, no flesh
, whom he hath chosen, he
the days.
ll say to you, Lo, here is Christ; or,
, he is there; believe him not: 13:22 For false Christs and false
se, and shall shew signs and wonders, to seduce, if
t.
ve foretold you all things.
n those days, after that tribulation, the sun shall be
 not give her light, 13:25 And the stars
of heaven shall fall, and the powers that are in heaven shall be
nd then shall they see the Son of man coming in the clouds with
ry.
gels, and shall gather together his
 from the four winds, from the uttermost part of the earth to the
 heaven.
he fig tree; When her branch is yet
r, and putteth forth leaves, ye know that summer is near: 13:29
r, when ye shall see these things come to pass,
oors.
 this generation shall not pass, till
 these things be done.
 earth shall pass away: but my words shall not pass
and that hour knoweth no man, no, not the angels
on, but the Father.
 watch and pray: for ye know not when the time is.
 a man taking a far journey, who left
 house, and gave authority to his servants, and to every man his
d the porter to watch.
herefore: for ye know not when the master of the house
ght, or at the cockcrowing, or in the
ning: 13:36 Lest coming suddenly he find you sleeping.
you I say unto all, Watch.
wo days was the feast of the passover, and of unleavened
ts and the scribes sought how they might
take him by craft, and put him to death.

, lest there be an uproar of

of Simon the leper, as he sat
ere came a woman having an alabaster box of ointment of
d she brake the box, and poured it on his
d indignation within themselves, and
, Why was this waste of the ointment made?  14:5 For it might have
re than three hundred pence, and have been given to
inst her.
alone; why trouble ye her? she hath
ht a good work on me.
the poor with you always, and whensoever ye will ye
e not always.
he could: she is come aforehand to anoint my
say unto you, Wheresoever this gospel shall be preached
 this also that she hath done shall be
oken of for a memorial of her.
d Judas Iscariot, one of the twelve, went unto the chief
o them.
hey were glad, and promised to give him
oney. And he sought how he might conveniently betray him.
 of unleavened bread, when they killed the
here wilt thou that we go and
t thou mayest eat the passover?  14:13 And he sendeth forth
nd saith unto them, Go ye into the city, and
itcher of water: follow him.
wheresoever he shall go in, say ye to the goodman of the
here is the guestchamber, where I shall eat
And he will shew you a large
urnished and prepared: there make ready for us.
h, and came into the city, and found
e had said unto them: and they made ready the passover.
he cometh with the twelve.
 they sat and did eat, Jesus said, Verily I say unto you,
ith me shall betray me.
began to be sorrowful, and to say unto him one by one,
s it I?  14:20 And he answered and said
nto them, It is one of the twelve, that dippeth with me in the dish.
n of man indeed goeth, as it is written of him: but woe to
 of man is betrayed! good were it for that man
And as they did eat, Jesus took bread, and blessed, and brake
 and said, Take, eat: this is my body.
14:23 And he took the cup, and when he had given thanks, he gave it to
ey all drank of it.
nto them, This is my blood of the new testament,
erily I say unto you, I will drink no more of the fruit of the
 that I drink it new in the kingdom of God.
 they went out into the mount of

 shall be offended because of
ht: for it is written, I will smite the shepherd, and the

l go before you into Galilee.
 Peter said unto him, Although all shall be offended, yet
Jesus saith unto him, Verily I say unto thee, That this day,
fore the cock crow twice, thou shalt deny me
 vehemently, If I should die with thee, I
also said they all.
 to a place which was named Gethsemane: and he
 while I shall pray.
h with him Peter and James and John, and began to be
avy; 14:34 And saith unto them, My soul
s exceeding sorrowful unto death: tarry ye here, and watch.
ward a little, and fell on the ground, and prayed
ur might pass from him.
id, Abba, Father, all things are possible unto thee;
vertheless not what I will, but what
 wilt.
 them sleeping, and saith unto Peter,
on, sleepest thou? couldest not thou watch one hour?  14:38 Watch
 ye enter into temptation. The spirit truly is ready,
39 And again he went away, and prayed, and spake the same words.
e returned, he found them asleep again, (for their
hey what to answer him.
meth the third time, and saith unto them, Sleep on now,
nough, the hour is come; behold, the Son of
rs.
at betrayeth me is at hand.
mmediately, while he yet spake, cometh Judas, one of the
at multitude with swords and staves, from
 elders.
 had given them a token, saying,
er I shall kiss, that same is he; take him, and lead him away
as soon as he was come, he goeth straightway to him, and
 kissed him.
hands on him, and took him.
ne of them that stood by drew a sword, and smote a servant
cut off his ear.
ed and said unto them, Are ye come out, as
aves to take me?  14:49 I was
you in the temple teaching, and ye took me not: but the
d.
fled.
rtain young man, having a linen cloth
t about his naked body; and the young men laid hold on him: 14:52
inen cloth, and fled from them naked.
4:53 And they led Jesus away to the high priest: and with him were
e chief priests and the elders and the scribes.
 off, even into the palace of the
iest: and he sat with the servants, and warmed himself at the
e chief priests and all the council sought for witness
death; and found none.
are false witness against him, but their witness
there arose certain, and bare false witness against him,
 say, I will destroy this temple that is
made with hands, and within three days I will build another made
14:59 But neither so did their witness agree together.
stood up in the midst, and asked Jesus,
aying, Answerest thou nothing? what is it which these witness against
But he held his peace, and answered nothing. Again the
aid unto him, Art thou the Christ, the Son
 am: and ye shall see the Son
ing on the right hand of power, and coming in the clouds of
he high priest rent his clothes, and saith, What need we
:64 Ye have heard the blasphemy: what think
ilty of death.
spit on him, and to cover his face, and to
y: and the servants did strike
he palms of their hands.
eter was beneath in the palace, there cometh one of the
4:67 And when she saw Peter warming
lf, she looked upon him, and said, And thou also wast with Jesus
:68 But he denied, saying, I know not, neither understand I what
e went out into the porch; and the cock crew.
 began to say to them that stood
 is one of them.
 again. And a little after, they that stood by
 one of them: for thou art a
nd thy speech agreeth thereto.
t he began to curse and to swear, saying, I know not this man
14:72 And the second time the cock crew. And Peter called to mind the
us said unto him, Before the cock crow twice, thou shalt
e thought thereon, he wept.
raightway in the morning the chief priests held a
scribes and the whole council, and
Jesus, and carried him away, and delivered him to Pilate.
im, Art thou the King of the Jews? And he

 of many things: but he answered

g, Answerest thou nothing?
y things they witness against thee.
5 But Jesus yet answered nothing; so that Pilate marvelled.
t he released unto them one prisoner, whomsoever
s one named Barabbas, which lay bound with them that
, who had committed murder in the
ction.
oud began to desire him to do as he
ver done unto them.
wered them, saying, Will ye that I release unto you
r he knew that the chief priests had
vered him for envy.
 priests moved the people, that he should rather
12 And Pilate answered and said again unto them, What will ye then
unto him whom ye call the King of the Jews?  15:13 And
y him.
, Why, what evil hath he done? And
ried out the more exceedingly, Crucify him.
nt the people, released Barabbas
m, and delivered Jesus, when he had scourged him, to be
 soldiers led him away into the hall, called Praetorium;
 whole band.
 with purple, and platted a crown of thorns,
egan to salute him, Hail, King
s!  15:19 And they smote him on the head with a reed, and
wing their knees worshipped him.
And when they had mocked him, they took off the purple from him,
othes on him, and led him out to crucify him.
yrenian, who passed by, coming out
 country, the father of Alexander and Rufus, to bear his cross.
ing him unto the place Golgotha, which is, being

mingled with myrrh: but he
t.
m, they parted his garments,
 upon them, what every man should take.

 crucified him.
ption of his accusation was written over, THE
im they crucify two thieves; the one on his right

which saith, And he was
 transgressors.
sed by railed on him, wagging their heads, and
 temple, and buildest it in three
5:30 Save thyself, and come down from the cross.
iests mocking said among themselves
the scribes, He saved others; himself he cannot save.
f Israel descend now from the cross, that
e crucified with him reviled
3 And when the sixth hour was come, there was darkness over the
e ninth hour.
ur Jesus cried with a loud voice, saying,
eing interpreted, My God, my
t thou forsaken me?  15:35 And some of them that stood by,
, Behold, he calleth Elias.
ne ran and filled a spunge full of vinegar, and put it on a
rink, saying, Let alone; let us see whether
:37 And Jesus cried with a loud voice, and gave up the ghost.
of the temple was rent in twain from the top to the
enturion, which stood over against him, saw that
host, he said, Truly this man was
 of God.
oking on afar off: among whom was Mary
gdalene, and Mary the mother of James the less and of Joses, and
 also, when he was in Galilee, followed him, and
er women which came up with him unto
salem.
come, because it was the preparation,
t is, the day before the sabbath, 15:43 Joseph of Arimathaea, an
lor, which also waited for the kingdom of God, came,
, and craved the body of Jesus.
nd Pilate marvelled if he were already dead: and calling unto
 asked him whether he had been any while dead.
enturion, he gave the body to
15:46 And he bought fine linen, and took him down, and wrapped him in
d laid him in a sepulchre which was hewn out of a rock,
 door of the sepulchre.
Magdalene and Mary the mother of Joses beheld where he
he sabbath was past, Mary Magdalene, and Mary the
bought sweet spices, that they might
 and anoint him.
 the morning the first day of the week, they
of the sun.
emselves, Who shall roll us away the stone
d when they looked, they saw
ne was rolled away: for it was very great.
they saw a young man sitting on
 side, clothed in a long white garment; and they were
ith unto them, Be not affrighted: Ye seek Jesus of
e is risen; he is not here: behold the
ace where they laid him.
ur way, tell his disciples and Peter that he goeth
hall ye see him, as he said unto you.
6:8 And they went out quickly, and fled from the sepulchre; for they
ere amazed: neither said they any thing to any man; for
ow when Jesus was risen early the first day of the week, he
Magdalene, out of whom he had cast seven
devils.
m that had been with him, as they
 and wept.
d heard that he was alive, and had been
een of her, believed not.
hat he appeared in another form unto two of them, as they
 country.
it unto the residue: neither believed
y them.
o the eleven as they sat at meat, and
raided them with their unbelief and hardness of heart, because they
em which had seen him after he was risen.
 all the world, and preach the
every creature.
 and is baptized shall be saved; but he that
7 And these signs shall follow them that believe; In my name shall
vils; they shall speak with new tongues; 16:18 They
they drink any deadly thing, it shall
 hurt them; they shall lay hands on the sick, and they shall
hen after the Lord had spoken unto them, he was received up
 the right hand of God.
went forth, and preached every where, the Lord working
e word with signs following. Amen.

1:1 Forasmuch as many have taken in hand to set forth in order a
se things which are most surely believed among us,
unto us, which from the beginning were
ewitnesses, and ministers of the word; 1:3 It seemed good to me
rfect understanding of all things from the very
 most excellent Theophilus, 1:4
 mightest know the certainty of those things, wherein thou

ing of Judaea, a certain
harias, of the course of Abia: and his wife was of the
name was Elisabeth.
oth righteous before God, walking in all the
d blameless.
 because that Elisabeth was barren, and they

executed the priest's office
n the order of his course, 1:9 According to the custom of
lot was to burn incense when he went into the
hole multitude of the people were praying without at the
nd there appeared unto him an angel of the Lord standing on the
ltar of incense.
s saw him, he was troubled, and fear fell upon
 him, Fear not, Zacharias: for thy prayer
ar thee a son, and thou shalt
me John.
nd gladness; and many shall rejoice at
s birth.
the sight of the Lord, and shall drink
ither wine nor strong drink; and he shall be filled with the Holy
his mother's womb.
 children of Israel shall he turn to the Lord
fore him in the spirit and power of Elias, to
 children, and the disobedient to
dom of the just; to make ready a people prepared for the Lord.
 said unto the angel, Whereby shall I know this? for
ell stricken in years.
el answering said unto him, I am Gabriel, that stand
 sent to speak unto thee, and to shew
e these glad tidings.
 thou shalt be dumb, and not able to speak, until the
e performed, because thou believest not
y words, which shall be fulfilled in their season.
 Zacharias, and marvelled that he
 so long in the temple.
e came out, he could not speak unto them: and they
ion in the temple: for he beckoned
hem, and remained speechless.
it came to pass, that, as soon as the days of his
e departed to his own house.
fter those days his wife Elisabeth conceived, and hid
1:25 Thus hath the Lord dealt with me in
the days wherein he looked on me, to take away my reproach among men.
 the sixth month the angel Gabriel was sent from God unto a
Nazareth, 1:27 To a virgin espoused to a man
 David; and the virgin's name

 said, Hail, thou that art
d, the Lord is with thee: blessed art thou among women.
, she was troubled at his saying, and cast in
is should be.
nto her, Fear not, Mary: for thou hast found
thou shalt conceive in thy womb, and bring forth a
US.
e called the Son of the Highest:
Lord God shall give unto him the throne of his father David:
n over the house of Jacob for ever; and of his
34 Then said Mary unto the angel, How shall this be, seeing I know
 And the angel answered and said unto her, The Holy
 the power of the Highest shall
w thee: therefore also that holy thing which shall be born of
the Son of God.
ousin Elisabeth, she hath also conceived a son
h month with her, who was called

ssible.
handmaid of the Lord; be it unto me
ding to thy word. And the angel departed from her.
ays, and went into the hill country with
haste, into a city of Juda; 1:40 And entered into the house of
ed Elisabeth.
 that, when Elisabeth heard the salutation of
d Elisabeth was filled with the
t: 1:42 And she spake out with a loud voice, and said,
, and blessed is the fruit of thy womb.

other of my Lord should come
 For, lo, as soon as the voice of thy salutation sounded
ped in my womb for joy.
d is she that believed: for there shall be a
 told her from the Lord.
said, My soul doth magnify the Lord, 1:47 And my spirit
iour.
 estate of his handmaiden: for,
rom henceforth all generations shall call me blessed.
hath done to me great things; and holy is
m that fear him from generation to
tion.
 his arm; he hath scattered the proud
the imagination of their hearts.
e hath put down the mighty from their seats, and exalted them of
3 He hath filled the hungry with good things; and the rich he hath

, in remembrance of his mercy;
 spake to our fathers, to Abraham, and to his seed for ever.
with her about three months, and returned to her
 full time came that she should be delivered; and
And her neighbours and her cousins heard how the Lord had shewed
er; and they rejoiced with her.
d it came to pass, that on the eighth day they came to
ey called him Zacharias, after the name of
red and said, Not so; but he shall be called
There is none of thy kindred that is
ed by this name.
ns to his father, how he would have him called.
able, and wrote, saying, His name is
. And they marvelled all.
mouth was opened immediately, and his tongue loosed, and

ound about them: and all these
re noised abroad throughout all the hill country of Judaea.
t heard them laid them up in their hearts,
be! And the hand of the Lord
.
led with the Holy Ghost, and
saying, 1:68 Blessed be the Lord God of Israel; for he
s people, 1:69 And hath raised up an horn
ervant David; 1:70 As he
th of his holy prophets, which have been since the
 be saved from our enemies, and from
hand of all that hate us; 1:72 To perform the mercy promised to
 remember his holy covenant; 1:73 The oath which he
74 That he would grant unto us, that we
eing delivered out of the hand of our enemies might serve him without
 holiness and righteousness before him, all the days of
 child, shalt be called the prophet of the Highest: for
ce of the Lord to prepare his ways; 1:77 To
ople by the remission of their
 Through the tender mercy of our God; whereby the dayspring
ed us, 1:79 To give light to them that sit in
to guide our feet into the way of

ng in spirit, and was in the
 the day of his shewing unto Israel.
1 And it came to pass in those days, that there went out a decree
tus that all the world should be taxed.

Cyrenius was governor of
 all went to be taxed, every one into his own city.
rom Galilee, out of the city of Nazareth,
h is called Bethlehem;
 the house and lineage of David:) 2:5 To be taxed
g great with child.
that, while they were there, the days were
d.
orn son, and wrapped him in
thes, and laid him in a manger; because there was no room
:8 And there were in the same country shepherds abiding in the field,
 over their flock by night.
, the angel of the Lord came upon them, and the glory of
 them: and they were sore afraid.
And the angel said unto them, Fear not: for, behold, I bring you
eat joy, which shall be to all people.
2:11 For unto you is born this day in the city of David a Saviour,
the Lord.
 unto you; Ye shall find the babe wrapped

gel a multitude of the heavenly
sing God, and saying, 2:14 Glory to God in the highest, and
ll toward men.
, as the angels were gone away from them into
ther, Let us now go even unto
and see this thing which is come to pass, which the Lord

 Mary, and Joseph, and the
a manger.
t, they made known abroad the saying
h was told them concerning this child.
2:18 And all they that heard it wondered at those things which were
e shepherds.
se things, and pondered them in her heart.
fying and praising God for all
 that they had heard and seen, as it was told unto them.
 were accomplished for the circumcising of the
ich was so named of the angel
as conceived in the womb.
 the days of her purification according to the law of
 brought him to Jerusalem, to present him
e law of the LORD, Every male
h the womb shall be called holy to the Lord;) 2:24 And to
ng to that which is said in the law of the
g pigeons.
a man in Jerusalem, whose name was Simeon;
iting for the consolation of
the Holy Ghost was upon him.
t was revealed unto him by the Holy Ghost, that he should
had seen the Lord's Christ.
 came by the Spirit into the temple: and when the parents
s, to do for him after the custom of the law,
 and blessed God, and said, 2:29
w lettest thou thy servant depart in peace, according to thy
es have seen thy salvation, 2:31 Which thou hast
ople; 2:32 A light to lighten the
s, and the glory of thy people Israel.
2:33 And Joseph and his mother marvelled at those things which were

unto Mary his mother, Behold,
is set for the fall and rising again of many in Israel; and
be spoken against; 2:35 (Yea, a sword shall
 the thoughts of many hearts
led.
phetess, the daughter of Phanuel, of
tribe of Aser: she was of a great age, and had lived with an
om her virginity; 2:37 And she was a widow of
 departed not from the temple,
 God with fastings and prayers night and day.
 gave thanks likewise unto the
spake of him to all them that looked for redemption in
they had performed all things according to the law of
Galilee, to their own city Nazareth.
40 And the child grew, and waxed strong in spirit, filled with
e of God was upon him.
ents went to Jerusalem every year at the feast of the
 was twelve years old, they went up to Jerusalem after
2:43 And when they had fulfilled the days, as they returned, the child
d behind in Jerusalem; and Joseph and his mother knew not
supposing him to have been in the company, went a day's
m among their kinsfolk and acquaintance.

urned back again to Jerusalem,
m.
 three days they found him in the
 sitting in the midst of the doctors, both hearing them, and

ished at his understanding and

azed: and his mother said unto
why hast thou thus dealt with us? behold, thy father and I
ng.
it that ye sought me? wist ye not
must be about my Father's business?  2:50 And they understood
he spake unto them.
wn with them, and came to Nazareth, and was subject
all these sayings in her heart.
d Jesus increased in wisdom and stature, and in favour with God
 in the fifteenth year of the reign of Tiberius Caesar, Pontius
or of Judaea, and Herod being tetrarch of Galilee,
of Ituraea and of the region of
is, and Lysanias the tetrarch of Abilene, 3:2 Annas and
ests, the word of God came unto John the
son of Zacharias in the wilderness.
 And he came into all the country about Jordan, preaching the
 for the remission of sins; 3:4 As it is written
 the prophet, saying, The voice of
ying in the wilderness, Prepare ye the way of the Lord, make his

ry mountain and hill shall be
; and the crooked shall be made straight, and the rough
3:6 And all flesh shall see the salvation
ude that came forth to be baptized of
, O generation of vipers, who hath warned you to flee from the
Bring forth therefore fruits worthy of repentance,
selves, We have Abraham to our father:
r I say unto you, That God is able of these stones to raise up
m.
o the root of the trees: every
fore which bringeth not forth good fruit is hewn down, and
:10 And the people asked him, saying, What shall we do then?  3:11 He
 saith unto them, He that hath two coats, let him impart
 he that hath meat, let him do likewise.

ized, and said unto him,
ll we do?  3:13 And he said unto them, Exact no more
ou.
nded of him, saying, And what shall
? And he said unto them, Do violence to no man, neither accuse
content with your wages.
e people were in expectation, and all men mused in their
 were the Christ, or not; 3:16 John
red, saying unto them all, I indeed baptize you with water; but
 cometh, the latchet of whose shoes I am not worthy
u with the Holy Ghost and with fire:
 Whose fan is in his hand, and he will throughly purge his floor,
he wheat into his garner; but the chaff he will burn
8 And many other things in his exhortation preached he unto the
 Herod the tetrarch, being reproved by him for Herodias his
and for all the evils which Herod had done,
shut up John in prison.
ll the people were baptized, it came to pass, that
raying, the heaven was opened, 3:22
he Holy Ghost descended in a bodily shape like a dove upon him,
om heaven, which said, Thou art my beloved Son; in
And Jesus himself began to be about thirty years of age, being
e son of Joseph, which was the son of Heli, 3:24
h was the son of Levi, which was the
of Melchi, which was the son of Janna, which was the son of
the son of Mattathias, which was the son of
was the son of Esli, which was
 Nagge, 3:26 Which was the son of Maath, which was the son
 the son of Semei, which was the son of
oseph, which was the son of Juda, 3:27 Which was the son of Joanna,
on of Rhesa, which was the son of Zorobabel, which was
was the son of Neri, 3:28 Which was the
on of Melchi, which was the son of Addi, which was the son of Cosam,
son of Elmodam, which was the son of Er, 3:29 Which was
the son of Eliezer, which was the son of
Jorim, which was the son of Matthat, which was the son of Levi, 3:30
son of Simeon, which was the son of Juda, which was the
e son of Jonan, which was the son of
kim, 3:31 Which was the son of Melea, which was the son of Menan,
 of Mattatha, which was the son of Nathan, which was
as the son of Jesse, which was the son
 Obed, which was the son of Booz, which was the son of Salmon, which
 Naasson, 3:33 Which was the son of Aminadab, which was
the son of Esrom, which was the son of
ares, which was the son of Juda, 3:34 Which was the son of Jacob,
 of Isaac, which was the son of Abraham, which was
son of Nachor, 3:35 Which was the son
Saruch, which was the son of Ragau, which was the son of Phalec,
of Heber, which was the son of Sala, 3:36 Which was
e son of Arphaxad, which was the son of
em, which was the son of Noe, which was the son of Lamech, 3:37 Which
f Mathusala, which was the son of Enoch, which was the
son of Maleleel, which was the son of
nan, 3:38 Which was the son of Enos, which was the son of Seth,
f Adam, which was the son of God.
nd Jesus being full of the Holy Ghost returned from Jordan, and
it into the wilderness, 4:2 Being forty days
s he did eat nothing: and when
ended, he afterward hungered.
he devil said unto him, If thou be the Son of God, command
de bread.
aying, It is written, That man shall not
live by bread alone, but by every word of God.
nto an high mountain, shewed unto
 the kingdoms of the world in a moment of time.
All this power will I give thee, and
glory of them: for that is delivered unto me; and to whomsoever I

ll shall be thine.
ed and said unto him, Get thee behind me, Satan:
hip the Lord thy God, and him only
thou serve.
erusalem, and set him on a pinnacle of the
e Son of God, cast thyself
e: 4:10 For it is written, He shall give his angels
 4:11 And in their hands they shall
thee up, lest at any time thou dash thy foot against a stone.
ering said unto him, It is said, Thou shalt not
 when the devil had ended all the temptation, he departed from

he Spirit into Galilee: and
t a fame of him through all the region round about.
ynagogues, being glorified of all.
 And he came to Nazareth, where he had been brought up: and, as
went into the synagogue on the sabbath day, and
here was delivered unto him the book of the prophet Esaias.
the book, he found the place where it was
pon me, because he hath
each the gospel to the poor; he hath sent me to heal
eliverance to the captives, and
g of sight to the blind, to set at liberty them that are
e acceptable year of the Lord.
 he closed the book, and he gave it again to the minister, and
es of all them that were in the synagogue were
n to say unto them, This day is this scripture
all bare him witness, and wondered at the gracious words
 mouth. And they said, Is not this Joseph's
ll surely say unto me this
cian, heal thyself: whatsoever we have heard done in
 country.
y unto you, No prophet is accepted in his
truth, many widows were in Israel in the days
 three years and six months, when
amine was throughout all the land; 4:26 But unto none of them
unto Sarepta, a city of Sidon, unto a woman that
rs were in Israel in the time of Eliseus the
, saving Naaman the Syrian.
l they in the synagogue, when they heard these things, were
 And rose up, and thrust him out of the city,
 whereon their city was built,
might cast him down headlong.
he passing through the midst of them went his way, 4:31 And
 a city of Galilee, and taught them on the
nished at his doctrine: for his word was with
here was a man, which had a spirit of an
unclean devil, and cried out with a loud voice, 4:34 Saying, Let us
e we to do with thee, thou Jesus of Nazareth? art thou
hee who thou art; the Holy One of God.
4:35 And Jesus rebuked him, saying, Hold thy peace, and come out of
n the devil had thrown him in the midst, he came out of him,
:36 And they were all amazed, and spake among themselves, saying,
is! for with authority and power he commandeth the
ut.
nto every place of the country
t.
ue, and entered into Simon's
d Simon's wife's mother was taken with a great fever; and they
.
ed the fever; and it left her:
ately she arose and ministered unto them.
they that had any sick with
es brought them unto him; and he laid his hands on every
em.
ny, crying out, and saying, Thou
st the Son of God. And he rebuking them suffered them not to
hat he was Christ.
 day, he departed and went into a desert place:
 unto him, and stayed him, that he
 not depart from them.
 unto them, I must preach the kingdom of God to other
 I sent.
nagogues of Galilee.
 pass, that, as the people pressed upon him to hear
e lake of Gennesaret, 5:2 And saw two
ps standing by the lake: but the fishermen were gone out of them,
their nets.
 of the ships, which was Simon's, and
yed him that he would thrust out a little from the land. And he sat
t the people out of the ship.
hen he had left speaking, he said unto Simon, Launch out into
n your nets for a draught.
n answering said unto him, Master, we have toiled all the
hing: nevertheless at thy word I will let
is done, they inclosed a great multitude of
 they beckoned unto their partners, which were in the other
come and help them. And they came, and filled
 sink.
fell down at Jesus' knees, saying,
 from me; for I am a sinful man, O Lord.

were with him, at the draught
es which they had taken: 5:10 And so was also James, and
 which were partners with Simon. And Jesus
th thou shalt catch men.
they had brought their ships to land, they forsook all,
nd it came to pass, when he was in a certain city, behold a man
o seeing Jesus fell on his face, and besought him,
 canst make me clean.
orth his hand, and touched him, saying, I will: be
leprosy departed from him.
charged him to tell no man: but go, and shew thyself to
hy cleansing, according as Moses commanded,
so much the more went there a fame abroad of him: and great
r to hear, and to be healed by him of their
mself into the wilderness, and prayed.
5:17 And it came to pass on a certain day, as he was teaching, that
isees and doctors of the law sitting by, which were
ee, and Judaea, and Jerusalem: and the
wer of the Lord was present to heal them.
a man which was taken with a
hey sought means to bring him in, and to lay him before
could not find by what way they might bring him in
ent upon the housetop, and let him
hrough the tiling with his couch into the midst before Jesus.
w their faith, he said unto him, Man, thy sins are
cribes and the Pharisees began to reason, saying, Who is
emies? Who can forgive sins, but God alone?
ughts, he answering said unto
reason ye in your hearts?  5:23 Whether is easier, to say,
e; or to say, Rise up and walk?  5:24 But that
 power upon earth to forgive sins,
id unto the sick of the palsy,) I say unto thee, Arise, and take
go into thine house.
ly he rose up before them, and took up that whereon
 house, glorifying God.
ere all amazed, and they glorified God, and were filled
seen strange things to day.
ter these things he went forth, and saw a publican, named
ipt of custom: and he said unto him, Follow
nd followed him.
 a great feast in his own house: and there was a
others that sat down with them.
t their scribes and Pharisees murmured against his disciples,
 and drink with publicans and sinners?  5:31 And
ey that are whole need not a
ut they that are sick.
to call the righteous, but sinners to repentance.
y do the disciples of John fast often,
d make prayers, and likewise the disciples of the Pharisees; but
k?  5:34 And he said unto them, Can ye make the
while the bridegroom is with them?
ut the days will come, when the bridegroom shall be taken away
shall they fast in those days.
 he spake also a parable unto them; No man putteth a piece of
 old; if otherwise, then both the new maketh a
ut of the new agreeth not with the

d bottles; else the new wine
he bottles, and be spilled, and the bottles shall perish.
be put into new bottles; and both are
served.
ld wine straightway desireth new: for
saith, The old is better.
me to pass on the second sabbath after the first, that he
lds; and his disciples plucked the ears of
 hands.
s said unto them, Why do ye that which
 not lawful to do on the sabbath days?  6:3 And Jesus answering them
not read so much as this, what David did, when himself
ch were with him; 6:4 How he went into the
hewbread, and gave also to
 with him; which it is not lawful to eat but for the
d unto them, That the Son of man is Lord
also of the sabbath.
 pass also on another sabbath, that he entered into
here was a man whose right hand was
red.
watched him, whether he would heal
 sabbath day; that they might find an accusation against him.
ir thoughts, and said to the man which had the
rth in the midst. And he arose and
forth.
 will ask you one thing; Is it lawful
the sabbath days to do good, or to do evil? to save life, or to
nd looking round about upon them all, he said unto
 And he did so: and his hand was
 whole as the other.
 filled with madness; and communed one with another

hat he went out into a
and continued all night in prayer to God.
o him his disciples: and of
 twelve, whom also he named apostles; 6:14 Simon, (whom
ndrew his brother, James and John, Philip
 James the son of Alphaeus,
led Zelotes, 6:16 And Judas the brother of James, and
s the traitor.
th them, and stood in the plain, and the
company of his disciples, and a great multitude of people out of all
usalem, and from the sea coast of Tyre and Sidon, which
 healed of their diseases; 6:18 And they
that were vexed with unclean spirits: and they were healed.
ltitude sought to touch him: for there went

disciples, and said, Blessed be
for yours is the kingdom of God.
lessed are ye that hunger now: for ye shall be filled. Blessed
: for ye shall laugh.
ye, when men shall hate you, and when they shall
nd shall reproach you, and cast out
name as evil, for the Son of man's sake.

r joy: for, behold, your
in heaven: for in the like manner did their fathers
woe unto you that are rich! for ye have received your
 you that are full! for ye shall hunger. Woe unto you
mourn and weep.
 all men shall speak well of you! for so did

 your enemies, do good to them
 you, 6:28 Bless them that curse you, and pray for them

 the one cheek offer also the
him that taketh away thy cloak forbid not to take thy coat
ery man that asketh of thee; and of him that taketh
in.
d do to you, do ye also to them

u, what thank have ye? for
ove those that love them.
e do good to them which do good to you, what thank have
en the same.
m of whom ye hope to receive, what thank
have ye? for sinners also lend to sinners, to receive as much again.
e ye your enemies, and do good, and lend, hoping for
 shall be great, and ye shall be the
dren of the Highest: for he is kind unto the unthankful and to the
 ye therefore merciful, as your Father also is merciful.
hall not be judged: condemn not, and ye shall
ll be forgiven: 6:38 Give, and it
e given unto you; good measure, pressed down, and shaken
, shall men give into your bosom. For with
shall be measured to you
nd he spake a parable unto them, Can the blind lead the blind?
fall into the ditch?  6:40 The disciple is not
 is perfect shall be as his
41 And why beholdest thou the mote that is in thy brother's eye, but
 the beam that is in thine own eye?  6:42 Either how
 Brother, let me pull out the mote that
s in thine eye, when thou thyself beholdest not the beam that is in
Thou hypocrite, cast out first the beam out of thine
ee clearly to pull out the mote that is
n thy brother's eye.
ee bringeth not forth corrupt fruit; neither doth a
ruit.
is own fruit. For of thorns men do
ther figs, nor of a bramble bush gather they grapes.
ood treasure of his heart bringeth forth
that which is good; and an evil man out of the evil treasure of his
forth that which is evil: for of the abundance of the
6:46 And why call ye me, Lord, Lord, and do not the things which I
ever cometh to me, and heareth my sayings, and doeth
he is like: 6:48 He is like a man which
uilt an house, and digged deep, and laid the foundation on a rock:
od arose, the stream beat vehemently upon that house,
t was founded upon a rock.
that heareth, and doeth not, is like a man that without a
 upon the earth; against which the stream did
ell; and the ruin of that house
.
ings in the audience of the
tered into Capernaum.
 centurion's servant, who was dear unto him, was
 when he heard of Jesus, he sent unto him the elders of the
at he would come and heal his servant.
7:4 And when they came to Jesus, they besought him instantly, saying,
orthy for whom he should do this: 7:5 For he loveth our
s a synagogue.
 them. And when he was now not far from the
m, saying unto him, Lord,
self: for I am not worthy that thou shouldest enter
ither thought I myself worthy to come
o thee: but say in a word, and my servant shall be healed.
n set under authority, having under me soldiers,
th; and to another, Come, and he
and to my servant, Do this, and he doeth it.
e marvelled at him, and turned him
 and said unto the people that followed him, I say unto you, I
eat faith, no, not in Israel.
they that were sent, returning to the house, found the
sick.
after, that he went into a city
in; and many of his disciples went with him, and much people.
me nigh to the gate of the city, behold, there was
 son of his mother, and she was a
and much people of the city was with her.
compassion on her, and said
p not.
 bier: and they that bare him stood
.
ee, Arise.
t up, and began to speak. And he delivered
e a fear on all: and they glorified God, saying,
mong us; and, That God hath visited
eople.
 forth throughout all Judaea, and
out all the region round about.
d the disciples of John shewed him of all these things.
o him two of his disciples sent them to
esus, saying, Art thou he that should come? or look we for another?
en were come unto him, they said, John Baptist hath
thou he that should come? or look we
another?  7:21 And in that same hour he cured many of their
, and of evil spirits; and unto many that were
sus answering said unto them, Go your way, and tell John
nd heard; how that the blind see, the lame
hear, the dead are raised, to
e gospel is preached.
is he, whosoever shall not be offended in me.
n were departed, he began to speak
he people concerning John, What went ye out into the wilderness
 shaken with the wind?  7:25 But what went ye out
 raiment?  Behold, they which are
sly apparelled, and live delicately, are in kings' courts.
out for to see? A prophet? Yea, I say unto you,
27 This is he, of whom it is written, Behold, I send my messenger
which shall prepare thy way before thee.

t are born of women there is
r prophet than John the Baptist: but he that is least in
ter than he.
at heard him, and the publicans, justified
John.
s rejected the counsel of God against
mselves, being not baptized of him.
1 And the Lord said, Whereunto then shall I liken the men of this
o what are they like?  7:32 They are like unto
 and calling one to another, and
We have piped unto you, and ye have not danced; we have
 not wept.
me neither eating bread nor drinking wine;
 Son of man is come eating and drinking; and ye say, Behold a
 winebibber, a friend of publicans and sinners!
 her children.
isees desired him that he would eat with him.
, and sat down to meat.
d, a woman in the city, which was a sinner, when she
 the Pharisee's house, brought an
er box of ointment, 7:38 And stood at his feet behind him
h his feet with tears, and did wipe them with
 feet, and anointed them with the
t.
 bidden him saw it, he spake
lf, saying, This man, if he were a prophet, would have
 woman this is that toucheth him: for she
said unto him, Simon, I have somewhat to say
n.
ich had two debtors: the one owed
ndred pence, and the other fifty.
And when they had nothing to pay, he frankly forgave them both.
which of them will love him most?  7:43 Simon
 to whom he forgave most.
nto him, Thou hast rightly judged.
 And he turned to the woman, and said unto Simon, Seest thou this
into thine house, thou gavest me no water for my
with tears, and wiped them with the
 of her head.
ss: but this woman since the time I came in
6 My head with oil thou didst not anoint: but this woman hath
 ointment.
ee, Her sins, which are many, are
n; for she loved much: but to whom little is forgiven, the same
:48 And he said unto her, Thy sins are forgiven.
ith him began to say within
ho is this that forgiveth sins also?  7:50 And he said to
 saved thee; go in peace.
me to pass afterward, that he went throughout every city
 shewing the glad tidings of the kingdom of
And certain women, which had
of evil spirits and infirmities, Mary called Magdalene,
ls, 8:3 And Joanna the wife of Chuza
d's steward, and Susanna, and many others, which ministered unto
ance.
hered together, and were come to him
of every city, he spake by a parable: 8:5 A sower went out to sow
he sowed, some fell by the way side; and it was
air devoured it.
 a rock; and as soon as it was sprung up, it
ure.
d the thorns sprang up with it, and
d it.
, and sprang up, and bare fruit an
dfold. And when he had said these things, he cried, He that hath
him hear.
im, saying, What might this parable be?
:10 And he said, Unto you it is given to know the mysteries of the
but to others in parables; that seeing they might not
ot understand.
this: The seed is the word of God.
 Those by the way side are they that hear; then cometh the devil,
he word out of their hearts, lest they should believe
 the rock are they, which, when they hear, receive the
e no root, which for a while believe, and
And that which fell among thorns are they, which, when they have
nd are choked with cares and riches and pleasures of
to perfection.
d ground are they, which in an honest and good
t, and bring forth fruit with

le, covereth it with a vessel,
 it under a bed; but setteth it on a candlestick, that they
the light.
that shall not be made manifest; neither
any thing hid, that shall not be known and come abroad.
how ye hear: for whosoever hath, to him shall
m him shall be taken even that
eemeth to have.
is mother and his brethren, and could not come
 was told him by certain which said, Thy mother and thy
iring to see thee.
 and said unto them, My mother and my brethren are
, and do it.
n a certain day, that he went into a ship
, Let us go over unto the
he lake. And they launched forth.
But as they sailed he fell asleep: and there came down a storm of
 and they were filled with water, and were in
m, and awoke him, saying, Master, master, we
 wind and the raging of the
ey ceased, and there was a calm.
nd he said unto them, Where is your faith? And they being afraid
ne to another, What manner of man is this! for he
er, and they obey him.
rived at the country of the Gadarenes, which is over
hen he went forth to land, there met him out of the city a
evils long time, and ware no clothes, neither

and fell down before him, and
 voice said, What have I to do with thee, Jesus, thou Son
ch thee, torment me not.
ad commanded the unclean spirit to come out of the man.
t him: and he was kept bound with chains
and in fetters; and he brake the bands, and was driven of the devil
ness.)  8:30 And Jesus asked him, saying, What is thy
cause many devils were entered into him.

 not command them to go out
.
any swine feeding on the
ey besought him that he would suffer them to enter

an, and entered into the swine:
erd ran violently down a steep place into the lake, and were
hey that fed them saw what was done, they fled, and went
d in the country.
ut to see what was done; and came to Jesus, and
ls were departed, sitting at the
Jesus, clothed, and in his right mind: and they were afraid.
 saw it told them by what means he that was
8:37 Then the whole multitude of the country of the Gadarenes round
him to depart from them; for they were taken with great
he ship, and returned back again.
Now the man out of whom the devils were departed besought him
 him: but Jesus sent him away, saying, 8:39
 great things God hath done
d he went his way, and published throughout the whole
ad done unto him.
ass, that, when Jesus was returned, the people
ll waiting for him.
here came a man named Jairus, and he was a ruler of
 at Jesus' feet, and besought him that
 would come into his house: 8:42 For he had one only daughter, about
f age, and she lay a dying. But as he went the people
oman having an issue of blood twelve years, which had
sicians, neither could be healed of any,
8:44 Came behind him, and touched the border of his garment: and
sue of blood stanched.
aid, Who touched me? When all denied, Peter and they
r, the multitude throng thee and press
ee, and sayest thou, Who touched me?  8:46 And Jesus said, Somebody
: for I perceive that virtue is gone out of me.
she was not hid, she came trembling,
falling down before him, she declared unto him before all the
 she had touched him, and how she was healed
her, Daughter, be of good comfort: thy faith
8:49 While he yet spake, there cometh one from the ruler of the
saying to him, Thy daughter is dead; trouble not
 heard it, he answered him, saying, Fear not:
hole.
use, he suffered no man to go in,
ter, and James, and John, and the father and the mother of the
all wept, and bewailed her: but he said, Weep not; she is not

ing that she was dead.
them all out, and took her by the hand, and called,
d her spirit came again, and she arose straightway: and he
at.
d: but he charged them that they
ell no man what was done.
alled his twelve disciples together, and gave them power
ils, and to cure diseases.
ent them to preach the kingdom of God, and to heal the
o them, Take nothing for your journey, neither
ither money; neither have two
e.
to, there abide, and thence
5 And whosoever will not receive you, when ye go out of that city,
ry dust from your feet for a testimony against them.
ent through the towns, preaching the
el, and healing every where.
rod the tetrarch heard of all that was done by him: and he
hat it was said of some, that John was risen
lias had appeared; and of
e of the old prophets was risen again.
9:9 And Herod said, John have I beheaded: but who is this, of whom I
gs? And he desired to see him.
 the apostles, when they were returned, told him all that they
k them, and went aside privately into a desert
ethsaida.
y knew it, followed him: and he received
them, and spake unto them of the kingdom of God, and healed them that
ealing.
wear away, then came the twelve, and
 unto him, Send the multitude away, that they may go into the
nd about, and lodge, and get victuals: for we are
ut he said unto them, Give ye them to eat. And they said, We
loaves and two fishes; except we should go and
4 For they were about five thousand men. And he said to his
t down by fifties in a company.
d they did so, and made them all sit down.
the two fishes, and looking up
 he blessed them, and brake, and gave to the disciples to

lled: and there was taken up of
 that remained to them twelve baskets.
9:18 And it came to pass, as he was alone praying, his disciples were
 he asked them, saying, Whom say the people that I am?
hn the Baptist; but some say, Elias; and
others say, that one of the old prophets is risen again.
But whom say ye that I am? Peter answering
straitly charged them, and commanded them to tell no man
he Son of man must suffer many things, and
sts and scribes, and be slain,
sed the third day.
them all, If any man will come after me, let him
s daily, and follow me.
ver will save his life shall lose it: but whosoever
 the same shall save it.
is a man advantaged, if he gain the whole world, and
  9:26 For whosoever shall be ashamed of
me and of my words, of him shall the Son of man be ashamed, when he
is own glory, and in his Father's, and of the holy
f a truth, there be some standing here, which
ee the kingdom of God.
 to pass about an eight days after these sayings, he
 and went up into a mountain to pray.
:29 And as he prayed, the fashion of his countenance was altered, and
as white and glistering.
ld, there talked with him two men, which were Moses and
 glory, and spake of his decease which he
ut Peter and they that were with him were heavy with sleep: and
e, they saw his glory, and the two men that stood
pass, as they departed from him, Peter said unto
o be here: and let us make three
les; one for thee, and one for Moses, and one for Elias: not

cloud, and overshadowed them:
ared as they entered into the cloud.
35 And there came a voice out of the cloud, saying, This is my
m.
sus was found alone. And they kept
se, and told no man in those days any of those things which they
And it came to pass, that on the next day, when they were come
much people met him.
a man of the company cried out, saying, Master, I
or he is mine only child.
 a spirit taketh him, and he suddenly crieth out; and it
h again, and bruising him hardly departeth
ciples to cast him out; and they could not.
hless and perverse generation,
hall I be with you, and suffer you? Bring thy son hither.
a coming, the devil threw him down, and tare
spirit, and healed the child, and
ed him again to his father.
ey were all amazed at the mighty power of God. But while
 all things which Jesus did, he said unto
k down into your ears: for
 shall be delivered into the hands of men.
ng, and it was hid from them,
erceived it not: and they feared to ask him of that saying.
 a reasoning among them, which of them should be
iving the thought of their heart, took a child,
nto them, Whosoever shall receive
ild in my name receiveth me: and whosoever shall receive me
 me: for he that is least among you all, the
answered and said, Master, we saw one casting out devils
 him, because he followeth not with us.

not: for he that is not
 us.
 time was come that he should be
 up, he stedfastly set his face to go to Jerusalem, 9:52 And
 his face: and they went, and entered into a
dy for him.
ve him, because his face was as though he
is disciples James and John saw this, they said, Lord,
re to come down from heaven, and consume
them, even as Elias did?  9:55 But he turned, and rebuked them, and
ot what manner of spirit ye are of.
6 For the Son of man is not come to destroy men's lives, but to
 went to another village.
ame to pass, that, as they went in the way, a certain man
ll follow thee whithersoever thou goest.

 holes, and birds of the air
but the Son of man hath not where to lay his head.
 Follow me. But he said, Lord, suffer me
first to go and bury my father.
sus said unto him, Let the dead bury their dead: but go thou
 of God.
rd, I will follow thee; but let me first
go bid them farewell, which are at home at my house.
, No man, having put his hand to the
gh, and looking back, is fit for the kingdom of God.
LORD appointed other seventy also, and
nt them two and two before his face into every city and place,
ould come.
them, The harvest truly is great, but the
Lord of the harvest, that he
orth labourers into his harvest.
o your ways: behold, I send you forth as lambs among wolves.
urse, nor scrip, nor shoes: and salute no man by
er house ye enter, first say, Peace be to this
ce be there, your peace shall rest upon it:
10:7 And in the same house remain, eating and drinking such things as
r the labourer is worthy of his hire. Go not from house
whatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you, eat such
ou: 10:9 And heal the sick that are therein,
is come nigh unto you.
hatsoever city ye enter, and they receive you not, go
s of the same, and say, 10:11 Even the
ry dust of your city, which cleaveth on us, we do wipe off against
ding be ye sure of this, that the kingdom of God is
t I say unto you, that it shall be more tolerable in that day
hat city.
! woe unto thee, Bethsaida! for if the
ghty works had been done in Tyre and Sidon, which have been done in
 great while ago repented, sitting in sackcloth and
 more tolerable for Tyre and Sidon at the
, Capernaum, which art exalted to heaven, shalt be
 that heareth you heareth me; and he that despiseth you
espiseth me despiseth him that sent me.

 joy, saying, Lord, even the
ubject unto us through thy name.
And he said unto them, I beheld Satan as lightning fall from
d, I give unto you power to tread on serpents and
 of the enemy: and nothing shall by
eans hurt you.
 this rejoice not, that the spirits are
ubject unto you; but rather rejoice, because your names are written
0:21 In that hour Jesus rejoiced in spirit, and said, I thank thee, O
of heaven and earth, that thou hast hid these things from
 hast revealed them unto babes: even so,
Father; for so it seemed good in thy sight.
of my Father: and no man knoweth
Son is, but the Father; and who the Father is, but the Son,
will reveal him.
m unto his disciples, and said privately,
 that ye see: 10:24 For I
many prophets and kings have desired to see those
 seen them; and to hear those things
h ye hear, and have not heard them.
25 And, behold, a certain lawyer stood up, and tempted him, saying,
all I do to inherit eternal life?  10:26 He said unto
aw? how readest thou?  10:27 And he
ring said, Thou shalt love the Lord thy God with all thy heart,
ul, and with all thy strength, and with all thy

answered right: this do, and
ive.
imself, said unto Jesus, And who is
ighbour?  10:30 And Jesus answering said, A certain man went down
 Jericho, and fell among thieves, which stripped him
m, and departed, leaving him half dead.

tain priest that way: and
, he passed by on the other side.
 And likewise a Levite, when he was at the place, came and looked
d by on the other side.
tain Samaritan, as he journeyed, came where he was: and
passion on him, 10:34 And went to him, and
wine, and set him on his own
rought him to an inn, and took care of him.
ted, he took out two pence, and
 to the host, and said unto him, Take care of him; and
e, when I come again, I will repay thee.

 thou, was neighbour unto him
mong the thieves?  10:37 And he said, He that shewed mercy
unto him, Go, and do thou likewise.
38 Now it came to pass, as they went, that he entered into a
 certain woman named Martha received him into
ter called Mary, which also sat at Jesus' feet,
rtha was cumbered about much serving, and came to him, and
t care that my sister hath left me to serve
 me.
unto her, Martha, Martha, thou art
l and troubled about many things: 10:42 But one thing is
sen that good part, which shall not be taken
pass, that, as he was praying in a certain place,
les said unto him, Lord, teach us to
, as John also taught his disciples.
:2 And he said unto them, When ye pray, say, Our Father which art in
ed be thy name. Thy kingdom come. Thy will be done, as
1:3 Give us day by day our daily bread.

 forgive every one that is
. And lead us not into temptation; but deliver us from
to them, Which of you shall have a friend, and
ay unto him, Friend, lend me three
; 11:6 For a friend of mine in his journey is come to me, and I
 before him?  11:7 And he from within shall answer
r is now shut, and my children are
e in bed; I cannot rise and give thee.
11:8 I say unto you, Though he will not rise and give him, because he
, yet because of his importunity he will rise and give

ll be given you; seek, and ye
 knock, and it shall be opened unto you.

h; and he that seeketh
m that knocketh it shall be opened.
11 If a son shall ask bread of any of you that is a father, will he
e? or if he ask a fish, will he for a fish give him a
l ask an egg, will he offer him a
n?  11:13 If ye then, being evil, know how to give good gifts
ow much more shall your heavenly Father give the
 11:14 And he was casting out a
d it was dumb. And it came to pass, when the devil was gone
d the people wondered.
f them said, He casteth out devils through Beelzebub
:16 And others, tempting him, sought of him a sign from heaven.
wing their thoughts, said unto them, Every kingdom
t to desolation; and a house divided
nst a house falleth.
o be divided against himself, how shall his kingdom
st out devils through Beelzebub.
And if I by Beelzebub cast out devils, by whom do your sons cast
e shall they be your judges.
if I with the finger of God cast out devils, no doubt the
on you.
eepeth his palace, his goods are in
: 11:22 But when a stronger than he shall come upon him, and
h from him all his armour wherein he trusted,
that is not with me is against me: and he that gathereth not

 of a man, he walketh through
 seeking rest; and finding none, he saith, I will return
e out.
deth it swept and garnished.
 goeth he, and taketh to him seven other spirits more wicked
 enter in, and dwell there: and the last state

 these things, a certain woman
pany lifted up her voice, and said unto him, Blessed is the
d the paps which thou hast sucked.
8 But he said, Yea rather, blessed are they that hear the word of

d thick together, he began to
s an evil generation: they seek a sign; and there shall no
e sign of Jonas the prophet.
as Jonas was a sign unto the Ninevites, so shall also the
eration.
hall rise up in the judgment with the
 of this generation, and condemn them: for she came from the utmost
rth to hear the wisdom of Solomon; and, behold, a
11:32 The men of Nineve shall rise up in the judgment with this
ll condemn it: for they repented at the preaching
than Jonas is here.
he hath lighted a candle, putteth it in a secret
 on a candlestick, that they which
n may see the light.
 the body is the eye: therefore when thine eye is
ll of light; but when thine eye is
thy body also is full of darkness.
5 Take heed therefore that the light which is in thee be not
thy whole body therefore be full of light, having no part
full of light, as when the bright shining of
7 And as he spake, a certain Pharisee besought him to dine with
, and sat down to meat.
the Pharisee saw it, he marvelled that he had not first
:39 And the Lord said unto him, Now do ye Pharisees make clean the
up and the platter; but your inward part is full of
40 Ye fools, did not he that made that which is without make that
lso?  11:41 But rather give alms of such things as ye
 are clean unto you.
 you, Pharisees! for ye tithe mint and rue and all
udgment and the love of God: these
ye to have done, and not to leave the other undone.
! for ye love the uppermost seats in the
synagogues, and greetings in the markets.
es, hypocrites! for ye are as
h appear not, and the men that walk over them are not aware
answered one of the lawyers, and said unto him, Master,
t us also.
you also, ye lawyers! for ye lade men with
rselves touch not the burdens
 your fingers.
ye build the sepulchres of the prophets, and
ly ye bear witness that ye allow the deeds of your fathers:
them, and ye build their sepulchres.
:49 Therefore also said the wisdom of God, I will send them prophets
and some of them they shall slay and persecute: 11:50
phets, which was shed from the foundation
eration; 11:51 From the blood
o the blood of Zacharias which perished between the altar
say unto you, It shall be required of this
rs! for ye have taken away the key of
wledge: ye entered not in yourselves, and them that were entering

hem, the scribes and the
to urge him vehemently, and to provoke him to speak of
it for him, and seeking to catch something
 him.
 were gathered together an
ltitude of people, insomuch that they trode one upon
his disciples first of all, Beware ye of
the leaven of the Pharisees, which is hypocrisy.
d, that shall not be revealed; neither
d, that shall not be known.
ore whatsoever ye have spoken in darkness shall be heard in
ch ye have spoken in the ear in closets shall
12:4 And I say unto you my friends, Be not afraid of them that kill
fter that have no more that they can do.

ll fear: Fear him, which after
lled hath power to cast into hell; yea, I say unto you, Fear
ive sparrows sold for two farthings, and not one of them
12:7 But even the very hairs of your head
are of more value than many
12:8 Also I say unto you, Whosoever shall confess me before men, him
of man also confess before the angels of God: 12:9 But
n shall be denied before the angels of
d.
rd against the Son of man, it
rgiven him: but unto him that blasphemeth against the Holy
rgiven.
nto the synagogues, and unto
 and powers, take ye no thought how or what thing ye shall
 say: 12:12 For the Holy Ghost shall teach you
y.
to him, Master, speak to my
 he divide the inheritance with me.
14 And he said unto him, Man, who made me a judge or a divider over
 he said unto them, Take heed, and beware of
eth not in the abundance of the
ich he possesseth.
 parable unto them, saying, The ground of a
lly: 12:17 And he thought
 saying, What shall I do, because I have no room where
And he said, This will I do: I will pull
down my barns, and build greater; and there will I bestow all my
s.
l, thou hast much goods laid up
years; take thine ease, eat, drink, and be merry.
ou fool, this night thy soul shall be
uired of thee: then whose shall those things be, which thou hast
o is he that layeth up treasure for himself, and is
nd he said unto his disciples, Therefore I say unto you, Take
ife, what ye shall eat; neither for the body,
fe is more than meat, and the body is more than raiment.
s: for they neither sow nor reap; which
either have storehouse nor barn; and God feedeth them: how much more
than the fowls?  12:25 And which of you with taking
one cubit?  12:26 If ye then be not
to do that thing which is least, why take ye thought for the
the lilies how they grow: they toil not, they
t Solomon in all his glory was
d like one of these.
so clothe the grass, which is to day in the field,
ven; how much more will he clothe you,
ye of little faith?  12:29 And seek not ye what ye shall eat, or
k, neither be ye of doubtful mind.
0 For all these things do the nations of the world seek after: and
eth that ye have need of these things.
12:31 But rather seek ye the kingdom of God; and all these things
to you.
or it is your Father's good pleasure to
ive you the kingdom.
 have, and give alms; provide yourselves bags which
heavens that faileth not, where no
approacheth, neither moth corrupteth.
2:34 For where your treasure is, there will your heart be also.
ins be girded about, and your lights burning; 12:36
 that wait for their lord, when he will
eturn from the wedding; that when he cometh and knocketh, they may
mediately.
ants, whom the lord when he cometh shall
find watching: verily I say unto you, that he shall gird himself, and
sit down to meat, and will come forth and serve them.
in the second watch, or come in the third
e servants.
f the goodman of the house had known what
watched, and not have
to be broken through.
fore ready also: for the Son of man cometh at an hour
hen Peter said unto him, Lord, speakest thou this parable unto
 12:42 And the Lord said, Who then is that
 shall make ruler over his
give them their portion of meat in due season?  12:43
 his lord when he cometh shall find so
ing.
hat he will make him ruler over all
he hath.
say in his heart, My lord delayeth his
ming; and shall begin to beat the menservants and maidens, and to
d to be drunken; 12:46 The lord of that servant will
not for him, and at an hour when he is
t aware, and will cut him in sunder, and will appoint him his
lievers.
knew his lord's will, and prepared not
mself, neither did according to his will, shall be beaten with many
48 But he that knew not, and did commit things worthy of stripes,
ith few stripes. For unto whomsoever much is given,
and to whom men have committed much, of
im they will ask the more.
ome to send fire on the earth; and what will I, if it be
t I have a baptism to be baptized with; and
shed!  12:51 Suppose ye that I
 give peace on earth? I tell you, Nay; but rather division:
th there shall be five in one house divided,
ee.
gainst the son, and the son against
ather; the mother against the daughter, and the daughter against
ther in law against her daughter in law, and the
 in law.
people, When ye see a cloud rise out of
he west, straightway ye say, There cometh a shower; and so it is.
ye see the south wind blow, ye say, There will be heat;
2:56 Ye hypocrites, ye can discern the face of the sky and of the
 it that ye do not discern this time?  12:57 Yea, and
ye not what is right?  12:58 When thou
est with thine adversary to the magistrate, as thou art in the way,
that thou mayest be delivered from him; lest he hale
ge deliver thee to the officer, and the
fficer cast thee into prison.
ell thee, thou shalt not depart thence, till thou hast paid
13:1 There were present at that season some that told him of the
blood Pilate had mingled with their sacrifices.
o them, Suppose ye that these
were sinners above all the Galilaeans, because they
ell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye
hall all likewise perish.
 eighteen, upon whom the tower in Siloam fell, and slew
re sinners above all men that dwelt in
rusalem?  13:5 I tell you, Nay: but, except ye repent, ye shall all
.
rtain man had a fig tree planted
ineyard; and he came and sought fruit thereon, and found none.
unto the dresser of his vineyard, Behold, these
 this fig tree, and find none: cut
n; why cumbereth it the ground?  13:8 And he answering said unto
alone this year also, till I shall dig about it, and
ruit, well: and if not, then after that
hou shalt cut it down.
 teaching in one of the synagogues on the sabbath.
 woman which had a spirit of infirmity
ghteen years, and was bowed together, and could in no wise lift up
2 And when Jesus saw her, he called her to him, and said unto her,
loosed from thine infirmity.
he laid his hands on her: and immediately she was made

nswered with indignation,
sus had healed on the sabbath day, and said unto the
which men ought to work: in them
e come and be healed, and not on the sabbath day.
m, and said, Thou hypocrite, doth not
h one of you on the sabbath loose his ox or his ass from the stall,
ay to watering?  13:16 And ought not this woman, being
Satan hath bound, lo, these eighteen
s, be loosed from this bond on the sabbath day?  13:17 And when he
hings, all his adversaries were ashamed: and all the
orious things that were done by him.
:18 Then said he, Unto what is the kingdom of God like? and
ble it?  13:19 It is like a grain of mustard
his garden; and it grew, and
t tree; and the fowls of the air lodged in the branches of
e said, Whereunto shall I liken the kingdom of God?
a woman took and hid in three measures
 meal, till the whole was leavened.
22 And he went through the cities and villages, teaching, and
usalem.
ord, are there few that be saved? And
said unto them, 13:24 Strive to enter in at the strait gate: for
ou, will seek to enter in, and shall not be able.
he house is risen up, and hath shut to
e door, and ye begin to stand without, and to knock at the door,
, open unto us; and he shall answer and say unto
 13:26 Then shall ye begin to say,
e eaten and drunk in thy presence, and thou hast taught in our
t he shall say, I tell you, I know you not whence ye are;
rkers of iniquity.
 weeping and gnashing of teeth, when ye shall see
d all the prophets, in the kingdom of
, and you yourselves thrust out.
And they shall come from the east, and from the west, and from
the south, and shall sit down in the kingdom of
e last which shall be first, and there are
same day there came certain of the Pharisees, saying unto
part hence: for Herod will kill thee.
3:32 And he said unto them, Go ye, and tell that fox, Behold, I cast
d I do cures to day and to morrow, and the third day I
 Nevertheless I must walk to day, and to morrow, and the day
ot be that a prophet perish out of Jerusalem.
 killest the prophets, and stonest
hat are sent unto thee; how often would I have gathered thy
 hen doth gather her brood under her wings, and
ouse is left unto you desolate: and
y I say unto you, Ye shall not see me, until the time come when
ed is he that cometh in the name of the Lord.
t into the house of one of the
isees to eat bread on the sabbath day, that they watched
there was a certain man before him which had the
g spake unto the lawyers and Pharisees, saying,
 day?  14:4 And they held their
d he took him, and healed him, and let him go; 14:5 And
h of you shall have an ass or an ox fallen
l him out on the sabbath day?
ey could not answer him again to these things.
 those which were bidden, when he
how they chose out the chief rooms; saying unto them.
f any man to a wedding, sit not down in the
n than thou be bidden of him;
 that bade thee and him come and say to thee, Give this man
ith shame to take the lowest room.
0 But when thou art bidden, go and sit down in the lowest room;
ade thee cometh, he may say unto thee, Friend, go
orship in the presence of them that
t meat with thee.
xalteth himself shall be abased; and he that
14:12 Then said he also to him that bade him, When thou makest a
, call not thy friends, nor thy brethren, neither
urs; lest they also bid thee again,
 recompence be made thee.
n thou makest a feast, call the poor, the maimed, the
ou shalt be blessed; for they cannot
mpense thee: for thou shalt be recompensed at the resurrection of
5 And when one of them that sat at meat with him heard these
im, Blessed is he that shall eat bread in the
 unto him, A certain man made a great supper, and
vant at supper time to say to them
ere bidden, Come; for all things are now ready.
nt began to make excuse. The first
nto him, I have bought a piece of ground, and I must needs go
ee have me excused.
aid, I have bought five yoke of oxen, and I go to
xcused.
married a wife, and therefore I cannot
me.
wed his lord these things. Then the
r of the house being angry said to his servant, Go out quickly
 lanes of the city, and bring in hither the poor,
 the blind.
 Lord, it is done as thou hast commanded,
ord said unto the servant, Go out into the highways and
come in, that my house may be filled.
4:24 For I say unto you, That none of those men which were bidden
 supper.
titudes with him: and he turned, and
 unto them, 14:26 If any man come to me, and hate not his father,
ife, and children, and brethren, and sisters, yea,
 be my disciple.
th not bear his cross, and come after me, cannot
 of you, intending to build a tower, sitteth not down
 whether he have sufficient to finish it?
foundation, and is not able
 all that behold it begin to mock him, 14:30 Saying, This
as not able to finish.
ng, going to make war against another king, sitteth
whether he be able with ten thousand to
eet him that cometh against him with twenty thousand?  14:32 Or else,
er is yet a great way off, he sendeth an ambassage, and
e.
f you that forsaketh not all that
, he cannot be my disciple.
is good: but if the salt have lost his savour, wherewith
35 It is neither fit for the land, nor yet
e that hath ears to hear, let

licans and sinners for to hear
:2 And the Pharisees and scribes murmured, saying, This man
eateth with them.
s parable unto them, saying, 15:4 What man of
ose one of them, doth not leave
y and nine in the wilderness, and go after that which is
5:5 And when he hath found it, he layeth it
d when he cometh home, he calleth together his friends and
them, Rejoice with me; for I have found my
 you, that likewise joy shall be in heaven over one
n over ninety and nine just persons,
h need no repentance.
woman having ten pieces of silver, if she lose one
and sweep the house, and seek
till she find it?  15:9 And when she hath found it, she
 neighbours together, saying, Rejoice with
ad lost.
, there is joy in the presence of the
els of God over one sinner that repenteth.
wo sons: 15:12 And the younger
id to his father, Father, give me the portion of goods that
ivided unto them his living.
not many days after the younger son gathered all together,
o a far country, and there wasted his
stance with riotous living.
hen he had spent all, there arose a mighty famine in that
in want.
imself to a citizen of that country; and
he sent him into his fields to feed swine.
s belly with the husks that the
 eat: and no man gave unto him.
nd when he came to himself, he said, How many hired servants of
ead enough and to spare, and I perish with hunger!
father, and will say unto him, Father,
have sinned against heaven, and before thee, 15:19 And am no more
ed thy son: make me as one of thy hired servants.
 his father. But when he was yet a
way off, his father saw him, and had compassion, and ran, and
 kissed him.
o him, Father, I have sinned against heaven,
y to be called thy son.
ather said to his servants, Bring forth the best robe,
 ring on his hand, and shoes on his feet:
nd kill it; and let us eat,
 15:24 For this my son was dead, and is alive again; he
 they began to be merry.
elder son was in the field: and as he came and drew nigh
ick and dancing.
e of the servants, and asked what these things
, Thy brother is come; and thy father hath
received him safe and sound.
he was angry, and would not go in: therefore came his father
.
ther, Lo, these many years do I
e, neither transgressed I at any time thy commandment: and
 a kid, that I might make merry with my
riends: 15:30 But as soon as this thy son was come, which hath
with harlots, thou hast killed for him the fatted
im, Son, thou art ever with me, and all that I
that we should make merry, and be glad: for this thy
 again; and was lost, and is found.
1 And he said also unto his disciples, There was a certain rich
eward; and the same was accused unto him that he
he called him, and said unto him, How is it that I hear this
nt of thy stewardship; for thou mayest be no
rd said within himself, What shall I do? for my
dship: I cannot dig; to beg I am

hen I am put out of the
 may receive me into their houses.
 So he called every one of his lord's debtors unto him, and said
w much owest thou unto my lord?  16:6 And he said,
he said unto him, Take thy bill, and
down quickly, and write fifty.
n said he to another, And how much owest thou? And he said, An
wheat. And he said unto him, Take thy bill, and
rd commended the unjust steward, because he had done
is world are in their generation wiser
an the children of light.
y unto you, Make to yourselves friends of the mammon of
 ye fail, they may receive you into
asting habitations.
ithful in that which is least is faithful also in
e least is unjust also in much.
f therefore ye have not been faithful in the unrighteous
 your trust the true riches?  16:12 And if
is another man's, who shall
 which is your own?  16:13 No servant can serve two
e the one, and love the other; or else
 will hold to the one, and despise the other. Ye cannot serve God
:14 And the Pharisees also, who were covetous, heard all these
ided him.
Ye are they which justify yourselves
re men; but God knoweth your hearts: for that which is highly
 abomination in the sight of God.
 The law and the prophets were until John: since that time the
eached, and every man presseth into it.

th to pass, than one tittle
 fail.
 wife, and marrieth another,
dultery: and whosoever marrieth her that is put away from
ultery.
man, which was clothed in purple and
 linen, and fared sumptuously every day: 16:20 And there was a
 Lazarus, which was laid at his gate, full of
ith the crumbs which fell from
an's table: moreover the dogs came and licked his sores.
s, that the beggar died, and was carried by
ch man also died, and was
nd in hell he lift up his eyes, being in torments, and
Lazarus in his bosom.
d and said, Father Abraham, have mercy on me, and
 tip of his finger in water, and cool
tongue; for I am tormented in this flame.
hat thou in thy lifetime
ood things, and likewise Lazarus evil things: but now
 tormented.
between us and you there is a great gulf
fixed: so that they which would pass from hence to you cannot; neither
s to us, that would come from thence.
6:27 Then he said, I pray thee therefore, father, that thou wouldest
 father's house: 16:28 For I have five brethren; that he
t they also come into this place of torment.
ave Moses and the prophets; let
 them.
braham: but if one went unto them from
e dead, they will repent.
said unto him, If they hear not Moses and the prophets,
ded, though one rose from the dead.
1 Then said he unto the disciples, It is impossible but that
t woe unto him, through whom they come!  17:2 It
ne were hanged about his neck, and
t into the sea, than that he should offend one of these little
eed to yourselves: If thy brother trespass against thee,
nt, forgive him.
s against thee seven times in a day, and seven
aying, I repent; thou shalt

d, Increase our faith.
d said, If ye had faith as a grain of mustard seed, ye
 tree, Be thou plucked up by the root, and
d obey you.
ng a servant plowing or feeding cattle,
ill say unto him by and by, when he is come from the field, Go and
?  17:8 And will not rather say unto him, Make ready
thyself, and serve me, till I have eaten
and drunken; and afterward thou shalt eat and drink?  17:9 Doth he
nt because he did the things that were commanded him?
ise ye, when ye shall have done all those things which
re unprofitable servants: we have done
at which was our duty to do.
it came to pass, as he went to Jerusalem, that he passed
ia and Galilee.
 into a certain village, there met him ten men
ff: 17:13 And they lifted up their
, and said, Jesus, Master, have mercy on us.
unto them, Go shew yourselves unto
iests. And it came to pass, that, as they went, they were
e of them, when he saw that he was healed, turned back,
fied God, 17:16 And fell down on his face
s a Samaritan.
g said, Were there not ten cleansed? but where
ound that returned to give glory
save this stranger.
nto him, Arise, go thy way: thy faith hath made
s demanded of the Pharisees, when the kingdom of
and said, The kingdom of God cometh
ith observation: 17:21 Neither shall they say, Lo here! or, lo
the kingdom of God is within you.
 And he said unto the disciples, The days will come, when ye
e of the days of the Son of man, and ye shall
ay to you, See here; or, see there: go not after
r as the lightning, that lighteneth out of the one part under
the other part under heaven; so shall also the
ut first must he suffer many things, and be rejected of this
nd as it was in the days of Noe, so shall it be also in the

arried wives, they were given in
, until the day that Noe entered into the ark, and the flood
em all.
n the days of Lot; they did eat, they
nk, they bought, they sold, they planted, they builded; 17:29 But
 Lot went out of Sodom it rained fire and brimstone
 all.
e day when the Son of man is

 the housetop, and his stuff
, let him not come down to take it away: and he that is in
ise not return back.
's wife.
save his life shall lose it; and
r shall lose his life shall preserve it.

all be two men in one bed; the
be taken, and the other shall be left.
17:35 Two women shall be grinding together; the one shall be taken,
eft.
d; the one shall be taken, and the
left.
unto him, Where, Lord? And he said
hem, Wheresoever the body is, thither will the eagles be
 And he spake a parable unto them to this end, that men ought
ot to faint; 18:2 Saying, There was in a city a
r regarded man: 18:3 And there was
w in that city; and she came unto him, saying, Avenge me of mine
 And he would not for a while: but afterward he said within
not God, nor regard man; 18:5 Yet because this
r, lest by her continual coming
 me.
the unjust judge saith.
not God avenge his own elect, which cry day and night
 with them?  18:8 I tell you that he will
he Son of man cometh, shall
 on the earth?  18:9 And he spake this parable unto
lves that they were righteous, and
ed others: 18:10 Two men went up into the temple to pray; the
he other a publican.
 stood and prayed thus with himself, God, I thank
are, extortioners, unjust,
 even as this publican.
ice in the week, I give tithes of all that I possess.
nding afar off, would not lift up so much
is breast, saying, God be
a sinner.
nt down to his house justified rather
n the other: for every one that exalteth himself shall be abased;
eth himself shall be exalted.
 they brought unto him also infants, that he would touch
es saw it, they rebuked them.
 Jesus called them unto him, and said, Suffer little children
forbid them not: for of such is the kingdom of
 Whosoever shall not receive the kingdom
of God as a little child shall in no wise enter therein.
r asked him, saying, Good Master, what shall I
nd Jesus said unto him, Why
me good? none is good, save one, that is, God.
s, Do not commit adultery, Do not
o not steal, Do not bear false witness, Honour thy father and
And he said, All these have I kept from my youth up.
hese things, he said unto him, Yet lackest
 and distribute unto the poor,
halt have treasure in heaven: and come, follow me.
he was very sorrowful: for he was very
ch.
s very sorrowful, he said, How
ll they that have riches enter into the kingdom of God!
a camel to go through a needle's eye, than
 of God.
aid, Who then can be saved?  18:27 And
 said, The things which are impossible with men are possible with
n Peter said, Lo, we have left all, and followed thee.
m, Verily I say unto you, There is no man
hren, or wife, or children,
om of God's sake, 18:30 Who shall not receive manifold
nd in the world to come life everlasting.
 and said unto them, Behold, we
Jerusalem, and all things that are written by the prophets
n shall be accomplished.
hall be delivered unto the Gentiles, and shall be
 and spitted on: 18:33 And they shall
urge him, and put him to death: and the third day he shall rise
 they understood none of these things: and this saying was
new they the things which were spoken.
18:35 And it came to pass, that as he was come nigh unto Jericho, a
an sat by the way side begging: 18:36 And hearing the
hat it meant.
that Jesus of Nazareth passeth by.
8 And he cried, saying, Jesus, thou son of David, have mercy on
ey which went before rebuked him, that he should hold his
ch the more, Thou son of David, have mercy on
manded him to be brought unto him: and
en he was come near, he asked him, 18:41 Saying, What wilt thou that
o thee? And he said, Lord, that I may receive my sight.
 him, Receive thy sight: thy faith hath saved
eived his sight, and followed him,
ying God: and all the people, when they saw it, gave praise unto
esus entered and passed through Jericho.

Zacchaeus, which was the chief
publicans, and he was rich.
 sought to see Jesus who he was; and could not for the
 of stature.
d climbed up into a sycomore tree to see
him: for he was to pass that way.
And when Jesus came to the place, he looked up, and saw him, and
chaeus, make haste, and come down; for to day I must
d he made haste, and came down, and received him joyfully.
 it, they all murmured, saying, That he was gone
inner.
id unto the Lord: Behold, Lord, the
of my goods I give to the poor; and if I have taken any thing
 accusation, I restore him fourfold.
:9 And Jesus said unto him, This day is salvation come to this
he also is a son of Abraham.
the Son of man is come to seek and to save that which was
y heard these things, he added and spake a parable,
m, and because they thought that the
dom of God should immediately appear.
9:12 He said therefore, A certain nobleman went into a far country to
imself a kingdom, and to return.
And he called his ten servants, and delivered them ten pounds,
Occupy till I come.
ens hated him, and sent a message after him,
eign over us.
, that when he was returned, having received
ervants to be called unto him,
 had given the money, that he might know how much every man

, thy pound hath gained ten
:17 And he said unto him, Well, thou good servant: because thou hast
in a very little, have thou authority over ten cities.
 saying, Lord, thy pound hath gained five
him, Be thou also over five cities.
20 And another came, saying, Lord, behold, here is thy pound, which
d up in a napkin: 19:21 For I feared thee, because thou
kest up that thou layedst not down, and
eapest that thou didst not sow.
nd he saith unto him, Out of thine own mouth will I judge thee,
. Thou knewest that I was an austere man, taking up
ng that I did not sow: 19:23 Wherefore
en gavest not thou my money into the bank, that at my coming I might
mine own with usury?  19:24 And he said unto them that
pound, and give it to him that hath ten
ounds.
ord, he hath ten pounds.)  19:26 For I
y unto you, That unto every one which hath shall be given; and from
ot, even that he hath shall be taken away from him.
 which would not that I should reign over
me.
he went before, ascending up to
.
s come nigh to Bethphage and
the mount called the mount of Olives, he sent two of his
o ye into the village over against you; in
 a colt tied, whereon yet
loose him, and bring him hither.
And if any man ask you, Why do ye loose him? thus shall ye say
e Lord hath need of him.
 that were sent went their way, and found even as he had
nd as they were loosing the colt, the owners thereof said unto
he colt?  19:34 And they said, The Lord hath need
 him to Jesus: and they cast their garments upon
on.
heir clothes in the way.
 he was come nigh, even now at the descent of the mount
ude of the disciples began to rejoice and
mighty works that they had
ying, Blessed be the King that cometh in the name of the
 glory in the highest.
f the Pharisees from among the multitude said unto
s.
them, I tell you that, if these
ld their peace, the stones would immediately cry out.
near, he beheld the city, and wept over it,
 thou, at least in this thy
gs which belong unto thy peace! but now they are hid from
the days shall come upon thee, that thine enemies shall cast
nd compass thee round, and keep thee in on every
n with the ground, and thy children
n thee; and they shall not leave in thee one stone upon another;
st not the time of thy visitation.
5 And he went into the temple, and began to cast out them that
em that bought; 19:46 Saying unto them, It is
yer: but ye have made it a den of
.
le. But the chief priests and the
 and the chief of the people sought to destroy him, 19:48 And
hey might do: for all the people were very
me to pass, that on one of those days, as he taught the
reached the gospel, the chief priests and
, 20:2 And spake unto him,
s, by what authority doest thou these things? or who is
ority?  20:3 And he answered and said unto
 answer me: 20:4 The baptism
 it from heaven, or of men?  20:5 And they reasoned with
shall say, From heaven; he will say, Why
then believed ye him not?  20:6 But and if we say, Of men; all the
e us: for they be persuaded that John was a prophet.
 they could not tell whence it was.
8 And Jesus said unto them, Neither tell I you by what authority I

ple this parable; A certain man
 vineyard, and let it forth to husbandmen, and went into a
ime.
servant to the husbandmen, that they
ld give him of the fruit of the vineyard: but the husbandmen beat
 away empty.
other servant: and they beat him also, and
way empty.
ird: and they wounded him also, and cast
him out.
e vineyard, What shall I do? I will send
my beloved son: it may be they will reverence him when they see him.
en the husbandmen saw him, they reasoned among themselves,
: come, let us kill him, that the inheritance
m out of the vineyard, and killed him. What
d do unto them?  20:16 He shall
destroy these husbandmen, and shall give the vineyard to
d it, they said, God forbid.
he beheld them, and said, What is this then that is written,
ilders rejected, the same is become the head of
fall upon that stone shall be
 on whomsoever it shall fall, it will grind him to powder.
iests and the scribes the same hour sought to
 people: for they perceived that
poken this parable against them.
And they watched him, and sent forth spies, which should feign
 that they might take hold of his words, that so
wer and authority of the governor.
1 And they asked him, saying, Master, we know that thou sayest and
, neither acceptest thou the person of any, but
2 Is it lawful for us to give
o Caesar, or no?  20:23 But he perceived their craftiness,
tempt ye me?  20:24 Shew me a penny. Whose
nswered and said, Caesar's.
e said unto them, Render therefore unto Caesar the things
to God the things which be God's.
 And they could not take hold of his words before the people: and
 his answer, and held their peace.
7 Then came to him certain of the Sadducees, which deny that there
ion; and they asked him, 20:28 Saying, Master, Moses
other die, having a wife, and he die
out children, that his brother should take his wife, and raise up
ther.
brethren: and the first took a wife,
died without children.
cond took her to wife, and he died childless.
n like manner the seven also: and
ft no children, and died.
 all the woman died also.
re in the resurrection whose wife of them is she? for
34 And Jesus answering said unto them, The children of this world
ven in marriage: 20:35 But they which shall be
d, and the resurrection from the
ither marry, nor are given in marriage: 20:36 Neither can they
ey are equal unto the angels; and are the children
e resurrection.
 are raised, even Moses shewed at the bush,
aham, and the God of Isaac, and
f Jacob.
he dead, but of the living: for all live
unto him.
ibes answering said, Master, thou hast
ll said.
t not ask him any question at all.
1 And he said unto them, How say they that Christ is David's son?
imself saith in the book of Psalms, The LORD said
t hand, 20:43 Till I make thine
hy footstool.
leth him Lord, how is he then his son?  20:45
e he said unto his disciples,
e of the scribes, which desire to walk in long robes, and
kets, and the highest seats in the
gues, and the chief rooms at feasts; 20:47 Which devour widows'
hew make long prayers: the same shall receive
ked up, and saw the rich men casting their gifts into
saw also a certain poor widow casting in thither two
 a truth I say unto you, that this poor widow hath
 For all these have of their abundance
st in unto the offerings of God: but she of her penury hath cast in
that she had.
 the temple, how it was adorned with goodly
these things which ye behold,
ll come, in the which there shall not be left one stone
t be thrown down.
im, saying, Master, but when shall these things
en these things shall come to pass?
And he said, Take heed that ye be not deceived: for many shall
ing, I am Christ; and the time draweth near: go ye
9 But when ye shall hear of wars and commotions, be not terrified:
 must first come to pass; but the end is not by and
them, Nation shall rise against nation, and
t earthquakes shall be in
and famines, and pestilences; and fearful sights and
m heaven.
hey shall lay their hands on you, and
secute you, delivering you up to the synagogues, and into prisons,
fore kings and rulers for my name's sake.
stimony.
our hearts, not to meditate before what
e shall answer: 21:15 For I will give you a mouth and wisdom, which
aries shall not be able to gainsay nor resist.
h by parents, and brethren, and
, and friends; and some of you shall they cause to be put to
 shall be hated of all men for my name's sake.
of your head perish.
ence possess ye your souls.
hen ye shall see Jerusalem compassed with armies, then know
reof is nigh.
 are in Judaea flee to the mountains; and let
art out; and let not them that
 countries enter thereinto.
hese be the days of vengeance, that all things which are

hild, and to them that give
e days! for there shall be great distress in the land,

f the sword, and shall be led
e into all nations: and Jerusalem shall be trodden down of
times of the Gentiles be fulfilled.
25 And there shall be signs in the sun, and in the moon, and in the
 the earth distress of nations, with perplexity; the
26 Men's hearts failing them for fear,
d for looking after those things which are coming on the earth: for
eaven shall be shaken.
hall they see the Son of man coming in a cloud with
 And when these things begin to come to pass, then look up, and
 for your redemption draweth nigh.
9 And he spake to them a parable; Behold the fig tree, and all the
n they now shoot forth, ye see and know of your own
at hand.
see these things come to pass, know ye
at the kingdom of God is nigh at hand.
21:32 Verily I say unto you, This generation shall not pass away, till
lled.
 away: but my words shall not pass

 at any time your hearts be
ith surfeiting, and drunkenness, and cares of this life,
you unawares.
l it come on all them that dwell on the face
therefore, and pray always, that ye may be accounted
ngs that shall come to pass, and to
 before the Son of man.
e day time he was teaching in the temple; and at night
e mount that is called the mount of
s.
in the morning to him in the
to hear him.
avened bread drew nigh, which is called the
 and scribes sought how they might kill him;
en entered Satan into Judas surnamed Iscariot, being of the

ith the chief priests and
e might betray him unto them.
they were glad, and covenanted to give him money.
t opportunity to betray him unto them
the absence of the multitude.
 came the day of unleavened bread, when the passover must be
 sent Peter and John, saying, Go and prepare us the
2:9 And they said unto him, Where wilt thou that we prepare?  22:10
o them, Behold, when ye are entered into the city,
ing a pitcher of water; follow him
he house where he entereth in.
d ye shall say unto the goodman of the house, The Master saith
the guestchamber, where I shall eat the passover
hall shew you a large upper room
d: there make ready.
t, and found as he had said unto them: and they made
nd when the hour was come, he sat down, and the twelve apostles
And he said unto them, With desire I have desired to eat this
ore I suffer: 22:16 For I say unto you, I will
e fulfilled in the kingdom of God.
7 And he took the cup, and gave thanks, and said, Take this, and
urselves: 22:18 For I say unto you, I will not drink
l the kingdom of God shall come.
And he took bread, and gave thanks, and brake it, and gave unto
is my body which is given for you: this do in
also the cup after supper, saying, This cup is the new
 is shed for you.
e hand of him that betrayeth me is with me on the
 of man goeth, as it was determined: but woe
 22:23 And they began to enquire
emselves, which of them it was that should do this thing.
o a strife among them, which of them should be
 he said unto them, The kings of the Gentiles exercise
 that exercise authority upon them are
lled benefactors.
t be so: but he that is greatest among you, let
is chief, as he that doth serve.
For whether is greater, he that sitteth at meat, or he that
t sitteth at meat? but I am among you as he
h have continued with me in my temptations.
m, as my Father hath appointed
2:30 That ye may eat and drink at my table in my kingdom,
g the twelve tribes of Israel.
d the Lord said, Simon, Simon, behold, Satan hath desired to
sift you as wheat: 22:32 But I have prayed for
hen thou art converted, strengthen
ethren.
d, I am ready to go with thee, both
prison, and to death.
, I tell thee, Peter, the cock shall not crow this
ce deny that thou knowest me.
 he said unto them, When I sent you without purse, and scrip,
any thing? And they said, Nothing.
6 Then said he unto them, But now, he that hath a purse, let him
ise his scrip: and he that hath no sword, let him

is written must yet be
, And he was reckoned among the transgressors: for
 end.
, here are two swords. And he said
hem, It is enough.
t, and went, as he was wont, to the mount of
d him.
ce, he said unto them, Pray that ye
 not into temptation.
withdrawn from them about a stone's cast, and kneeled
g, Father, if thou be willing, remove
s cup from me: nevertheless not my will, but thine, be done.
ared an angel unto him from heaven, strengthening
ny he prayed more earnestly: and his sweat
ing down to the ground.
he rose up from prayer, and was come to his disciples,
orrow, 22:46 And said unto them, Why sleep
mptation.
 behold a multitude, and he that was
ed Judas, one of the twelve, went before them, and drew near unto
.
 betrayest thou the Son of man
s?  22:49 When they which were about him saw what would
 Lord, shall we smite with the sword?
50 And one of them smote the servant of the high priest, and cut

fer ye thus far. And he touched
and healed him.
nto the chief priests, and captains of the
to him, Be ye come out, as
f, with swords and staves?  22:53 When I was daily with
ched forth no hands against me: but this is

nd brought him into the high
se. And Peter followed afar off.
And when they had kindled a fire in the midst of the hall, and
er, Peter sat down among them.
t a certain maid beheld him as he sat by the fire, and
nd said, This man was also with him.
:57 And he denied him, saying, Woman, I know him not.
ile another saw him, and said, Thou art
lso of them. And Peter said, Man, I am not.
 after another confidently
ng, Of a truth this fellow also was with him: for he is
eter said, Man, I know not what thou sayest. And
he cock crew.
, and looked upon Peter. And Peter remembered
 unto him, Before the cock crow,
lt deny me thrice.
 out, and wept bitterly.
men that held Jesus mocked him, and smote him.
d him, they struck him on the face,
sked him, saying, Prophesy, who is it that smote thee?  22:65 And
 blasphemously spake they against him.
22:66 And as soon as it was day, the elders of the people and the
 the scribes came together, and led him into their
the Christ? tell us. And he said unto
m, If I tell you, ye will not believe: 22:68 And if I also ask you,
wer me, nor let me go.
shall the Son of man sit on the right hand of the
they all, Art thou then the Son of God? And he said

ther witness? for we
 of his own mouth.
ultitude of them arose, and led him unto Pilate.
m, saying, We found this fellow
g the nation, and forbidding to give tribute to Caesar,
hrist a King.
, saying, Art thou the King of the Jews? And
it.
priests and to the people, I find
t in this man.
ore fierce, saying, He stirreth up the people,
ning from Galilee to this place.
hen Pilate heard of Galilee, he asked whether the man were a
 as soon as he knew that he belonged unto Herod's
d, who himself also was at Jerusalem
hat time.
, he was exceeding glad: for he was
ous to see him of a long season, because he had heard many things
ped to have seen some miracle done by him.
ny words; but he answered him

tood and vehemently accused
 And Herod with his men of war set him at nought, and mocked him,
n a gorgeous robe, and sent him again to Pilate.
d Herod were made friends together:
efore they were at enmity between themselves.
d together the chief priests and
rs and the people, 23:14 Said unto them, Ye have brought this
hat perverteth the people: and, behold, I, having
nd no fault in this man touching
ings whereof ye accuse him: 23:15 No, nor yet Herod: for I
, nothing worthy of death is done unto him.
and release him.
y he must release one unto them at the feast.)
, saying, Away with this man, and
 unto us Barabbas: 23:19 (Who for a certain sedition made in
er, was cast into prison.)  23:20 Pilate
therefore, willing to release Jesus, spake again to them.
aying, Crucify him, crucify him.
And he said unto them the third time, Why, what evil hath he
cause of death in him: I will therefore chastise
they were instant with loud voices, requiring that he might
oices of them and of the chief priests
evailed.
 that it should be as they required.
:25 And he released unto them him that for sedition and murder was
, whom they had desired; but he delivered Jesus to
 led him away, they laid hold upon one Simon, a
, and on him they laid the cross,
 might bear it after Jesus.
here followed him a great company of people, and of women,
lamented him.
nto them said, Daughters of Jerusalem, weep
d for your children.
 the days are coming, in the which they shall say,
wombs that never bare, and the paps
 never gave suck.
 begin to say to the mountains, Fall on us; and
r if they do these things in a green tree, what shall be done
d there were also two other, malefactors, led
 And when they were come to the place, which is called Calvary,
d him, and the malefactors, one on the right hand,
:34 Then said Jesus, Father, forgive them; for they know not what
 parted his raiment, and cast lots.
35 And the people stood beholding. And the rulers also with them
g, He saved others; let him save himself, if he be
:36 And the soldiers also mocked him, coming to him, and offering
7 And saying, If thou be the king of the Jews, save
ription also was written over him in letters of
IS THE KING OF THE JEWS.
of the malefactors which were hanged railed on him,
 thyself and us.
swering rebuked him, saying, Dost not thou fear
ndemnation?  23:41 And we indeed
for we receive the due reward of our deeds: but this man hath

mber me when thou comest into
.
 I say unto thee, To day shalt
th me in paradise.
ut the sixth hour, and there was a darkness over
.
he veil of the temple was rent in
st.
 a loud voice, he said, Father,
hands I commend my spirit: and having said thus, he gave up
 when the centurion saw what was done, he glorified God,
 a righteous man.
ple that came together to that sight, beholding
heir breasts, and returned.
ll his acquaintance, and the women that followed him from
beholding these things.
ld, there was a man named Joseph, a counsellor; and he
23:51 (The same had not consented to the
counsel and deed of them;) he was of Arimathaea, a city of the Jews:
lf waited for the kingdom of God.
 This man went unto Pilate, and begged the body of Jesus.
wn, and wrapped it in linen, and laid it in a
rein never man before was laid.
nd that day was the preparation, and the sabbath drew on.
o, which came with him from Galilee, followed
how his body was laid.
eturned, and prepared spices and ointments; and rested
 the commandment.
st day of the week, very early in the morning,
ng the spices which they had
d certain others with them.
ey found the stone rolled away from the sepulchre.
found not the body of the Lord Jesus.
4:4 And it came to pass, as they were much perplexed thereabout,
ood by them in shining garments: 24:5 And as they
 faces to the earth, they said unto
 Why seek ye the living among the dead?  24:6 He is not here, but
r how he spake unto you when he was yet in Galilee,
t be delivered into the hands of sinful
en, and be crucified, and the third day rise again.
words, 24:9 And returned from the
re, and told all these things unto the eleven, and to all the
 Mary Magdalene and Joanna, and Mary the mother of James,
 with them, which told these things unto the
med to them as idle tales, and they believed
nd ran unto the sepulchre; and stooping down,
hemselves, and departed,
self at that which was come to pass.
:13 And, behold, two of them went that same day to a village called
as from Jerusalem about threescore furlongs.
l these things which had happened.
5 And it came to pass, that, while they communed together and
lf drew near, and went with them.
 But their eyes were holden that they should not know him.
 them, What manner of communications are these
alk, and are sad?  24:18 And the
hem, whose name was Cleopas, answering said unto him, Art thou
erusalem, and hast not known the things which are
  24:19 And he said unto them, What
s? And they said unto him, Concerning Jesus of Nazareth, which
 in deed and word before God and all the people:
d our rulers delivered him to be
d to death, and have crucified him.
21 But we trusted that it had been he which should have redeemed
 all this, to day is the third day since these
certain women also of our company made us astonished,
chre; 24:23 And when they found not his
ody, they came, saying, that they had also seen a vision of angels,
 he was alive.
m which were with us went to the sepulchre,
aid: but him they saw not.
e said unto them, O fools, and slow of heart to believe
spoken: 24:26 Ought not Christ to have
ffered these things, and to enter into his glory?  24:27 And
 all the prophets, he expounded unto them in all
ng himself.
to the village, whither they went: and he
.
g, Abide with us: for it is
g, and the day is far spent. And he went in to tarry with
e to pass, as he sat at meat with them, he took bread,
nd gave to them.
ere opened, and they knew him; and he vanished
y said one to another, Did not our heart burn within us,
 the way, and while he opened to us the
criptures?  24:33 And they rose up the same hour, and returned to
und the eleven gathered together, and them that were
ord is risen indeed, and hath appeared
 Simon.
 were done in the way, and how he was
wn of them in breaking of bread.
And as they thus spake, Jesus himself stood in the midst of
em, Peace be unto you.
ere terrified and affrighted, and supposed that they
d he said unto them, Why are ye troubled? and why do thoughts
  24:39 Behold my hands and my feet, that it is I
 spirit hath not flesh and bones, as
ee me have.
spoken, he shewed them his hands and his
feet.
 not for joy, and wondered, he said
them, Have ye here any meat?  24:42 And they gave him a piece of
d of an honeycomb.
, and did eat before them.
 said unto them, These are the words which I spake unto
ou, that all things must be fulfilled,
ich were written in the law of Moses, and in the prophets, and in
rning me.
derstanding, that they might understand
he scriptures, 24:46 And said unto them, Thus it is written, and thus
rist to suffer, and to rise from the dead the third day:
and remission of sins should be preached in
t Jerusalem.
 of these things.
send the promise of my Father upon you: but tarry
l ye be endued with power from on

ethany, and he lifted up his
lessed them.
 while he blessed them, he was parted from
52 And they worshipped him, and returned to Jerusalem with great
e continually in the temple, praising and blessing
ccording to Saint John
inning was the Word, and the Word was with God, and the
me was in the beginning with God.
ll things were made by him; and without him was not any thing

e light of men.
th in darkness; and the darkness comprehended
rom God, whose name was John.
ame came for a witness, to bear witness of the Light, that
t believe.
ut was sent to bear witness of that Light.
hteth every man that cometh into
d.
rld was made by him, and the world
im not.
his own received him not.
any as received him, to them gave he power to become the
that believe on his name: 1:13 Which were
e flesh, nor of the will of
od.
nd dwelt among us, (and we beheld
ry, the glory as of the only begotten of the Father,) full of
:15 John bare witness of him, and cried, saying, This was he of whom
at cometh after me is preferred before me: for he was
 fulness have all we received, and grace for grace.
 Moses, but grace and truth came by Jesus
ny time, the only begotten Son, which is
in the bosom of the Father, he hath declared him.
John, when the Jews sent priests and
tes from Jerusalem to ask him, Who art thou?  1:20 And he
; but confessed, I am not the Christ.
:21 And they asked him, What then? Art thou Elias? And he saith, I am
 that prophet? And he answered, No.
2 Then said they unto him, Who art thou? that we may give an answer
nt us. What sayest thou of thyself?  1:23 He said, I am
the wilderness, Make straight the way of
the Lord, as said the prophet Esaias.
:24 And they which were sent were of the Pharisees.
said unto him, Why baptizest thou then,
f thou be not that Christ, nor Elias, neither that prophet?  1:26
m, saying, I baptize with water: but there standeth
; 1:27 He it is, who coming after me is
referred before me, whose shoe's latchet I am not worthy to unloose.
hings were done in Bethabara beyond Jordan, where John was
ext day John seeth Jesus coming unto him, and saith, Behold
taketh away the sin of the world.
This is he of whom I said, After me cometh a man which is
he was before me.
ot: but that he should be made manifest to
th water.
ying, I saw the Spirit descending from
aven like a dove, and it abode upon him.

t me to baptize with water,
 unto me, Upon whom thou shalt see the Spirit descending,
 same is he which baptizeth with the Holy
 that this is the Son of God.
n the next day after John stood, and two of his disciples;
sus as he walked, he saith, Behold the Lamb of
rd him speak, and they followed

owing, and saith unto them,
 They said unto him, Rabbi, (which is to say, being
llest thou?  1:39 He saith unto them,
e and see. They came and saw where he dwelt, and abode with him
s about the tenth hour.
 two which heard John speak, and followed him, was

mon, and saith unto him, We
e Messias, which is, being interpreted, the Christ.
sus. And when Jesus beheld him, he said,
Thou art Simon the son of Jona: thou shalt be called Cephas, which is
tion, A stone.
esus would go forth into Galilee, and findeth
.
 city of Andrew and Peter.
findeth Nathanael, and saith unto him, We have found him,
 and the prophets, did write, Jesus of
zareth, the son of Joseph.
hanael said unto him, Can there any good thing come out of
nto him, Come and see.
athanael coming to him, and saith of him, Behold an
 guile!  1:48 Nathanael saith unto him,
hence knowest thou me? Jesus answered and said unto him, Before that
thee, when thou wast under the fig tree, I saw thee.
saith unto him, Rabbi, thou art the Son of
0 Jesus answered and said unto him, Because I said unto thee, I saw
fig tree, believest thou? thou shalt see greater things
saith unto him, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Hereafter
 and the angels of God ascending and
ending upon the Son of man.
 third day there was a marriage in Cana of Galilee; and the
re: 2:2 And both Jesus was called, and his
hen they wanted wine, the mother of Jesus saith unto him,
 Jesus saith unto her, Woman, what have I to do with thee? mine
e.
ts, Whatsoever he saith unto you,

ots of stone, after the manner
ifying of the Jews, containing two or three firkins apiece.
them, Fill the waterpots with water. And they
d he saith unto them, Draw out now, and bear unto the governor
ey bare it.
east had tasted the water that was made
ine, and knew not whence it was: (but the servants which drew the
governor of the feast called the bridegroom, 2:10 And
the beginning doth set forth good wine;
nd when men have well drunk, then that which is worse: but thou hast
wine until now.
miracles did Jesus in Cana of Galilee, and
iples believed on him.
he went down to Capernaum, he, and his mother, and his
 and they continued there not many days.

 and Jesus went up to
And found in the temple those that sold oxen and sheep and doves,
of money sitting: 2:15 And when he had made a scourge
 all out of the temple, and the sheep,
d the oxen; and poured out the changers' money, and overthrew the
said unto them that sold doves, Take these things
 an house of merchandise.
disciples remembered that it was written, The zeal of

nto him, What sign shewest thou
seeing that thou doest these things?  2:19 Jesus answered and
oy this temple, and in three days I will raise it
orty and six years was this temple in
lding, and wilt thou rear it up in three days?  2:21 But he spake
his body.
sen from the dead, his disciples
ed that he had said this unto them; and they believed the
hich Jesus had said.
as in Jerusalem at the passover, in the feast day,
they saw the miracles which he did.
4 But Jesus did not commit himself unto them, because he knew all
ded not that any should testify of man: for he knew
as a man of the Pharisees, named Nicodemus, a ruler of the
to Jesus by night, and said unto him, Rabbi,
rom God: for no man can do these
 that thou doest, except God be with him.
erily, verily, I say unto thee,
man be born again, he cannot see the kingdom of God.
, How can a man be born when he is old?
an he enter the second time into his mother's womb, and be born?  3:5
d, Verily, verily, I say unto thee, Except a man be born
, he cannot enter into the kingdom of God.
 flesh; and that which is born
rit is spirit.
id unto thee, Ye must be born again.
8 The wind bloweth where it listeth, and thou hearest the sound
not tell whence it cometh, and whither it goeth: so
e Spirit.
id unto him, How can these things be?
0 Jesus answered and said unto him, Art thou a master of Israel,
ese things?  3:11 Verily, verily, I say unto thee,
stify that we have seen; and ye
ot our witness.
 earthly things, and ye believe not, how shall
y things?  3:13 And no man hath
up to heaven, but he that came down from heaven, even the Son
aven.
erpent in the wilderness, even so
e Son of man be lifted up: 3:15 That whosoever believeth in him
but have eternal life.
loved the world, that he gave his only begotten Son,
m should not perish, but have
 life.
to the world to condemn the world; but
at the world through him might be saved.

demned: but he that believeth
emned already, because he hath not believed in the name of
 God.
, that light is come into the world,
men loved darkness rather than light, because their deeds were
ery one that doeth evil hateth the light, neither cometh to
ds should be reproved.
 doeth truth cometh to the light, that his deeds may
e wrought in God.
gs came Jesus and his disciples into the land of
them, and baptized.
was baptizing in Aenon near to Salim, because there
came, and were baptized.
was not yet cast into prison.
 there arose a question between some of John's disciples and
ng.
aid unto him, Rabbi, he that was
e beyond Jordan, to whom thou barest witness, behold, the same
en come to him.
said, A man can receive nothing, except it be
rselves bear me witness, that I said, I am not the Christ,
e him.
he bridegroom: but the friend of the
egroom, which standeth and heareth him, rejoiceth greatly because
's voice: this my joy therefore is fulfilled.
ecrease.
 is above all: he that is of the earth
 earthly, and speaketh of the earth: he that cometh from heaven is
32 And what he hath seen and heard, that he testifieth; and no man
stimony.
 testimony hath set to his seal that God
is true.
 speaketh the words of God: for God
h not the Spirit by measure unto him.
:35 The Father loveth the Son, and hath given all things into his
that believeth on the Son hath everlasting life: and he that
shall not see life; but the wrath of God abideth
LORD knew how the Pharisees had heard that
han John, 4:2 (Though Jesus
zed not, but his disciples,) 4:3 He left Judaea, and

.
ia, which is called Sychar, near
arcel of ground that Jacob gave to his son Joseph.
. Jesus therefore, being wearied with
 journey, sat thus on the well: and it was about the sixth hour.
 a woman of Samaria to draw water: Jesus saith unto
For his disciples were gone away unto the city to buy meat.)  4:9
man of Samaria unto him, How is it that thou, being a
h am a woman of Samaria? for the Jews
e no dealings with the Samaritans.
 Jesus answered and said unto her, If thou knewest the gift of
hat saith to thee, Give me to drink; thou wouldest
have given thee living water.
woman saith unto him, Sir, thou hast nothing to draw with,
om whence then hast thou that living water?
acob, which gave us the well,
hereof himself, and his children, and his cattle?  4:13
o her, Whosoever drinketh of this water
hall thirst again: 4:14 But whosoever drinketh of the water that I
hall never thirst; but the water that I shall give him
ter springing up into everlasting life.

me this water, that I thirst
 come hither to draw.
unto her, Go, call thy husband, and come hither.
, I have no husband. Jesus said unto
 Thou hast well said, I have no husband: 4:18 For thou hast had
he whom thou now hast is not thy husband: in that
man saith unto him, Sir, I perceive that thou art a
rshipped in this mountain; and ye say, that in
ht to worship.
r, Woman, believe me, the hour cometh, when ye
yet at Jerusalem, worship the
4:22 Ye worship ye know not what: we know what we worship: for
Jews.
 is, when the true worshippers shall
hip the Father in spirit and in truth: for the Father seeketh such

ship him must worship him in
n truth.
 I know that Messias cometh, which is
led Christ: when he is come, he will tell us all things.
r, I that speak unto thee am he.
nd upon this came his disciples, and marvelled that he talked
o man said, What seekest thou? or, Why talkest
left her waterpot, and went her
the city, and saith to the men, 4:29 Come, see a man, which
 ever I did: is not this the Christ?  4:30 Then
 unto him.
isciples prayed him, saying, Master, eat.
 to eat that ye know not of.
fore said the disciples one to another, Hath any man brought
4 Jesus saith unto them, My meat is to do the
sh his work.
 yet four months, and then cometh harvest?
s, and look on the fields; for
hite already to harvest.
at reapeth receiveth wages, and gathereth fruit unto
t soweth and he that reapeth may rejoice
together.
g true, One soweth, and another reapeth.

bestowed no labour: other men
nd ye are entered into their labours.
:39 And many of the Samaritans of that city believed on him for the
oman, which testified, He told me all that ever I did.
s were come unto him, they besought him that
 there two days.
ieved because of his own word; 4:42 And said
cause of thy saying: for we have
m ourselves, and know that this is indeed the Christ, the
4:43 Now after two days he departed thence, and went into Galilee.
 himself testified, that a prophet hath no honour in his
when he was come into Galilee, the Galilaeans received him,
ngs that he did at Jerusalem at the feast: for
46 So Jesus came again into Cana of Galilee, where he made the water
e was a certain nobleman, whose son was sick at
at Jesus was come out of Judaea into Galilee, he
at he would come down, and heal his
for he was at the point of death.
Then said Jesus unto him, Except ye see signs and wonders, ye
4:49 The nobleman saith unto him, Sir, come down ere my child die.
th unto him, Go thy way; thy son liveth. And the man
ad spoken unto him, and he went his way.

ervants met him, and told him,
y son liveth.
them the hour when he began to amend. And
nth hour the fever left him.
e father knew that it was at the same hour, in the which
on liveth: and himself believed, and his
whole house.
ond miracle that Jesus did, when he was come
er this there was a feast of the Jews; and Jesus went up to
here is at Jerusalem by the sheep market a pool, which is
ue Bethesda, having five porches.
n these lay a great multitude of impotent folk, of blind, halt,
or the moving of the water.
angel went down at a certain season into the pool, and
r then first after the troubling of the
ater stepped in was made whole of whatsoever disease he had.
n was there, which had an infirmity thirty and
im lie, and knew that he had been now a long time
Wilt thou be made whole?  5:7 The
t man answered him, Sir, I have no man, when the water is
the pool: but while I am coming, another
steppeth down before me.
h unto him, Rise, take up thy bed, and walk.
 whole, and took up his bed, and
and on the same day was the sabbath.
10 The Jews therefore said unto him that was cured, It is the
t lawful for thee to carry thy bed.
1 He answered them, He that made me whole, the same said unto me,
and walk.
t man is that which said unto thee, Take
up thy bed, and walk?  5:13 And he that was healed wist not who it
ad conveyed himself away, a multitude being in that
findeth him in the temple, and said unto him,
ore, lest a worse thing come unto

 that it was Jesus, which had
ole.
rsecute Jesus, and sought to slay
cause he had done these things on the sabbath day.
My Father worketh hitherto, and I work.

o kill him, because he not
n the sabbath, but said also that God was his Father,
.
o them, Verily, verily, I say
he Son can do nothing of himself, but what he seeth the
soever he doeth, these also doeth the Son
he Son, and sheweth him all things that
imself doeth: and he will shew him greater works than these, that ye

d, and quickeneth them; even
uickeneth whom he will.
ther judgeth no man, but hath committed all judgment
n should honour the Son, even as they
our the Father.
he Son honoureth not the Father which hath sent
unto you, He that heareth my word, and
lieveth on him that sent me, hath everlasting life, and shall not
ation; but is passed from death unto life.
he hour is coming, and now is,
ead shall hear the voice of the Son of God: and they that
For as the Father hath life in himself; so hath he given to the
 himself; 5:27 And hath given him authority to
 the Son of man.
s: for the hour is coming, in the which all that
oice, 5:29 And shall come forth;
t have done good, unto the resurrection of life; and they that
 the resurrection of damnation.
can of mine own self do nothing: as I hear, I judge: and my
se I seek not mine own will, but the will of
 If I bear witness of myself, my witness is not true.
beareth witness of me; and I know that the
e.
witness unto the truth.
ive not testimony from man: but these things I say,
 He was a burning and a shining light: and ye were willing for a
in his light.
itness than that of John: for the works which
he same works that I do, bear
me, that the Father hath sent me.
And the Father himself, which hath sent me, hath borne witness of
ither heard his voice at any time, nor seen his shape.
ord abiding in you: for whom he hath sent,
criptures; for in them ye think ye have eternal life:
fy of me.
me, that ye might have life.
eive not honour from men.
ow you, that ye have not the love of God in you.
me, and ye receive me not: if another
ll come in his own name, him ye will receive.
ive honour one of another, and seek
he honour that cometh from God only?  5:45 Do not think that I
he Father: there is one that accuseth you, even
r had ye believed Moses, ye would have believed me; for he
 if ye believe not his writings, how shall ye believe my
ings Jesus went over the sea of Galilee,
which is the sea of Tiberias.
 great multitude followed him, because they saw his miracles
hat were diseased.
p into a mountain, and there he sat with his
feast of the Jews, was nigh.
esus then lifted up his eyes, and saw a great company come
Philip, Whence shall we buy bread, that these
ve him: for he himself knew what
 do.
ed pennyworth of bread is not
for them, that every one of them may take a little.
rew, Simon Peter's brother, saith unto
m, 6:9 There is a lad here, which hath five barley loaves, and two
t what are they among so many?  6:10 And Jesus said,
re was much grass in the place. So the
n sat down, in number about five thousand.
en he had given thanks, he
 the disciples, and the disciples to them that were set
ishes as much as they would.
they were filled, he said unto his disciples, Gather up the
that nothing be lost.
ey gathered them together, and filled twelve baskets
 barley loaves, which remained over and
bove unto them that had eaten.
n those men, when they had seen the miracle that Jesus did,
h that prophet that should come into the world.
ed that they would come and take him
orce, to make him a king, he departed again into a mountain
And when even was now come, his disciples went down unto the sea,
into a ship, and went over the sea toward Capernaum.
 was not come to them.
 arose by reason of a great wind that blew.
e and twenty or thirty furlongs,
 Jesus walking on the sea, and drawing nigh unto the ship: and

not afraid.
ceived him into the ship: and immediately
t.
ple which stood on the other side
sea saw that there was none other boat there, save that one
 were entered, and that Jesus went not with his
is disciples were gone away alone;
Howbeit there came other boats from Tiberias nigh unto the place
 bread, after that the Lord had given thanks:) 6:24
hat Jesus was not there, neither his
iples, they also took shipping, and came to Capernaum, seeking for
nd when they had found him on the other side of the sea, they
 when camest thou hither?  6:26 Jesus answered
 unto you, Ye seek me, not because
 the miracles, but because ye did eat of the loaves, and were
r not for the meat which perisheth, but for that meat which
ng life, which the Son of man shall give unto
ed.
shall we do, that we might work the
 of God?  6:29 Jesus answered and said unto them, This is the
believe on him whom he hath sent.
They said therefore unto him, What sign shewest thou then, that
ieve thee? what dost thou work?  6:31 Our fathers
t is written, He gave them bread from
ven to eat.
hem, Verily, verily, I say unto you, Moses
 my Father giveth you the true
 heaven.
e which cometh down from heaven, and
th life unto the world.
they unto him, Lord, evermore give us this bread.
I am the bread of life: he that cometh
 me shall never hunger; and he that believeth on me shall never
 I said unto you, That ye also have seen me, and believe not.
ather giveth me shall come to me; and him that
out.
not to do mine own will, but the
him that sent me.
Father's will which hath sent me, that of all
nothing, but should raise it up
the last day.
 of him that sent me, that every one which
 have everlasting life: and I
him up at the last day.
hen murmured at him, because he said, I am the bread

he son of Joseph, whose father
 we know? how is it then that he saith, I came down from
ore answered and said unto them, Murmur not
me to me, except the Father which hath sent me draw
 the last day.
e prophets, And they shall be all taught of
eard, and hath learned of the Father,
eth unto me.
 seen the Father, save he which is of God,
 verily, I say unto you, He that believeth on me hath
m that bread of life.
 did eat manna in the wilderness, and are dead.
th down from heaven, that a man may
hereof, and not die.
ng bread which came down from heaven: if any man eat
or ever: and the bread that I will give
s my flesh, which I will give for the life of the world.
strove among themselves, saying, How can this
hen Jesus said unto them, Verily,
 I say unto you, Except ye eat the flesh of the Son of man, and
 have no life in you.
 my flesh, and drinketh my blood, hath eternal life;
 last day.
deed, and my blood is drink indeed.
6 He that eateth my flesh, and drinketh my blood, dwelleth in me,
6:57 As the living Father hath sent me, and I live by the Father: so
 me, even he shall live by me.
s is that bread which came down from heaven: not as your
 are dead: he that eateth of this bread
hall live for ever.
aid he in the synagogue, as he taught in Capernaum.
sciples, when they had heard this, said,
This is an hard saying; who can hear it?  6:61 When Jesus knew in
disciples murmured at it, he said unto them, Doth
f ye shall see the Son of man ascend
here he was before?  6:63 It is the spirit that quickeneth; the
hing: the words that I speak unto you, they are
But there are some of you that believe not. For Jesus knew from
hey were that believed not, and who should betray
re said I unto you, that no man can come unto
my Father.
his disciples went back, and walked no
re with him.
the twelve, Will ye also go away?  6:68 Then
m shall we go? thou hast the
rnal life.
sure that thou art that Christ, the Son of
hem, Have not I chosen you twelve, and one of you
as Iscariot the son of Simon: for he
as that should betray him, being one of the twelve.
walked in Galilee: for he would not walk
in Jewry, because the Jews sought to kill him.
cles was at hand.
efore said unto him, Depart hence, and go into
see the works that thou doest.
there is no man that doeth any thing in secret, and he himself
openly. If thou do these things, shew thyself to
his brethren believe in him.
esus said unto them, My time is not yet come: but your time
The world cannot hate you; but me it hateth, because I testify of
s thereof are evil.
his feast: I go not up yet unto this feast: for my
9 When he had said these words unto them, he abode still in Galilee.
n his brethren were gone up, then went he also up unto the
s it were in secret.
 sought him at the feast, and said, Where is he?
among the people concerning him: for
 said, He is a good man: others said, Nay; but he deceiveth the
beit no man spake openly of him for fear of the Jews.
 the feast Jesus went up into the temple,
d, saying, How knoweth this man letters,
having never learned?  7:16 Jesus answered them, and said, My doctrine
 but his that sent me.
will do his will, he shall know of the doctrine,
 speak of myself.
 of himself seeketh his own glory: but he that
 same is true, and no
in him.
 law, and yet none of you keepeth the
?  Why go ye about to kill me?  7:20 The people answered and said,
l: who goeth about to kill thee?  7:21 Jesus answered
ne one work, and ye all marvel.
ses therefore gave unto you circumcision; (not because it is of
athers;) and ye on the sabbath day circumcise a
h day receive circumcision, that the law of
y at me, because I have made a
whit whole on the sabbath day?  7:24 Judge not according to
ge righteous judgment.
ome of them of Jerusalem, Is not this he, whom they
 speaketh boldly, and they say nothing
to him. Do the rulers know indeed that this is the very Christ?
w this man whence he is: but when Christ cometh, no
28 Then cried Jesus in the temple as he taught, saying, Ye both know
w whence I am: and I am not come of myself, but he that
ow not.
rom him, and he hath sent me.
 they sought to take him: but no man laid hands on him,
t come.
ieved on him, and said, When Christ
h, will he do more miracles than these which this man hath done?
 heard that the people murmured such things
he chief priests sent officers
m.
a little while am I with you, and
go unto him that sent me.
 seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither
en said the Jews among themselves, Whither will he go, that we
will he go unto the dispersed among the Gentiles,
t manner of saying is this that he
Ye shall seek me, and shall not find me: and where I am, thither
:37 In the last day, that great day of the feast,
 any man thirst, let him come unto
d drink.
as the scripture hath said, out of his
lly shall flow rivers of living water.
7:39 (But this spake he of the Spirit, which they that believe on him
e: for the Holy Ghost was not yet given; because that
  7:40 Many of the people therefore, when
this is the Prophet.
This is the Christ. But some said, Shall Christ come
 the scripture said, That Christ cometh
f the seed of David, and out of the town of Bethlehem, where David
ere was a division among the people because of him.
ave taken him; but no man laid hands on
im.
chief priests and Pharisees; and
d unto them, Why have ye not brought him?  7:46 The officers
ake like this man.
hem the Pharisees, Are ye also deceived?  7:48
risees believed on him?  7:49 But
ople who knoweth not the law are cursed.

 came to Jesus by night, being
m,) 7:51 Doth our law judge any man, before it hear him, and
:52 They answered and said unto him, Art thou
or out of Galilee ariseth no
7:53 And every man went unto his own house.
es.
e again into the temple, and all
le came unto him; and he sat down, and taught them.
sees brought unto him a woman taken in
ultery; and when they had set her in the midst, 8:4 They say unto
 woman was taken in adultery, in the very act.
 us, that such should be stoned: but
 sayest thou?  8:6 This they said, tempting him, that they might
. But Jesus stooped down, and with his finger wrote
rd them not.
 asking him, he lifted up himself, and said
 you, let him first cast a

e on the ground.
rd it, being convicted by their own conscience,
he eldest, even unto the last: and
was left alone, and the woman standing in the midst.
p himself, and saw none but the woman, he
ne accusers? hath no man
 8:11 She said, No man, Lord. And Jesus said unto her,
o, and sin no more.
us again unto them, saying, I am the light of the
 not walk in darkness, but shall have
 light of life.
efore said unto him, Thou bearest record of
4 Jesus answered and said unto them, Though I bear record of
is true: for I know whence I came, and whither I
me, and whither I go.
er the flesh; I judge no man.
yet if I judge, my judgment is true: for I am not alone, but
sent me.
r law, that the testimony of two men is
rue.
 myself, and the Father that sent me
eth witness of me.
unto him, Where is thy Father? Jesus answered, Ye
f ye had known me, ye should have
y Father also.
esus in the treasury, as he taught in the
 his hour was not yet come.
aid Jesus again unto them, I go my way, and ye shall seek
 sins: whither I go, ye cannot come.
22 Then said the Jews, Will he kill himself? because he saith,
not come.
e are from beneath; I am from above: ye
re of this world; I am not of this world.
 shall die in your sins: for if
e not that I am he, ye shall die in your sins.
art thou? And Jesus saith unto them,
 the same that I said unto you from the beginning.
 and to judge of you: but he that sent
 is true; and I speak to the world those things which I have heard
They understood not that he spake to them of the Father.
o them, When ye have lifted up the Son of man,
 that I do nothing of myself; but
ather hath taught me, I speak these things.
the Father hath not left me
do always those things that please him.

ed on him.
e Jews which believed on him, If ye
nue in my word, then are ye my disciples indeed; 8:32 And ye
and the truth shall make you free.
 They answered him, We be Abraham's seed, and were never in
 sayest thou, Ye shall be made free?  8:34
ay unto you, Whosoever
the servant of sin.
t abideth not in the house for ever: but the Son
herefore shall make you free, ye shall be free
braham's seed; but ye seek to kill me,
cause my word hath no place in you.
8 I speak that which I have seen with my Father: and ye do that
with your father.
d said unto him, Abraham is our father. Jesus
 children, ye would do the works
am.
man that hath told you the truth,
 have heard of God: this did not Abraham.
en said they to him, We be not
rnication; we have one Father, even God.

our Father, ye would love me:
eded forth and came from God; neither came I of myself, but
 do ye not understand my speech? even because ye cannot hear
e of your father the devil, and the lusts of your father ye
rer from the beginning, and abode not in the
m. When he speaketh a lie, he
 his own: for he is a liar, and the father of it.
 truth, ye believe me not.
f you convinceth me of sin? And if I say the truth, why do
 He that is of God heareth God's words: ye
not of God.
, and said unto him, Say we not well that
8:49 Jesus answered, I have
but I honour my Father, and ye do dishonour me.
y: there is one that seeketh and

f a man keep my saying, he shall
e death.
im, Now we know that thou hast a devil.

ou sayest, If a man keep my
all never taste of death.
 greater than our father Abraham, which is dead? and the
kest thou thyself?  8:54 Jesus answered, If
it is my Father that honoureth
m ye say, that he is your God: 8:55 Yet ye have not known
if I should say, I know him not, I shall be a
nd keep his saying.
raham rejoiced to see my day: and he saw it, and
ws unto him, Thou art not yet fifty years old,
sus said unto them, Verily,
 unto you, Before Abraham was, I am.
59 Then took they up stones to cast at him: but Jesus hid himself,
the temple, going through the midst of them, and so
passed by, he saw a man which was blind from his
ked him, saying, Master, who did sin, this
ind?  9:3 Jesus answered,
is man sinned, nor his parents: but that the works of
n him.
 that sent me, while it is day: the
 cometh, when no man can work.
ong as I am in the world, I am the light of the world.
n, he spat on the ground, and made clay of
 the blind man with the clay,
d unto him, Go, wash in the pool of Siloam, (which is by
went his way therefore, and washed, and came
e, and they which before had seen him that
sat and begged?  9:9 Some
e: others said, He is like him: but he said, I am he.
to him, How were thine eyes opened?  9:11
d Jesus made clay, and
, and said unto me, Go to the pool of Siloam, and
I received sight.
nto him, Where is he? He said, I know not.
 that aforetime was blind.
was the sabbath day when Jesus made the clay, and opened
in the Pharisees also asked him how he had received his
e put clay upon mine eyes, and I washed,
and do see.
 the Pharisees, This man is not of God,
ecause he keepeth not the sabbath day. Others said, How can a man
do such miracles? And there was a division among
ind man again, What sayest thou of him, that
 is a prophet.
t believe concerning him, that he had been
y called the parents of him
ived his sight.
m, saying, Is this your son, who ye say was
9:20 His parents answered them
We know that this is our son, and that he was born blind:
 now seeth, we know not; or who hath opened
k him: he shall speak for
2 These words spake his parents, because they feared the Jews: for
eed already, that if any man did confess that he was
f the synagogue.
s parents, He is of age; ask him.
Then again called they the man that was blind, and said unto him,
se: we know that this man is a sinner.
9:25 He answered and said, Whether he be a sinner or no, I know not:
ow, that, whereas I was blind, now I see.
did he to thee? how opened he
  9:27 He answered them, I have told you already, and ye
uld ye hear it again? will ye also be his
nd said, Thou art his
e Moses' disciples.
od spake unto Moses: as for this fellow, we know
 man answered and said unto them, Why herein is a marvellous
t from whence he is, and yet he hath opened mine
 heareth not sinners: but if any man be a
m he heareth.
n was it not heard that any man opened the
 If this man were not of God, he could do nothing.
to him, Thou wast altogether born in
, and dost thou teach us? And they cast him out.
ast him out; and when he had found
e said unto him, Dost thou believe on the Son of God?  9:36 He
ho is he, Lord, that I might believe on him?  9:37
st both seen him, and it is he that
th with thee.
 believe. And he worshipped him.
nd Jesus said, For judgment I am come into this world, that they
t see; and that they which see might be made blind.
s which were with him heard these words,
and said unto him, Are we blind also?  9:41 Jesus said unto them, If
 ye should have no sin: but now ye say, We see;
:1 Verily, verily, I say unto you, He that entereth not by the door
old, but climbeth up some other way, the same is a
he that entereth in by the door is the shepherd of the sheep.
ter openeth; and the sheep hear his voice: and he
d leadeth them out.
tteth forth his own sheep, he goeth before them,
 know his voice.
ll they not follow, but will flee from him: for
s.
hem: but they understood not what
they were which he spake unto them.
7 Then said Jesus unto them again, Verily, verily, I say unto you,
 the sheep.
ore me are thieves and robbers: but the
heep did not hear them.
oor: by me if any man enter in, he shall be saved, and
d pasture.
but for to steal, and to kill, and to
troy: I am come that they might have life, and that they might have
tly.
good shepherd giveth his life for
ep.
nd not the shepherd, whose own the
are not, seeth the wolf coming, and leaveth the sheep, and
cheth them, and scattereth the sheep.
0:13 The hireling fleeth, because he is an hireling, and careth not

my sheep, and am known of mine.
s the Father knoweth me, even so know I the Father: and I lay
sheep.
ich are not of this fold: them also I
t bring, and they shall hear my voice; and there shall be one fold,
d.
me, because I lay down my life,
ght take it again.
it from me, but I lay it down of myself. I have
wer to take it again. This
ve I received of my Father.
 was a division therefore again among the Jews for these
 of them said, He hath a devil, and is mad; why hear ye
ese are not the words of him that hath a
devil. Can a devil open the eyes of the blind?  10:22 And it was at
east of the dedication, and it was winter.
n Solomon's porch.
Jews round about him, and said unto him, How long
ou be the Christ, tell us plainly.
5 Jesus answered them, I told you, and ye believed not: the works
ather's name, they bear witness of me.
10:26 But ye believe not, because ye are not of my sheep, as I said
:27 My sheep hear my voice, and I know them, and they follow me:
nto them eternal life; and they shall never perish,
m out of my hand.
h gave them me, is greater than all; and no man
her's hand.
ne.
again to stone him.
d them, Many good works have I shewed you from my
do ye stone me?  10:33 The Jews
him, saying, For a good work we stone thee not; but for
 thou, being a man, makest thyself God.

ten in your law, I said, Ye
:35 If he called them gods, unto whom the word of God
t be broken; 10:36 Say ye of him, whom
e Father hath sanctified, and sent into the world, Thou blasphemest;
, I am the Son of God?  10:37 If I do not the works of

 me, believe the works: that
 and believe, that the Father is in me, and I in him.
 again to take him: but he escaped out of
ond Jordan into the place
irst baptized; and there he abode.
1 And many resorted unto him, and said, John did no miracle: but
hn spake of this man were true.
nd many believed on him there.
 a certain man was sick, named Lazarus, of Bethany, the town
 Martha.
nointed the Lord with ointment, and
 his feet with her hair, whose brother Lazarus was sick.)  11:3
rs sent unto him, saying, Lord, behold, he whom
esus heard that, he said, This sickness is not unto death,
, that the Son of God might be glorified
thereby.
nd her sister, and Lazarus.
e had heard therefore that he was sick, he abode two days
here he was.
 he to his disciples, Let us go into Judaea
im, Master, the Jews of late sought to
one thee; and goest thou thither again?  11:9 Jesus answered, Are
hours in the day? If any man walk in the day, he
e light of this world.
an walk in the night, he stumbleth, because there is
e things said he: and after that he saith unto them, Our
ut I go, that I may awake him out of sleep.
if he sleep, he shall do well.
wbeit Jesus spake of his death: but they thought that he had
st in sleep.
 them plainly, Lazarus is dead.
nd I am glad for your sakes that I was not there, to the intent
ertheless let us go unto him.
n said Thomas, which is called Didymus, unto his
hat we may die with him.
n Jesus came, he found that he had lain in the grave
w Bethany was nigh unto Jerusalem, about fifteen furlongs off:
e Jews came to Martha and Mary, to comfort them
Then Martha, as soon as she heard that Jesus was coming, went
 sat still in the house.
d Martha unto Jesus, Lord, if thou hadst been here, my
22 But I know, that even now, whatsoever thou wilt ask of God, God
e.
her shall rise again.
h unto him, I know that he shall rise again in the

rection, and the life: he
in me, though he were dead, yet shall he live: 11:26
veth in me shall never die. Believest
u this?  11:27 She saith unto him, Yea, Lord: I believe that thou
he Son of God, which should come into the world.
she went her way, and called Mary her
ter secretly, saying, The Master is come, and calleth for thee.
she heard that, she arose quickly, and came unto him.
 come into the town, but was in that place
then which were with her in the house, and comforted
she rose up hastily and went out,
d her, saying, She goeth unto the grave to weep there.
ome where Jesus was, and saw him, she fell
 if thou hadst been here, my
not died.
w her weeping, and the Jews also weeping
which came with her, he groaned in the spirit, and was troubled.
Where have ye laid him? They said unto him, Lord, come
.
he loved him!  11:37 And some of
d, Could not this man, which opened the eyes of the blind,
is man should not have died?  11:38 Jesus
h to the grave. It was a
e lay upon it.
e away the stone. Martha, the sister of him
 this time he stinketh: for he
dead four days.
her, Said I not unto thee, that, if thou
wouldest believe, thou shouldest see the glory of God?  11:41 Then
he stone from the place where the dead was laid. And
said, Father, I thank thee that thou
 heard me.
earest me always: but because of the
le which stand by I said it, that they may believe that thou hast
 And when he thus had spoken, he cried with a loud voice,
1:44 And he that was dead came forth, bound hand and foot with
s face was bound about with a napkin. Jesus saith
 go.
came to Mary, and had seen the
ch Jesus did, believed on him.
t some of them went their ways to the Pharisees, and told them
d done.
riests and the Pharisees a council, and
aid, What do we? for this man doeth many miracles.
, all men will believe on him: and the
mans shall come and take away both our place and nation.
amed Caiaphas, being the high priest that same
g at all, 11:50 Nor consider that
xpedient for us, that one man should die for the people, and
perish not.
 of himself: but being high priest that
ear, he prophesied that Jesus should die for that nation; 11:52 And
tion only, but that also he should gather together in
were scattered abroad.
that day forth they took counsel together for to put
herefore walked no more openly among the Jews; but went
to the wilderness, into a city called
raim, and there continued with his disciples.
gh at hand: and many went out of
try up to Jerusalem before the passover, to purify themselves.
they for Jesus, and spake among themselves, as they
 ye, that he will not come to the
 11:57 Now both the chief priests and the Pharisees had given a
if any man knew where he were, he should shew it,
 Then Jesus six days before the passover came to Bethany, where
had been dead, whom he raised from the dead.
nd Martha served: but Lazarus was
them that sat at the table with him.
:3 Then took Mary a pound of ointment of spikenard, very costly, and
eet of Jesus, and wiped his feet with her hair: and the
dour of the ointment.
ne of his disciples, Judas Iscariot, Simon's son,
 was not this ointment sold for three
dred pence, and given to the poor?  12:6 This he said, not that he
or; but because he was a thief, and had the bag, and
12:7 Then said Jesus, Let her alone: against the day of my burying
is.
th you; but me ye have not always.
 Much people of the Jews therefore knew that he was there: and
sus' sake only, but that they might see Lazarus
ead.
ted that they might put Lazarus also
eath; 12:11 Because that by reason of him many of the Jews went
on Jesus.
ople that were come to the feast, when
ey heard that Jesus was coming to Jerusalem, 12:13 Took branches of
 went forth to meet him, and cried, Hosanna: Blessed is
eth in the name of the Lord.
Jesus, when he had found a young ass, sat thereon; as it is
, daughter of Sion: behold, thy King cometh,
se things understood not his disciples at the first: but when
then remembered they that these things were
these things unto him.
 therefore that was with him when he called Lazarus
m from the dead, bare record.
 this cause the people also met him, for that they heard that
cle.
 among themselves, Perceive ye how
vail nothing? behold, the world is gone after him.
reeks among them that came up to worship
at the feast: 12:21 The same came therefore to Philip, which was of
lilee, and desired him, saying, Sir, we would see
 telleth Andrew: and again Andrew and Philip
d them, saying, The hour is come, that the Son
 Verily, verily, I say unto you, Except a corn of wheat fall into
e, it abideth alone: but if it die, it bringeth forth
loveth his life shall lose it; and he that hateth his
 it unto life eternal.
 serve me, let him follow me; and where I am, there
y man serve me, him will my Father
.
at shall I say? Father, save me
 hour: but for this cause came I unto this hour.
Then came there a voice from heaven,
ng, I have both glorified it, and will glorify it again.
re, that stood by, and heard it, said that it
e to him.
, This voice came not because of me, but
for your sakes.
nt of this world: now shall the prince of this
f I be lifted up from the earth, will draw all men unto
signifying what death he should die.
:34 The people answered him, We have heard out of the law that
ver: and how sayest thou, The Son of man must be
  12:35 Then Jesus said unto them,
little while is the light with you.
k while ye have the light, lest darkness come upon you: for he that
ness knoweth not whither he goeth.
6 While ye have light, believe in the light, that ye may be the
These things spake Jesus, and departed, and did
t though he had done so many miracles before them, yet they
:38 That the saying of Esaias the prophet might
 who hath believed our report? and
m hath the arm of the Lord been revealed?  12:39 Therefore they
because that Esaias said again, 12:40 He hath
r heart; that they should not see
eir eyes, nor understand with their heart, and be converted,
.
he saw his glory, and spake of
:42 Nevertheless among the chief rulers also many believed on him;
he Pharisees they did not confess him, lest they
: 12:43 For they loved the praise of
more than the praise of God.
s cried and said, He that believeth on me, believeth not on
t me.
him that sent me.
ht into the world, that whosoever believeth on me
12:47 And if any man hear my words, and believe not, I judge him not:
t to judge the world, but to save the world.
iveth not my words, hath one that
 him: the word that I have spoken, the same shall judge him in
49 For I have not spoken of myself; but the Father which sent me,
andment, what I should say, and what I should speak.
mmandment is life everlasting: whatsoever
d unto me, so I speak.
the feast of the passover, when Jesus knew that his
part out of this world unto the Father,
aving loved his own which were in the world, he loved them unto the
d supper being ended, the devil having now put into the heart
mon's son, to betray him; 13:3 Jesus knowing that
nto his hands, and that he was come
God, and went to God; 13:4 He riseth from supper, and laid aside
took a towel, and girded himself.
After that he poureth water into a bason, and began to wash the
d to wipe them with the towel wherewith he was
mon Peter: and Peter saith unto him, Lord,
ered and said unto him, What I
owest not now; but thou shalt know hereafter.
lt never wash my feet. Jesus
, If I wash thee not, thou hast no part with me.
 Lord, not my feet only, but also my
s and my head.
, He that is washed needeth not save to wash
 ye are clean, but not all.
e knew who should betray him; therefore said he, Ye are not
after he had washed their feet, and had taken his garments,
 he said unto them, Know ye what I have done to
ord: and ye say well; for so I am.
4 If I then, your Lord and Master, have washed your feet; ye also
 another's feet.
 you an example, that ye should do as I have
I say unto you, The servant is not greater than
reater than he that sent him.
ye know these things, happy are ye if ye do them.
 know whom I have chosen: but that the
ripture may be fulfilled, He that eateth bread with me hath lifted
nst me.
come, that, when it is come to pass, ye
ay believe that I am he.
verily, I say unto you, He that receiveth whomsoever I
at receiveth me receiveth him that sent
e.
as troubled in spirit, and
 said, Verily, verily, I say unto you, that one of you
en the disciples looked one on another, doubting of whom he
re was leaning on Jesus' bosom one of his disciples, whom
on Peter therefore beckoned to him, that he should ask who it
spake.
east saith unto him, Lord, who is it?
26 Jesus answered, He it is, to whom I shall give a sop, when I
 when he had dipped the sop, he gave it to Judas
27 And after the sop Satan entered into him. Then said Jesus unto
est, do quickly.
e table knew for what intent he spake this unto
ght, because Judas had the bag, that Jesus
 we have need of against the
hat he should give something to the poor.
ent immediately out: and it was

sus said, Now is the Son of
, and God is glorified in him.
 God be glorified in him, God shall also glorify him in
way glorify him.
 yet a little while I am with you. Ye shall seek
hither I go, ye cannot come; so now
 to you.
 unto you, That ye love one another; as
 have loved you, that ye also love one another.
that ye are my disciples, if ye have
 one to another.
 unto him, Lord, whither goest thou? Jesus
ot follow me now; but thou
e afterwards.
, Lord, why cannot I follow thee now? I will
8 Jesus answered him, Wilt thou lay down thy life for my sake?
y unto thee, The cock shall not crow, till thou
not your heart be troubled: ye believe in God, believe also
ther's house are many mansions: if it were not so, I
repare a place for you.
o and prepare a place for you, I will come again, and
 where I am, there ye may be also.
 And whither I go ye know, and the way ye know.
 we know not whither thou goest; and
can we know the way?  14:6 Jesus saith unto him, I am the way, the
ife: no man cometh unto the Father, but by me.
 have known my Father also: and from
eforth ye know him, and have seen him.
14:8 Philip saith unto him, Lord, shew us the Father, and it sufficeth
Jesus saith unto him, Have I been so long time with you, and yet
n me, Philip? he that hath seen me hath seen the
Shew us the Father?  14:10 Believest
 not that I am in the Father, and the Father in me?  the words
u I speak not of myself: but the Father that

 and the Father in me: or
 for the very works' sake.
, verily, I say unto you, He that believeth on me, the
also; and greater works than these shall
he do; because I go unto my Father.
13 And whatsoever ye shall ask in my name, that will I do, that the
lorified in the Son.
ask any thing in my name, I will do it.

.
 he shall give you another
t he may abide with you for ever; 14:17 Even the Spirit
nnot receive, because it seeth him not,
either knoweth him: but ye know him; for he dwelleth with you, and

: I will come to you.
e while, and the world seeth me no more; but ye see
ve also.
w that I am in my Father, and ye in me,
nd I in you.
andments, and keepeth them, he it is that
 loved of my Father, and I
 and will manifest myself to him.
 Judas saith unto him, not Iscariot, Lord, how is it that thou
f unto us, and not unto the world?  14:23 Jesus
n love me, he will keep my words:
Father will love him, and we will come unto him, and make our
:24 He that loveth me not keepeth not my sayings: and the word which
 mine, but the Father's which sent me.
14:25 These things have I spoken unto you, being yet present with you.
the Comforter, which is the Holy Ghost, whom the Father will
all teach you all things, and bring all things
ve said unto you.
ith you, my peace I give unto you: not as the
t your heart be troubled, neither
be afraid.
id unto you, I go away, and come again
to you. If ye loved me, ye would rejoice, because I said, I go unto
 my Father is greater than I.
 now I have told you before it come to pass, that, when it is
t believe.
alk much with you: for the prince of this
14:31 But that the world may know that I love the Father; and as the
 commandment, even so I do. Arise, let us go hence.
my Father is the husbandman.
 branch in me that beareth not fruit he taketh away: and
fruit, he purgeth it, that it may bring
orth more fruit.
through the word which I have spoken unto you.
 the branch cannot bear fruit of
except it abide in the vine; no more can ye, except ye abide
e vine, ye are the branches: He that abideth in me, and I
 forth much fruit: for without me ye can do
me, he is cast forth as a branch, and is
withered; and men gather them, and cast them into the fire, and they

e in you, ye shall ask what
it shall be done unto you.
is my Father glorified, that ye bear much fruit; so shall
:9 As the Father hath loved me, so have I loved you: continue ye in
10 If ye keep my commandments, ye shall abide in my love; even as I
ther's commandments, and abide in his love.
 you, that my joy might remain in
d that your joy might be full.
is is my commandment, That ye love one another, as I have
er love hath no man than this, that a man lay down his life
14 Ye are my friends, if ye do whatsoever I command you.
you not servants; for the servant knoweth not
d you friends; for all things
 heard of my Father I have made known unto you.
I have chosen you, and ordained you,
 ye should go and bring forth fruit, and that your fruit should
ever ye shall ask of the Father in my name, he may
gs I command you, that ye love one another.
that it hated me before it hated
15:19 If ye were of the world, the world would love his own: but
 of the world, but I have chosen you out of the
ou.
 unto you, The servant is not
n his lord. If they have persecuted me, they will also
kept my saying, they will keep yours also.
o unto you for my name's sake,
ey know not him that sent me.
I had not come and spoken unto them, they had not had sin:
ak for their sin.
me hateth my Father also.
d not done among them the works which none other man did,
 now have they both seen and hated both me
to pass, that the word might be fulfilled that
me without a cause.
Comforter is come, whom I will send unto you from
uth, which proceedeth from the
 shall testify of me: 15:27 And ye also shall bear witness,
th me from the beginning.
ings have I spoken unto you, that ye should not be
 you out of the synagogues: yea, the time cometh,
hink that he doeth God service.
d these things will they do unto you, because they have not
e.
u, that when the time shall come,
remember that I told you of them. And these things I said not
ning, because I was with you.
now I go my way to him that sent me; and none of you asketh
  16:6 But because I have said these things
.
h; It is expedient for you that I
: for if I go not away, the Comforter will not come unto you;
ll send him unto you.
is come, he will reprove the world of sin, and of
6:9 Of sin, because they believe not
e; 16:10 Of righteousness, because I go to my Father, and ye see
Of judgment, because the prince of this world is
hings to say unto you, but ye cannot bear them
pirit of truth, is come, he will guide you
f himself; but whatsoever he
that shall he speak: and he will shew you things to come.
me: for he shall receive of mine, and shall
hat the Father hath are mine: therefore said I, that
ll shew it unto you.
le, and ye shall not see me: and again, a little
e I go to the Father.
ome of his disciples among themselves, What is this
 while, and ye shall not see me: and
n, a little while, and ye shall see me: and, Because I go to the
y said therefore, What is this that he saith, A
e saith.
 were desirous to ask him, and said unto
them, Do ye enquire among yourselves of that I said, A little while,
ot see me: and again, a little while, and ye shall see
 say unto you, That ye shall weep and
ent, but the world shall rejoice: and ye shall be sorrowful, but
be turned into joy.
she is in travail hath sorrow, because her hour is
vered of the child, she remembereth no
re the anguish, for joy that a man is born into the world.
fore have sorrow: but I will see you again, and
joy no man taketh from you.
n that day ye shall ask me nothing. Verily, verily, I say
hall ask the Father in my name, he will give
d nothing in my name: ask, and ye shall
eceive, that your joy may be full.
5 These things have I spoken unto you in proverbs: but the time
l no more speak unto you in proverbs, but I shall

e: and I say not unto you,
ay the Father for you: 16:27 For the Father himself
ed me, and have believed that I came
from God.
ather, and am come into the world: again,

now speakest thou plainly, and
o proverb.
hou knowest all things, and needest not
hat any man should ask thee: by this we believe that thou camest

eve?  16:32 Behold, the hour
 is now come, that ye shall be scattered, every man to his
alone: and yet I am not alone, because the
 I have spoken unto you, that in me ye might have
ave tribulation: but be of good cheer; I have
ds spake Jesus, and lifted up his eyes to heaven, and
e; glorify thy Son, that thy Son also may
 power over all flesh, that
e eternal life to as many as thou hast given him.
that they might know thee the only true
od, and Jesus Christ, whom thou hast sent.
h: I have finished the work
vest me to do.
glorify thou me with thine own self with the
 world was.
name unto the men which thou gavest me out
gavest them me; and they have
rd.
hings whatsoever thou hast given me
f thee.
 the words which thou gavest me; and
 have received them, and have known surely that I came out from
 believed that thou didst send me.
 I pray for them: I pray not for the world, but for them which
for they are thine.
are thine, and thine are mine; and I am glorified
 more in the world, but these are in the world,
ep through thine own name those
 hast given me, that they may be one, as we are.
he world, I kept them in thy name:
that thou gavest me I have kept, and none of them is lost, but
; that the scripture might be fulfilled.

things I speak in the world,
ght have my joy fulfilled in themselves.

e world hath hated them,
 not of the world, even as I am not of the world.
ldest take them out of the world, but
t thou shouldest keep them from the evil.
s I am not of the world.
 them through thy truth: thy word is truth.
orld, even so have I also sent
the world.
sanctify myself, that they also might be
sanctified through the truth.
ther pray I for these alone, but for them also which shall
eir word; 17:21 That they all may be one; as
, that they also may be one in
he world may believe that thou hast sent me.
t me I have given them; that they
one, even as we are one: 17:23 I in them, and thou in me, that
fect in one; and that the world may know that thou
m, as thou hast loved me.
 I will that they also, whom thou hast given me, be with
ay behold my glory, which thou hast given
tion of the world.
ther, the world hath not known thee: but I have
at thou hast sent me.
declared unto them thy name, and will declare it:
 loved me may be in them, and I in

 he went forth with his
e brook Cedron, where was a garden, into the which he

 knew the place: for Jesus
ted thither with his disciples.
das then, having received a band of men and officers from the
risees, cometh thither with lanterns and torches
re, knowing all things that should come upon him,
hom seek ye?  18:5 They answered him,
us of Nazareth. Jesus saith unto them, I am he.
m, stood with them.
s he had said unto them, I am he, they went
:7 Then asked he them again, Whom seek ye? And they said, Jesus of
8 Jesus answered, I have told you that I am he: if therefore ye
go their way: 18:9 That the saying might be
h thou gavest me have I lost
10 Then Simon Peter having a sword drew it, and smote the high
d cut off his right ear. The servant's name was
nto Peter, Put up thy sword into the sheath:
 shall I not drink it?  18:12
nd and the captain and officers of the Jews took Jesus, and
d him away to Annas first; for he was father in
 priest that same year.
has was he, which gave counsel to the Jews, that it was
ld die for the people.
Peter followed Jesus, and so did another disciple:
 high priest, and went in with Jesus
 the palace of the high priest.
ut Peter stood at the door without. Then went out that other
own unto the high priest, and spake unto her
er.
pt the door unto Peter, Art not
 one of this man's disciples? He saith, I am not.
cers stood there, who had made a fire
coals; for it was cold: and they warmed themselves: and Peter stood
warmed himself.
hen asked Jesus of his disciples, and of his
 I spake openly to the world; I ever taught
ither the Jews always resort;
et have I said nothing.
t thou me? ask them which heard me, what I have said
hat I said.
spoken, one of the officers which stood by
saying, Answerest thou the
?  18:23 Jesus answered him, If I have spoken evil, bear
f well, why smitest thou me?  18:24 Now
nnas had sent him bound unto Caiaphas the high priest.
d and warmed himself. They said therefore
sciples? He denied it, and
.
 priest, being his kinsman whose
r cut off, saith, Did not I see thee in the garden with him?
d again: and immediately the cock crew.

nto the hall of judgment: and
y; and they themselves went not into the judgment hall,
; but that they might eat the passover.

 said, What accusation bring
his man?  18:30 They answered and said unto him, If he
uld not have delivered him up unto thee.

e him, and judge him according
w. The Jews therefore said unto him, It is not lawful for us
h: 18:32 That the saying of Jesus might be
at death he should die.
te entered into the judgment hall again, and called
hou the King of the Jews?  18:34 Jesus
swered him, Sayest thou this thing of thyself, or did others tell it
8:35 Pilate answered, Am I a Jew? Thine own nation and
ered thee unto me: what hast thou done?
8:36 Jesus answered, My kingdom is not of this world: if my kingdom
rld, then would my servants fight, that I should not be
now is my kingdom not from hence.
 Pilate therefore said unto him, Art thou a king then? Jesus
that I am a king. To this end was I born, and
 that I should bear witness unto
h. Every one that is of the truth heareth my voice.
What is truth? And when he had said this,
h unto them, I find in him no
l.
hould release unto you one at the
r: will ye therefore that I release unto you the King of the
d they all again, saying, Not this man, but

d scourged him.
latted a crown of thorns, and put it on his
, 19:3 And said, Hail, King of
and they smote him with their hands.
:4 Pilate therefore went forth again, and saith unto them, Behold, I
h to you, that ye may know that I find no fault in him.
h, wearing the crown of thorns, and the
urple robe. And Pilate saith unto them, Behold the man!  19:6 When
s therefore and officers saw him, they cried out,
 Pilate saith unto them, Take ye him,
 crucify him: for I find no fault in him.
aw, and by our law he ought to
se he made himself the Son of God.
 When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he was the more afraid;
in into the judgment hall, and saith unto Jesus,
m no answer.
to him, Speakest thou not unto me? knowest
ee, and have power to release
1 Jesus answered, Thou couldest have no power at all
en thee from above: therefore he that
ivered me unto thee hath the greater sin.
t to release him: but the Jews
 saying, If thou let this man go, thou art not Caesar's
mself a king speaketh against Caesar.
9:13 When Pilate therefore heard that saying, he brought Jesus forth,
in the judgment seat in a place that is called the
batha.
 of the passover, and about the sixth
r: and he saith unto the Jews, Behold your King!  19:15 But they
th him, away with him, crucify him.
ate saith unto them, Shall I crucify your King? The chief priests
 no king but Caesar.
ed he him therefore unto them to be crucified. And
y.
forth into a place called the
skull, which is called in the Hebrew Golgotha: 19:18 Where
two other with him, on either side one, and
 wrote a title, and put it on the cross. And the
KING OF THE JEWS.
 read many of the Jews: for the place where Jesus
y: and it was written in Hebrew, and
k, and Latin.
 priests of the Jews to Pilate, Write not,
I am King of the Jews.
wered, What I have written I have written.
 crucified Jesus, took his
made four parts, to every soldier a part; and also his
ut seam, woven from the top throughout.

s, Let us not rend it, but
it, whose it shall be: that the scripture might be
ted my raiment among them, and for my
ture they did cast lots. These things therefore the soldiers did.
 stood by the cross of Jesus his mother, and his
Cleophas, and Mary Magdalene.
n Jesus therefore saw his mother, and the disciple standing
aith unto his mother, Woman, behold thy son!
ehold thy mother! And from that
 disciple took her unto his own home.
9:28 After this, Jesus knowing that all things were now accomplished,
pture might be fulfilled, saith, I thirst.
of vinegar: and they filled a
 vinegar, and put it upon hyssop, and put it to his mouth.
fore had received the vinegar, he said, It is
gave up the ghost.
fore, because it was the preparation, that the
oss on the sabbath day, (for that
 day was an high day,) besought Pilate that their legs might be
ey might be taken away.
 the soldiers, and brake the legs of the first, and of
d with him.
 Jesus, and saw that he was dead already,
 the soldiers with a spear
de, and forthwith came there out blood and water.
ecord, and his record is true: and he
weth that he saith true, that ye might believe.
 that the scripture should be
A bone of him shall not be broken.
7 And again another scripture saith, They shall look on him whom
9:38 And after this Joseph of Arimathaea, being a disciple of Jesus,
or fear of the Jews, besought Pilate that he might take
 Pilate gave him leave. He came therefore,
 there came also Nicodemus, which at the first came to Jesus
a mixture of myrrh and aloes, about an hundred
y the body of Jesus, and wound it in linen clothes
f the Jews is to bury.
 place where he was crucified there was a garden; and
, wherein was never man yet laid.
 There laid they Jesus therefore because of the Jews' preparation
lchre was nigh at hand.
day of the week cometh Mary Magdalene early, when it
re, and seeth the stone taken away from
he sepulchre.
d cometh to Simon Peter, and to the other
o them, They have taken away
 of the sepulchre, and we know not where they have laid
e went forth, and that other disciple, and came to
an both together: and the other disciple did outrun
pulchre.
 looking in, saw the linen clothes
 yet went he not in.
imon Peter following him, and went into the
lie, 20:7 And the napkin, that
his head, not lying with the linen clothes, but wrapped
lf.
isciple, which came first to the
e, and he saw, and believed.
s yet they knew not the scripture, that he must rise again
Then the disciples went away again unto their own home.
out at the sepulchre weeping: and as she
wept, she stooped down, and looked into the sepulchre, 20:12 And seeth
n white sitting, the one at the head, and the other at the
Jesus had lain.
 her, Woman, why weepest thou? She saith unto
 LORD, and I know not where they
d him.
, she turned herself back, and saw
standing, and knew not that it was Jesus.
weepest thou? whom seekest
pposing him to be the gardener, saith unto him, Sir, if
tell me where thou hast laid him, and I
ill take him away.
to her, Mary. She turned herself, and saith unto
ter.
me not; for I am not yet ascended to
ather: but go to my brethren, and say unto them, I ascend unto my
Father; and to my God, and your God.
:18 Mary Magdalene came and told the disciples that she had seen the
 he had spoken these things unto her.
0:19 Then the same day at evening, being the first day of the week,
were shut where the disciples were assembled for fear
tood in the midst, and saith unto them,
eace be unto you.
 so said, he shewed unto them his hands and his
ad, when they saw the LORD.
said Jesus to them again, Peace be unto you: as my Father
d I you.
s, he breathed on them, and saith unto
em, Receive ye the Holy Ghost: 20:23 Whose soever sins ye remit,
unto them; and whose soever sins ye retain, they are
 one of the twelve, called Didymus, was not with them
 other disciples therefore said unto him, We have seen the
o them, Except I shall see in his hands the print of
nto the print of the nails, and thrust
 hand into his side, I will not believe.

ciples were within, and Thomas
 then came Jesus, the doors being shut, and stood in the
unto you.
, Reach hither thy finger, and behold my
hands; and reach hither thy hand, and thrust it into my side: and be
 but believing.
ed and said unto him, My LORD and my God.
ause thou hast seen me, thou
d: blessed are they that have not seen, and yet have
her signs truly did Jesus in the presence of his
n this book: 20:31 But these are
 that ye might believe that Jesus is the Christ, the Son of
 ye might have life through his name.
1:1 After these things Jesus shewed himself again to the disciples at
berias; and on this wise shewed he himself.
 and Thomas called Didymus, and
 of Cana in Galilee, and the sons of Zebedee, and two other
:3 Simon Peter saith unto them, I go a fishing. They say unto him,
thee. They went forth, and entered into a ship
ght nothing.
was now come, Jesus stood on the shore: but
s.
ldren, have ye any meat? They
m, No.
 the net on the right side of the
nd ye shall find. They cast therefore, and now they were not
e multitude of fishes.
hat disciple whom Jesus loved saith unto Peter, It is
r heard that it was the Lord, he girt his
,) and did cast himself into
21:8 And the other disciples came in a little ship; (for they were not
d, but as it were two hundred cubits,) dragging the net
n then as they were come to land, they saw a fire of coals
reon, and bread.
 them, Bring of the fish which ye have now
d drew the net to land full of great
es, an hundred and fifty and three: and for all there were so
 net broken.
m, Come and dine. And none of the disciples
at it was the Lord.
meth, and taketh bread, and giveth them, and fish
e third time that Jesus shewed himself to his
om the dead.
ed, Jesus saith to Simon Peter, Simon, son
? He saith unto him, Yea,
est that I love thee. He saith unto him, Feed my lambs.
in the second time, Simon, son of Jonas,
lovest thou me? He saith unto him, Yea, Lord; thou knowest that I love
th unto him, Feed my sheep.
ith unto him the third time, Simon, son of Jonas, lovest
 because he said unto him the third time,
d, thou knowest all things;
that I love thee. Jesus saith unto him, Feed my sheep.
y unto thee, When thou wast young, thou
irdest thyself, and walkedst whither thou wouldest: but when thou
u shalt stretch forth thy hands, and another shall
r thou wouldest not.
e, signifying by what death he should glorify God.
saith unto him, Follow me.
eter, turning about, seeth the disciple whom Jesus loved
ed on his breast at supper, and said, Lord,
 Peter seeing him saith to
nd what shall this man do?  21:22 Jesus saith unto him,
l I come, what is that to thee? follow thou
ad among the brethren, that that
 should not die: yet Jesus said not unto him, He shall not
 he tarry till I come, what is that to thee?
fieth of these things, and wrote
ings: and we know that his testimony is true.
 things which Jesus did, the which,
ey should be written every one, I suppose that even the world
ain the books that should be written. Amen.
:1 The former treatise have I made, O Theophilus, of all that Jesus
o and teach, 1:2 Until the day in which he was taken
Holy Ghost had given commandments unto
e apostles whom he had chosen: 1:3 To whom also he shewed himself
assion by many infallible proofs, being seen of them
e things pertaining to the kingdom of
: 1:4 And, being assembled together with them, commanded them that
depart from Jerusalem, but wait for the promise of the
have heard of me.
ptized with water; but ye shall be baptized with
.
ether, they asked of him, saying,
ilt thou at this time restore again the kingdom to Israel?  1:7
em, It is not for you to know the times or the
n his own power.
ve power, after that the Holy Ghost is come upon
o me both in Jerusalem, and in all
, and in Samaria, and unto the uttermost part of the earth.
poken these things, while they beheld, he was
t of their sight.
ooked stedfastly toward heaven as he went up,
e apparel; 1:11 Which also said,
f Galilee, why stand ye gazing up into heaven? this same
rom you into heaven, shall so come in like
n.
em from the mount called Olivet,
 from Jerusalem a sabbath day's journey.

nt up into an upper room,
h Peter, and James, and John, and Andrew, Philip, and
hew, James the son of Alphaeus, and Simon

d in prayer and supplication,
men, and Mary the mother of Jesus, and with his brethren.
Peter stood up in the midst of the disciples,
er were about an hundred and
6 Men and brethren, this scripture must needs have been
host by the mouth of David spake before
oncerning Judas, which was guide to them that took Jesus.
d with us, and had obtained part of this
ministry.
 field with the reward of iniquity; and
alling headlong, he burst asunder in the midst, and all his bowels
:19 And it was known unto all the dwellers at Jerusalem; insomuch as
called in their proper tongue, Aceldama, that is to say,
0 For it is written in the book of Psalms, Let his habitation be
no man dwell therein: and his bishoprick let another
se men which have companied with us all the time
t among us, 1:22 Beginning from the
sm of John, unto that same day that he was taken up from us, must
o be a witness with us of his resurrection.
alled Barsabas, who was surnamed
and Matthias.
 said, Thou, Lord, which knowest the hearts
hou hast chosen, 1:25 That he
rt of this ministry and apostleship, from which Judas by
e might go to his own place.
hey gave forth their lots; and the lot fell upon Matthias;
 the eleven apostles.
day of Pentecost was fully come, they were all with
 And suddenly there came a sound from heaven as of a rushing mighty
lled all the house where they were sitting.
en tongues like as of fire, and
on each of them.
filled with the Holy Ghost, and began to speak
ve them utterance.
welling at Jerusalem Jews, devout men, out of
 when this was noised abroad, the multitude came together, and
ause that every man heard them speak in his own
amazed and marvelled, saying one to another,
Galilaeans?  2:8 And how hear we
n in our own tongue, wherein we were born?  2:9 Parthians, and
 and the dwellers in Mesopotamia, and in Judaea,
a, 2:10 Phrygia, and Pamphylia, in
 and in the parts of Libya about Cyrene, and strangers of Rome,
, 2:11 Cretes and Arabians, we do hear them speak
s of God.
, and were in doubt, saying one to
r, What meaneth this?  2:13 Others mocking said, These men are

en, lifted up his voice, and
em, Ye men of Judaea, and all ye that dwell at Jerusalem,
nd hearken to my words: 2:15 For these are
 but the third hour of the
ut this is that which was spoken by the prophet Joel; 2:17 And
s in the last days, saith God, I will pour out of
r sons and your daughters shall
 and your young men shall see visions, and your old men shall
d on my servants and on my handmaidens I will
and they shall prophesy: 2:19 And
shew wonders in heaven above, and signs in the earth beneath;
vapour of smoke: 2:20 The sun shall be turned
d, before the great and notable
e Lord come: 2:21 And it shall come to pass, that whosoever
of the Lord shall be saved.
 of Israel, hear these words; Jesus of Nazareth, a man
 miracles and wonders and signs, which God
urselves also know: 2:23 Him,
ered by the determinate counsel and foreknowledge of God,
ked hands have crucified and slain: 2:24 Whom
 pains of death: because it was
ble that he should be holden of it.
5 For David speaketh concerning him, I foresaw the Lord always
he is on my right hand, that I should not be
oice, and my tongue was glad;
so my flesh shall rest in hope: 2:27 Because thou wilt not
either wilt thou suffer thine Holy One to see
own to me the ways of life; thou shalt make me

k unto you of the patriarch
e is both dead and buried, and his sepulchre is with us
efore being a prophet, and knowing that God had sworn with an
the fruit of his loins, according to the flesh,
his throne; 2:31 He seeing this
ake of the resurrection of Christ, that his soul was not left
flesh did see corruption.
us hath God raised up, whereof we all are witnesses.
right hand of God exalted, and having
eived of the Father the promise of the Holy Ghost, he hath shed
e now see and hear.
ot ascended into the heavens: but he saith himself,
 thou on my right hand, 2:35 Until I
 thy foes thy footstool.
 let all the house of Israel know assuredly, that God
m ye have crucified, both Lord and
.
ere pricked in their heart, and
 Peter and to the rest of the apostles, Men and brethren,
hen Peter said unto them, Repent, and be
baptized every one of you in the name of Jesus Christ for the
d ye shall receive the gift of the Holy Ghost.
and to your children, and to all
 afar off, even as many as the LORD our God shall call.
words did he testify and exhort, saying, Save
ion.
d his word were baptized: and the
y there were added unto them about three thousand souls.
stedfastly in the apostles' doctrine and
fellowship, and in breaking of bread, and in prayers.
ry soul: and many wonders and signs were
done by the apostles.
 believed were together, and had all things common;
 and goods, and parted them to all men,
s every man had need.
ntinuing daily with one accord in the temple, and
e, did eat their meat with gladness
ingleness of heart, 2:47 Praising God, and having favour with all
he Lord added to the church daily such as should be
n went up together into the temple at the hour of
3:2 And a certain man lame from his mother's womb was carried, whom
 at the gate of the temple which is called Beautiful,
red into the temple; 3:3 Who seeing Peter
d an alms.
 eyes upon him with John, said, Look on
s.
cting to receive something of
6 Then Peter said, Silver and gold have I none; but such as I have
the name of Jesus Christ of Nazareth rise up and walk.
 right hand, and lifted him up: and
iately his feet and ankle bones received strength.
nd walked, and entered with them into
 temple, walking, and leaping, and praising God.
alking and praising God: 3:10 And they
ew that it was he which sat for alms at the Beautiful gate of the
were filled with wonder and amazement at that which
And as the lame man which was healed held Peter and John, all the
er unto them in the porch that is called Solomon's,
when Peter saw it, he answered unto the people, Ye men of
this? or why look ye so earnestly on us, as
had made this man to walk?
f Abraham, and of Isaac, and of Jacob, the God of our
on Jesus; whom ye delivered up, and
d him in the presence of Pilate, when he was determined to let
ye denied the Holy One and the Just, and desired a murderer
 3:15 And killed the Prince of life, whom God
 are witnesses.
gh faith in his name hath made this man strong,
h which is by him hath given him
fect soundness in the presence of you all.
ough ignorance ye did it, as did
r rulers.
God before had shewed by the mouth of all
he hath so fulfilled.
erefore, and be converted, that your sins may be
reshing shall come from the presence
he Lord.
hrist, which before was preached unto
: 3:21 Whom the heaven must receive until the times of restitution
hich God hath spoken by the mouth of all his holy

rs, A prophet shall the Lord
se up unto you of your brethren, like unto me; him shall
soever he shall say unto you.
it shall come to pass, that every soul, which will not hear
destroyed from among the people.
ea, and all the prophets from Samuel and those that follow
poken, have likewise foretold of these days.
hets, and of the covenant which
with our fathers, saying unto Abraham, And in thy seed shall
e earth be blessed.
 God, having raised up his Son Jesus, sent him to
one of you from his iniquities.
 as they spake unto the people, the priests, and the captain of
 Sadducees, came upon them, 4:2 Being grieved that
ched through Jesus the resurrection
the dead.
em, and put them in hold unto the next
y: for it was now eventide.
 many of them which heard the word believed; and the number
ve thousand.
 the morrow, that their rulers, and elders,
est, and Caiaphas, and John,
r, and as many as were of the kindred of the high priest,
 Jerusalem.
hem in the midst, they asked, By what
er, or by what name, have ye done this?  4:8 Then Peter, filled
, said unto them, Ye rulers of the people, and
 be examined of the good deed done
 impotent man, by what means he is made whole; 4:10 Be it known
o all the people of Israel, that by the name of
rucified, whom God raised from the
even by him doth this man stand here before you whole.
ch was set at nought of you builders, which
12 Neither is there salvation in any other: for there is none other
en given among men, whereby we must be saved.
 of Peter and John, and perceived
ey were unlearned and ignorant men, they marvelled; and they
, that they had been with Jesus.
nd beholding the man which was healed standing with them, they
ainst it.
ded them to go aside out of the council,
they conferred among themselves, 4:16 Saying, What shall we do to
at indeed a notable miracle hath been done by them is
ll in Jerusalem; and we cannot deny it.

the people, let us straitly
, that they speak henceforth to no man in this name.
nd commanded them not to speak at all nor
eter and John answered and said unto them, Whether it be
to hearken unto you more than unto God,
udge ye.
he things which we have seen and heard.

them, they let them go,
ow they might punish them, because of the people: for
t which was done.
above forty years old, on whom this miracle of
g let go, they went to their own company, and reported
nd elders had said unto them.
when they heard that, they lifted up their voice to God with
Lord, thou art God, which hast made heaven, and
 them is: 4:25 Who by the mouth of
rvant David hast said, Why did the heathen rage, and the people
?  4:26 The kings of the earth stood up, and the
nst the Lord, and against his
4:27 For of a truth against thy holy child Jesus, whom thou hast
od, and Pontius Pilate, with the Gentiles, and the
together, 4:28 For to do whatsoever
and and thy counsel determined before to be done.
r threatenings: and grant unto thy
ts, that with all boldness they may speak thy word, 4:30 By
hand to heal; and that signs and wonders may be
Jesus.
he place was shaken where they were
bled together; and they were all filled with the Holy Ghost, and
d of God with boldness.
ltitude of them that believed were of one heart and of
f them that ought of the things which he
possessed was his own; but they had all things common.
gave the apostles witness of the
tion of the Lord Jesus: and great grace was upon them all.
 any among them that lacked: for as many as were
 them, and brought the prices of the
gs that were sold, 4:35 And laid them down at the apostles' feet:
was made unto every man according as he had need.
tles was surnamed Barnabas, (which is,
ing interpreted, The son of consolation,) a Levite, and of the
:37 Having land, sold it, and brought the money,

ith Sapphira his wife, sold a
 5:2 And kept back part of the price, his wife also being
a certain part, and laid it at the apostles'
why hath Satan filled thine heart to lie
to the Holy Ghost, and to keep back part of the price of the land?
mained, was it not thine own? and after it was sold,
 why hast thou conceived this thing in
ine heart?  thou hast not lied unto men, but unto God.
ese words fell down, and gave up the ghost:
ard these things.
 arose, wound him up, and carried him out, and
the space of three hours after, when his wife,

e whether ye sold the land for
nd she said, Yea, for so much.
 Peter said unto her, How is it that ye have agreed together
 the Lord? behold, the feet of them which have
and shall carry thee out.
l she down straightway at his feet, and yielded up the
e in, and found her dead, and, carrying
er forth, buried her by her husband.
11 And great fear came upon all the church, and upon as many as

were many signs and wonders
 the people; (and they were all with one accord in
the rest durst no man join himself to them: but the people
And believers were the more added to the Lord, multitudes both of
5:15 Insomuch that they brought forth the sick into
eds and couches, that at the least the
adow of Peter passing by might overshadow some of them.
ltitude out of the cities round about unto
 which were vexed with unclean
nd they were healed every one.
n the high priest rose up, and all they that were with him,
he Sadducees,) and were filled with
nation, 5:18 And laid their hands on the apostles, and put them
n.
ght opened the prison doors, and
them forth, and said, 5:20 Go, stand and speak in the temple
words of this life.
heard that, they entered into the temple early in
high priest came, and they that were
 him, and called the council together, and all the senate of the
, and sent to the prison to have them brought.
nd found them not in the prison,
urned and told, 5:23 Saying, The prison truly found we shut
e keepers standing without before the doors:
n within.
 and the captain of the temple and the
ief priests heard these things, they doubted of them whereunto this
5:25 Then came one and told them, saying, Behold, the men whom ye put
 standing in the temple, and teaching the people.
 the officers, and brought them without
iolence: for they feared the people, lest they should have been
 when they had brought them, they set them before the council:
asked them, 5:28 Saying, Did not we straitly
n this name? and, behold, ye
Jerusalem with your doctrine, and intend to bring this
 Then Peter and the other apostles answered and said, We ought to
han men.
ised up Jesus, whom ye slew and hanged
 a tree.
 his right hand to be a Prince and a
our, for to give repentance to Israel, and forgiveness of sins.
is witnesses of these things; and so is also the Holy
 them that obey him.
rd that, they were cut to the heart, and took
ood there up one in the council, a Pharisee, named
ad in reputation among all the people,
d commanded to put the apostles forth a little space; 5:35 And said
en of Israel, take heed to yourselves what ye intend to

as, boasting himself to be
hom a number of men, about four hundred, joined
 as many as obeyed him, were
nd brought to nought.
an rose up Judas of Galilee in the days of the
ter him: he also perished; and
as many as obeyed him, were dispersed.
5:38 And now I say unto you, Refrain from these men, and let them
s counsel or this work be of men, it will come to
 ye cannot overthrow it; lest haply
 found even to fight against God.
And to him they agreed: and when they had called the apostles,
y commanded that they should not speak in the name
41 And they departed from the presence of the council, rejoicing
nted worthy to suffer shame for his name.
ery house, they ceased not to
reach Jesus Christ.
ys, when the number of the disciples was
multiplied, there arose a murmuring of the Grecians against the
eir widows were neglected in the daily
nistration.
the multitude of the disciples unto them,
 leave the word of God, and

mong you seven men of honest
 of the Holy Ghost and wisdom, whom we may appoint over
e will give ourselves continually to prayer, and to the
5 And the saying pleased the whole multitude: and they chose
 faith and of the Holy Ghost, and Philip, and
d Parmenas, and Nicolas a
tioch: 6:6 Whom they set before the apostles: and when
heir hands on them.
 God increased; and the number of the disciples
d a great company of the priests
dient to the faith.
ll of faith and power, did great wonders and
 there arose certain of the synagogue, which is called the
nes, and Cyrenians, and Alexandrians, and of
 with Stephen.
ble to resist the wisdom and the spirit by
ed men, which said, We have heard him speak
ainst God.
 people, and the elders, and the scribes,
ought him to the council,
 false witnesses, which said, This man ceaseth not to
st this holy place, and the law: 6:14 For
 Nazareth shall destroy this
hall change the customs which Moses delivered us.
uncil, looking stedfastly on him, saw
 face as it had been the face of an angel.
se things so?  7:2 And he said,
hren, and fathers, hearken; The God of glory appeared unto
 he was in Mesopotamia, before he dwelt in
 out of thy country, and from
, and come into the land which I shall shew thee.
d of the Chaldaeans, and dwelt in
: and from thence, when his father was dead, he removed him
 ye now dwell.
 inheritance in it, no, not so much as to set
would give it to him for a
d to his seed after him, when as yet he had no child.
ise, That his seed should sojourn in a
range land; and that they should bring them into bondage, and
r hundred years.
whom they shall be in bondage will I judge, said
e forth, and serve me in this place.
8 And he gave him the covenant of circumcision: and so Abraham begat
cumcised him the eighth day; and Isaac begat Jacob; and
iarchs.
ith envy, sold Joseph into Egypt: but
 was with him, 7:10 And delivered him out of all his afflictions,
ur and wisdom in the sight of Pharaoh king of Egypt;
Egypt and all his house.
 came a dearth over all the land of Egypt and Chanaan,
r fathers found no sustenance.
 when Jacob heard that there was corn in Egypt, he sent out
:13 And at the second time Joseph was made known to his brethren; and
red was made known unto Pharaoh.
hen sent Joseph, and called his father Jacob to him, and all his
e and fifteen souls.
 down into Egypt, and died, he, and our fathers,
chem, and laid in the sepulchre that
ham bought for a sum of money of the sons of Emmor the father of
t when the time of the promise drew nigh, which God had sworn
e grew and multiplied in Egypt, 7:18 Till another
.
 kindred, and evil entreated our
 so that they cast out their young children, to the end they
0 In which time Moses was born, and was exceeding fair, and
her's house three months: 7:21 And when he was
m up, and nourished him for her

isdom of the Egyptians, and was
 words and in deeds.
as full forty years old, it came into his heart to
of Israel.
suffer wrong, he defended him, and avenged
yptian: 7:25 For he supposed
 would have understood how that God by his hand would
tood not.
ed himself unto them as they strove, and
would have set them at one again, saying, Sirs, ye are brethren; why
e to another?  7:27 But he that did his neighbour wrong
o made thee a ruler and a judge over us?
7:28 Wilt thou kill me, as thou diddest the Egyptian yesterday?  7:29
es at this saying, and was a stranger in the land of
s.
ed, there appeared to him in the
ss of mount Sina an angel of the Lord in a flame of fire in a
ses saw it, he wondered at the sight: and as he drew near
f the LORD came unto him, 7:32 Saying, I am
ham, and the God of Isaac, and
 Jacob. Then Moses trembled, and durst not behold.
, Put off thy shoes from thy feet: for
e place where thou standest is holy ground.
liction of my people which is in
nd I have heard their groaning, and am come down to deliver
ill send thee into Egypt.
es whom they refused, saying, Who made thee a ruler and a
end to be a ruler and a deliverer by the hand
 the bush.
ter that he had shewed wonders and signs
in the land of Egypt, and in the Red sea, and in the wilderness forty
7 This is that Moses, which said unto the children of Israel, A
ord your God raise up unto you of your brethren,

in the wilderness with the
ake to him in the mount Sina, and with our fathers: who
 to give unto us: 7:39 To whom our fathers
, and in their hearts turned
nto Egypt, 7:40 Saying unto Aaron, Make us gods to go
ses, which brought us out of the land of
Egypt, we wot not what is become of him.

 and offered sacrifice unto
 rejoiced in the works of their own hands.
 to worship the host of heaven;
written in the book of the prophets, O ye house of Israel,
ain beasts and sacrifices by the space of
 ye took up the tabernacle of
 the star of your god Remphan, figures which ye made to
rry you away beyond Babylon.
athers had the tabernacle of witness in the wilderness, as
ng unto Moses, that he should make it
ording to the fashion that he had seen.

er brought in with Jesus into
ion of the Gentiles, whom God drave out before the face of
ys of David; 7:46 Who found favour before God,
 the God of Jacob.
lt him an house.
High dwelleth not in temples made with hands; as
my throne, and earth is my
t house will ye build me? saith the Lord: or what is the
th not my hand made all these things?  7:51
rt and ears, ye do always
 Ghost: as your fathers did, so do ye.
7:52 Which of the prophets have not your fathers persecuted? and they
em which shewed before of the coming of the Just One; of
betrayers and murderers: 7:53 Who have
ceived the law by the disposition of angels, and have not kept it.
 heard these things, they were cut to the heart, and
 teeth.
Holy Ghost, looked up stedfastly into
ven, and saw the glory of God, and Jesus standing on the right hand
d said, Behold, I see the heavens opened, and the Son
hand of God.
ith a loud voice, and stopped their ears,
d cast him out of the city,
m: and the witnesses laid down their clothes at a young
Saul.
ling upon God, and saying, Lord
ceive my spirit.
wn, and cried with a loud voice, Lord, lay not
e had said this, he fell asleep.
d Saul was consenting unto his death. And at that time there was
n against the church which was at Jerusalem; and
oughout the regions of Judaea and
, except the apostles.
en carried Stephen to his burial, and made great
r Saul, he made havock of the church, entering into every
 women committed them to prison.
erefore they that were scattered abroad went every where
 Then Philip went down to the city of Samaria, and preached Christ
6 And the people with one accord gave heed unto those things which
aring and seeing the miracles which he did.
loud voice, came out of many that
ssessed with them: and many taken with palsies, and that were


d Simon, which beforetime in the
y used sorcery, and bewitched the people of Samaria, giving
me great one: 8:10 To whom they all gave heed,
ng, This man is the great power of

 that of long time he had
with sorceries.
eved Philip preaching the things concerning the
us Christ, they were baptized, both
nd women.
ved also: and when he was baptized, he
ntinued with Philip, and wondered, beholding the miracles and signs
.
 at Jerusalem heard that Samaria
ived the word of God, they sent unto them Peter and John: 8:15
come down, prayed for them, that they might
t he was fallen upon none of
hey were baptized in the name of the Lord Jesus.)  8:17
on them, and they received the Holy Ghost.
aying on of the apostles' hands
Ghost was given, he offered them money, 8:19 Saying, Give me
on whomsoever I lay hands, he may receive the
to him, Thy money perish with thee, because thou
may be purchased with money.
hast neither part nor lot in this matter: for thy heart is
f God.
y wickedness, and pray God, if perhaps
e thought of thine heart may be forgiven thee.
in the gall of bitterness, and in
d of iniquity.
, and said, Pray ye to the LORD for me, that
ken come upon me.
hey had testified and preached the word of the
ached the gospel in many villages
Samaritans.
ord spake unto Philip, saying, Arise, and
th down from Jerusalem unto
s desert.
nd, behold, a man of Ethiopia, an eunuch
of great authority under Candace queen of the Ethiopians, who had the
 her treasure, and had come to Jerusalem for to worship,
tting in his chariot read Esaias the
het.
lip, Go near, and join thyself to
ariot.
im, and heard him read the prophet
, and said, Understandest thou what thou readest?  8:31 And he
ept some man should guide me? And he desired
ith him.
e which he read was this, He was led as
 sheep to the slaughter; and like a lamb dumb before his shearer, so
his mouth: 8:33 In his humiliation his judgment was
re his generation? for his life is
from the earth.
wered Philip, and said, I pray thee, of whom
 or of some other man?  8:35
opened his mouth, and began at the same scripture, and
8:36 And as they went on their way, they came unto a certain water:
said, See, here is water; what doth hinder me to be
, If thou believest with all thine
 thou mayest.
 I believe that Jesus Christ is the Son of
t to stand still: and they went down
 into the water, both Philip and the eunuch; and he baptized him.
hey were come up out of the water, the Spirit of the
the eunuch saw him no more: and he went
n his way rejoicing.
s found at Azotus: and passing through he preached
to Caesarea.
g out threatenings and slaughter against the
igh priest, 9:2 And desired of
s to Damascus to the synagogues, that if he found any of
e men or women, he might bring them bound
d, he came near Damascus: and suddenly there
aven: 9:4 And he fell to the
eard a voice saying unto him, Saul, Saul, why persecutest
, Who art thou, Lord? And the Lord said, I am
rd for thee to kick against the

, Lord, what wilt thou have me
 the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the city, and it
t thou must do.
ourneyed with him stood speechless, hearing a
Saul arose from the earth; and when his eyes were opened, he
ed him by the hand, and brought him into
Damascus.
hout sight, and neither did eat nor
.
 at Damascus, named Ananias; and
aid the Lord in a vision, Ananias. And he said, Behold, I am
d the Lord said unto him, Arise, and go into the street which
nd enquire in the house of Judas for one called
ayeth, 9:12 And hath seen in a
an named Ananias coming in, and putting his hand on him,
sight.
, I have heard by many of this man,
uch evil he hath done to thy saints at Jerusalem: 9:14 And here
rom the chief priests to bind all that call on thy
unto him, Go thy way: for he is a chosen vessel
 Gentiles, and kings, and the
 Israel: 9:16 For I will shew him how great things he must
e.
ntered into the house; and putting
nds on him said, Brother Saul, the Lord, even Jesus, that
 way as thou camest, hath sent me, that thou
led with the Holy Ghost.
iately there fell from his eyes as it had been scales:
ith, and arose, and was baptized.
And when he had received meat, he was strengthened. Then was Saul
 the disciples which were at Damascus.
9:20 And straightway he preached Christ in the synagogues, that he is
d.
zed, and said; Is not this he that
yed them which called on this name in Jerusalem, and came hither
hat he might bring them bound unto the chief
more in strength, and confounded
 which dwelt at Damascus, proving that this is very Christ.
any days were fulfilled, the Jews took counsel to
wait was known of Saul. And they
the gates day and night to kill him.
25 Then the disciples took him by night, and let him down by the

m, he assayed to join himself
iples: but they were all afraid of him, and believed not

im to the apostles, and
m how he had seen the Lord in the way, and that he
d preached boldly at Damascus in the
 of Jesus.
ming in and going out at Jerusalem.
9 And he spake boldly in the name of the Lord Jesus, and disputed
ans: but they went about to slay him.
:30 Which when the brethren knew, they brought him down to Caesarea,
orth to Tarsus.
hes rest throughout all Judaea and Galilee and
ng in the fear of the Lord, and in
mfort of the Holy Ghost, were multiplied.
ed throughout all quarters, he
also to the saints which dwelt at Lydda.

med Aeneas, which had kept his
years, and was sick of the palsy.
And Peter said unto him, Aeneas, Jesus Christ maketh thee whole:
y bed. And he arose immediately.
nd all that dwelt at Lydda and Saron saw him, and turned to the
here was at Joppa a certain disciple named Tabitha, which by
ed Dorcas: this woman was full of good works and
nd it came to pass in those days, that she was sick, and died:
ashed, they laid her in an upper chamber.
 Joppa, and the disciples had
Peter was there, they sent unto him two men, desiring him
o come to them.
nd went with them. When he was come, they
ll the widows stood by him
hewing the coats and garments which Dorcas made, while
ut Peter put them all forth, and kneeled down, and prayed; and
ody said, Tabitha, arise. And she opened her eyes:
up.
lifted her up, and when he had
 saints and widows, presented her alive.

pa; and many believed in the
3 And it came to pass, that he tarried many days in Joppa with one

a called Cornelius, a centurion
nd called the Italian band, 10:2 A devout man, and one that
 house, which gave much alms to the people, and
 in a vision evidently about the ninth hour of the day an
 him, and saying unto him, Cornelius.
0:4 And when he looked on him, he was afraid, and said, What is it,
aid unto him, Thy prayers and thine alms are come up
10:5 And now send men to Joppa, and call for one Simon, whose surname
6 He lodgeth with one Simon a tanner, whose house is by
 thee what thou oughtest to do.
d when the angel which spake unto Cornelius was departed, he
ehold servants, and a devout soldier of them
nd when he had declared all
unto them, he sent them to Joppa.
On the morrow, as they went on their journey, and drew nigh unto
nt up upon the housetop to pray about the sixth
ry, and would have eaten: but while
made ready, he fell into a trance, 10:11 And saw heaven opened,
l descending upon him, as it had been a great sheet
et down to the earth: 10:12 Wherein
all manner of fourfooted beasts of the earth, and wild beasts,
 and fowls of the air.
came a voice to him, Rise, Peter; kill, and eat.
rd; for I have never eaten any thing
 is common or unclean.
ice spake unto him again the second time, What God
u common.
nd the vessel was received up again into
heaven.
n himself what this vision which he had
een should mean, behold, the men which were sent from Cornelius had
r Simon's house, and stood before the gate, 10:18 And
on, which was surnamed Peter, were lodged
e vision, the Spirit said unto him,
d, three men seek thee.
refore, and get thee down, and go with them, doubting
.
 which were sent unto him from
 and said, Behold, I am he whom ye seek: what is the cause
10:22 And they said, Cornelius the centurion,
 and of good report among all the
of the Jews, was warned from God by an holy angel to send for
and to hear words of thee.
alled he them in, and lodged them. And on the morrow Peter
 certain brethren from Joppa accompanied him.
ered into Caesarea. And Cornelius
for them, and he had called together his kinsmen and near
Peter was coming in, Cornelius met him, and fell down at
im.
, Stand up; I myself also am a man.
27 And as he talked with him, he went in, and found many that were

 that it is an unlawful thing
hat is a Jew to keep company, or come unto one of another
ed me that I should not call any man common
nto you without gainsaying, as soon as I was
ent ye have sent for me?  10:30
lius said, Four days ago I was fasting until this hour; and
yed in my house, and, behold, a man stood
aid, Cornelius, thy prayer is
thine alms are had in remembrance in the sight of God.
ppa, and call hither Simon, whose surname is
e Simon a tanner by the sea
en he cometh, shall speak unto thee.
:33 Immediately therefore I sent to thee; and thou hast well done
e. Now therefore are we all here present before God,
mmanded thee of God.
pened his mouth, and said, Of a truth I perceive
s: 10:35 But in every nation he that
eth him, and worketh righteousness, is accepted with him.
d sent unto the children of Israel, preaching
 all:) 10:37 That word, I say, ye
hich was published throughout all Judaea, and began from
 which John preached; 10:38 How God anointed
and with power: who went about
, and healing all that were oppressed of the devil; for God
And we are witnesses of all things which he did both in the land
n Jerusalem; whom they slew and hanged on a tree:
 day, and shewed him openly; 10:41
 all the people, but unto witnesses chosen before God, even to
drink with him after he rose from the dead.
nto the people, and to testify
 he which was ordained of God to be the Judge of quick and
ve all the prophets witness, that through his name
 receive remission of sins.
 Peter yet spake these words, the Holy Ghost fell on all

ch believed were astonished, as
ame with Peter, because that on the Gentiles also was poured
ly Ghost.
ak with tongues, and magnify God. Then
swered Peter, 10:47 Can any man forbid water, that these should not
ich have received the Holy Ghost as well as we?  10:48
baptized in the name of the Lord. Then
ayed they him to tarry certain days.
:1 And the apostles and brethren that were in Judaea heard that the
so received the word of God.
hen Peter was come up to Jerusalem, they that were of the
th him, 11:3 Saying, Thou wentest in to men

om the beginning, and expounded
er unto them, saying, 11:5 I was in the city of Joppa
w a vision, A certain vessel descend, as
it had been a great sheet, let down from heaven by four corners; and
o me: 11:6 Upon the which when I had fastened mine eyes,
footed beasts of the earth, and wild beasts,
air.
to me, Arise, Peter; slay and eat.
 But I said, Not so, Lord: for nothing common or unclean hath at
nto my mouth.
ed me again from heaven, What God hath
eansed, that call not thou common.
0 And this was done three times: and all were drawn up again into
And, behold, immediately there were three men already come unto
as, sent from Caesarea unto me.
nd the Spirit bade me go with them, nothing doubting. Moreover
ccompanied me, and we entered into the man's
ad seen an angel in his house,
d and said unto him, Send men to Joppa, and call for Simon,
 11:14 Who shall tell thee words, whereby thou

host fell on them, as on us
ing.
f the Lord, how that he said, John
 baptized with water; but ye shall be baptized with the Holy
uch then as God gave them the like gift as he did unto us,
 Jesus Christ; what was I, that I could
ithstand God?  11:18 When they heard these things, they held their
fied God, saying, Then hath God also to the Gentiles

oad upon the persecution that
 Stephen travelled as far as Phenice, and Cyprus, and
o none but unto the Jews only.
d some of them were men of Cyprus and Cyrene, which, when they
, spake unto the Grecians, preaching the LORD
ord was with them: and a great number
ieved, and turned unto the Lord.
Then tidings of these things came unto the ears of the church
m: and they sent forth Barnabas, that he should
 when he came, and had seen the grace of God, was glad, and
 with purpose of heart they would cleave unto
man, and full of the Holy Ghost and of faith:
rd.
sus, for to seek Saul: 11:26 And
had found him, he brought him unto Antioch. And it came to
they assembled themselves with the church, and
s were called Christians first in
.
 from Jerusalem unto Antioch.
 there stood up one of them named Agabus, and signified by
ould be great dearth throughout all the world:
audius Caesar.
, every man according to his ability,
ermined to send relief unto the brethren which dwelt in Judaea:
ey did, and sent it to the elders by the hands of
out that time Herod the king stretched forth his hands to
.
of John with the sword.
e he saw it pleased the Jews, he proceeded further to
he days of unleavened bread.)  12:4 And
hen he had apprehended him, he put him in prison, and delivered him
ions of soldiers to keep him; intending after Easter to
le.
ison: but prayer was made without
 of the church unto God for him.
nd when Herod would have brought him forth, the same night Peter
en two soldiers, bound with two chains: and the
ison.
e Lord came upon him, and a light
in the prison: and he smote Peter on the side, and raised him
quickly. And his chains fell off from his hands.
, Gird thyself, and bind on thy

ast thy garment about thee, and
.
m; and wist not that it was true
s done by the angel; but thought he saw a vision.
irst and the second ward, they came
the iron gate that leadeth unto the city; which opened to them of
nd they went out, and passed on through one street;
d from him.
me to himself, he said, Now I know of a
urety, that the LORD hath sent his angel, and hath delivered me out
Herod, and from all the expectation of the people of
 had considered the thing, he came to the house of
urname was Mark; where many were
 together praying.
nocked at the door of the gate, a damsel came to
 when she knew Peter's voice, she opened not the gate for
 told how Peter stood before the gate.
12:15 And they said unto her, Thou art mad. But she constantly
 even so. Then said they, It is his angel.
d when they had opened the door,
him, they were astonished.
, beckoning unto them with the hand to hold their peace,
 Lord had brought him out of the prison. And
es, and to the brethren. And he
 and went into another place.
 as soon as it was day, there was no small stir among the
 of Peter.
ght for him, and found him not, he
ed the keepers, and commanded that they should be put to death.
om Judaea to Caesarea, and there abode.

h them of Tyre and Sidon: but
ith one accord to him, and, having made Blastus the king's
, desired peace; because their country was
1 And upon a set day Herod, arrayed in royal apparel, sat upon his
 an oration unto them.
ople gave a shout, saying, It is the voice of a god,
 immediately the angel of the Lord smote him, because he gave
d he was eaten of worms, and gave up the ghost.
d multiplied.
ul returned from Jerusalem, when they had
hem John, whose surname was
 Now there were in the church that was at Antioch certain prophets
 Barnabas, and Simeon that was called Niger, and
h had been brought up with Herod the
arch, and Saul.
 to the Lord, and fasted, the Holy Ghost said,
e work whereunto I have called
3:3 And when they had fasted and prayed, and laid their hands on
em away.
 by the Holy Ghost, departed unto
a; and from thence they sailed to Cyprus.
y preached the word of God in
ues of the Jews: and they had also John to their minister.
 gone through the isle unto Paphos, they found a
 a Jew, whose name was Barjesus:
ch was with the deputy of the country, Sergius Paulus, a
r Barnabas and Saul, and desired to hear the
rcerer (for so is his name by interpretation)
the deputy from the faith.
ul, (who also is called Paul,) filled with the Holy Ghost,
13:10 And said, O full of all subtilty and all mischief, thou child of
hou enemy of all righteousness, wilt thou not cease to
e Lord?  13:11 And now, behold, the hand
of the Lord is upon thee, and thou shalt be blind, not seeing the sun
 And immediately there fell on him a mist and a darkness;
 some to lead him by the hand.
en the deputy, when he saw what was done, believed, being
e of the Lord.
his company loosed from Paphos, they came to
 from them returned to
4 But when they departed from Perga, they came to Antioch in
 the synagogue on the sabbath day, and sat down.
he law and the prophets the rulers of
 synagogue sent unto them, saying, Ye men and brethren, if ye have
rtation for the people, say on.
hen Paul stood up, and beckoning with his hand said, Men of
r God, give audience.
this people of Israel chose our fathers, and exalted
strangers in the land of Egypt, and with
an high arm brought he them out of it.
13:18 And about the time of forty years suffered he their manners in
.
 nations in the land of Chanaan,
ed their land to them by lot.
 after that he gave unto them judges about the space of four
s, until Samuel the prophet.
afterward they desired a king: and God gave unto them Saul
 the tribe of Benjamin, by the space of forty
ed him, he raised up unto them David to be
estimony, and said, I have
e son of Jesse, a man after mine own heart, which shall
3 Of this man's seed hath God according to his promise raised unto
, Jesus: 13:24 When John had first preached before his
ance to all the people of Israel.
 And as John fulfilled his course, he said, Whom think ye that I
But, behold, there cometh one after me, whose shoes
loose.
 of the stock of Abraham, and
mong you feareth God, to you is the word of this salvation
that dwell at Jerusalem, and their rulers, because they
oices of the prophets which are read every
 condemning him.
found no cause of death in him, yet desired they

t was written of him, they
from the tree, and laid him in a sepulchre.
d: 13:31 And he was seen many
m which came up with him from Galilee to Jerusalem, who are
people.
lad tidings, how that the promise which
as made unto the fathers, 13:33 God hath fulfilled the same unto us
 in that he hath raised up Jesus again; as it is also
Thou art my Son, this day have I begotten
raised him up from the dead, now no
to return to corruption, he said on this wise, I will give you
David.
 another psalm, Thou shalt not suffer
ne Holy One to see corruption.
r David, after he had served his own generation by the will of
and was laid unto his fathers, and saw corruption:
ain, saw no corruption.
wn unto you therefore, men and brethren, that through
 the forgiveness of sins: 13:39 And by
m all that believe are justified from all things, from which ye
ied by the law of Moses.
herefore, lest that come upon you, which is spoken of in
, ye despisers, and wonder, and perish: for
h ye shall in no wise believe,
an declare it unto you.
the Jews were gone out of the synagogue, the Gentiles
ht be preached to them the next sabbath.

en up, many of the Jews and
selytes followed Paul and Barnabas: who, speaking to
ue in the grace of God.
ext sabbath day came almost the whole city together to
45 But when the Jews saw the multitudes, they were filled with
nst those things which were spoken by Paul,
 Then Paul and Barnabas waxed bold, and said, It was necessary
 should first have been spoken to you: but seeing
rselves unworthy of everlasting life,
 we turn to the Gentiles.
hath the Lord commanded us, saying, I have set thee to be
that thou shouldest be for salvation unto the
the Gentiles heard this, they were glad, and glorified
 many as were ordained to eternal life
lieved.
was published throughout all the

t and honourable women, and the
 of the city, and raised persecution against Paul and
ut of their coasts.
k off the dust of their feet against them, and came
disciples were filled with joy, and with the Holy Ghost.
 in Iconium, that they went both together into
ake, that a great multitude both
ews and also of the Greeks believed.
:2 But the unbelieving Jews stirred up the Gentiles, and made their
cted against the brethren.
me therefore abode they speaking boldly in the Lord, which
word of his grace, and granted signs and
wonders to be done by their hands.
 But the multitude of the city was divided: and part held with the
ith the apostles.
as an assault made both of the Gentiles, and also
 use them despitefully, and to stone
, 14:6 They were ware of it, and fled unto Lystra and Derbe,
d unto the region that lieth round about: 14:7

tra, impotent in his feet,
e from his mother's womb, who never had walked: 14:9 The
 stedfastly beholding him, and perceiving
d with a loud voice, Stand
 feet. And he leaped and walked.
And when the people saw what Paul had done, they lifted up their
the speech of Lycaonia, The gods are come down to us
12 And they called Barnabas, Jupiter; and Paul, Mercurius, because
 speaker.
ter, which was before their city, brought
ld have done sacrifice with

and Paul, heard of, they rent
es, and ran in among the people, crying out, 14:15 And
e things? We also are men of like passions
ould turn from these vanities
ving God, which made heaven, and earth, and the sea, and
n: 14:16 Who in times past suffered all
ations to walk in their own ways.
 Nevertheless he left not himself without witness, in that he did
 rain from heaven, and fruitful seasons, filling our

strained they the people, that
ot done sacrifice unto them.
there came thither certain Jews from Antioch and Iconium,
 and having stoned Paul, drew him out of the
4:20 Howbeit, as the disciples stood round about him, he rose up, and
 city: and the next day he departed with Barnabas to
had preached the gospel to that city, and had
ystra, and to Iconium, and
 Confirming the souls of the disciples, and exhorting
, and that we must through much
on enter into the kingdom of God.
 And when they had ordained them elders in every church, and had
g, they commended them to the Lord, on whom they
had passed throughout Pisidia, they came to
reached the word in Perga, they went down
Antioch, from whence they had
ended to the grace of God for the work which they
 were come, and had gathered the church together,
one with them, and how he had opened
door of faith unto the Gentiles.
And there they abode long time with the disciples.
e down from Judaea taught the brethren,
nd said, Except ye be circumcised after the manner of Moses, ye

 no small dissension and
 them, they determined that Paul and Barnabas, and
 up to Jerusalem unto the apostles and
ders about this question.
g brought on their way by the church, they passed through
aring the conversion of the Gentiles: and
en.
usalem, they were received of the
 and of the apostles and elders, and they declared all things
h them.
of the sect of the Pharisees which
ed, saying, That it was needful to circumcise them, and to
 law of Moses.
d elders came together for to consider of this
een much disputing, Peter rose up, and said
w that a good while ago God
mong us, that the Gentiles by my mouth should hear the
eve.
arts, bare them witness, giving them
Holy Ghost, even as he did unto us; 15:9 And put no difference
 purifying their hearts by faith.
 Now therefore why tempt ye God, to put a yoke upon the neck of
h neither our fathers nor we were able to bear?
he grace of the LORD Jesus Christ
l be saved, even as they.
l the multitude kept silence, and gave audience to
t miracles and wonders God had wrought
ong the Gentiles by them.
er they had held their peace, James answered, saying, Men
o me: 15:14 Simeon hath declared how God at
ke out of them a people for his
15:15 And to this agree the words of the prophets; as it is written,
is I will return, and will build again the tabernacle of
n; and I will build again the ruins thereof,
esidue of men might seek after
and all the Gentiles, upon whom my name is called, saith the
ese things.
l his works from the beginning of the
ld.
t we trouble not them, which from
he Gentiles are turned to God: 15:20 But that we write unto
 from pollutions of idols, and from
cation, and from things strangled, and from blood.
th in every city them that preach him,
ing read in the synagogues every sabbath day.
and elders with the whole church,
 chosen men of their own company to Antioch with Paul and
urnamed Barsabas and Silas, chief men among
ers by them after this manner;
es and elders and brethren send greeting unto the brethren
s in Antioch and Syria and Cilicia.
24 Forasmuch as we have heard, that certain which went out from us
u with words, subverting your souls, saying, Ye must
aw: to whom we gave no such commandment:
15:25 It seemed good unto us, being assembled with one accord, to send
nto you with our beloved Barnabas and Paul, 15:26 Men that
s for the name of our Lord Jesus Christ.

ilas, who shall also tell you
ings by mouth.
 to the Holy Ghost, and to us, to lay upon you
ry things; 15:29 That ye abstain
ts offered to idols, and from blood, and from things
n: from which if ye keep yourselves, ye
hall do well. Fare ye well.
en they were dismissed, they came to Antioch: and when they
ude together, they delivered the epistle: 15:31
iced for the consolation.
as and Silas, being prophets also themselves, exhorted
, and confirmed them.
hey had tarried there a space, they were let go in
 apostles.
ased Silas to abide there still.
Paul also and Barnabas continued in Antioch, teaching and
 Lord, with many others also.
 some days after Paul said unto Barnabas, Let us go again and
 every city where we have preached the word of
:37 And Barnabas determined to take with them John, whose surname
8 But Paul thought not good to take him with them, who departed
hylia, and went not with them to the work.
between them, that they departed
one from the other: and so Barnabas took Mark, and sailed unto
ul chose Silas, and departed, being recommended by
od.
 Cilicia, confirming the churches.
 Then came he to Derbe and Lystra: and, behold, a certain disciple
 Timotheus, the son of a certain woman, which was a
ather was a Greek: 16:2 Which was well
ported of by the brethren that were at Lystra and Iconium.
ve to go forth with him; and took and
cumcised him because of the Jews which were in those quarters: for
at his father was a Greek.
they went through the cities, they delivered them the
e ordained of the apostles and elders
ch were at Jerusalem.
the churches established in the faith, and increased
hen they had gone throughout Phrygia and the region of
of the Holy Ghost to preach the word in
sia, 16:7 After they were come to Mysia, they assayed to go into
Spirit suffered them not.
 passing by Mysia came down to Troas.
6:9 And a vision appeared to Paul in the night; There stood a man of
 prayed him, saying, Come over into Macedonia, and help
ad seen the vision, immediately we endeavoured to
ering that the Lord had called us for
preach the gospel unto them.
efore loosing from Troas, we came with a straight course to
xt day to Neapolis; 16:12 And from thence to
hat part of Macedonia, and a
we were in that city abiding certain days.
f the city by a river side,
was wont to be made; and we sat down, and spake unto the
er.
ia, a seller of purple, of the city
yatira, which worshipped God, heard us: whose heart the Lord
ded unto the things which were spoken of Paul.
nd her household, she besought us,
, If ye have judged me to be faithful to the Lord, come into my
ere. And she constrained us.
it came to pass, as we went to prayer, a certain damsel
divination met us, which brought her
ers much gain by soothsaying: 16:17 The same followed Paul and us,
g, These men are the servants of the most high God,
alvation.
ays. But Paul, being grieved, turned and
said to the spirit, I command thee in the name of Jesus Christ to come

 And when her masters saw that the hope of their gains was gone,
nd Silas, and drew them into the marketplace unto
m to the magistrates, saying, These
being Jews, do exceedingly trouble our city, 16:21 And teach
 lawful for us to receive, neither to observe,
tude rose up together against them: and the
 commanded to beat them.
 they had laid many stripes upon them, they cast them
lor to keep them safely: 16:24 Who,
g received such a charge, thrust them into the inner prison, and
st in the stocks.
 Paul and Silas prayed, and sang praises unto

hquake, so that the
ison were shaken: and immediately all the doors
were loosed.
e prison awaking out of his sleep, and
eing the prison doors open, he drew out his sword, and would have
upposing that the prisoners had been fled.
, saying, Do thyself no harm:
all here.
ght, and sprang in, and came trembling,
nd fell down before Paul and Silas, 16:30 And brought them out, and
t must I do to be saved?  16:31 And they said, Believe
d thou shalt be saved, and thy house.
6:32 And they spake unto him the word of the Lord, and to all that
e.
 of the night, and washed their
and was baptized, he and all his, straightway.
 into his house, he set meat before
 and rejoiced, believing in God with all his house.
e magistrates sent the serjeants, saying,
 of the prison told this saying to Paul, The
ow therefore depart, and go in
16:37 But Paul said unto them, They have beaten us openly uncondemned,
, and have cast us into prison; and now do they thrust us
but let them come themselves and fetch us
e words unto the magistrates: and
ared, when they heard that they were Romans.
m, and brought them out, and
 to depart out of the city.
hey went out of the prison, and entered into the house of
seen the brethren, they comforted them, and
sed through Amphipolis and Apollonia, they
gue of the Jews: 17:2 And
nner was, went in unto them, and three sabbath days
criptures, 17:3 Opening and alleging,
t Christ must needs have suffered, and risen again from the dead;
us, whom I preach unto you, is Christ.
17:4 And some of them believed, and consorted with Paul and Silas; and
t Greeks a great multitude, and of the chief women not a
which believed not, moved with envy, took unto them
er sort, and gathered a company, and
all the city on an uproar, and assaulted the house of Jason, and
em out to the people.
y found them not, they drew Jason and certain
 crying, These that have turned
 upside down are come hither also; 17:7 Whom Jason hath
contrary to the decrees of Caesar, saying

 rulers of the city, when
e things.
security of Jason, and of the other, they
mediately sent away Paul and Silas by night
o the synagogue of the Jews.
e were more noble than those in Thessalonica, in that they
ll readiness of mind, and searched the
riptures daily, whether those things were so.
ed; also of honourable women which
reeks, and of men, not a few.
 when the Jews of Thessalonica had knowledge that the word of
aul at Berea, they came thither also, and stirred
immediately the brethren sent away Paul to go as it
Timotheus abode there still.
they that conducted Paul brought him unto Athens: and
Silas and Timotheus for to come to him
th all speed, they departed.
while Paul waited for them at Athens, his spirit was stirred
e city wholly given to idolatry.
Therefore disputed he in the synagogue with the Jews, and with
and in the market daily with them that met with
hers of the Epicureans, and of the Stoicks,
ll this babbler say? other
th to be a setter forth of strange gods: because he
he resurrection.
m, and brought him unto Areopagus, saying, May
eof thou speakest, is?  17:20 For
ingest certain strange things to our ears: we would know
s mean.
d strangers which were there spent
time in nothing else, but either to tell, or to hear some new
aul stood in the midst of Mars' hill, and said,
n all things ye are too

 devotions, I found an altar
scription, TO THE UNKNOWN GOD. Whom therefore ye
unto you.
 and all things therein, seeing that he
s Lord of heaven and earth, dwelleth not in temples made with hands;
is worshipped with men's hands, as though he needed any
all life, and breath, and all things; 17:26
of men for to dwell on all the
e earth, and hath determined the times before appointed, and
bitation; 17:27 That they should seek the Lord,
 and find him, though he be not far
every one of us: 17:28 For in him we live, and move, and have our
 also of your own poets have said, For we are also
h then as we are the offspring of God, we ought not to
ke unto gold, or silver, or stone, graven
 times of this ignorance God winked at; but now
epent: 17:31 Because he hath
day, in the which he will judge the world in righteousness
 ordained; whereof he hath given assurance
 from the dead.
rd of the resurrection of the dead, some
mocked: and others said, We will hear thee again of this matter.
parted from among them.
ertain men clave unto him, and believed: among the
te, and a woman named Damaris, and
 with them.
l departed from Athens, and came to
th; 18:2 And found a certain Jew named Aquila, born in Pontus,
ly, with his wife Priscilla; (because that
t from Rome:) and came unto
 And because he was of the same craft, he abode with them, and
r occupation they were tentmakers.
 And he reasoned in the synagogue every sabbath, and persuaded the
eks.
were come from Macedonia, Paul was
d in the spirit, and testified to the Jews that Jesus was
they opposed themselves, and blasphemed, he shook his
Your blood be upon your own heads; I am
lean; from henceforth I will go unto the Gentiles.
nd entered into a certain man's house,
med Justus, one that worshipped God, whose house joined hard to the
8:8 And Crispus, the chief ruler of the synagogue, believed on the
s house; and many of the Corinthians hearing believed,
hen spake the Lord to Paul in the night by a vision, Be not
hold not thy peace: 18:10 For I am with thee,
thee: for I have much people in
.
nd six months, teaching the word
mong them.
e deputy of Achaia, the Jews made
ction with one accord against Paul, and brought him to the
ing, This fellow persuadeth men to worship God
en Paul was now about to open his mouth, Gallio said unto
tter of wrong or wicked lewdness, O ye Jews,
ou: 18:15 But if it be a
s and names, and of your law, look ye to it; for I
.
ment seat.
ok Sosthenes, the chief ruler of the
gogue, and beat him before the judgment seat. And Gallio cared for
ings.
 there yet a good while, and then
s leave of the brethren, and sailed thence into Syria, and with
quila; having shorn his head in Cenchrea: for he
 Ephesus, and left them there: but he himself
ned with the Jews.
red him to tarry longer time with them, he
ell, saying, I must by all
s feast that cometh in Jerusalem: but I will return
d he sailed from Ephesus.
n he had landed at Caesarea, and gone up, and saluted the
ntioch.
me time there, he departed, and went
 all the country of Galatia and Phrygia in order, strengthening

born at Alexandria, an eloquent
mighty in the scriptures, came to Ephesus.
ay of the Lord; and being
spirit, he spake and taught diligently the things of
tism of John.
ak boldly in the synagogue: whom when Aquila
 unto them, and expounded unto
y of God more perfectly.
 he was disposed to pass into Achaia, the brethren
o receive him: who, when he was come,
ped them much which had believed through grace: 18:28 For he
 Jews, and that publickly, shewing by the
 And it came to pass, that, while Apollos was at Corinth, Paul
h the upper coasts came to Ephesus: and finding
o them, Have ye received the Holy
ince ye believed?  And they said unto him, We have not so much
re be any Holy Ghost.
unto them, Unto what then were ye baptized? And they
19:4 Then said Paul, John verily baptized with the baptism of
to the people, that they should believe on him
, on Christ Jesus.
 this, they were baptized in the name of the Lord
laid his hands upon them, the Holy Ghost came
 and prophesied.
ere about twelve.
 the synagogue, and spake boldly for the space of
ading the things concerning the
f God.
ed, and believed not, but spake evil
hat way before the multitude, he departed from them, and separated
isputing daily in the school of one Tyrannus.
ce of two years; so that all they
welt in Asia heard the word of the Lord Jesus, both Jews and
od wrought special miracles by the hands of Paul: 19:12 So
brought unto the sick handkerchiefs or aprons,
 and the evil spirits went out of

 exorcists, took upon them to
hem which had evil spirits the name of the LORD Jesus,
us whom Paul preacheth.
 were seven sons of one Sceva, a Jew, and chief of the
:15 And the evil spirit answered and said, Jesus I know, and Paul I
re ye?  19:16 And the man in whom the evil spirit was
them, and prevailed against them, so that
nded.
he Jews and Greeks also dwelling at
us; and fear fell on them all, and the name of the Lord Jesus was
18 And many that believed came, and confessed, and shewed their
y of them also which used curious arts brought their books
m before all men: and they counted the price
ieces of silver.
 the word of God and prevailed.
fter these things were ended, Paul purposed in the spirit, when
gh Macedonia and Achaia, to go to Jerusalem,
t also see Rome.
Macedonia two of them that ministered unto him,
lf stayed in Asia for a season.
nd the same time there arose no small stir about that way.
n named Demetrius, a silversmith, which made
mall gain unto the craftsmen;
he called together with the workmen of like occupation, and
t by this craft we have our wealth.
26 Moreover ye see and hear, that not alone at Ephesus, but almost
sia, this Paul hath persuaded and turned away much
ods, which are made with hands: 19:27
that not only this our craft is in danger to be set at nought; but
mple of the great goddess Diana should be despised,
destroyed, whom all Asia and the world
rshippeth.
ese sayings, they were full of wrath, and
Ephesians.
 filled with confusion: and having caught
Paul's companions in travel,
with one accord into the theatre.
 And when Paul would have entered in unto the people, the
t.
ia, which were his friends, sent
, desiring him that he would not adventure himself into the
therefore cried one thing, and some another: for the
 more part knew not wherefore they were
ome together.
nder out of the multitude, the Jews putting
h the hand, and would have made
ce unto the people.
 knew that he was a Jew, all with one voice about
 Great is Diana of the Ephesians.
 And when the townclerk had appeased the people, he said, Ye men
an is there that knoweth not how that the city of
the great goddess Diana, and of the
 which fell down from Jupiter?  19:36 Seeing then that these
n against, ye ought to be quiet, and to do
ught hither these men, which are neither robbers
f your goddess.
trius, and the craftsmen which are with him,
 is open, and there are
m implead one another.
enquire any thing concerning other matters, it shall
mbly.
called in question for this day's
 there being no cause whereby we may give an account of this
d when he had thus spoken, he dismissed the assembly.
as ceased, Paul called unto him the
ples, and embraced them, and departed for to go into Macedonia.
had gone over those parts, and had given them much
, 20:3 And there abode three months.
when the Jews laid wait for him, as he was about to sail into
 return through Macedonia.
re accompanied him into Asia Sopater of Berea; and of the
s and Secundus; and Gaius of Derbe, and
imotheus; and of Asia, Tychicus and Trophimus.
r us at Troas.
from Philippi after the days of unleavened
ve days; where we abode seven
:7 And upon the first day of the week, when the disciples came
ead, Paul preached unto them, ready to depart on
ch until midnight.
many lights in the upper chamber, where they were
ere sat in a window a certain young man named Eutychus,
eep: and as Paul was long preaching, he
unk down with sleep, and fell down from the third loft, and was taken
0:10 And Paul went down, and fell on him, and embracing him said,
elves; for his life is in him.
en he therefore was come up again, and had broken bread, and
ng while, even till break of day, so he
eparted.
ng man alive, and were not a little
rted.
 and sailed unto Assos, there
o take in Paul: for so had he appointed, minding himself to
when he met with us at Assos, we took him in, and came to
 sailed thence, and came the next day over against Chios;
ed at Samos, and tarried at Trogyllium; and
16 For Paul had determined to sail by Ephesus, because he would not
in Asia: for he hasted, if it were possible for him, to
Pentecost.
nt to Ephesus, and called the elders of
he church.
e to him, he said unto them, Ye know, from
er what manner I have been
l seasons, 20:19 Serving the LORD with all humility of
nd temptations, which befell me by the
ing in wait of the Jews: 20:20 And how I kept back nothing that was
 you, but have shewed you, and have taught you
20:21 Testifying both to the Jews,
so to the Greeks, repentance toward God, and faith toward our

spirit unto Jerusalem, not
ings that shall befall me there: 20:23 Save that the
 city, saying that bonds and afflictions
abide me.
s move me, neither count I my life dear
nto myself, so that I might finish my course with joy, and the
ve received of the Lord Jesus, to testify the
And now, behold, I know that ye all, among whom I have gone
f God, shall see my face no more.
 Wherefore I take you to record this day, that I am pure from the

e unto you all the counsel of
28 Take heed therefore unto yourselves, and to all the flock, over
ly Ghost hath made you overseers, to feed the church
d with his own blood.
this, that after my departing shall grievous wolves
 the flock.
es shall men arise, speaking perverse
ngs, to draw away disciples after them.

 by the space of three years
 to warn every one night and day with tears.
ou to God, and to the word of his
which is able to build you up, and to give you an inheritance
are sanctified.
 man's silver, or gold, or apparel.
34 Yea, ye yourselves know, that these hands have ministered unto
nd to them that were with me.
ave shewed you all things, how that so labouring ye ought to
to remember the words of the Lord Jesus, how he
an to receive.
us spoken, he kneeled down, and prayed with
re, and fell on Paul's neck, and kissed him,
rds which he spake, that they
his face no more. And they accompanied him unto the ship.
s, that after we were gotten from them, and had
ourse unto Coos, and the day
to Rhodes, and from thence unto Patara: 21:2 And finding a
henicia, we went aboard, and set forth.

e left it on the left hand,
to Syria, and landed at Tyre: for there the ship was to
And finding disciples, we tarried there seven days: who said to
irit, that he should not go up to Jerusalem.
ose days, we departed and went our
nd they all brought us on our way, with wives and children, till
 city: and we kneeled down on the shore, and prayed.
ur leave one of another, we took ship; and
en we had finished our course from Tyre, we came to
hren, and abode with them one day.
 And the next day we that were of Paul's company departed, and
and we entered into the house of Philip the
 and abode with him.
man had four daughters, virgins, which did prophesy.
e many days, there came down from Judaea a
And when he was come unto us, he took Paul's girdle, and bound
et, and said, Thus saith the Holy Ghost, So shall
n that owneth this girdle, and shall
ver him into the hands of the Gentiles.

h we, and they of that place,
m not to go up to Jerusalem.
 Paul answered, What mean ye to weep and to break mine
o be bound only, but also to die at
alem for the name of the Lord Jesus.
:14 And when he would not be persuaded, we ceased, saying, The will
done.
k up our carriages, and went up to
lem.
ain of the disciples of Caesarea,
ught with them one Mnason of Cyprus, an old disciple, with whom

 the brethren received us
8 And the day following Paul went in with us unto James; and all
esent.
em, he declared particularly what
God had wrought among the Gentiles by his ministry.
 they glorified the Lord, and said unto
im, Thou seest, brother, how many thousands of Jews there are which
ey are all zealous of the law: 21:21 And they are
est all the Jews which are among the
iles to forsake Moses, saying that they ought not to circumcise
ther to walk after the customs.
hat is it therefore? the multitude must needs come together:
t thou art come.
s that we say to thee: We have four men which
and purify thyself with them, and
harges with them, that they may shave their heads: and all may
gs, whereof they were informed concerning thee,
also walkest orderly, and keepest
.
believe, we have written and
at they observe no such thing, save only that they keep
red to idols, and from blood, and from
rangled, and from fornication.
en Paul took the men, and the next day purifying himself with
 temple, to signify the accomplishment of the
ffering should be offered for
f them.
ere almost ended, the Jews which were
Asia, when they saw him in the temple, stirred up all the people,
 him, 21:28 Crying out, Men of Israel, help: This is
 every where against the people, and the
law, and this place: and further brought Greeks also into the temple,
uted this holy place.
ad seen before with him in the city Trophimus an
Paul had brought into the temple.)
And all the city was moved, and the people ran together: and
ew him out of the temple: and forthwith the
ent about to kill him, tidings came unto the chief
rusalem was in an uproar.
ediately took soldiers and centurions, and ran down unto
e chief captain and the soldiers, they left
f captain came near, and took him, and commanded
nd demanded who he was, and what he
one.
me another, among the multitude: and
 he could not know the certainty for the tumult, he commanded him
o the castle.
on the stairs, so it was, that he was borne
 people.
 people followed after, crying, Away
 him.
nto the castle, he said unto the
ptain, May I speak unto thee? Who said, Canst thou speak
 that Egyptian, which before these days
adest an uproar, and leddest out into the wilderness four thousand
rderers?  21:39 But Paul said, I am a man which am a
ia, a citizen of no mean city: and, I
eech thee, suffer me to speak unto the people.
cence, Paul stood on the stairs, and
oned with the hand unto the people. And when there was made a
ke unto them in the Hebrew tongue, saying, 22:1
 my defence which I make now unto

n the Hebrew tongue to them,
e more silence: and he saith,) 22:3 I am verily a man
s, a city in Cilicia, yet brought up in
his city at the feet of Gamaliel, and taught according to the perfect
 law of the fathers, and was zealous toward God, as ye
d I persecuted this way unto the death, binding and delivering
n and women.
st doth bear me witness, and all the estate
d letters unto the brethren,
Damascus, to bring them which were there bound unto

de my journey, and was come
ascus about noon, suddenly there shone from heaven a

d a voice saying unto me,
 persecutest thou me?  22:8 And I answered, Who art
, I am Jesus of Nazareth, whom thou
cutest.
 saw indeed the light, and were afraid;
ut they heard not the voice of him that spake to me.
 I do, LORD? And the Lord said unto me,
rise, and go into Damascus; and there it shall be told thee of all
 appointed for thee to do.
en I could not see for the glory of that light, being led
were with me, I came into Damascus.
12 And one Ananias, a devout man according to the law, having a
the Jews which dwelt there, 22:13 Came unto me, and
r Saul, receive thy sight. And the same
our I looked up upon him.
said, The God of our fathers hath chosen thee, that thou
nd see that Just One, and shouldest hear the
shalt be his witness unto all men of what thou hast
w why tarriest thou? arise, and be baptized, and wash away
 name of the Lord.
 pass, that, when I was come again to Jerusalem,
 I was in a trance; 22:18 And saw
ing unto me, Make haste, and get thee quickly out of Jerusalem:
eceive thy testimony concerning me.
19 And I said, Lord, they know that I imprisoned and beat in every
hat believed on thee: 22:20 And when the blood of thy
so was standing by, and consenting unto
is death, and kept the raiment of them that slew him.
Depart: for I will send thee far hence unto
m audience unto this word, and then lifted up
h a fellow from the earth: for it
fit that he should live.
hey cried out, and cast off their clothes, and threw
hief captain commanded him to be brought
into the castle, and bade that he should be examined by scourging;
ow wherefore they cried so against him.

Paul said unto the centurion
y, Is it lawful for you to scourge a man that is a Roman,
hen the centurion heard that, he went and
 what thou doest: for this
.
d said unto him, Tell me, art
n? He said, Yea.
ptain answered, With a great sum obtained I this
free born.
departed from him which should have
ned him: and the chief captain also was afraid, after he knew
and because he had bound him.
the morrow, because he would have known the certainty
he Jews, he loosed him from his bands,
d commanded the chief priests and all their council to appear, and
n, and set him before them.
ul, earnestly beholding the council, said, Men and
od conscience before God until this

ded them that stood by him to
n the mouth.
im, God shall smite thee, thou whited wall:
law, and commandest me to be
rary to the law?  23:4 And they that stood by said,
?  23:5 Then said Paul, I wist not,
ren, that he was the high priest: for it is written, Thou shalt
he ruler of thy people.
aul perceived that the one part were Sadducees, and the
ut in the council, Men and brethren, I am a
 hope and resurrection of the
alled in question.
 so said, there arose a dissension between the
 multitude was divided.
dducees say that there is no resurrection, neither
sees confess both.
 a great cry: and the scribes that were of the
aying, We find no evil in this
f a spirit or an angel hath spoken to him, let us not fight
nd when there arose a great dissension, the chief captain,
 have been pulled in pieces of them, commanded
 him by force from among them, and
ng him into the castle.
ight following the Lord stood by him, and said, Be of
 hast testified of me in Jerusalem, so
st thou bear witness also at Rome.
2 And when it was day, certain of the Jews banded together, and
der a curse, saying that they would neither eat nor
.
hich had made this conspiracy.
d they came to the chief priests and elders, and said, We have
r a great curse, that we will eat nothing until we
erefore ye with the council signify to the chief captain
o you to morrow, as though ye would enquire
: and we, or ever he come near,
 to kill him.
ter's son heard of their lying in wait, he
ld Paul.
the centurions unto him, and said, Bring
this young man unto the chief captain: for he hath a certain thing to
23:18 So he took him, and brought him to the chief captain, and said,
oner called me unto him, and prayed me to bring this
something to say unto thee.
the chief captain took him by the hand, and went with him
d him, What is that thou hast to tell me?
o desire thee that thou
wn Paul to morrow into the council, as though they
re perfectly.
ld unto them: for there lie in wait for him
 bound themselves with an oath,
 will neither eat nor drink till they have killed him: and
ing for a promise from thee.
he chief captain then let the young man depart, and charged
an that thou hast shewed these things to me.
turions, saying, Make ready two
oldiers to go to Caesarea, and horsemen threescore and ten,
d, at the third hour of the night; 23:24 And
 Paul on, and bring him safe
he governor.
r after this manner: 23:26 Claudius Lysias
endeth greeting.
en of the Jews, and should have been killed of
rescued him, having understood
s a Roman.
known the cause wherefore they accused
m, I brought him forth into their council: 23:29 Whom I perceived to
questions of their law, but to have nothing laid to his
f bonds.
how that the Jews laid wait for the man,
I sent straightway to thee, and gave commandment to his accusers also
 thee what they had against him. Farewell.
manded them, took Paul, and
y night to Antipatris.
row they left the horsemen to go with him, and
hen they came to Caesarea and
he epistle to the governor, presented Paul also before him.
vernor had read the letter, he asked of what
d that he was of Cilicia; 23:35
ar thee, said he, when thine accusers are also come. And he
t in Herod's judgment hall.
ter five days Ananias the high priest descended with the
 orator named Tertullus, who informed the
e was called forth, Tertullus began to accuse him,
njoy great quietness, and that very
y deeds are done unto this nation by thy providence, 24:3 We
in all places, most noble Felix, with all
at I be not further tedious unto thee, I pray
y clemency a few words.
e found this man a pestilent fellow, and a mover of
oughout the world, and a ringleader of
e sect of the Nazarenes: 24:6 Who also hath gone about to profane
we took, and would have judged according to our law.
ysias came upon us, and with great
ce took him away out of our hands, 24:8 Commanding his accusers
by examining of whom thyself mayest take knowledge
accuse him.
nted, saying that these things were so.

had beckoned unto him to
 Forasmuch as I know that thou hast been of many years
do the more cheerfully answer for myself:
, that there are yet but
e I went up to Jerusalem for to worship.

emple disputing with any man,
sing up the people, neither in the synagogues, nor in the
hey prove the things whereof they now accuse
hee, that after the way which they call
eresy, so worship I the God of my fathers, believing all things which
n the law and in the prophets: 24:15 And have hope toward
s also allow, that there shall be a
rection of the dead, both of the just and unjust.
myself, to have always a conscience
to offence toward God, and toward men.
24:17 Now after many years I came to bring alms to my nation, and
18 Whereupon certain Jews from Asia found me purified in the
ultitude, nor with tumult.
ght to have been here before thee, and object, if they had
20 Or else let these same here say, if they have found any evil
I stood before the council, 24:21 Except it be for
nding among them, Touching the
on of the dead I am called in question by you this day.
d these things, having more perfect knowledge
id, When Lysias the chief captain
ome down, I will know the uttermost of your matter.
urion to keep Paul, and to let him have
iberty, and that he should forbid none of his acquaintance to
 him.
n Felix came with his wife Drusilla,
h was a Jewess, he sent for Paul, and heard him concerning the
24:25 And as he reasoned of righteousness, temperance, and judgment to
trembled, and answered, Go thy way for this time; when I
I will call for thee.
so that money should have been given him of Paul,
e he sent for him the oftener, and
ed with him.
Porcius Festus came into Felix' room: and
e, left Paul bound.
s was come into the province, after three days he
em.
hief of the Jews informed him
l, and besought him, 25:3 And desired favour against him,
m to Jerusalem, laying wait in the way to
at Paul should be kept at Caesarea, and
hat he himself would depart shortly thither.
ich among you are able, go down
and accuse this man, if there be any wickedness in him.
ied among them more than ten days, he went
ting on the judgment seat
to be brought.
e, the Jews which came down from Jerusalem
evous complaints against Paul,
 could not prove.
d for himself, Neither against the law of the
 yet against Caesar, have I
thing at all.
to do the Jews a pleasure, answered Paul, and
nd there be judged of these
 me?  25:10 Then said Paul, I stand at Caesar's judgment
judged: to the Jews have I done no wrong, as
f I be an offender, or have committed any thing worthy of
e: but if there be none of these things
hereof these accuse me, no man may deliver me unto them. I appeal
5:12 Then Festus, when he had conferred with the council, answered,
led unto Caesar? unto Caesar shalt thou go.
ippa and Bernice came unto
lute Festus.
en there many days, Festus declared Paul's
certain man left in bonds by
 About whom, when I was at Jerusalem, the chief priests
informed me, desiring to have judgment
ainst him.
 is not the manner of the Romans to
er any man to die, before that he which is accused have the
and have licence to answer for himself
ncerning the crime laid against him.
:17 Therefore, when they were come hither, without any delay on the
 the judgment seat, and commanded the man to be brought
m when the accusers stood up, they brought none
osed: 25:19 But had certain
inst him of their own superstition, and of one Jesus,
irmed to be alive.
doubted of such manner of questions, I asked him
and there be judged of these
25:21 But when Paul had appealed to be reserved unto the hearing of
manded him to be kept till I might send him to Caesar.
to Festus, I would also hear the man myself.
m.
a was come, and Bernice, with
 and was entered into the place of hearing, with the chief
men of the city, at Festus' commandment Paul
 said, King Agrippa, and all men which are here
bout whom all the multitude of the
ave dealt with me, both at Jerusalem, and also here, crying that
ve any longer.
hat he had committed nothing worthy of death,
Augustus, I have determined to

o write unto my lord. Wherefore
ought him forth before you, and specially before thee, O king
examination had, I might have somewhat to write.
sonable to send a prisoner, and not
l to signify the crimes laid against him.
art permitted to speak for
en Paul stretched forth the hand, and answered for himself: 26:2 I
py, king Agrippa, because I shall answer for myself
ll the things whereof I am accused of
 Jews: 26:3 Especially because I know thee to be expert in all
s which are among the Jews: wherefore I beseech
My manner of life from my youth, which was at the first among
rusalem, know all the Jews; 26:5 Which knew me
stify, that after the most
 of our religion I lived a Pharisee.
:6 And now I stand and am judged for the hope of the promise made of
fathers: 26:7 Unto which promise our twelve tribes,
ight, hope to come. For which hope's
, king Agrippa, I am accused of the Jews.
ncredible with you, that God
 the dead?  26:9 I verily thought with myself, that I
ary to the name of Jesus of Nazareth.
6:10 Which thing I also did in Jerusalem: and many of the saints did
rison, having received authority from the chief priests;
death, I gave my voice against them.
:11 And I punished them oft in every synagogue, and compelled them
d being exceedingly mad against them, I persecuted

th authority and commission
f priests, 26:13 At midday, O king, I saw in the way a
 brightness of the sun, shining round
ut me and them which journeyed with me.

earth, I heard a voice
and saying in the Hebrew tongue, Saul, Saul, why
r thee to kick against the pricks.
5 And I said, Who art thou, Lord? And he said, I am Jesus whom

for I have appeared unto thee
rpose, to make thee a minister and a witness both of these
een, and of those things in the which I will
e from the people, and from the
 unto whom now I send thee, 26:18 To open their eyes, and to
s to light, and from the power of Satan unto
 of sins, and inheritance among
h are sanctified by faith that is in me.

ot disobedient unto the
26:20 But shewed first unto them of Damascus, and at
the coasts of Judaea, and then to the
tiles, that they should repent and turn to God, and do works meet

e in the temple, and went
e.
 of God, I continue unto this day,
sing both to small and great, saying none other things than
s and Moses did say should come: 26:23 That
d be the first that should rise
dead, and should shew light unto the people, and to the
e thus spake for himself, Festus said with a loud voice,
elf; much learning doth make thee mad.
26:25 But he said, I am not mad, most noble Festus; but speak forth
uth and soberness.
noweth of these things, before whom also I speak
ne of these things are hidden from
or this thing was not done in a corner.

ophets? I know that thou
:28 Then Agrippa said unto Paul, Almost thou persuadest me to be a
:29 And Paul said, I would to God, that not only thou, but also all
is day, were both almost, and altogether such as I am,
 And when he had thus spoken, the king rose up, and the governor,
they that sat with them: 26:31 And when they were
hemselves, saying, This man doeth
 worthy of death or of bonds.
n said Agrippa unto Festus, This man might have been set at
appealed unto Caesar.
was determined that we should sail into Italy, they
r prisoners unto one named Julius, a
urion of Augustus' band.
ing into a ship of Adramyttium, we launched, meaning to
 one Aristarchus, a Macedonian of
onica, being with us.
 day we touched at Sidon. And Julius courteously
ty to go unto his friends to refresh
elf.
 thence, we sailed under Cyprus,
the winds were contrary.
we had sailed over the sea of Cilicia and Pamphylia, we
ia.
a ship of Alexandria sailing into
and he put us therein.
 had sailed slowly many days, and scarce were come
t suffering us, we sailed under Crete,
er against Salmone; 27:8 And, hardly passing it, came unto a place
The fair havens; nigh whereunto was the city of Lasea.
s spent, and when sailing was now dangerous,
 Paul admonished them, 27:10 And
o them, Sirs, I perceive that this voyage will be with hurt
ly of the lading and ship, but also of our
on believed the master and the owner of
he ship, more than those things which were spoken by Paul.
haven was not commodious to winter in, the more
 if by any means they might attain
nice, and there to winter; which is an haven of Crete, and lieth
est and north west.
south wind blew softly, supposing that they had
nce, they sailed close by Crete.
But not long after there arose against it a tempestuous wind,

ould not bear up into the
r drive.
ain island which is called Clauda, we
 much work to come by the boat: 27:17 Which when they had taken up,
, undergirding the ship; and, fearing lest they should
rake sail, and so were driven.
d we being exceedingly tossed with a tempest, the next day
 27:19 And the third day we cast out with our

many days appeared, and no
lay on us, all hope that we should be saved was then
 long abstinence Paul stood forth in the midst of them,
ave hearkened unto me, and not have loosed
 and loss.
o be of good cheer: for there shall be no
the ship.
his night the angel of God, whose I am,
nd whom I serve, 27:24 Saying, Fear not, Paul; thou must be brought
and, lo, God hath given thee all them that sail with
, be of good cheer: for I believe God, that it
27:26 Howbeit we must be cast upon a certain island.
h night was come, as we were driven up and
n deemed that they drew near
try; 27:28 And sounded, and found it twenty fathoms: and
e further, they sounded again, and found it
lest we should have fallen upon rocks, they cast
 wished for the day.
hipmen were about to flee out of the ship, when they
 sea, under colour as though they would
ave cast anchors out of the foreship, 27:31 Paul said to the
oldiers, Except these abide in the ship, ye
iers cut off the ropes of the boat, and let her
y was coming on, Paul besought them all to take
eenth day that ye have tarried and
ued fasting, having taken nothing.
4 Wherefore I pray you to take some meat: for this is for your
all not an hair fall from the head of any of you.
en, he took bread, and gave thanks to
 in presence of them all: and when he had broken it, he began to
 were they all of good cheer, and they also took some meat.
all in the ship two hundred threescore and
d eaten enough, they lightened the ship, and
:39 And when it was day, they knew not the land: but they discovered
k with a shore, into the which they were minded, if it
the ship.
 up the anchors, they committed
s unto the sea, and loosed the rudder bands, and hoised up
, and made toward shore.
ing into a place where two seas met, they ran the ship
uck fast, and remained unmoveable, but the
 of the waves.
counsel was to kill the prisoners, lest any of

Paul, kept them from their
ommanded that they which could swim should cast
get to land: 27:44 And the rest,
boards, and some on broken pieces of the ship.
escaped all safe to land.
 they were escaped, then they knew that the island was
he barbarous people shewed us no little kindness: for they
ived us every one, because of the present
d when Paul had gathered a bundle of sticks, and laid them on
a viper out of the heat, and fastened on his
saw the venomous beast hang on his hand,
they said among themselves, No doubt this man is a murderer, whom,
scaped the sea, yet vengeance suffereth not to live.
ast into the fire, and felt no harm.
:6 Howbeit they looked when he should have swollen, or fallen down
ut after they had looked a great while, and saw no
heir minds, and said that he was a

ns of the chief man of the
name was Publius; who received us, and lodged us three
d it came to pass, that the father of Publius lay sick of a
lux: to whom Paul entered in, and prayed, and
.
so, which had diseases in the
e, and were healed: 28:10 Who also honoured us with many
ted, they laded us with such things as were
ths we departed in a ship of Alexandria,
which had wintered in the isle, whose sign was Castor and Pollux.
ng at Syracuse, we tarried there three days.
ompass, and came to Rhegium: and
e day the south wind blew, and we came the next day to
d brethren, and were desired to tarry with
ome.
ethren heard of us, they came to
as far as Appii forum, and The three taverns: whom when Paul
nd took courage.
 to Rome, the centurion delivered the prisoners
ul was suffered to dwell by himself
a soldier that kept him.
ame to pass, that after three days Paul called the chief
when they were come together, he said unto
mmitted nothing against the
stoms of our fathers, yet was I delivered prisoner from
 the Romans.
xamined me, would have let me go, because
19 But when the Jews spake against it, I was constrained to appeal
 that I had ought to accuse my nation of.
alled for you, to see you, and
ith you: because that for the hope of Israel I am bound with
nd they said unto him, We neither received letters out of
either any of the brethren that came shewed
 we desire to hear of thee what thou thinkest: for as
 that every where it is spoken against.

ay, there came many to him
ng; to whom he expounded and testified the kingdom of
ng Jesus, both out of the law of Moses,
nd out of the prophets, from morning till evening.
ings which were spoken, and some
 not.
ong themselves, they departed, after
 Paul had spoken one word, Well spake the Holy Ghost by Esaias the
 fathers, 28:26 Saying, Go unto this people, and say,
all not understand; and seeing ye shall
ee, and not perceive: 28:27 For the heart of this people is waxed
ears are dull of hearing, and their eyes have they
h their eyes, and hear with their
nd understand with their heart, and should be converted, and I

t the salvation of God is
entiles, and that they will hear it.
:29 And when he had said these words, the Jews departed, and had
ong themselves.
o whole years in his own hired house, and
 Preaching the kingdom of
ng those things which concern the Lord Jesus Christ,
rbidding him.
 the Apostle to the Romans
a servant of Jesus Christ, called to be an apostle,
d, 1:2 (Which he had promised afore by
s prophets in the holy scriptures,) 1:3 Concerning his Son Jesus
hich was made of the seed of David according to the
he Son of God with power, according to
e spirit of holiness, by the resurrection from the dead: 1:5 By whom
ed grace and apostleship, for obedience to the faith
e: 1:6 Among whom are ye also the called
of Jesus Christ: 1:7 To all that be in Rome, beloved of God, called to
race to you and peace from God our Father, and the Lord
 I thank my God through Jesus Christ for you all, that your
ughout the whole world.
my witness, whom I serve with my spirit in the gospel
ing I make mention of you always in my
ayers; 1:10 Making request, if by any means now at length I might
 journey by the will of God to come unto you.
may impart unto you some spiritual
to the end ye may be established; 1:12 That is, that I may be
th you by the mutual faith both of you and me.
rant, brethren, that oftentimes I
d to come unto you, (but was let hitherto,) that I might have
also, even as among other Gentiles.
4 I am debtor both to the Greeks, and to the Barbarians; both to
he unwise.
, I am ready to preach the gospel to you
that are at Rome also.
t ashamed of the gospel of Christ: for it is the power
ry one that believeth; to the Jew first,
and also to the Greek.
 is the righteousness of God revealed from faith to
st shall live by faith.
ath of God is revealed from heaven against all
en, who hold the truth in
; 1:19 Because that which may be known of God is
wed it unto them.
e things of him from the creation of the world
y the things that are made, even
nal power and Godhead; so that they are without excuse: 1:21
y knew God, they glorified him not as God,
n their imaginations, and
eart was darkened.
selves to be wise, they became fools, 1:23 And
le God into an image made like to
ible man, and to birds, and fourfooted beasts, and creeping
re God also gave them up to uncleanness through the lusts
ishonour their own bodies between themselves:
o a lie, and worshipped and
eature more than the Creator, who is blessed for ever.
 God gave them up unto vile affections: for even
 use into that which is against
:27 And likewise also the men, leaving the natural use of the
r lust one toward another; men with men working
ng in themselves that recompence of
 error which was meet.
 they did not like to retain God in their knowledge,
ate mind, to do those things which are
t convenient; 1:29 Being filled with all unrighteousness,
covetousness, maliciousness; full of envy,
erers, 1:30 Backbiters, haters
spiteful, proud, boasters, inventors of evil things,
ithout understanding, covenantbreakers,
ithout natural affection, implacable, unmerciful: 1:32 Who knowing
God, that they which commit such things are worthy of
but have pleasure in them that do them.

, whosoever thou art that
erein thou judgest another, thou condemnest thyself;
e same things.
 the judgment of God is according to truth

judgest them which do such
est the same, that thou shalt escape the judgment of
e riches of his goodness and forbearance
and longsuffering; not knowing that the goodness of God leadeth thee
  2:5 But after thy hardness and impenitent heart
against the day of wrath and
f the righteous judgment of God; 2:6 Who will render to
deeds: 2:7 To them who by patient
ance in well doing seek for glory and honour and immortality,
 unto them that are contentious, and do not obey
s, indignation and wrath, 2:9
 and anguish, upon every soul of man that doeth evil, of
 the Gentile; 2:10 But glory, honour, and
 the Jew first, and also to
2:11 For there is no respect of persons with God.
 without law shall also perish without
w: and as many as have sinned in the law shall be judged by the law;
the hearers of the law are just before God, but the
fied.
 have not the law, do by nature the
s contained in the law, these, having not the law, are a law unto
Which shew the work of the law written in their
ng witness, and their thoughts the
hile accusing or else excusing one another;) 2:16 In the day
he secrets of men by Jesus Christ according to
called a Jew, and restest in the law, and makest
 his will, and approvest the things
are more excellent, being instructed out of the law; 2:19 And art
ou thyself art a guide of the blind, a light of them
 instructor of the foolish, a teacher of
babes, which hast the form of knowledge and of the truth in the law.
erefore which teachest another, teachest thou not thyself?
n should not steal, dost thou steal?  2:22
 adultery, dost thou commit
u that abhorrest idols, dost thou commit sacrilege?  2:23
t of the law, through breaking the law
shonourest thou God?  2:24 For the name of God is blasphemed among
ough you, as it is written.
rcumcision verily profiteth, if thou keep the law: but if
law, thy circumcision is made uncircumcision.
n keep the righteousness of the
l not his uncircumcision be counted for circumcision?  2:27
ision which is by nature, if it fulfil the law,
ircumcision dost transgress the
8 For he is not a Jew, which is one outwardly; neither is
is outward in the flesh: 2:29 But he is a
ion is that of the heart, in
and not in the letter; whose praise is not of men, but of
e then hath the Jew? or what profit is there of
chiefly, because that unto them
itted the oracles of God.
if some did not believe? shall their unbelief make the
  3:4 God forbid: yea, let God be true,
ut every man a liar; as it is written, That thou mightest be
gs, and mightest overcome when thou art judged.
mmend the righteousness of God, what
l we say? Is God unrighteous who taketh vengeance? (I speak as a
d: for then how shall God judge the world?  3:7 For
bounded through my lie unto his glory;
y yet am I also judged as a sinner?  3:8 And not rather, (as we be
orted, and as some affirm that we say,) Let us do
amnation is just.
 better than they? No, in no wise: for we have
, that they are all under sin;
 is written, There is none righteous, no, not one: 3:11
ndeth, there is none that seeketh after
od.
ay, they are together become
; there is none that doeth good, no, not one.
hre; with their tongues they have
ceit; the poison of asps is under their lips: 3:14 Whose mouth
nd bitterness: 3:15 Their feet are swift to shed
 are in their ways: 3:17 And the way
eace have they not known: 3:18 There is no fear of God before
ow we know that what things soever the law saith, it saith to
e law: that every mouth may be stopped, and all
God.
 law there shall no flesh be
 his sight: for by the law is the knowledge of sin.
s of God without the law is manifested,
eing witnessed by the law and the prophets; 3:22 Even the
h is by faith of Jesus Christ unto all and
 no difference: 3:23 For all
 and come short of the glory of God; 3:24 Being justified
gh the redemption that is in Christ Jesus:
pitiation through faith in his
declare his righteousness for the remission of sins that are
earance of God; 3:26 To declare, I say, at this
ht be just, and the justifier of
h believeth in Jesus.
sting then? It is excluded. By what law? of works?

justified by faith without
he law.
only? is he not also of the Gentiles?
, of the Gentiles also: 3:30 Seeing it is one God, which shall
sion by faith, and uncircumcision through faith.
w through faith? God forbid: yea, we
blish the law.
en that Abraham our father, as pertaining to
aham were justified by works, he
reof to glory; but not before God.
For what saith the scripture? Abraham believed God, and it was
 righteousness.
keth is the reward not reckoned of grace, but
th not, but believeth on him that justifieth
righteousness.
escribeth the blessedness of the man, unto
works, 4:7 Saying, Blessed are
 iniquities are forgiven, and whose sins are covered.
hom the Lord will not impute sin.
ometh this blessedness then upon the circumcision only, or upon
also? for we say that faith was reckoned to Abraham
was it then reckoned? when he was in circumcision, or in
cumcision, but in uncircumcision.
And he received the sign of circumcision, a seal of the
which he had yet being uncircumcised: that
believe, though they be not
that righteousness might be imputed unto them also: 4:12
sion to them who are not of the circumcision
f that faith of our father
 he had being yet uncircumcised.
or the promise, that he should be the heir of the world, was not
his seed, through the law, but through the
hey which are of the law be heirs, faith is made void,
 effect: 4:15 Because the law worketh
th: for where no law is, there is no transgression.
, that it might be by grace; to the end
he promise might be sure to all the seed; not to that only which is
 to that also which is of the faith of Abraham; who is
As it is written, I have made thee a
er of many nations,) before him whom he believed, even God, who
, and calleth those things which be not as though
pe believed in hope, that he might become the
that which was spoken, So shall
be.
e considered not his own body now
hen he was about an hundred years old, neither yet the deadness
20 He staggered not at the promise of God through
, giving glory to God; 4:21 And being
ly persuaded that, what he had promised, he was able also to
herefore it was imputed to him for righteousness.
 his sake alone, that it was imputed to
im; 4:24 But for us also, to whom it shall be imputed, if we believe
ised up Jesus our Lord from the dead; 4:25 Who was
was raised again for our

we have peace with God through
esus Christ: 5:2 By whom also we have access by faith into
and, and rejoice in hope of the glory of God.
n tribulations also: knowing that
tion worketh patience; 5:4 And patience, experience; and
hope maketh not ashamed; because the love of
e Holy Ghost which is given unto
:6 For when we were yet without strength, in due time Christ died for

ll one die: yet peradventure
an some would even dare to die.
 God commendeth his love toward us, in that, while we were yet
 for us.
justified by his blood, we shall be
 from wrath through him.
hen we were enemies, we were reconciled to God by the
being reconciled, we shall be saved by
s life.
so joy in God through our Lord Jesus
st, by whom we have now received the atonement.
 entered into the world, and death by
; and so death passed upon all men, for that all have sinned: 5:13
aw sin was in the world: but sin is not imputed when
theless death reigned from Adam to Moses, even over them
the similitude of Adam's transgression, who

 the free gift. For if through
e of one many be dead, much more the grace of God, and the
by one man, Jesus Christ, hath abounded unto
 that sinned, so is the gift: for the
gment was by one to condemnation, but the free gift is of many
ication.
ce death reigned by one; much more they
hich receive abundance of grace and of the gift of righteousness
e by one, Jesus Christ.)  5:18 Therefore as by the
n all men to condemnation; even so by
 righteousness of one the free gift came upon all men unto

ny were made sinners, so by
 of one shall many be made righteous.
:20 Moreover the law entered, that the offence might abound. But
, grace did much more abound: 5:21 That as sin hath
ht grace reign through righteousness
 eternal life by Jesus Christ our Lord.

inue in sin, that grace may
God forbid. How shall we, that are dead to sin, live any
ye not, that so many of us as were baptized
s death?  6:4 Therefore we are
h him by baptism into death: that like as Christ was raised
 glory of the Father, even so we also should
 we have been planted together in the likeness of his death,
e likeness of his resurrection: 6:6 Knowing
h him, that the body of sin
royed, that henceforth we should not serve sin.
from sin.
rist, we believe that we shall also live
with him: 6:9 Knowing that Christ being raised from the dead dieth no
ath no more dominion over him.
 in that he died, he died unto sin once: but in that he

s to be dead indeed unto sin,
nto God through Jesus Christ our Lord.
6:12 Let not sin therefore reign in your mortal body, that ye should
 lusts thereof.
our members as instruments of unrighteousness
od, as those that are alive from
, and your members as instruments of righteousness unto God.
ot have dominion over you: for ye are not under
hat then? shall we sin, because we are not under the law, but
id.
ield yourselves servants to obey,
vants ye are to whom ye obey; whether of sin unto death, or of
eousness?  6:17 But God be thanked, that ye were
beyed from the heart that form of
e which was delivered you.
hen made free from sin, ye became the servants of
ter the manner of men because of the infirmity of your
d your members servants to uncleanness and
ield your members servants to
ss unto holiness.
 the servants of sin, ye were free from
ighteousness.
en in those things whereof ye are now
amed?  for the end of those things is death.
n, and become servants to God, ye
ur fruit unto holiness, and the end everlasting life.
s death; but the gift of God is eternal
ife through Jesus Christ our Lord.
Know ye not, brethren, (for I speak to them that know the law,)
th dominion over a man as long as he liveth?  7:2
nd is bound by the law to her husband
long as he liveth; but if the husband be dead, she is loosed from
sband.
d liveth, she be married to another
she shall be called an adulteress: but if her husband be dead,
t law; so that she is no adulteress, though she be
herefore, my brethren, ye also are become dead to the law by the
at ye should be married to another, even to him who
e should bring forth fruit unto God.
5 For when we were in the flesh, the motions of sins, which were by
rk in our members to bring forth fruit unto death.
rom the law, that being dead wherein we
ere held; that we should serve in newness of spirit, and not in the
letter.
the law sin? God forbid. Nay, I had not
nown sin, but by the law: for I had not known lust, except the law
halt not covet.
asion by the commandment, wrought in me all
e law sin was dead.
 without the law once: but when the commandment
:10 And the commandment, which was ordained to life, I found to be
:11 For sin, taking occasion by the commandment, deceived me, and by

ommandment holy, and just,
:13 Was then that which is good made death unto me? God forbid. But
ght appear sin, working death in me by that which is
ent might become exceeding sinful.
 For we know that the law is spiritual: but I am carnal, sold
r that which I do I allow not: for what I would, that do I not;
at do I.
 would not, I consent unto the law that
t is good.
I that do it, but sin that dwelleth in me.
n my flesh,) dwelleth no good
to will is present with me; but how to perform that which
19 For the good that I would I do not: but the evil which I would

 no more I that do it, but sin
eth in me.
, when I would do good, evil is present
ith me.
f God after the inward man: 7:23 But I
e another law in my members, warring against the law of my mind, and
to captivity to the law of sin which is in my members.
 am! who shall deliver me from the body of
sus Christ our Lord. So then
d I myself serve the law of God; but with the flesh the
 therefore now no condemnation to them which are in Christ
r the flesh, but after the Spirit.
For the law of the Spirit of life in Christ Jesus hath made me
 sin and death.
uld not do, in that it was weak through the
ikeness of sinful flesh, and
demned sin in the flesh: 8:4 That the righteousness of the
n us, who walk not after the flesh, but after
after the flesh do mind the things of the flesh;
 the things of the Spirit.
e carnally minded is death; but to be spiritually minded
Because the carnal mind is enmity against God: for it is not
God, neither indeed can be.
 they that are in the flesh cannot please God.
ut in the Spirit, if so be that the
t of God dwell in you. Now if any man have not the Spirit of
his.
body is dead because of sin; but the
it is life because of righteousness.
11 But if the Spirit of him that raised up Jesus from the dead dwell
t raised up Christ from the dead shall also quicken your
t that dwelleth in you.
 brethren, we are debtors, not to the flesh, to live
f ye live after the flesh, ye shall die: but if ye through
e deeds of the body, ye shall live.
4 For as many as are led by the Spirit of God, they are the sons of
r ye have not received the spirit of bondage again to fear; but
e Spirit of adoption, whereby we cry, Abba, Father.
h witness with our spirit, that we are
e children of God: 8:17 And if children, then heirs; heirs of God,
with Christ; if so be that we suffer with him, that we
er.
gs of this present time are not
 be compared with the glory which shall be revealed in us.
xpectation of the creature waiteth for the
0 For the creature was made subject to vanity, not willingly, but
who hath subjected the same in hope, 8:21 Because the
 delivered from the bondage of corruption
 of God.
e creation groaneth and travaileth in
n together until now.
 they, but ourselves also, which have the firstfruits
ves groan within ourselves, waiting for
he adoption, to wit, the redemption of our body.
ut hope that is seen is not hope: for
t a man seeth, why doth he yet hope for?  8:25 But if we hope for
then do we with patience wait for it.
:26 Likewise the Spirit also helpeth our infirmities: for we know not
d pray for as we ought: but the Spirit itself maketh
ings which cannot be uttered.
he that searcheth the hearts knoweth what is the mind of the
eth intercession for the saints according to the
hat all things work together for good to them that
lled according to his purpose.
 whom he did foreknow, he also did predestinate to be
 Son, that he might be the firstborn
g many brethren.
did predestinate, them he also called: and whom
and whom he justified, them he also
fied.
ese things? If God be for us, who can
against us?  8:32 He that spared not his own Son, but delivered him
how shall he not with him also freely give us all
hing to the charge of God's elect? It
God that justifieth.
t condemneth? It is Christ that died, yea rather,
at the right hand of God, who also
 intercession for us.
parate us from the love of Christ? shall tribulation,
or famine, or nakedness, or peril, or
rd?  8:36 As it is written, For thy sake we are killed all the day
ounted as sheep for the slaughter.
 Nay, in all these things we are more than conquerors through him

th, nor life, nor angels, nor
ies, nor powers, nor things present, nor things to come,
, nor any other creature, shall be able to
is in Christ Jesus our Lord.
the truth in Christ, I lie not, my conscience also bearing
host, 9:2 That I have great heaviness and
I could wish that myself were accursed from Christ for my
rding to the flesh: 9:4 Who are Israelites;
e glory, and the covenants, and
g of the law, and the service of God, and the promises; 9:5
and of whom as concerning the flesh Christ
ver. Amen.
f God hath taken none effect. For they are
 Neither, because they are the
raham, are they all children: but, In Isaac shall thy seed
s, They which are the children of the flesh, these are not
 the children of the promise are counted for
of promise, At this time will I come, and
nly this; but when Rebecca also had conceived by one,
1 (For the children being not yet born,
either having done any good or evil, that the purpose of God
might stand, not of works, but of him that
 elder shall serve the
s it is written, Jacob have I loved, but Esau have I hated.
y then? Is there unrighteousness with God? God
s, I will have mercy on whom I will have
mercy, and I will have compassion on whom I will have compassion.
 is not of him that willeth, nor of him that runneth,
.
raoh, Even for this same purpose
aised thee up, that I might shew my power in thee, and that my
ed throughout all the earth.
fore hath he mercy on whom he will have mercy, and whom he
19 Thou wilt say then unto me, Why doth he yet find fault? For who
s will?  9:20 Nay but, O man, who art thou that
ng formed say to him that formed
hast thou made me thus?  9:21 Hath not the potter power over
lump to make one vessel unto honour, and another
 willing to shew his wrath, and to
is power known, endured with much longsuffering the vessels of
ruction: 9:23 And that he might make known the
f mercy, which he had afore
 glory, 9:24 Even us, whom he hath called, not of the
ntiles?  9:25 As he saith also in Osee, I
my people; and her beloved,
 beloved.
s, that in the place where it was said
to them, Ye are not my people; there shall they be called the
g God.
ng Israel, Though the number of the
ren of Israel be as the sand of the sea, a remnant shall be
 finish the work, and cut it short in
hteousness: because a short work will the Lord make upon the earth.
saias said before, Except the Lord of Sabaoth had left us
doma, and been made like unto Gomorrha.

tiles, which followed not
ness, have attained to righteousness, even the
9:31 But Israel, which followed after the law of righteousness, hath
o the law of righteousness.
ore? Because they sought it not by faith, but as it were by
or they stumbled at that stumblingstone; 9:33
on a stumblingstone and rock of
and whosoever believeth on him shall not be ashamed.
sire and prayer to God for Israel is, that
them record that they have a zeal of God, but not
or they being ignorant of God's righteousness, and going about
wn righteousness, have not submitted themselves
0:4 For Christ is the end of the law for righteousness to every one

sness which is of the law, That
hich doeth those things shall live by them.
f faith speaketh on this wise,
 thine heart, Who shall ascend into heaven? (that is, to
ve:) 10:7 Or, Who shall descend into the
deep? (that is, to bring up Christ again from the dead.)  10:8 But
he word is nigh thee, even in thy mouth, and in thy
th, which we preach; 10:9 That if thou
alt confess with thy mouth the Lord Jesus, and shalt believe in
d hath raised him from the dead, thou shalt be
an believeth unto righteousness; and with
on.
oever believeth on him shall not be
ed.
tween the Jew and the Greek: for
 Lord over all is rich unto all that call upon him.
l upon the name of the Lord shall be
d.
m in whom they have not believed?
 shall they believe in him of whom they have not heard? and how
hout a preacher?  10:15 And how shall they preach,
itten, How beautiful are the feet of
 that preach the gospel of peace, and bring glad tidings of good
 they have not all obeyed the gospel. For Esaias
 report?  10:17 So then faith cometh
earing, and hearing by the word of God.

 verily, their sound went
rth, and their words unto the ends of the world.
know? First Moses saith, I will
ou to jealousy by them that are no people, and by a foolish
.
ith, I was found of them that
ot; I was made manifest unto them that asked not after me.
 saith, All day long I have stretched forth my
ing people.
ast away his people? God forbid. For I also
, of the tribe of Benjamin.
th not cast away his people which he foreknew. Wot ye not
of Elias? how he maketh intercession to God
have killed thy prophets, and
 thine altars; and I am left alone, and they seek my life.
e answer of God unto him? I have reserved to
t bowed the knee to the image of

so there is a remnant
ection of grace.
then is it no more of works: otherwise grace is
s, then it is no more grace:
rk is no more work.
ael hath not obtained that which he seeketh for;
 and the rest were blinded.
ding as it is written, God hath given them the spirit of
ould not see, and ears that they should not
 saith, Let their table be made a snare, and a trap, and
compence unto them: 11:10 Let their eyes be
w down their back alway.
en, Have they stumbled that they should fall? God
fall salvation is come unto the
 for to provoke them to jealousy.
 Now if the fall of them be the riches of the world, and the
e riches of the Gentiles; how much more their
ntiles, inasmuch as I am the
he Gentiles, I magnify mine office: 11:14 If by any means
n them which are my flesh, and might save
 away of them be the reconciling of the world,
 but life from the dead?  11:16
e firstfruit be holy, the lump is also holy: and if the root
anches.
es be broken off, and thou, being a
olive tree, wert graffed in among them, and with them partakest
ness of the olive tree; 11:18 Boast not against the
ou bearest not the root, but the root
e.
es were broken off, that I might
ed in.
they were broken off, and thou
y faith. Be not highminded, but fear: 11:21 For if God
hes, take heed lest he also spare not
e.
and severity of God: on them which
severity; but toward thee, goodness, if thou continue in his
ou also shalt be cut off.
y also, if they abide not still in unbelief, shall be
o graff them in again.
u wert cut out of the olive tree which is wild by
 to nature into a good olive tree:
ch more shall these, which be the natural branches, be graffed
 tree?  11:25 For I would not, brethren, that ye
, lest ye should be wise in your own
eits; that blindness in part is happened to Israel, until the
es be come in.
shall be saved: as it is written, There shall
hall turn away ungodliness from
:27 For this is my covenant unto them, when I shall take away
As concerning the gospel, they are enemies for your sakes: but
tion, they are beloved for the father's sakes.
 God are without repentance.
as ye in times past have not believed God, yet have now
r unbelief: 11:31 Even so have these also
 they also may obtain mercy.
God hath concluded them all in unbelief, that he might have
3 O the depth of the riches both of the wisdom and knowledge of
ble are his judgments, and his ways past finding
 mind of the Lord? or who hath been
ounsellor?  11:35 Or who hath first given to him, and it shall be
him again?  11:36 For of him, and through him, and to
be glory for ever. Amen.
 you therefore, brethren, by the mercies of God, that ye
ng sacrifice, holy, acceptable unto God,
which is your reasonable service.
And be not conformed to this world: but be ye transformed by the
ind, that ye may prove what is that good, and

n unto me, to every man that is
, not to think of himself more highly than he ought to think;
 according as God hath dealt to every man the
ave many members in one body, and all members have not
 being many, are one body in Christ, and
every one members one of another.
Having then gifts differing according to the grace that is given
phecy, let us prophesy according to the proportion
us wait on our ministering: or he that
acheth, on teaching; 12:8 Or he that exhorteth, on exhortation: he
 him do it with simplicity; he that ruleth, with
with cheerfulness.
hout dissimulation. Abhor that which is evil;
0 Be kindly affectioned one to another with brotherly love; in
e another; 12:11 Not slothful in business; fervent
12 Rejoicing in hope; patient in
ion; continuing instant in prayer; 12:13 Distributing to the
iven to hospitality.
hich persecute you: bless, and curse not.
, and weep with them that weep.
e of the same mind one toward another. Mind not high things,
of low estate. Be not wise in your own conceits.
for evil. Provide things honest in the
ght of all men.
, as much as lieth in you, live peaceably with
enge not yourselves, but rather give place
 is mine; I will repay, saith

eed him; if he thirst, give
r in so doing thou shalt heap coals of fire on his head.
 evil, but overcome evil with good.
1 Let every soul be subject unto the higher powers. For there is no
d: the powers that be are ordained of God.
 power, resisteth the ordinance
nd they that resist shall receive to themselves damnation.
t a terror to good works, but to the evil. Wilt
r? do that which is good, and thou
have praise of the same: 13:4 For he is the minister of God to
f thou do that which is evil, be afraid; for he
he is the minister of God, a
execute wrath upon him that doeth evil.

not only for wrath, but also
ce sake.
 tribute also: for they are God's
rs, attending continually upon this very thing.
r dues: tribute to whom tribute is
ustom to whom custom; fear to whom fear; honour to whom honour.
ny thing, but to love one another: for he that loveth
w.
 adultery, Thou shalt not kill,
t not steal, Thou shalt not bear false witness, Thou shalt
be any other commandment, it is briefly
omprehended in this saying, namely, Thou shalt love thy neighbour as
:10 Love worketh no ill to his neighbour: therefore love is the
aw.
hat now it is high time to awake
leep: for now is our salvation nearer than when we believed.
ar spent, the day is at hand: let us therefore
let us put on the armour of light.
3 Let us walk honestly, as in the day; not in rioting and
ering and wantonness, not in strife and
nvying.
sus Christ, and make not provision for
e flesh, to fulfil the lusts thereof.
4:1 Him that is weak in the faith receive ye, but not to doubtful
14:2 For one believeth that he may eat all things: another, who is
bs.
e him that eateth not; and let not
ich eateth not judge him that eateth: for God hath received him.
u that judgest another man's servant? to his own
, he shall be holden up: for God is
to make him stand.
th one day above another: another esteemeth every
 persuaded in his own mind.
t regardeth the day, regardeth it unto the Lord; and he
 to the Lord he doth not regard it. He that
th God thanks; and he that
 the Lord he eateth not, and giveth God thanks.
self, and no man dieth to himself.
 For whether we live, we live unto the Lord; and whether we die,
rd: whether we live therefore, or die, we are the
hrist both died, and rose, and revived, that he
living.
hy brother? or why dost thou set at
t thy brother? for we shall all stand before the judgment seat of
For it is written, As I live, saith the Lord, every knee shall
 tongue shall confess to God.
then every one of us shall give account of himself to God.
fore judge one another any more: but judge this
block or an occasion to fall in his
er's way.
d by the Lord Jesus, that there is
g unclean of itself: but to him that esteemeth any thing to be
s unclean.
grieved with thy meat, now walkest thou
ot charitably. Destroy not him with thy meat, for whom Christ died.
 then your good be evil spoken of: 14:17 For the kingdom
nk; but righteousness, and peace, and joy in
n these things serveth Christ is acceptable to God,
et us therefore follow after the things which make for peace,
one may edify another.
estroy not the work of God. All things indeed are
 who eateth with offence.
ood neither to eat flesh, nor to drink wine, nor any
bleth, or is offended, or is made weak.

 before God. Happy is he that
not himself in that thing which he alloweth.
 if he eat, because he eateth not
h: for whatsoever is not of faith is sin.
ear the infirmities of the
to please ourselves.
 of us please his neighbour for his good to
eased not himself; but, as it is written, The
ee fell on me.
gs were written aforetime were written for our
nd comfort of the scriptures might
ope.
onsolation grant you to be
 toward another according to Christ Jesus: 15:6 That ye
outh glorify God, even the Father of our
Lord Jesus Christ.
ve ye one another, as Christ also received us to
y that Jesus Christ was a minister of the circumcision
firm the promises made unto the fathers:
15:9 And that the Gentiles might glorify God for his mercy; as it is
his cause I will confess to thee among the Gentiles, and
10 And again he saith, Rejoice, ye Gentiles, with his people.
aise the Lord, all ye Gentiles; and laud him, all
aias saith, There shall be a root of Jesse, and he
e Gentiles; in him shall the Gentiles
st.
with all joy and peace in
 ye may abound in hope, through the power of the Holy
also am persuaded of you, my brethren, that ye also
th all knowledge, able also to admonish
ne another.
n, I have written the more boldly unto you
cause of the grace that is
 God, 15:16 That I should be the minister of Jesus
ing the gospel of God, that the
up of the Gentiles might be acceptable, being sanctified by
7 I have therefore whereof I may glory through Jesus Christ in
ertain to God.
e to speak of any of those things which Christ
Gentiles obedient, by word and
9 Through mighty signs and wonders, by the power of the
 Jerusalem, and round about unto Illyricum,
ist.
each the gospel, not where Christ
ed, lest I should build upon another man's foundation: 15:21
To whom he was not spoken of, they shall see:
derstand.
have been much hindered from coming to
u.
n these parts, and having a great
these many years to come unto you; 15:24 Whensoever I take my
 will come to you: for I trust to see you in my
y thitherward by you, if first I be
hat filled with your company.
 now I go unto Jerusalem to minister unto the saints.
hem of Macedonia and Achaia to make a
tain contribution for the poor saints which are at Jerusalem.
ed them verily; and their debtors they are. For if
akers of their spiritual things, their
ty is also to minister unto them in carnal things.
rformed this, and have sealed to them
s fruit, I will come by you into Spain.

o you, I shall come in the
 blessing of the gospel of Christ.
0 Now I beseech you, brethren, for the Lord Jesus Christ's sake,
f the Spirit, that ye strive together with me in
That I may be delivered from them
 not believe in Judaea; and that my service which I have for
ted of the saints; 15:32 That I may come unto
may with you be refreshed.
e God of peace be with you all. Amen.
6:1 I commend unto you Phebe our sister, which is a servant of the
at Cenchrea: 16:2 That ye receive her in the Lord, as
assist her in whatsoever business she
h need of you: for she hath been a succourer of many, and of myself
reet Priscilla and Aquila my helpers in Christ Jesus: 16:4 Who
d down their own necks: unto whom not only I give
 of the Gentiles.
he church that is in their house. Salute my
tfruits of Achaia unto Christ.
et Mary, who bestowed much labour on us.

smen, and my fellow-prisoners,
 note among the apostles, who also were in Christ before me.
y beloved in the Lord.
ne, our helper in Christ, and Stachys my beloved.
n Christ. Salute them which are of
bulus' household.
 my kinsman. Greet them that be of the household
d.
who labour in the Lord. Salute the
d Persis, which laboured much in the Lord.
 and his mother and mine.
Asyncritus, Phlegon, Hermas, Patrobas, Hermes, and the
.
ereus, and his sister, and
ll the saints which are with them.
6 Salute one another with an holy kiss. The churches of Christ
 Now I beseech you, brethren, mark them which cause divisions and
 to the doctrine which ye have learned; and avoid
such serve not our Lord Jesus Christ, but
ir speeches deceive the
ple.
broad unto all men. I am glad
n your behalf: but yet I would have you wise unto that
ncerning evil.
ce shall bruise Satan under your feet shortly.
e with you. Amen.
rkfellow, and Lucius, and Jason, and Sosipater,
Tertius, who wrote this epistle, salute you in the Lord.
nd of the whole church, saluteth you. Erastus
you, and Quartus a brother.
race of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
power to stablish you according to my
pel, and the preaching of Jesus Christ, according to the revelation
 which was kept secret since the world began, 16:26 But
y the scriptures of the prophets, according
od, made known to all nations
dience of faith: 16:27 To God only wise, be glory through
en.
 Apostle to the Corinthians
called to be an apostle of Jesus Christ through the will of
brother, 1:2 Unto the church of God which is at
d in Christ Jesus, called to be
ith all that in every place call upon the name of Jesus
's and our's: 1:3 Grace be unto you, and
peace, from God our Father, and from the Lord Jesus Christ.
ways on your behalf, for the grace of God which
hat in every thing ye are enriched
, in all utterance, and in all knowledge; 1:6 Even as the
onfirmed in you: 1:7 So that ye come behind
ur Lord Jesus Christ: 1:8 Who
confirm you unto the end, that ye may be blameless in the
ist.
re called unto the fellowship of his
Jesus Christ our Lord.
ch you, brethren, by the name of our Lord Jesus
thing, and that there be no
ng you; but that ye be perfectly joined together in the
udgment.
 unto me of you, my brethren, by them
ch are of the house of Chloe, that there are contentions among you.
 I say, that every one of you saith, I am of Paul; and I
s; and I of Christ.
ded? was Paul crucified for you? or were ye
hank God that I baptized none
 Crispus and Gaius; 1:15 Lest any should say that I had

of Stephanas: besides, I know
 I baptized any other.
sent me not to baptize, but to preach the gospel: not
e cross of Christ should be made of none
effect.
ross is to them that perish
but unto us which are saved it is the power of God.
l destroy the wisdom of the wise, and
l bring to nothing the understanding of the prudent.
e is the scribe? where is the disputer of
 wisdom of this world?  1:21
at in the wisdom of God the world by wisdom knew not God,
lishness of preaching to save them that
elieve.
n, and the Greeks seek after wisdom:
 But we preach Christ crucified, unto the Jews a stumblingblock,
s foolishness; 1:24 But unto them which are called,
e power of God, and the wisdom of God.
1:25 Because the foolishness of God is wiser than men; and the
tronger than men.
calling, brethren, how that not many wise men
 many noble, are called: 1:27 But
h chosen the foolish things of the world to confound the wise;
the weak things of the world to confound the
 things of the world, and things
e despised, hath God chosen, yea, and things which are not, to
gs that are: 1:29 That no flesh should glory in
e ye in Christ Jesus, who of God is made unto us
ctification, and redemption: 1:31
ccording as it is written, He that glorieth, let him glory in
I, brethren, when I came to you, came not with excellency of
eclaring unto you the testimony of God.

g among you, save Jesus
rucified.
kness, and in fear, and in much
.
s not with enticing words of
, but in demonstration of the Spirit and of power: 2:5
tand in the wisdom of men, but in the
er of God.
among them that are perfect: yet not the
wisdom of this world, nor of the princes of this world, that come to
t we speak the wisdom of God in a mystery, even the
ed before the world unto our glory: 2:8
hich none of the princes of this world knew: for had they known it,
have crucified the Lord of glory.
ut as it is written, Eye hath not seen, nor ear heard, neither
e heart of man, the things which God hath prepared
But God hath revealed them unto us by his Spirit: for the Spirit
gs, yea, the deep things of God.
or what man knoweth the things of a man, save the spirit of man
en so the things of God knoweth no man, but the
received, not the spirit of the world, but the spirit
t know the things that are freely given
o us of God.
speak, not in the words which man's wisdom
eth; comparing spiritual
itual.
th not the things of the Spirit of
or they are foolishness unto him: neither can he know them,
ually discerned.
iritual judgeth all things, yet he himself is
h known the mind of the Lord, that he may instruct
rist.
eak unto you as unto spiritual, but
to carnal, even as unto babes in Christ.

th meat: for hitherto ye were
 bear it, neither yet now are ye able.
3:3 For ye are yet carnal: for whereas there is among you envying, and
divisions, are ye not carnal, and walk as men?  3:4 For
ul; and another, I am of Apollos; are ye
not carnal?  3:5 Who then is Paul, and who is Apollos, but ministers
ieved, even as the Lord gave to every man?  3:6 I have
t God gave the increase.
ither is he that planteth any thing, neither he that
the increase.
and he that watereth are one: and every man
to his own labour.
rers together with God: ye are God's husbandry, ye
rding to the grace of God which is given unto me, as a wise
aid the foundation, and another buildeth
thereon. But let every man take heed how he buildeth thereupon.
undation can no man lay than that is laid, which is
y man build upon this foundation gold, silver, precious
 3:13 Every man's work shall be made
fest: for the day shall declare it, because it shall be revealed
ire shall try every man's work of what sort it is.
hich he hath built thereupon, he shall
ceive a reward.
shall be burned, he shall suffer loss: but he
fire.
temple of God, and that the Spirit of
 dwelleth in you?  3:17 If any man defile the temple of God, him
 for the temple of God is holy, which temple ye are.
elf. If any man among you seemeth to be
ise in this world, let him become a fool, that he may be wise.
m of this world is foolishness with God. For it is
heir own craftiness.
e Lord knoweth the thoughts of the wise, that they
no man glory in men. For all things are your's;
ephas, or the world, or life, or
r things present, or things to come; all are your's; 3:23 And
Christ is God's.
nt of us, as of the ministers of Christ, and
:2 Moreover it is required in stewards, that a man be found faithful.
h me it is a very small thing that I should be judged of
 yea, I judge not mine own self.
r I know nothing by myself; yet am I not hereby justified: but
s the Lord.
 before the time, until the Lord come, who
gs of darkness, and will make
e counsels of the hearts: and then shall every man have
hese things, brethren, I have in a figure transferred to
your sakes; that ye might learn in us not to
en, that no one of you be puffed
ne against another.
thee to differ from another? and what hast thou
 thou didst receive it, why dost
ry, as if thou hadst not received it?  4:8 Now ye are full,
e reigned as kings without us: and I would to
reign with you.
d hath set forth us the apostles last, as it
de a spectacle unto the world,
els, and to men.
Christ's sake, but ye are wise in Christ; we are
nourable, but we are despised.
n unto this present hour we both hunger, and thirst, and are
d, and have no certain dwellingplace; 4:12 And
being reviled, we bless; being
, we suffer it: 4:13 Being defamed, we intreat: we are made
ld, and are the offscouring of all things unto
things to shame you, but as my beloved sons I
ten thousand instructers in Christ, yet have
us I have begotten you through
.
ollowers of me.
e I sent unto you Timotheus, who is my beloved
hall bring you into remembrance of
s which be in Christ, as I teach every where in every church.
uffed up, as though I would not come to you.
 if the Lord will, and will know,
 speech of them which are puffed up, but the power.
s not in word, but in power.
will ye? shall I come unto you with a rod, or in love, and
s?  5:1 It is reported commonly that there is
cation as is not so much as named
he Gentiles, that one should have his father's wife.
d have not rather mourned, that he that
ath done this deed might be taken away from among you.
t in body, but present in spirit, have
dged already, as though I were present, concerning him that hath so
 5:4 In the name of our Lord Jesus Christ, when ye are
irit, with the power of our Lord Jesus
rist, 5:5 To deliver such an one unto Satan for the destruction of
the spirit may be saved in the day of the Lord Jesus.
od. Know ye not that a little leaven
eneth the whole lump?  5:7 Purge out therefore the old leaven,
 lump, as ye are unleavened. For even Christ our
 Therefore let us keep the feast,
h old leaven, neither with the leaven of malice and wickedness;
ened bread of sincerity and truth.
I wrote unto you in an epistle not to company with fornicators:
ther with the fornicators of this world, or with
with idolaters; for then must ye
 out of the world.
written unto you not to keep company, if any man
icator, or covetous, or an idolater,
 railer, or a drunkard, or an extortioner; with such an one no not
For what have I to do to judge them also that are without? do not
t are within?  5:13 But them that are without God
among yourselves that wicked person.
1 Dare any of you, having a matter against another, go to law before
d not before the saints?  6:2 Do ye not know that the
 and if the world shall be judged by you,
ters?  6:3 Know ye not that
e angels? how much more things that pertain to this life?
ents of things pertaining to this life, set
 the church.
 Is it so, that there is not a wise man
mong you? no, not one that shall be able to judge between his
other goeth to law with brother, and that before
ore there is utterly a fault among you, because ye go to
do ye not rather take wrong? why do ye not
?  6:8 Nay, ye do wrong, and
 that your brethren.
at the unrighteous shall not inherit the kingdom of
fornicators, nor idolaters, nor
s, nor effeminate, nor abusers of themselves with mankind,
vetous, nor drunkards, nor revilers, nor
extortioners, shall inherit the kingdom of God.
ut ye are washed, but ye are
but ye are justified in the name of the Lord Jesus, and by

all things are not expedient:
are lawful for me, but I will not be brought under the
for the belly, and the belly for meats: but God shall
 the body is not for fornication, but for
:14 And God hath both raised up the Lord, and will also raise up us
r.
e the members of Christ? shall I
e the members of Christ, and make them the members of an
6 What? know ye not that he which is joined to an harlot is one
th he, shall be one flesh.
that is joined unto the Lord is one spirit.
 a man doeth is without the body;
that committeth fornication sinneth against his own body.
that your body is the temple of the Holy Ghost
d, and ye are not your own?  6:20
are bought with a price: therefore glorify God in your body,
ich are God's.
hings whereof ye wrote unto me: It is good for
evertheless, to avoid fornication, let every man have his own
oman have her own husband.
husband render unto the wife due benevolence: and likewise
usband.
her own body, but the husband: and
se also the husband hath not power of his own body, but the
 not one the other, except it be with consent for a
es to fasting and prayer; and come
er again, that Satan tempt you not for your incontinency.
 permission, and not of commandment.
7 For I would that all men were even as I myself. But every man hath
t of God, one after this manner, and another after that.
he unmarried and widows, It is good for them
 they cannot contain, let them marry: for it is better to
10 And unto the married I command, yet not I, but the Lord, Let not
 from her husband: 7:11 But and if she depart, let her
ciled to her husband: and let not the
band put away his wife.
 rest speak I, not the Lord: If any brother hath a wife
 be pleased to dwell with him, let him not
h hath an husband that believeth not, and if he
er not leave him.
ing husband is sanctified by the wife, and the
e husband: else were your children
n; but now are they holy.
he unbelieving depart, let him depart. A brother or a
n such cases: but God hath called us to
eace.
e, whether thou shalt save thy
or how knowest thou, O man, whether thou shalt save thy
 distributed to every man, as the Lord hath
so ordain I in all churches.
y man called being circumcised? let him not become
uncircumcision? let him not be
d.
circumcision is nothing, but the
of the commandments of God.
ery man abide in the same calling wherein he was called.
ng a servant? care not for it: but if thou
:22 For he that is called in the Lord, being a servant, is the Lord's
wise also he that is called, being free, is Christ's
 with a price; be not ye the servants of men.
in he is called, therein abide with

ommandment of the Lord: yet I
gment, as one that hath obtained mercy of the Lord to be
e therefore that this is good for the present distress, I
a man so to be.
o a wife? seek not to be loosed. Art thou
:28 But and if thou marry, thou hast not sinned; and if a virgin
t sinned. Nevertheless such shall have trouble in
29 But this I say, brethren, the time is short: it remaineth, that
ave wives be as though they had none; 7:30 And they
not; and they that rejoice, as though
y rejoiced not; and they that buy, as though they possessed not;
 use this world, as not abusing it: for the fashion
7:32 But I would have you without carefulness. He that is unmarried
things that belong to the Lord, how he may please the
ried careth for the things that are of
e world, how he may please his wife.
34 There is difference also between a wife and a virgin. The
 for the things of the Lord, that she may be
he that is married careth for
of the world, how she may please her husband.
profit; not that I may cast a snare
you, but for that which is comely, and that ye may attend upon
traction.
t he behaveth himself uncomely toward his
, and need so require, let
 will, he sinneth not: let them marry.
7:37 Nevertheless he that standeth stedfast in his heart, having no
hath power over his own will, and hath so decreed in
s virgin, doeth well.
hat giveth her in marriage doeth well; but he that
 better.
law as long as her husband liveth; but
 her husband be dead, she is at liberty to be married to whom she
 Lord.
o abide, after my judgment: and I
lso that I have the Spirit of God.
Now as touching things offered unto idols, we know that we all
ledge puffeth up, but charity edifieth.

any thing, he knoweth nothing
ught to know.
od, the same is known of him.
ncerning therefore the eating of those things that are
ols, we know that an idol is nothing in
he world, and that there is none other God but one.
are called gods, whether in heaven or in
earth, (as there be gods many, and lords many,) 8:6 But to us there is
 the Father, of whom are all things, and we in him; and
hom are all things, and we by him.
Howbeit there is not in every man that knowledge: for some with
dol unto this hour eat it as a thing offered unto
ng weak is defiled.
deth us not to God: for neither, if we eat, are we
ot, are we the worse.
 lest by any means this liberty of your's become a
weak.
h hast knowledge sit at meat in the
s temple, shall not the conscience of him which is weak be
things which are offered to idols; 8:11 And
other perish, for whom Christ
 But when ye sin so against the brethren, and wound their
gainst Christ.
make my brother to offend, I will eat no flesh
e my brother to offend.
 apostle? am I not free? have I not seen Jesus Christ
in the Lord?  9:2 If I be not an apostle
unto others, yet doubtless I am to you: for the seal of mine
the Lord.
do examine me is this, 9:4 Have we not
wer to eat and to drink?  9:5 Have we not power to lead about a
well as other apostles, and as the brethren of the
 and Barnabas, have not we power to
ar working?  9:7 Who goeth a warfare any time at his own charges?
neyard, and eateth not of the fruit thereof? or who
 of the milk of the flock?  9:8 Say I
se things as a man? or saith not the law the same also?  9:9 For it
he law of Moses, Thou shalt not muzzle the mouth of the
rn. Doth God take care for oxen?  9:10 Or
 our sakes, no doubt, this is
at he that ploweth should plow in hope; and that he that
e partaker of his hope.
 sown unto you spiritual things, is it a great thing if
hings?  9:12 If others be partakers of this
ertheless we have not used this
t suffer all things, lest we should hinder the gospel of
know that they which minister about holy things live of
nd they which wait at the altar are
kers with the altar?  9:14 Even so hath the Lord ordained that
e gospel should live of the gospel.
5 But I have used none of these things: neither have I written
t should be so done unto me: for it were better
ould make my glorying void.
ough I preach the gospel, I have nothing to glory of: for
; yea, woe is unto me, if I preach not the
lingly, I have a reward: but
y will, a dispensation of the gospel is committed unto me.
 then? Verily that, when I preach the gospel, I
ut charge, that I abuse not my
he gospel.
om all men, yet have I made myself servant

 that I might gain the Jews;
 are under the law, as under the law, that I might gain
; 9:21 To them that are without law, as
ithout law, (being not without law to God, but under the law to
ht gain them that are without law.
 To the weak became I as weak, that I might gain the weak: I am
all men, that I might by all means save some.
 sake, that I might be partaker
ith you.
ch run in a race run all, but one
th the prize? So run, that ye may obtain.
e mastery is temperate in all
 they do it to obtain a corruptible crown; but we an
fore so run, not as uncertainly; so fight I, not as one
But I keep under my body, and bring it into
n I have preached to others, I
uld be a castaway.
ren, I would not that ye should be ignorant, how
e cloud, and all passed through the
10:2 And were all baptized unto Moses in the cloud and in the
 eat the same spiritual meat; 10:4 And did all
they drank of that spiritual Rock
llowed them: and that Rock was Christ.
10:5 But with many of them God was not well pleased: for they were
e wilderness.
e our examples, to the intent we should not
sted.
were some of them; as it is written,
people sat down to eat and drink, and rose up to play.
 fornication, as some of them committed, and
and.
as some of them also tempted, and
stroyed of serpents.
ur ye, as some of them also murmured, and were
 Now all these things happened unto them for ensamples: and they
r admonition, upon whom the ends of the world are
that thinketh he standeth take heed lest he
 taken you but such as is common to man:
but God is faithful, who will not suffer you to be tempted above that
but will with the temptation also make a way to escape,
 it.
, flee from idolatry.
to wise men; judge ye what I say.
 The cup of blessing which we bless, is it not the communion of
? The bread which we break, is it not the communion
or we being many are one bread, and one
ody: for we are all partakers of that one bread.
esh: are not they which eat of the
ices partakers of the altar?  10:19 What say I then? that the
 that which is offered in sacrifice to idols is
he things which the Gentiles
hey sacrifice to devils, and not to God: and I would not
ship with devils.
 the cup of the Lord, and the cup of devils: ye
able, and of the table of devils.
 Do we provoke the Lord to jealousy? are we stronger than he?
lawful for me, but all things are not expedient:
all things edify not.
seek his own, but every man another's wealth.
mbles, that eat, asking no question
onscience sake: 10:26 For the earth is the Lord's, and the
7 If any of them that believe not bid you to a feast, and ye be
tsoever is set before you, eat, asking no question
t if any man say unto you, This is offered in sacrifice unto
 sake that shewed it, and for conscience sake:
 fulness thereof: 10:29
, not thine own, but of the other: for why is my
nscience?  10:30 For if I by grace
artaker, why am I evil spoken of for that for which I give
herefore ye eat, or drink, or whatsoever ye
2 Give none offence, neither to the Jews, nor to the Gentiles, nor
 God: 10:33 Even as I please all men in all things,
t the profit of many, that they may be
ved.
s I also am of Christ.
e you, brethren, that ye remember me in all things,
elivered them to you.
have you know, that the head of every man is Christ;
he man; and the head of Christ is God.
11:4 Every man praying or prophesying, having his head covered,
ad.
r prophesieth with her head
honoureth her head: for that is even all one as if she
the woman be not covered, let her also be shorn: but if it
o be shorn or shaven, let her be covered.
r his head, forasmuch as he is
and glory of God: but the woman is the glory of the man.
of the woman: but the woman of the man.

woman; but the woman for the
0 For this cause ought the woman to have power on her head because

thout the woman, neither the
t the man, in the Lord.
e woman is of the man, even so is the man also by the

y that a woman pray unto God
11:14 Doth not even nature itself teach you, that, if a
 shame unto him?  11:15 But if a woman have
r hair is given her for a
:16 But if any man seem to be contentious, we have no such custom,
ches of God.
eclare unto you I praise you not, that ye
 the worse.
n ye come together in the church, I hear
that there be divisions among you; and I partly believe it.
be also heresies among you, that they which are
 you.
fore into one place, this is not to
he Lord's supper.
very one taketh before other his own supper: and
ken.
eat and to drink in? or despise ye
urch of God, and shame them that have not? What shall I say to
you in this? I praise you not.
r I have received of the Lord that which also I delivered unto
esus the same night in which he was betrayed took
n thanks, he brake it, and said,
t: this is my body, which is broken for you: this do in
 After the same manner also he took the cup, when he had supped,
s the new testament in my blood: this do ye, as oft
of me.
s bread, and drink this cup, ye do
he Lord's death till he come.
refore whosoever shall eat this bread, and drink this cup of
shall be guilty of the body and blood of the
imself, and so let him eat of that bread,
at eateth and drinketh unworthily, eateth and drinketh
scerning the Lord's body.
s cause many are weak and sickly among you, and many
d judge ourselves, we should not be judged.
chastened of the Lord, that we
 be condemned with the world.
refore, my brethren, when ye come together to eat, tarry one
And if any man hunger, let him eat at home; that ye come not
tion. And the rest will I set in order when I
l gifts, brethren, I would not have you
gnorant.
iles, carried away unto these dumb
 even as ye were led.
give you to understand, that no man speaking by the
ursed: and that no man can say that
 is the Lord, but by the Holy Ghost.
:4 Now there are diversities of gifts, but the same Spirit.
fferences of administrations, but the same Lord.
f operations, but it is the same God
h worketh all in all.
festation of the Spirit is given to every man to
is given by the Spirit the word of wisdom; to another
same Spirit; 12:9 To another faith by the
ing by the same Spirit; 12:10
the working of miracles; to another prophecy; to another
another divers kinds of tongues; to another
t all these worketh that one
same Spirit, dividing to every man severally as he will.
 one, and hath many members, and all the
members of that one body, being many, are one body: so also is Christ.
by one Spirit are we all baptized into one body, whether we
ether we be bond or free; and have been all
 For the body is not one member, but many.
 am not the hand, I am not of
s it therefore not of the body?  12:16 And if the ear shall
he eye, I am not of the body; is it therefore
body were an eye, where were the
 If the whole were hearing, where were the smelling?  12:18
e members every one of them in the body, as it
ey were all one member, where were the body?  12:20 But
yet but one body.
not say unto the hand, I have no need of thee:
ve no need of you.
 those members of the body, which seem to be more
those members of the body, which we
 to be less honourable, upon these we bestow more abundant
 parts have more abundant comeliness.
2:24 For our comely parts have no need: but God hath tempered the
ving given more abundant honour to that part which
ld be no schism in the body; but that the members
 another.
suffer, all the members suffer with it;
r one member be honoured, all the members rejoice with it.
ody of Christ, and members in particular.
ch, first apostles, secondarily
 thirdly teachers, after that miracles, then gifts of
 diversities of tongues.
apostles? are all prophets? are all teachers? are all
ave all the gifts of healing? do all
k with tongues? do all interpret?  12:31 But covet earnestly the
t shew I unto you a more excellent way.

en and of angels, and have
 am become as sounding brass, or a tinkling cymbal.
ft of prophecy, and understand all
ies, and all knowledge; and though I have all faith, so that I
ns, and have not charity, I am nothing.

feed the poor, and though I
to be burned, and have not charity, it profiteth me
eth long, and is kind; charity envieth not; charity
fed up, 13:5 Doth not behave itself
mly, seeketh not her own, is not easily provoked, thinketh no
not in iniquity, but rejoiceth in the truth; 13:7
 things, hopeth all things, endureth
things.
 whether there be prophecies, they
fail; whether there be tongues, they shall cease; whether there
all vanish away.
rt, and we prophesy in part.
when that which is perfect is come, then that which is in

child, I understood as a child,
 as a child: but when I became a man, I put away childish
we see through a glass, darkly; but then face to face:
 shall I know even as also I am known.
13:13 And now abideth faith, hope, charity, these three; but the
is charity.
and desire spiritual gifts, but rather that
eaketh in an unknown tongue speaketh not unto men,
andeth him; howbeit in the spirit he
keth mysteries.
sieth speaketh unto men to edification, and
at speaketh in an unknown tongue edifieth himself; but he
 the church.
pake with tongues but rather that ye
hesied: for greater is he that prophesieth than he that speaketh
pt he interpret, that the church may receive
come unto you speaking with tongues, what
to you either by revelation,
dge, or by prophesying, or by doctrine?  14:7 And even
ound, whether pipe or harp, except they
ive a distinction in the sounds, how shall it be known what is piped
:8 For if the trumpet give an uncertain sound, who shall
tle?  14:9 So likewise ye, except ye utter
d, how shall it be known what
for ye shall speak into the air.
There are, it may be, so many kinds of voices in the world, and
hout signification.
I know not the meaning of the voice, I shall be
 and he that speaketh shall be a
n unto me.
as ye are zealous of spiritual gifts, seek
 church.
peaketh in an unknown tongue pray that
 may interpret.
an unknown tongue, my spirit prayeth, but my
What is it then? I will pray with the spirit, and I will pray
g also: I will sing with the spirit, and I will

e spirit, how shall he that
 room of the unlearned say Amen at thy giving of thanks,
t what thou sayest?  14:17 For thou verily
 edified.
 with tongues more than ye all: 14:19 Yet
ds with my understanding,
e I might teach others also, than ten thousand words in
 Brethren, be not children in understanding: howbeit in malice be
in understanding be men.
aw it is written, With men of other tongues and other
eople; and yet for all that will they not
re tongues are for a sign, not to them that believe, but
but prophesying serveth not for them that

come together into one place,
ak with tongues, and there come in those that are
hey not say that ye are mad?  14:24
f all prophesy, and there come in one that believeth not, or one
onvinced of all, he is judged of all: 14:25 And thus
ade manifest; and so falling down on his
face he will worship God, and report that God is in you of a truth.
it then, brethren? when ye come together, every one of
trine, hath a tongue, hath a revelation,
hath an interpretation. Let all things be done unto edifying.
eak in an unknown tongue, let it be by two, or at
urse; and let one interpret.
if there be no interpreter, let him keep silence in the
o himself, and to God.
ophets speak two or three, and let the other judge.
d to another that sitteth by, let the
st hold his peace.
 prophesy one by one, that all may learn, and all
e spirits of the prophets are subject to the prophets.
uthor of confusion, but of peace, as in all
ur women keep silence in the churches: for it is not
but they are commanded to be under
nce as also saith the law.
 they will learn any thing, let them ask their husbands at
for women to speak in the church.
 What? came the word of God out from you? or came it unto you
an think himself to be a prophet, or spiritual,
 that I write unto you are the
ts of the Lord.
 ignorant, let him be ignorant.
herefore, brethren, covet to prophesy, and forbid not to speak
40 Let all things be done decently and in order.
re unto you the gospel which I
nto you, which also ye have received, and wherein ye stand;
re saved, if ye keep in memory what I preached
 vain.
rst of all that which I also received,
w that Christ died for our sins according to the scriptures; 15:4
uried, and that he rose again the third day according
hat he was seen of Cephas, then of the
elve: 15:6 After that, he was seen of above five hundred brethren at
the greater part remain unto this present, but some are
r that, he was seen of James; then of all the apostles.
as seen of me also, as of one born out of due
he apostles, that am not meet to be called
rch of God.
od I am what I am: and his grace which was
laboured more abundantly than
et not I, but the grace of God which was with me.
 I or they, so we preach, and so ye
ved.
at he rose from the dead, how say
ong you that there is no resurrection of the dead?  15:13 But
ection of the dead, then is Christ not risen:
n is our preaching vain, and your
s also vain.
d false witnesses of God; because we have
: whom he raised not up, if
e dead rise not.
rise not, then is not Christ raised: 15:17 And
is vain; ye are yet in your sins.
 Then they also which are fallen asleep in Christ are perished.
life only we have hope in Christ, we are of all men
w is Christ risen from the dead, and become the
15:21 For since by man came death, by man came also the resurrection

 Christ shall all be made
 But every man in his own order: Christ the firstfruits;
rist's at his coming.
 the end, when he shall have delivered up the kingdom
 he shall have put down all rule and all
authority and power.
reign, till he hath put all enemies under his feet.
ll be destroyed is death.
hath put all things under his feet. But when he saith all
 it is manifest that he is excepted, which
nd when all things shall be subdued unto him, then shall the
bject unto him that put all things under him,
Else what shall they do which are baptized for the dead, if the
l? why are they then baptized for the dead?  15:30
ry hour?  15:31 I protest by your
ng which I have in Christ Jesus our LORD, I die daily.
of men I have fought with beasts at Ephesus,
se not? let us eat and drink;
ow we die.
communications corrupt good manners.
:34 Awake to righteousness, and sin not; for some have not the
speak this to your shame.
e man will say, How are the dead raised up? and with what
 Thou fool, that which thou sowest is not
which thou sowest, thou
ody that shall be, but bare grain, it may chance of
15:38 But God giveth it a body as it
 pleased him, and to every seed his own body.
sh: but there is one kind of flesh
, another flesh of beasts, another of fishes, and another of
are also celestial bodies, and bodies terrestrial: but the
s one, and the glory of the terrestrial is
the sun, and another glory of the moon,
nd another glory of the stars: for one star differeth from another

 dead. It is sown in
ised in incorruption: 15:43 It is sown in
own in weakness; it is raised
5:44 It is sown a natural body; it is raised a spiritual
ody, and there is a spiritual body.
45 And so it is written, The first man Adam was made a living soul;
as made a quickening spirit.
eit that was not first which is spiritual, but that which is
 that which is spiritual.
st man is of the earth, earthy; the second man is the
 is the earthy, such are they also that are earthy: and as is
e they also that are heavenly.
d as we have borne the image of the earthy, we shall also bear
venly.
that flesh and blood cannot inherit
ingdom of God; neither doth corruption inherit incorruption.
 you a mystery; We shall not all sleep, but we
ent, in the twinkling of an eye,
ast trump: for the trumpet shall sound, and the dead shall be
 and we shall be changed.
s corruptible must put on incorruption, and this mortal

 put on incorruption, and
ll have put on immortality, then shall be brought to
n, Death is swallowed up in victory.
:55 O death, where is thy sting? O grave, where is thy victory?
death is sin; and the strength of sin is the law.
ch giveth us the victory through our
 Jesus Christ.
ved brethren, be ye stedfast, unmoveable,
 forasmuch as ye know that
 not in vain in the Lord.
erning the collection for the saints, as I have given
tia, even so do ye.
 day of the week let every one of you lay by him in
m, that there be no gatherings when I
e.
shall approve by your letters,
I send to bring your liberality unto Jerusalem.
also, they shall go with me.
 will come unto you, when I shall pass through Macedonia:
edonia.
abide, yea, and winter with you, that
may bring me on my journey whithersoever I go.
 the way; but I trust to tarry a
th you, if the Lord permit.
will tarry at Ephesus until Pentecost.
16:9 For a great door and effectual is opened unto me, and there are
es.
at he may be with you without fear:
e worketh the work of the Lord, as I also do.
him: but conduct him forth in
 he may come unto me: for I look for him with the brethren.
 brother Apollos, I greatly desired him to come
 will was not at all to come at
; but he will come when he shall have convenient time.
 in the faith, quit you like men, be strong.
th charity.
en, (ye know the house of Stephanas, that
 they have addicted
istry of the saints,) 16:16 That ye submit
hat helpeth with us, and
:17 I am glad of the coming of Stephanas and Fortunatus and
h was lacking on your part they have supplied.
pirit and your's: therefore
e them that are such.
s of Asia salute you. Aquila and Priscilla salute you
urch that is in their house.
the brethren greet you. Greet ye one another with
tion of me Paul with mine own hand.
22 If any man love not the Lord Jesus Christ, let him be
23 The grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you.
in Christ Jesus. Amen.
 Epistle of Paul the Apostle to the Corinthians
hrist by the will of God, and Timothy
 brother, unto the church of God which is at Corinth, with all the
 in all Achaia: 1:2 Grace be to you and peace from God
d Jesus Christ.
n the Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, the
mfort; 1:4 Who comforteth us
ribulation, that we may be able to comfort them which are
mfort wherewith we ourselves are comforted of
Christ abound in us, so our consolation
lso aboundeth by Christ.
r we be afflicted, it is for your consolation and
the enduring of the same sufferings
 we also suffer: or whether we be comforted, it is for your
on.
, knowing, that as ye are partakers
e sufferings, so shall ye be also of the consolation.
ren, have you ignorant of our trouble which
d out of measure, above
h that we despaired even of life: 1:9 But we had the
, that we should not trust in ourselves,
but in God which raiseth the dead: 1:10 Who delivered us from so great
 doth deliver: in whom we trust that he will yet deliver
ogether by prayer for us, that for the gift
ersons thanks may be given by
 behalf.
, the testimony of our conscience, that
n simplicity and godly sincerity, not with fleshly wisdom, but by the
 we have had our conversation in the world, and more
3 For we write none other things unto you, than what ye read or
trust ye shall acknowledge even to the end; 1:14 As
 part, that we are your rejoicing, even
s ye also are our's in the day of the Lord Jesus.
as minded to come unto you before, that
e might have a second benefit; 1:16 And to pass by you into
again out of Macedonia unto you, and of you to

did I use lightness? or the
 purpose, do I purpose according to the flesh, that with
, and nay nay?  1:18 But as God is true, our

ho was preached among you by
me and Silvanus and Timotheus, was not yea and nay, but in
 all the promises of God in him are yea, and in him Amen, unto
us.
th you in Christ, and hath anointed
s God; 1:22 Who hath also sealed us, and given the earnest of the
rts.
ord upon my soul, that to spare you
e not as yet unto Corinth.
 that we have dominion over your faith, but are helpers of
e stand.
 myself, that I would not come again to
ou in heaviness.
sorry, who is he then that maketh me glad, but
 2:3 And I wrote this same unto
, when I came, I should have sorrow from them of whom I ought
nfidence in you all, that my joy is the joy of
iction and anguish of heart I wrote unto you
 grieved, but that ye might know
 which I have more abundantly unto you.

 not grieved me, but in part:
not overcharge you all.
to such a man is this punishment, which was inflicted
ariwise ye ought rather to forgive him, and comfort
ould be swallowed up with overmuch
.
ould confirm your love toward
 For to this end also did I write, that I might know the proof of
e obedient in all things.
ye forgive any thing, I forgive also: for if I forgave
 it, for your sakes forgave I it in the
erson of Christ; 2:11 Lest Satan should get an advantage of us: for
rant of his devices.
when I came to Troas to preach Christ's gospel, and
e Lord, 2:13 I had no rest in my
because I found not Titus my brother: but taking my leave of
ce into Macedonia.
nto God, which always causeth us to triumph in
ur of his knowledge by us in every

r of Christ, in them that are
in them that perish: 2:16 To the one we are the savour of
the other the savour of life unto life. And
17 For we are not as many,
the word of God: but as of sincerity, but as of God, in
n Christ.
end ourselves? or need we, as some
, epistles of commendation to you, or letters of commendation
 our epistle written in our hearts, known and
are manifestly declared to be the
 of Christ ministered by us, written not with ink, but with the
g God; not in tables of stone, but in fleshy tables
rust have we through Christ to God-ward: 3:5 Not that we
s to think any thing as of ourselves; but
ath made us able ministers of
tament; not of the letter, but of the spirit: for the
t giveth life.
ion of death, written and engraven in stones,
 Israel could not stedfastly
ace of Moses for the glory of his countenance; which glory
 How shall not the ministration of the spirit
inistration of condemnation be
h more doth the ministration of righteousness exceed in
t which was made glorious had no glory in this
 excelleth.
one away was glorious, much more that which
hen that we have such hope, we use great plainness of
, which put a vail over his face, that
e children of Israel could not stedfastly look to the end of that
d: 3:14 But their minds were blinded: for until this
taken away in the reading of the old
ament; which vail is done away in Christ.
 is read, the vail is upon

the Lord, the vail shall be

ere the Spirit of the Lord is,
iberty.
 beholding as in a glass the glory of
 Lord, are changed into the same image from glory to glory, even as
f the LORD.
e this ministry, as we have received mercy,
e hidden things of dishonesty,
g in craftiness, nor handling the word of God deceitfully;
the truth commending ourselves to every man's
3 But if our gospel be hid, it is hid to them that are lost: 4:4 In
 this world hath blinded the minds of them which
 glorious gospel of Christ, who is
age of God, should shine unto them.
 For we preach not ourselves, but Christ Jesus the Lord; and
s for Jesus' sake.
manded the light to shine out of darkness, hath
ight of the knowledge of the glory
 in the face of Jesus Christ.
e have this treasure in earthen vessels, that the excellency
 God, and not of us.
d on every side, yet not distressed; we are
ecuted, but not forsaken; cast
not destroyed; 4:10 Always bearing about in the body the
hat the life also of Jesus might be made
manifest in our body.
 live are alway delivered unto death for Jesus' sake,
ight be made manifest in our mortal
.
 life in you.
pirit of faith, according as it is written, I
; we also believe, and therefore
:14 Knowing that he which raised up the Lord Jesus shall raise
 and shall present us with you.
r all things are for your sakes, that the abundant grace might
ving of many redound to the glory of God.
though our outward man perish,
ward man is renewed day by day.
r our light affliction, which is but for a moment, worketh for
ing and eternal weight of glory; 4:18 While we
n, but at the things which are not
for the things which are seen are temporal; but the things which
ternal.
thly house of this tabernacle were
ved, we have a building of God, an house not made with hands,
s.
desiring to be clothed upon with
e which is from heaven: 5:3 If so be that being clothed we
.
e do groan, being burdened: not
we would be unclothed, but clothed upon, that mortality might
fe.
 the selfsame thing is God, who
 given unto us the earnest of the Spirit.
knowing that, whilst we are at
e body, we are absent from the Lord: 5:7 (For we walk by
We are confident, I say, and willing rather
resent with the Lord.
labour, that, whether present or absent, we may be
must all appear before the judgment seat of Christ; that
things done in his body, according to that

he Lord, we persuade men; but we
 manifest unto God; and I trust also are made manifest in your
 For we commend not ourselves again unto you, but give you
 behalf, that ye may have somewhat to answer
t in heart.
de ourselves, it is to God: or whether we
or the love of Christ constraineth us; because we thus judge,
all, then were all dead: 5:15 And that he died
 not henceforth live unto
 unto him which died for them, and rose again.
no man after the flesh: yea, though
ve known Christ after the flesh, yet now henceforth know we him
erefore if any man be in Christ, he is a new creature: old
behold, all things are become new.
 And all things are of God, who hath reconciled us to himself by
hath given to us the ministry of reconciliation;
t, reconciling the world unto
t imputing their trespasses unto them; and hath committed
ciliation.
dors for Christ, as though God did beseech
, be ye reconciled to God.
hath made him to be sin for us, who knew no sin; that we
sness of God in him.
rkers together with him, beseech you also that ye
ain.
ee in a time accepted, and in the
salvation have I succoured thee: behold, now is the accepted
he day of salvation.)  6:3 Giving no offence in
 blamed: 6:4 But in all things
ourselves as the ministers of God, in much patience, in
, in distresses, 6:5 In stripes, in
sonments, in tumults, in labours, in watchings, in fastings; 6:6
owledge, by longsuffering, by kindness, by the Holy
y the word of truth, by the power of
 by the armour of righteousness on the right hand and on the left,
d dishonour, by evil report and good report: as
nown, and yet well known; as dying,
behold, we live; as chastened, and not killed; 6:10 As sorrowful,
ng; as poor, yet making many rich; as having nothing,
.
pen unto you, our heart is
:12 Ye are not straitened in us, but ye are straitened in your own
Now for a recompence in the same, (I speak as unto my children,)
d.
her with unbelievers: for what
 hath righteousness with unrighteousness? and what communion
ss?  6:15 And what concord hath Christ with
veth with an infidel?  6:16 And
ement hath the temple of God with idols? for ye are the
s God hath said, I will dwell in them, and
nd they shall be my people.
ore come out from among them, and be ye separate, saith the
 unclean thing; and I will receive you.

e shall be my sons and
he Lord Almighty.
these promises, dearly beloved, let us cleanse
 flesh and spirit, perfecting
 the fear of God.
ve wronged no man, we have corrupted no man, we
ak not this to condemn you: for I have said before, that ye
e and live with you.
ldness of speech toward you, great is my glorying of
 I am exceeding joyful in all our
tion.
acedonia, our flesh had no rest, but
ere troubled on every side; without were fightings, within were
theless God, that comforteth those that are cast down,
f Titus; 7:7 And not by his coming only,
but by the consolation wherewith he was comforted in you, when he told
est desire, your mourning, your fervent mind toward me; so
.
a letter, I do not repent, though
epent: for I perceive that the same epistle hath made you
 for a season.
hat ye were made sorry, but that ye sorrowed
after a godly manner, that ye
ve damage by us in nothing.
dly sorrow worketh repentance to salvation not to be
 the world worketh death.
ld this selfsame thing, that ye sorrowed after a godly
ought in you, yea, what clearing of
elves, yea, what indignation, yea, what fear, yea, what vehement
zeal, yea, what revenge! In all things ye have
his matter.
ote unto you, I did it not for his cause
that had done the wrong, nor for his cause that suffered wrong, but
or you in the sight of God might appear unto you.
d in your comfort: yea, and exceedingly
he more joyed we for the joy of Titus, because his spirit was

o him of you, I am not ashamed;
 spake all things to you in truth, even so our boasting,
 is found a truth.
affection is more abundant toward you, whilst he
ll, how with fear and trembling ye
ed him.
 have confidence in you in all things.
8:1 Moreover, brethren, we do you to wit of the grace of God bestowed
es of Macedonia; 8:2 How that in a great trial of
 joy and their deep poverty abounded
 the riches of their liberality.
r to their power, I bear record, yea, and beyond their power
hemselves; 8:4 Praying us with much intreaty
ke upon us the fellowship of the
ing to the saints.
d, not as we hoped, but first gave their own
 will of God.
red Titus, that as he had begun, so he would
.
thing, in faith, and utterance,
edge, and in all diligence, and in your love to us, see that
e also.
 but by occasion of the forwardness of
hers, and to prove the sincerity of your love.
ord Jesus Christ, that, though he
h, yet for your sakes he became poor, that ye through his

s is expedient for you, who
fore, not only to do, but also to be forward a year ago.
rm the doing of it; that as there was a
eadiness to will, so there may be a performance also out of that
8:12 For if there be first a willing mind, it is accepted according to
ath, and not according to that he hath not.
 eased, and ye burdened: 8:14 But
quality, that now at this time your abundance may be a supply
their abundance also may be a supply for your
5 As it is written, He that had
much had nothing over; and he that had gathered little had no
nks be to God, which put the same earnest care into the
8:17 For indeed he accepted the exhortation; but being more forward,
ord he went unto you.
sent with him the brother, whose praise is in the
s; 8:19 And not that only, but who
so chosen of the churches to travel with us with this grace,
by us to the glory of the same Lord, and
declaration of your ready mind: 8:20 Avoiding this, that no man should
this abundance which is administered by us: 8:21 Providing
nly in the sight of the Lord, but also in the
t with them our brother, whom we have oftentimes
t now much more diligent, upon the
confidence which I have in you.
ether any do enquire of Titus, he is my partner and
 our brethren be enquired of, they are
e messengers of the churches, and the glory of Christ.
them, and before the churches, the proof of
behalf.
ring to the saints, it is superfluous
 me to write to you: 9:2 For I know the forwardness of your mind,
 of you to them of Macedonia, that Achaia was ready a
provoked very many.
 the brethren, lest our boasting of you should be
I said, ye may be ready: 9:4 Lest
f they of Macedonia come with me, and find you unprepared, we
 should be ashamed in this same confident
ecessary to exhort the brethren, that they
forehand your bounty, whereof
ce before, that the same might be ready, as a matter of
ousness.
oweth sparingly shall reap also
; and he which soweth bountifully shall reap also
ording as he purposeth in his heart, so let him give;
ty: for God loveth a cheerful giver.
8 And God is able to make all grace abound toward you; that ye,
ufficiency in all things, may abound to every good
hath dispersed abroad; he hath given
he poor: his righteousness remaineth for ever.
to the sower both minister bread for
 food, and multiply your seed sown, and increase the fruits of
 9:11 Being enriched in every thing to all
thanksgiving to God.
istration of this service not only supplieth the
t also by many thanksgivings unto
13 Whiles by the experiment of this ministration they glorify
d subjection unto the gospel of Christ, and for
, and unto all men; 9:14 And by
yer for you, which long after you for the exceeding grace of
anks be unto God for his unspeakable gift.
the meekness and gentleness of
o in presence am base among you, but being absent am bold
seech you, that I may not be bold when I am
 I think to be bold against
hink of us as if we walked according to the flesh.
 flesh, we do not war after the flesh:
:4 (For the weapons of our warfare are not carnal, but mighty
lling down of strong holds;) 10:5 Casting down
hat exalteth itself against the
 of God, and bringing into captivity every thought to the
 And having in a readiness to revenge all
illed.
the outward appearance? If any man
to himself that he is Christ's, let him of himself think this
 Christ's, even so are we Christ's.
8 For though I should boast somewhat more of our authority, which
en us for edification, and not for your destruction,
That I may not seem as if I would
 you by letters.
 say they, are weighty and powerful; but his
h contemptible.
hink this, that, such as we are in word by
 be also in deed when we are
10:12 For we dare not make ourselves of the number, or compare
that commend themselves: but they measuring
 themselves among themselves,
e.
s without our measure, but
he measure of the rule which God hath distributed to us,
to you.
ves beyond our measure, as though we
hed not unto you: for we are come as far as to you also in
Christ: 10:15 Not boasting of things without
abours; but having hope, when
is increased, that we shall be enlarged by you according to
:16 To preach the gospel in the regions beyond
's line of things made ready to

ory in the Lord.
commendeth himself is approved, but whom the
ye could bear with me a little in my folly: and
am jealous over you with godly jealousy: for I have
at I may present you as a chaste virgin
o Christ.
means, as the serpent beguiled Eve
h his subtilty, so your minds should be corrupted from the
rist.
eth another Jesus, whom we have not
hed, or if ye receive another spirit, which ye have not received,
, which ye have not accepted, ye might well bear with
was not a whit behind the very chiefest apostles.
eech, yet not in knowledge; but we have
een throughly made manifest among you in all things.
ence in abasing myself that ye might be
xalted, because I have preached to you the gospel of God freely?
r churches, taking wages of them, to do you service.
with you, and wanted, I was chargeable to
the brethren which came from
pplied: and in all things I have kept myself from being
 will I keep myself.
 of Christ is in me, no man shall stop me of this
.
ot? God knoweth.
hat I will do, that I may cut off occasion from
erein they glory, they may be found
as we.
s, deceitful workers, transforming
lves into the apostles of Christ.
 And no marvel; for Satan himself is transformed into an angel of
herefore it is no great thing if his ministers also be
 of righteousness; whose end shall be
ording to their works.
n, Let no man think me a fool; if otherwise, yet as a
oast myself a little.
I speak, I speak it not after the Lord, but as it
e of boasting.
lory after the flesh, I will glory also.

 ye yourselves are wise.
uffer, if a man bring you into bondage, if a man devour
if a man exalt himself, if a man smite you
ing reproach, as though we had been weak.
ak foolishly,) I am bold
re they Hebrews? so am I. Are they Israelites? so am I. Are
m? so am I.
 Christ? (I speak as a fool) I am more; in
measure, in prisons more
ths oft.
eceived I forty stripes save one.
 Thrice was I beaten with rods, once was I stoned, thrice I
ight and a day I have been in the deep; 11:26
ters, in perils of robbers, in
mine own countrymen, in perils by the heathen, in perils in
the wilderness, in perils in the sea, in perils
iness and painfulness, in watchings
, in hunger and thirst, in fastings often, in cold and nakedness.
ose things that are without, that which cometh upon me
hurches.
t weak? who is offended, and I burn not?
11:30 If I must needs glory, I will glory of the things which concern
ies.
rd Jesus Christ, which is blessed
rmore, knoweth that I lie not.
 Damascus the governor under Aretas the king kept the city of
 garrison, desirous to apprehend me: 11:33 And
et down by the wall, and escaped
s.
tless to glory. I will come to
d revelations of the Lord.
a man in Christ above fourteen years ago, (whether in the
hether out of the body, I cannot tell: God
hird heaven.
, (whether in the body, or out of the body,
hat he was caught up into
eard unspeakable words, which it is not lawful for a
an one will I glory: yet of myself I will not glory, but
:6 For though I would desire to glory, I shall not be a fool; for I
uth: but now I forbear, lest any man should think of me
e to be, or that he heareth of me.
 And lest I should be exalted above measure through the abundance
s, there was given to me a thorn in the flesh, the
 lest I should be exalted above

 thrice, that it might depart

ficient for thee: for my
 perfect in weakness. Most gladly therefore will I
that the power of Christ may rest upon
.
firmities, in reproaches, in
 in persecutions, in distresses for Christ's sake: for
rong.
ing; ye have compelled me: for I
 have been commended of you: for in nothing am I behind the
 though I be nothing.
igns of an apostle were wrought among you in all
nd mighty deeds.
herein ye were inferior to other churches,
nsome to you? forgive me this
2:14 Behold, the third time I am ready to come to you; and I will not
 to you: for I seek not your's but you: for the children
e parents, but the parents for the children.
nd be spent for you; though the
dantly I love you, the less I be loved.

 nevertheless, being crafty,
 with guile.
 you by any of them whom I sent unto you?
t a brother. Did Titus make a
? walked we not in the same spirit? walked we not in the
think ye that we excuse ourselves unto you?
o all things, dearly beloved,
ifying.
come, I shall not find you such as I
d, and that I shall be found unto you such as ye would not: lest
envyings, wraths, strifes, backbitings, whisperings,
lest, when I come again, my God will
le me among you, and that I shall bewail many which have sinned
ot repented of the uncleanness and fornication and
ommitted.
 am coming to you. In the mouth of two or
lished.
etell you, as if I were present, the
nd time; and being absent now I write to them which heretofore
all other, that, if I come again, I will not
hrist speaking in me, which to
s not weak, but is mighty in you.
For though he was crucified through weakness, yet he liveth by
r we also are weak in him, but we shall live with
u.
be in the faith; prove your own
now ye not your own selves, how that Jesus Christ is in you,
s?  13:6 But I trust that ye shall know that we
ray to God that ye do no evil; not that we should appear
ld do that which is honest, though we be as
ng against the truth, but for the truth.

and ye are strong: and this
 even your perfection.
I write these things being absent, lest being present
ding to the power which the Lord hath
en me to edification, and not to destruction.
Be perfect, be of good comfort, be
 mind, live in peace; and the God of love and peace shall be
et one another with an holy kiss.
 All the saints salute you.
race of the Lord Jesus Christ, and the love of God, and the
host, be with you all. Amen.
Epistle of Paul the Apostle to the Galatians
 neither by man, but by Jesus
 God the Father, who raised him from the dead;) 1:2 And all
with me, unto the churches of Galatia: 1:3
ather, and from our Lord Jesus
4 Who gave himself for our sins, that he might deliver us
rld, according to the will of God and our
 ever. Amen.
o soon removed from him that called you into
l: 1:7 Which is not another; but
 some that trouble you, and would pervert the gospel of
e, or an angel from heaven, preach any other gospel
e preached unto you, let him be

ain, if any man preach any other
nto you than that ye have received, let him be accursed.
de men, or God? or do I seek to please men?
be the servant of Christ.
rtify you, brethren, that the gospel which was preached
1:12 For I neither received it of man, neither was I taught it, but by
on of Jesus Christ.
ard of my conversation in time past in the Jews'
I persecuted the church of God, and
d it: 1:14 And profited in the Jews' religion above many my
on, being more exceedingly zealous of the
n it pleased God, who separated me from my mother's womb,
e, 1:16 To reveal his Son in me, that I might
tely I conferred not with flesh
: 1:17 Neither went I up to Jerusalem to them which were
went into Arabia, and returned again unto
I went up to Jerusalem to see Peter, and
abode with him fifteen days.
ther of the apostles saw I none, save James the Lord's
ngs which I write unto you, behold, before God, I lie
e into the regions of Syria and Cilicia; 1:22 And
ches of Judaea which were in Christ:
 But they had heard only, That he which persecuted us in times
he faith which once he destroyed.
And they glorified God in me.
fourteen years after I went up again to Jerusalem with
h me also.
ion, and communicated unto them that
el which I preach among the Gentiles, but privately to them which
n, lest by any means I should run, or had run, in
ho was with me, being a Greek, was compelled
e of false brethren unawares
who came in privily to spy out our liberty which we have
 might bring us into bondage: 2:5 To whom we
an hour; that the truth of the
ht continue with you.
who seemed to be somewhat, (whatsoever they were, it
cepteth no man's person:) for they who
emed to be somewhat in conference added nothing to me: 2:7 But
hey saw that the gospel of the uncircumcision was
of the circumcision was unto Peter;
For he that wrought effectually in Peter to the apostleship of
e same was mighty in me toward the Gentiles:) 2:9
 who seemed to be pillars, perceived
grace that was given unto me, they gave to me and Barnabas the
wship; that we should go unto the heathen, and
Only they would that we should remember the poor; the same which
 to do.
 Antioch, I withstood him to the face,
cause he was to be blamed.
ore that certain came from James, he did eat with the
come, he withdrew and separated himself,
fearing them which were of the circumcision.
ikewise with him; insomuch that
also was carried away with their dissimulation.
ked not uprightly according to the
of the gospel, I said unto Peter before them all, If thou, being
r the manner of Gentiles, and not as do the Jews,
to live as do the Jews?  2:15 We who
Jews by nature, and not sinners of the Gentiles, 2:16 Knowing that
tified by the works of the law, but by the faith of
eved in Jesus Christ, that we might be
stified by the faith of Christ, and not by the works of the law: for
f the law shall no flesh be justified.
2:17 But if, while we seek to be justified by Christ, we ourselves
inners, is therefore Christ the minister of sin? God
 again the things which I destroyed, I make myself
rough the law am dead to the law, that I might live unto
d with Christ: neverthless I live; yet not I, but
 which I now live in the flesh I live
the faith of the Son of God, who loved me, and gave himself for me.
 frustrate the grace of God: for if righteousness come by
ead in vain.
ho hath bewitched you, that ye should not
hrist hath been evidently set
ified among you?  3:2 This only would I learn of you,
 works of the law, or by the hearing of
aith?  3:3 Are ye so foolish? having begun in the Spirit, are ye now
y the flesh?  3:4 Have ye suffered so many things in

the Spirit, and worketh
u, doeth he it by the works of the law, or by the
raham believed God, and it was
to him for righteousness.
herefore that they which are of faith, the same are the
 And the scripture, foreseeing that God would justify the heathen
eached before the gospel unto Abraham, saying, In
.
e blessed with faithful Abraham.
or as many as are of the works of the law are under the curse:
ursed is every one that continueth not in all
of the law to do them.
 man is justified by the law in the sight of God, it
l live by faith.
t of faith: but, The man that doeth them shall
deemed us from the curse of the law, being made a
Cursed is every one that hangeth on a
e: 3:14 That the blessing of Abraham might come on the Gentiles
t; that we might receive the promise of the Spirit
 I speak after the manner of men; Though it be but a
onfirmed, no man disannulleth, or addeth
thereto.
ed were the promises made. He saith not,
And to seeds, as of many; but as of one, And to thy seed, which is
And this I say, that the covenant, that was confirmed before of
law, which was four hundred and thirty years after,
 make the promise of none effect.
For if the inheritance be of the law, it is no more of promise:
Abraham by promise.
 serveth the law? It was added because of
 to whom the promise was
 ordained by angels in the hand of a mediator.
tor of one, but God is one.
 law then against the promises of God? God forbid: for if
n which could have given life, verily
hteousness should have been by the law.

 under sin, that the promise
Jesus Christ might be given to them that believe.
were kept under the law, shut up unto
 faith which should afterwards be revealed.
master to bring us unto Christ,
ight be justified by faith.
ter that faith is come, we are no longer under a
ll the children of God by faith in Christ Jesus.
been baptized into Christ have put on
ist.
k, there is neither bond nor free,
is neither male nor female: for ye are all one in Christ Jesus.
 Christ's, then are ye Abraham's seed, and heirs
ow I say, That the heir, as long as he is a child, differeth
, though he be lord of all; 4:2 But is under
pointed of the father.
when we were children, were in bondage under the
n the fulness of the time was come,
ent forth his Son, made of a woman, made under the law, 4:5 To
e under the law, that we might receive the
are sons, God hath sent forth the Spirit of his Son
 Father.
 a servant, but a son; and if a son,
 an heir of God through Christ.
beit then, when ye knew not God, ye did service unto them which
ds.
wn God, or rather are known of God,
urn ye again to the weak and beggarly elements, whereunto ye
bondage?  4:10 Ye observe days, and months, and
id of you, lest I have bestowed upon you labour in vain.
 you, be as I am; for I am as ye are: ye have
w how through infirmity of the flesh I preached the gospel

lesh ye despised not, nor
eceived me as an angel of God, even as Christ Jesus.
edness ye spake of? for I bear you record,
have plucked out your own
given them to me.
ecome your enemy, because I tell you the truth?
 not well; yea, they would exclude
hat ye might affect them.
s good to be zealously affected always in a good thing,
ent with you.
of whom I travail in birth again until Christ
 present with you now, and to
oice; for I stand in doubt of you.
 Tell me, ye that desire to be under the law, do ye not hear the
is written, that Abraham had two sons, the one by a
man.
an was born after the flesh; but he
e freewoman was by promise.
things are an allegory: for these are the two covenants;
ai, which gendereth to bondage, which is
Agar.
 in Arabia, and answereth to
ich now is, and is in bondage with her children.
e is free, which is the mother of us

barren that bearest not; break
cry, thou that travailest not: for the desolate hath many
ich hath an husband.
ren, as Isaac was, are the children of promise.
 after the flesh persecuted him that
born after the Spirit, even so it is now.
ure? Cast out the bondwoman and
for the son of the bondwoman shall not be heir with the son
31 So then, brethren, we are not children of the bondwoman, but of
 Stand fast therefore in the liberty wherewith Christ hath made us
 entangled again with the yoke of bondage.
if ye be circumcised, Christ
 you nothing.
o every man that is circumcised, that he is a
rist is become of no effect unto you, whosoever of you are
 are fallen from grace.
ugh the Spirit wait for the hope of righteousness by
ist neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor
rketh by love.
 did hinder you that ye should not obey the
of him that calleth you.
eaven leaveneth the whole lump.
have confidence in you through the Lord, that ye will be none
 he that troubleth you shall bear his judgment,
thren, if I yet preach circumcision, why do I yet
ffence of the cross ceased.
d they were even cut off which trouble you.
ed unto liberty; only use not
 an occasion to the flesh, but by love serve one another.
 fulfilled in one word, even in this; Thou
5:15 But if ye bite and devour one another, take heed that ye be not
f another.
n the Spirit, and ye shall not fulfil the
lusteth against the Spirit, and the Spirit against
y the one to the other: so that ye
 do the things that ye would.
if ye be led of the Spirit, ye are not under the law.
lesh are manifest, which are these;
ery, fornication, uncleanness, lasciviousness, 5:20 Idolatry,
ariance, emulations, wrath, strife, seditions,
unkenness, revellings, and such
the which I tell you before, as I have also told you in time
do such things shall not inherit the kingdom of
pirit is love, joy, peace, longsuffering,
s, temperance: against such
aw.
e crucified the flesh with the
 and lusts.
it, let us also walk in the Spirit.
6 Let us not be desirous of vain glory, provoking one another,

 a fault, ye which are
 such an one in the spirit of meekness; considering
ted.
 and so fulfil the law of Christ.
or if a man think himself to be something, when he is nothing, he
.
ork, and then shall he have
himself alone, and not in another.
For every man shall bear his own burden.

ommunicate unto him that
good things.
s not mocked: for whatsoever a man soweth,
hat soweth to his flesh shall of the flesh reap
he Spirit shall of the Spirit reap
verlasting.
 in well doing: for in due season we shall
e therefore opportunity, let us do good unto all men,
of the household of faith.
how large a letter I have written unto you with mine own
esire to make a fair shew in the flesh, they
lest they should suffer
he cross of Christ.
ey themselves who are circumcised keep the law; but
 that they may glory in your flesh.
4 But God forbid that I should glory, save in the cross of our Lord
y whom the world is crucified unto me, and I unto the
Jesus neither circumcision availeth any thing, nor
re.
to this rule, peace be on them, and
, and upon the Israel of God.
 henceforth let no man trouble me: for I bear in my body the
s.
 Jesus Christ be with your spirit.
.
 to the Ephesians
e of Jesus Christ by the will of God, to the
e faithful in Christ Jesus:
to you, and peace, from God our Father, and from the Lord
sed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, who hath
iritual blessings in heavenly places in Christ:
in him before the foundation of the
, that we should be holy and without blame before him in love:
ated us unto the adoption of children by Jesus
good pleasure of his will, 1:6 To
ise of the glory of his grace, wherein he hath made us accepted
1:7 In whom we have redemption through his blood, the forgiveness of
g to the riches of his grace; 1:8 Wherein he hath
and prudence; 1:9 Having made known
us the mystery of his will, according to his good pleasure which
n himself: 1:10 That in the dispensation of the
gether in one all things in Christ,
which are in heaven, and which are on earth; even in him: 1:11 In
 obtained an inheritance, being predestinated
orketh all things after the
s own will: 1:12 That we should be to the praise of his
 Christ.
after that ye heard the word of truth,
e gospel of your salvation: in whom also after that ye believed, ye
h that holy Spirit of promise, 1:14 Which is the
he redemption of the purchased
, unto the praise of his glory.
erefore I also, after I heard of your faith in the Lord Jesus,
e saints, 1:16 Cease not to give thanks for you,
s; 1:17 That the God of our Lord
rist, the Father of glory, may give unto you the spirit of
 the knowledge of him: 1:18 The eyes of your
ye may know what is the hope of
ng, and what the riches of the glory of his inheritance in
t is the exceeding greatness of his power to
working of his mighty power,
e wrought in Christ, when he raised him from the dead, and
 hand in the heavenly places, 1:21 Far above
, and dominion, and every name
med, not only in this world, but also in that which is to
ll things under his feet, and gave him to be
, 1:23 Which is his body, the
him that filleth all in all.
u hath he quickened, who were dead in trespasses and sins;
 ye walked according to the course of this
wer of the air, the spirit
th in the children of disobedience: 2:3 Among whom also
 in times past in the lusts of our flesh,
f the mind; and were by
en of wrath, even as others.
d, who is rich in mercy, for his great love wherewith he
 were dead in sins, hath quickened us
ether with Christ, (by grace ye are saved;) 2:6 And hath raised us
 made us sit together in heavenly places in Christ
ome he might shew the exceeding riches
 his grace in his kindness toward us through Christ Jesus.
e saved through faith; and that not of
urselves: it is the gift of God: 2:9 Not of works, lest any man
10 For we are his workmanship, created in Christ Jesus unto good
ath before ordained that we should walk in them.
 being in time past Gentiles in the
, who are called Uncircumcision by that which is called the
sh made by hands; 2:12 That at that time ye
the commonwealth of Israel, and
 from the covenants of promise, having no hope, and without
But now in Christ Jesus ye who sometimes were
 Christ.
hath made both one, and hath broken down
the middle wall of partition between us; 2:15 Having abolished in his
ity, even the law of commandments contained in
f twain one new man, so making
6 And that he might reconcile both unto God in one body by
the enmity thereby: 2:17 And came and preached
d to them that were nigh.
ugh him we both have access by one Spirit unto the
 are no more strangers and foreigners, but
he household of God; 2:20 And
pon the foundation of the apostles and prophets, Jesus
ef corner stone; 2:21 In whom all the
lding fitly framed together groweth unto an holy temple in the
e also are builded together for an habitation of
 this cause I Paul, the prisoner of Jesus Christ for you
eard of the dispensation of the grace of God
 that by revelation he made
 the mystery; (as I wrote afore in few words, 3:4
erstand my knowledge in the mystery
rist) 3:5 Which in other ages was not made known unto the sons of
 revealed unto his holy apostles and prophets by the
should be fellowheirs, and of the same
dy, and partakers of his promise in Christ by the gospel: 3:7
minister, according to the gift of the grace of
working of his power.
am less than the least of all saints, is this grace
ng the Gentiles the unsearchable riches
f Christ; 3:9 And to make all men see what is the fellowship of the
from the beginning of the world hath been hid in God,
us Christ: 3:10 To the intent that now
to the principalities and powers in heavenly places might be known
e manifold wisdom of God, 3:11 According to the
n Christ Jesus our Lord: 3:12 In
have boldness and access with confidence by the faith of him.
sire that ye faint not at my tribulations for you,
 this cause I bow my knees unto the Father of our Lord Jesus
he whole family in heaven and earth is named,
ng to the riches of his glory, to
ngthened with might by his Spirit in the inner man; 3:17 That
our hearts by faith; that ye, being rooted and
o comprehend with all saints what
breadth, and length, and depth, and height; 3:19 And to know
ich passeth knowledge, that ye might be filled
 Now unto him that is able to do exceeding abundantly above all
k, according to the power that worketh in us, 3:21
by Christ Jesus throughout all ages,
d without end. Amen.
he prisoner of the Lord, beseech you that ye walk
ye are called, 4:2 With all lowliness
 meekness, with longsuffering, forbearing one another in love; 4:3
keep the unity of the Spirit in the bond of peace.
 Spirit, even as ye are called in one
e of your calling; 4:5 One Lord, one faith, one baptism, 4:6 One
all, who is above all, and through all, and in you
f us is given grace according to the measure
e he saith, When he ascended up on high, he led captivity
nto men.
t is it but that he also descended first
into the lower parts of the earth?  4:10 He that descended is the same
cended up far above all heavens, that he might fill all
some, apostles; and some, prophets; and
ome, evangelists; and some, pastors and teachers; 4:12 For the
ints, for the work of the ministry, for the
ll we all come in the unity of
 and of the knowledge of the Son of God, unto a perfect man,
e stature of the fulness of Christ: 4:14 That we
ssed to and fro, and carried about
very wind of doctrine, by the sleight of men, and cunning
lie in wait to deceive; 4:15 But speaking the
n all things, which is the head,
ist: 4:16 From whom the whole body fitly joined together and
h every joint supplieth, according to the
 part, maketh increase of the
he edifying of itself in love.
s I say therefore, and testify in the Lord, that ye henceforth
ntiles walk, in the vanity of their mind, 4:18
eing alienated from the life of
gh the ignorance that is in them, because of the blindness of
 being past feeling have given themselves over
leanness with greediness.
ave not so learned Christ; 4:21 If so be that ye have
ht by him, as the truth is in Jesus: 4:22
versation the old man, which
ccording to the deceitful lusts; 4:23 And be renewed in
24 And that ye put on the new man, which
after God is created in righteousness and true holiness.
way lying, speak every man truth with his
her.
 not the sun go down upon your
7 Neither give place to the devil.
 Let him that stole steal no more: but rather let him labour,
s the thing which is good, that he may have to
t no corrupt communication proceed out of your mouth, but that
 use of edifying, that it may minister grace unto
ot the holy Spirit of God, whereby ye are sealed unto
1 Let all bitterness, and wrath, and anger, and clamour, and evil
away from you, with all malice: 4:32 And be ye kind
forgiving one another, even as God for
rist's sake hath forgiven you.
e therefore followers of God, as dear children; 5:2 And walk
o hath loved us, and hath given himself for us
or a sweetsmelling savour.
ication, and all uncleanness, or covetousness, let it not
as becometh saints; 5:4 Neither filthiness,
 are not convenient: but rather
 thanks.
whoremonger, nor unclean person, nor
tous man, who is an idolater, hath any inheritance in the kingdom
God.
in words: for because of these
eth the wrath of God upon the children of disobedience.
artakers with them.
etimes darkness, but now are ye light in the Lord:
For the fruit of the Spirit is in all
dness and righteousness and truth;) 5:10 Proving what is acceptable

fruitful works of darkness, but
prove them.
 to speak of those things which are done of
that are reproved are made manifest by the light:
 is light.
ke thou that sleepest, and arise from the

, not as fools, but as wise,
ng the time, because the days are evil.

rstanding what the will of

 is excess; but be filled with
; 5:19 Speaking to yourselves in psalms and hymns and
making melody in your heart to the Lord;
5:20 Giving thanks always for all things unto God and the Father in
 Lord Jesus Christ; 5:21 Submitting yourselves one to

own husbands, as unto the
or the husband is the head of the wife, even as Christ is the
nd he is the saviour of the body.
Therefore as the church is subject unto Christ, so let the wives
sbands in every thing.
ove your wives, even as Christ also loved the church,
 That he might sanctify and cleanse it
th the washing of water by the word, 5:27 That he might present it
rious church, not having spot, or wrinkle, or any such
 holy and without blemish.
t men to love their wives as their own bodies. He that
lf.
own flesh; but nourisheth and
it, even as the Lord the church: 5:30 For we are members of
 and of his bones.
shall a man leave his father and mother, and shall
y two shall be one flesh.
a great mystery: but I speak concerning Christ and the
 let every one of you in particular so love his wife
see that she reverence her husband.
 Children, obey your parents in the Lord: for this is right.
r and mother; which is the first commandment with
with thee, and thou mayest live long
he earth.
not your children to wrath: but bring
m up in the nurture and admonition of the Lord.
 that are your masters according to
lesh, with fear and trembling, in singleness of your heart, as
 with eyeservice, as menpleasers; but as the
God from the heart; 6:7 With
ing service, as to the Lord, and not to men: 6:8 Knowing
 any man doeth, the same shall he receive of

 unto them, forbearing
ng that your Master also is in heaven; neither is
.
in the Lord, and in the power of
t.
 that ye may be able to stand
 wiles of the devil.
e not against flesh and blood, but against
the rulers of the darkness of
 against spiritual wickedness in high places.
ole armour of God, that ye may be
 withstand in the evil day, and having done all, to stand.
having your loins girt about with truth, and
ness; 6:15 And your feet shod
eparation of the gospel of peace; 6:16 Above all, taking
with ye shall be able to quench all the
iery darts of the wicked.
 the helmet of salvation, and the sword of the Spirit,
18 Praying always with all prayer and
plication in the Spirit, and watching thereunto with all
ion for all saints; 6:19 And for me, that
y open my mouth boldly, to
 mystery of the gospel, 6:20 For which I am an
may speak boldly, as I ought to

, and how I do, Tychicus, a
er and faithful minister in the Lord, shall make known to
 I have sent unto you for the same purpose,
t he might comfort your hearts.
ace be to the brethren, and love with faith, from God the
 Christ.
at love our Lord Jesus Christ in
y.
he Apostle to the Philippians
l and Timotheus, the servants of Jesus Christ, to all the
ich are at Philippi, with the bishops and
, from God our Father, and
Jesus Christ.
very remembrance of you, 1:4 Always in every
est with joy, 1:5 For your
the gospel from the first day until now; 1:6 Being
at he which hath begun a good work in
 will perform it until the day of Jesus Christ: 1:7 Even as it is
ink this of you all, because I have you in my heart;
and in the defence and confirmation of
e gospel, ye all are partakers of my grace.
 I long after you all in the
sus Christ.
our love may abound yet more and more in
knowledge and in all judgment; 1:10 That ye may approve things that
that ye may be sincere and without offence till the day
lled with the fruits of righteousness, which are by Jesus
d praise of God.
ould understand, brethren, that the things which
ather unto the furtherance of the
 1:13 So that my bonds in Christ are manifest in all the
laces; 1:14 And many of the brethren in the
 much more bold to speak the
 fear.
ven of envy and strife; and some also
good will: 1:16 The one preach Christ of contention, not sincerely,
d affliction to my bonds: 1:17 But the other of love,
 defence of the gospel.
 notwithstanding, every way, whether in pretence, or in
and I therein do rejoice, yea, and will
ejoice.
 turn to my salvation through your
, and the supply of the Spirit of Jesus Christ, 1:20 According
ation and my hope, that in nothing I shall be
as always, so now also Christ
gnified in my body, whether it be by life, or by death.
 Christ, and to die is gain.
f I live in the flesh, this is the fruit of my labour: yet
t not.
t two, having a desire to depart, and
be with Christ; which is far better: 1:24 Nevertheless to abide in
e needful for you.
 confidence, I know that I shall abide and
ce and joy of faith; 1:26 That
cing may be more abundant in Jesus Christ for me by my
 Only let your conversation be as it becometh the gospel of
come and see you, or else be absent, I may hear
 in one spirit, with one mind
gether for the faith of the gospel; 1:28 And in nothing
es: which is to them an evident token of
perdition, but to you of salvation, and that of God.
n in the behalf of Christ, not only to
lieve on him, but also to suffer for his sake; 1:30 Having the same
ye saw in me, and now hear to be in me.

 in Christ, if any comfort of
y fellowship of the Spirit, if any bowels and mercies, 2:2
e be likeminded, having the same love, being
 nothing be done through strife or vainglory; but in lowliness
eem other better than themselves.
ook not every man on his own things, but every man also on the

so in Christ Jesus: 2:6 Who,
 form of God, thought it not robbery to be equal with God:
no reputation, and took upon him the form of a
s of men: 2:8 And being found in
as a man, he humbled himself, and became obedient unto death,
 cross.
hly exalted him, and given him a name
ch is above every name: 2:10 That at the name of Jesus every knee
ings in heaven, and things in earth, and things under
y tongue should confess that Jesus Christ

always obeyed, not as in my
, but now much more in my absence, work out your own
ing.
n you both to will and to do of his
pleasure.
rmurings and disputings: 2:15 That ye may
d, without rebuke, in the
ked and perverse nation, among whom ye shine as lights
orth the word of life; that I may rejoice
 in vain, neither laboured in
17 Yea, and if I be offered upon the sacrifice and service of your
d rejoice with you all.
me cause also do ye joy, and rejoice with me.
to send Timotheus shortly unto you,
I also may be of good comfort, when I know your state.
eminded, who will naturally care for your
t the things which are Jesus Christ's.
2:22 But ye know the proof of him, that, as a son with the father, he
ith me in the gospel.
e I hope to send presently, so soon as I shall see
But I trust in the Lord that I also myself shall come shortly.
d it necessary to send to you Epaphroditus, my
d fellowsoldier, but your
he that ministered to my wants.
r he longed after you all, and was full of heaviness, because
t he had been sick.
was sick nigh unto death: but God had mercy on him;
also, lest I should have sorrow upon
ow.
carefully, that, when ye see him
e may rejoice, and that I may be the less sorrowful.
n the Lord with all gladness; and hold
ch in reputation: 2:30 Because for the work of Christ he was nigh
egarding his life, to supply your lack of service
thren, rejoice in the Lord. To write the same
ievous, but for you it is safe.
are of dogs, beware of evil workers, beware of the concision.
circumcision, which worship God in the spirit, and
e no confidence in the flesh.
h I might also have confidence in the flesh. If any other man
 whereof he might trust in the flesh, I more: 3:5
e stock of Israel, of the tribe of
in, an Hebrew of the Hebrews; as touching the law, a Pharisee;
 persecuting the church; touching the
hteousness which is in the law, blameless.
hose I counted loss for Christ.
 doubtless, and I count all things but loss for the excellency
Christ Jesus my Lord: for whom I have suffered the
 them but dung, that I may win Christ,
9 And be found in him, not having mine own righteousness, which is
that which is through the faith of Christ, the
th: 3:10 That I may know him, and
er of his resurrection, and the fellowship of his sufferings,
e unto his death; 3:11 If by any means I might
dead.
attained, either were already
t I follow after, if that I may apprehend that for which
hrist Jesus.
 myself to have apprehended: but this one
 are behind, and reaching
e things which are before, 3:14 I press toward the mark
alling of God in Christ Jesus.
 us therefore, as many as be perfect, be thus minded: and if
erwise minded, God shall reveal even this unto
e have already attained, let us walk by
he same rule, let us mind the same thing.
 me, and mark them which walk
ve us for an ensample.
alk, of whom I have told you often, and now tell you
e enemies of the cross of Christ: 3:19
ose end is destruction, whose God is their belly, and whose glory is
, who mind earthly things.)  3:20 For our conversation
so we look for the Saviour, the Lord Jesus
ody, that it may be fashioned
is glorious body, according to the working whereby he is
ings unto himself.
ethren dearly beloved and longed for, my joy and
my dearly beloved.
s, and beseech Syntyche, that they be of the same
treat thee also, true yokefellow, help those women which
spel, with Clement also, and with other my
book of life.
lway: and again I say, Rejoice.
 your moderation be known unto all men. The Lord is at hand.
othing; but in every thing by prayer and
supplication with thanksgiving let your requests be made known unto
 the peace of God, which passeth all understanding, shall keep
s through Christ Jesus.
ethren, whatsoever things are true, whatsoever things
 are just, whatsoever things are pure,
atsoever things are lovely, whatsoever things are of good report; if
irtue, and if there be any praise, think on these
h ye have both learned, and received, and heard,
 peace shall be with you.
joiced in the Lord greatly, that now at the last your
ain; wherein ye were also careful, but ye
eak in respect of want: for I have learned, in
be content.
abased, and I know how to abound: every
here and in all things I am instructed both to be full and to be
ound and to suffer need.
all things through Christ which strengtheneth me.
ll done, that ye did communicate with
affliction.
w also, that in the beginning of the
el, when I departed from Macedonia, no church communicated with me
ving and receiving, but ye only.
or even in Thessalonica ye sent once and again unto my
se I desire a gift: but I desire fruit that may abound
 I have all, and abound: I am full, having received of
h were sent from you, an odour of a sweet
ng to God.
 all your need according to his riches in
od and our Father be glory for ever and ever. Amen.
rist Jesus. The brethren which are with
e greet you.
 you, chiefly they that are of Caesar's
ousehold.
sus Christ be with you all. Amen.

lossians
us Christ by the will of God,
us our brother, 1:2  To the saints and faithful brethren
osse: Grace be unto you, and peace,
God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.
er of our Lord Jesus Christ, praying
ys for you,
aith in Christ Jesus, and of the love which ye
e hope which is laid up for you in heaven, whereof ye heard
he truth of the gospel;
e unto you, as it is in all the world; and bringeth forth
 you, since the day ye heard of it, and knew the
 also learned of Epaphras our dear fellowservant, who is for you
r of Christ;
us your love in the Spirit.
is cause we also, since the day we heard it, do not cease to
esire that ye might be filled with the knowledge of his
itual understanding;
walk worthy of the Lord unto all pleasing, being
ncreasing in the knowledge of God;
Strengthened with all might, according to his glorious power, unto
 longsuffering with joyfulness;
ing thanks unto the Father, which hath made us meet to be
nce of the saints in light:
h delivered us from the power of darkness, and hath translated
of his dear Son:
demption through his blood, even the forgiveness of
f the invisible God, the firstborn of every
ings created, that are in heaven, and that are
ther they be thrones, or dominions, or
incipalities, or powers: all things were created by him, and for him:
is before all things, and by him all things consist.
the body, the church: who is the beginning, the
l things he might have the preeminence.

im should all fulness dwell;
aving made peace through the blood of his cross, by him to
o himself; by him, I say, whether they be things in
1:21  And you, that were sometime alienated and enemies in your mind by
s, yet now hath he reconciled
e body of his flesh through death, to present you holy and
eable in his sight:
in the faith grounded and settled, and be not moved
l, which ye have heard, and which was preached
ven; whereof I Paul am made a minister;
:24  Who now rejoice in my sufferings for you, and fill up that which is
the afflictions of Christ in my flesh for his body's sake, which is
25  Whereof I am made a minister, according to the dispensation of God
en to me for you, to fulfil the word of God;
 hid from ages and from generations,
now is made manifest to his saints:
 To whom God would make known what is the riches of the glory of this
 the Gentiles; which is Christ in you, the hope of glory:
ning every man, and teaching every man in all
 perfect in Christ Jesus:
 I also labour, striving according to his working, which

conflict I have for you, and for
Laodicea, and for as many as have not seen my face in the flesh;
arts might be comforted, being knit together in love, and
ll assurance of understanding, to the
nowledgement of the mystery of God, and of the Father, and of Christ;
are hid all the treasures of wisdom and knowledge.
man should beguile you with enticing words.
esh, yet am I with you in the spirit,
ing and beholding your order, and the stedfastness of your faith in
 As ye have therefore received Christ Jesus the Lord, so walk ye in
ed and built up in him, and stablished in the faith, as ye have
ing therein with thanksgiving.
are lest any man spoil you through philosophy and vain deceit,
of men, after the rudiments of the world, and not after
dwelleth all the fulness of the Godhead bodily.
 which is the head of all principality and
cised with the circumcision made without
hands, in putting off the body of the sins of the flesh by the circumcision
st:
rein also ye are risen with him
he faith of the operation of God, who hath raised him from the dead.
u, being dead in your sins and the uncircumcision of your
together with him, having forgiven you all
writing of ordinances that was against us, which
t of the way, nailing it to his cross;
15  And having spoiled principalities and powers, he made a shew of them
iumphing over them in it.
man therefore judge you in meat, or in drink, or in respect of
e new moon, or of the sabbath days:
 Which are a shadow of things to come; but the body is of Christ.
n beguile you of your reward in a voluntary humility and
ruding into those things which he hath not seen,
nd,
which all the body by joints and bands
ving nourishment ministered, and knit together, increaseth with the
.
rist from the rudiments of the world,
, as though living in the world, are ye subject to ordinances,
ste not; handle not;
to perish with the using;) after the commandments and
h things have indeed a shew of wisdom in will worship, and
 of the body: not in any honour to the satisfying
be risen with Christ, seek those things which are above,
e right hand of God.
ction on things above, not on things on the earth.
 life is hid with Christ in God.
hen Christ, who is our life, shall appear, then shall ye also appear
ory.
s which are upon the earth; fornication,
uncleanness, inordinate affection, evil concupiscence, and covetousness,
dolatry:
wrath of God cometh on the children of
sobedience:
ked some time, when ye lived in them.
:8  But now ye also put off all these; anger, wrath, malice, blasphemy,
unication out of your mouth.
ot one to another, seeing that ye have put off the old man with
nd have put on the new man, which is renewed in knowledge after the
at created him:
her Greek nor Jew, circumcision nor
cumcision, Barbarian, Scythian, bond nor free: but Christ is all, and in
12  Put on therefore, as the elect of God, holy and beloved, bowels of
dness, humbleness of mind, meekness, longsuffering;
nd forgiving one another, if any man have a
gave you, so also do ye.
e all these things put on charity, which is the bond of
et the peace of God rule in your hearts, to the which also ye
y; and be ye thankful.
rd of Christ dwell in you richly in all wisdom; teaching
r in psalms and hymns and spiritual songs, singing
 Lord.
rd or deed, do all in the name of the Lord
er by him.
es unto your own husbands, as it is fit in the
ives, and be not bitter against them.
:20  Children, obey your parents in all things: for this is well pleasing
Lord.
hildren to anger, lest they be
d.
our masters according to the flesh; not
ith eyeservice, as menpleasers; but in singleness of heart, fearing God;
whatsoever ye do, do it heartily, as to the Lord, and not unto
that of the Lord ye shall receive the reward of the
ord Christ.
ng shall receive for the wrong which he hath
ns.
ts that which is just and equal; knowing
that ye also have a Master in heaven.
:2  Continue in prayer, and watch in the same with thanksgiving;
g also for us, that God would open unto us a door of
y of Christ, for which I am also in bonds:
ught to speak.
rd them that are without, redeeming the time.
grace, seasoned with salt, that ye may
ow how ye ought to answer every man.
7  All my state shall Tychicus declare unto you, who is a beloved
ithful minister and fellowservant in the Lord:
he same purpose, that he might know
estate, and comfort your hearts;
h Onesimus, a faithful and beloved brother, who is one of you. They
n unto you all things which are done here.
luteth you, and Marcus, sister's son
arnabas, (touching whom ye received commandments: if he come unto you,
)
, who are of the circumcision. These
 are my fellowworkers unto the kingdom of God, which have been a comfort

vant of Christ, saluteth you,
uring fervently for you in prayers, that ye may stand perfect and
he will of God.
cord, that he hath a great zeal for you, and them
 Hierapolis.
ysician, and Demas, greet you.
lute the brethren which are in Laodicea, and Nymphas, and the
s house.
 read among you, cause that it be read also
at ye likewise read the epistle from
icea.
heed to the ministry which thou hast
ived in the Lord, that thou fulfil it.
4:18  The salutation by the hand of me Paul. Remember my bonds. Grace be
Amen.
he Apostle to the Thessalonians
aul, and Silvanus, and Timotheus, unto the church of the
God the Father and in the Lord Jesus Christ:
 our Father, and the Lord Jesus

 all, making mention of you in
s; 1:3 Remembering without ceasing your work of faith, and
ence of hope in our Lord Jesus Christ, in the
ing, brethren beloved, your
od.
u in word only, but also in power,
 the Holy Ghost, and in much assurance; as ye know what manner
 you for your sake.
ollowers of us, and of the Lord, having received
joy of the Holy Ghost.
ere ensamples to all that believe in Macedonia and
ded out the word of the Lord not only in
Macedonia and Achaia, but also in every place your faith to God-ward
ad; so that we need not to speak any thing.
at manner of entering in we had
 and how ye turned to God from idols to serve the living and
wait for his Son from heaven, whom he raised
ered us from the wrath to come.
 yourselves, brethren, know our entrance in unto you, that it
But even after that we had suffered before, and
ow, at Philippi, we were bold in
to speak unto you the gospel of God with much contention.
 was not of deceit, nor of uncleanness, nor in
 God to be put in trust with the
even so we speak; not as pleasing men, but God, which trieth
 neither at any time used we flattering words, as ye know, nor
ess; God is witness: 2:6 Nor of men sought we
ers, when we might have been
as the apostles of Christ.
ere gentle among you, even as a nurse cherisheth her
onately desirous of you, we were willing
to have imparted unto you, not the gospel of God only, but also our
use ye were dear unto us.
member, brethren, our labour and travail: for labouring
ould not be chargeable unto any of you, we
2:10 Ye are witnesses, and God also, how holily and justly and
ed ourselves among you that believe: 2:11 As ye
and charged every one of you, as a
 doth his children, 2:12 That ye would walk worthy of God, who
 his kingdom and glory.
ause also thank we God without ceasing, because, when
hich ye heard of us, ye received it not
s the word of men, but as it is in truth, the word of God, which
h also in you that believe.
, brethren, became followers of the churches of God which
esus: for ye also have suffered like things
ve of the Jews: 2:15 Who both
Lord Jesus, and their own prophets, and have persecuted us;
, and are contrary to all men: 2:16 Forbidding
y might be saved, to fill up their
lway: for the wrath is come upon them to the uttermost.
ing taken from you for a short time in
esence, not in heart, endeavoured the more abundantly to see your
esire.
e unto you, even I Paul, once and
but Satan hindered us.
 our hope, or joy, or crown of rejoicing? Are not even
rd Jesus Christ at his coming?  2:20 For
ye are our glory and joy.
 when we could no longer forbear, we thought it good to
2 And sent Timotheus, our brother, and
nister of God, and our fellowlabourer in the gospel of Christ, to
d to comfort you concerning your faith: 3:3 That no
flictions: for yourselves know that we
e appointed thereunto.
when we were with you, we told you before that we
s it came to pass, and ye know.
 this cause, when I could no longer forbear, I sent to know
e means the tempter have tempted you, and our
n Timotheus came from you unto us, and brought us good
arity, and that ye have good remembrance
of us always, desiring greatly to see us, as we also to see you: 3:7
thren, we were comforted over you in all our affliction
 3:8 For now we live, if ye stand fast in
ender to God again for you, for all the
oy wherewith we joy for your sakes before our God; 3:10 Night and day
dingly that we might see your face, and might perfect
 faith?  3:11 Now God himself and our
her, and our Lord Jesus Christ, direct our way unto you.
ou to increase and abound in love one toward
e do toward you: 3:13 To the end
tablish your hearts unblameable in holiness before God, even
ing of our Lord Jesus Christ with all his
h you, brethren, and exhort you by the
rd Jesus, that as ye have received of us how ye ought to walk and to
 ye would abound more and more.
 ye know what commandments we gave you by the Lord Jesus.
l of God, even your sanctification, that ye
at every one of you should know
ssess his vessel in sanctification and honour; 4:5 Not in the
, even as the Gentiles which know not God: 4:6
s brother in any matter: because
 Lord is the avenger of all such, as we also have forewarned
4:7 For God hath not called us unto uncleanness, but unto holiness.
ore that despiseth, despiseth not man, but God, who hath
y Spirit.
 love ye need not that I write unto you:
for ye yourselves are taught of God to love one another.
 toward all the brethren which are in all
that ye increase more and
that ye study to be quiet, and to do your own business,
ands, as we commanded you; 4:12 That ye may
out, and that ye may have lack
.
gnorant, brethren, concerning
are asleep, that ye sorrow not, even as others which have
e believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them
ll God bring with him.
 say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we which
coming of the Lord shall not prevent
 which are asleep.
mself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with
with the trump of God: and the dead in
rist shall rise first: 4:17 Then we which are alive and remain shall
ogether with them in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the
be with the Lord.
t one another with these words.
 of the times and the seasons, brethren, ye have no need that I
5:2 For yourselves know perfectly that the day of the Lord so cometh
the night.
 Peace and safety; then sudden destruction
n with child; and they shall

ss, that that day should
a thief.
 light, and the children of the day: we
re not of the night, nor of darkness.
:6 Therefore let us not sleep, as do others; but let us watch and be
For they that sleep sleep in the night; and they that be drunken
 night.
day, be sober, putting on the
 of faith and love; and for an helmet, the hope of
ot appointed us to wrath, but to obtain salvation by
o died for us, that, whether we wake or
leep, we should live together with him.

r, and edify one another,
 do.
 to know them which labour among
 are over you in the Lord, and admonish you; 5:13 And to
 love for their work's sake. And be at peace
t you, brethren, warn them that are unruly, comfort
eak, be patient toward all men.
e that none render evil for evil unto any man; but ever follow
both among yourselves, and to all men.
5:16 Rejoice evermore.
t ceasing.
nks: for this is the will of God in Christ
 the Spirit.
ngs.
hat which is good.
l appearance of evil.
 God of peace sanctify you wholly; and I pray God
dy be preserved blameless unto the
 of our Lord Jesus Christ.
l is he that calleth you, who also will do it.
6 Greet all the brethren with an holy kiss.
is epistle be read unto all the
hren.
Christ be with you. Amen.
ond Epistle of Paul the Apostle to the Thessalonians
d Timotheus, unto the church of the
alonians in God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ: 1:2 Grace
, from God our Father and the Lord Jesus Christ.
ways for you, brethren, as it is meet,
cause that your faith groweth exceedingly, and the charity of every
toward each other aboundeth; 1:4 So that we ourselves
of God for your patience and faith in all
e endure: 1:5 Which is a
f the righteous judgment of God, that ye may be
d, for which ye also suffer: 1:6
t is a righteous thing with God to recompense tribulation to
 1:7 And to you who are troubled rest with us,
d from heaven with his mighty
 In flaming fire taking vengeance on them that know not
gospel of our Lord Jesus Christ: 1:9 Who
shall be punished with everlasting destruction from the presence of
rom the glory of his power; 1:10 When he shall come to
and to be admired in all them that believe
ieved) in that day.
 we pray always for you, that our God would count
ulfil all the good pleasure of his
ss, and the work of faith with power: 1:12 That the name of our
ay be glorified in you, and ye in him, according to
rd Jesus Christ.
, brethren, by the coming of our Lord Jesus
nto him, 2:2 That ye be not
n mind, or be troubled, neither by spirit, nor by word,
s that the day of Christ is at hand.
3 Let no man deceive you by any means: for that day shall not come,
me a falling away first, and that man of sin be
 Who opposeth and exalteth himself
all that is called God, or that is worshipped; so that he as God
ple of God, shewing himself that he is God.
 yet with you, I told you these
2:6 And now ye know what withholdeth that he might be
For the mystery of iniquity doth already work: only he who now
til he be taken out of the way.
 then shall that Wicked be revealed, whom the Lord shall
 his mouth, and shall destroy with the
ightness of his coming: 2:9 Even him, whose coming is after the
th all power and signs and lying wonders, 2:10 And
hteousness in them that perish;
hey received not the love of the truth, that they might be
his cause God shall send them strong delusion, that they
 That they all might be damned who believed
ghteousness.
ive thanks alway to God for you, brethren
m the beginning chosen you to
hrough sanctification of the Spirit and belief of the
ed you by our gospel, to the obtaining of
15 Therefore, brethren, stand fast, and hold the traditions which ye
ht, whether by word, or our epistle.
16 Now our Lord Jesus Christ himself, and God, even our Father,
, and hath given us everlasting consolation and
rt your hearts, and stablish you in
 good word and work.
ren, pray for us, that the word of the Lord may have
 even as it is with you: 3:2 And that we
may be delivered from unreasonable and wicked men: for all men have
:3 But the Lord is faithful, who shall stablish you, and keep you
 And we have confidence in the Lord touching you, that ye both do
hings which we command you.
 Lord direct your hearts into the love of God, and into the
ist.
in the name of our Lord Jesus
t ye withdraw yourselves from every brother that walketh
the tradition which he received of us.
3:7 For yourselves know how ye ought to follow us: for we behaved not
orderly among you; 3:8 Neither did we eat any man's bread
ith labour and travail night and day, that we
: 3:9 Not because we have not
to make ourselves an ensample unto you to follow us.
ith you, this we commanded you, that if
ny would not work, neither should he eat.
ich walk among you disorderly,
t at all, but are busybodies.
them that are such we command and exhort by our Lord Jesus
ess they work, and eat their own bread.

ll doing.
our word by this epistle, note that man,
and have no company with him, that he may be ashamed.
n enemy, but admonish him as a brother.

ou peace always by all means.
 with you all.
aul with mine own hand, which is the token in
e grace of our Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
f Paul the Apostle to Timothy
l, an apostle of Jesus Christ by the commandment of God our
 Christ, which is our hope; 1:2 Unto Timothy,
, and peace, from God our Father
s Christ our Lord.
ee to abide still at Ephesus, when I went into
 some that they teach no other
1:4 Neither give heed to fables and endless genealogies,
rather than godly edifying which is in
ith: so do.
andment is charity out of a pure heart, and
igned: 1:6 From which some
 have turned aside unto vain jangling; 1:7 Desiring to
rstanding neither what they say, nor
eof they affirm.
he law is good, if a man use it lawfully; 1:9
e for a righteous man, but for
s and disobedient, for the ungodly and for sinners, for
derers of fathers and murderers of mothers,
for them that defile themselves
ind, for menstealers, for liars, for perjured persons, and if
ing that is contrary to sound doctrine; 1:11
e blessed God, which was
trust.
r Lord, who hath enabled me, for that
counted me faithful, putting me into the ministry; 1:13 Who was
, and a persecutor, and injurious: but I obtained
y in unbelief.
r Lord was exceeding abundant with faith and
 This is a faithful saying, and worthy of all acceptation, that
nto the world to save sinners; of whom I am chief.
obtained mercy, that in me first Jesus
rist might shew forth all longsuffering, for a pattern to them which
er believe on him to life everlasting.
1:17 Now unto the King eternal, immortal, invisible, the only wise
nd glory for ever and ever. Amen.
This charge I commit unto thee, son Timothy, according to the
 before on thee, that thou by them mightest war a
 and a good conscience; which some
 put away concerning faith have made shipwreck: 1:20 Of whom is
nder; whom I have delivered unto Satan, that they
1 I exhort therefore, that, first of all, supplications, prayers,
d giving of thanks, be made for all men; 2:2 For
hority; that we may lead a quiet and
eable life in all godliness and honesty.

he sight of God our Saviour;
 have all men to be saved, and to come unto the knowledge
there is one God, and one mediator between God and men, the
ho gave himself a ransom for all, to be
estified in due time.
m ordained a preacher, and an apostle, (I speak the
a teacher of the Gentiles in faith and
rity.
y every where, lifting up holy hands,
hout wrath and doubting.
nner also, that women adorn themselves in modest
obriety; not with broided hair, or
or pearls, or costly array; 2:10 But (which becometh women
th good works.
 in silence with all subjection.
ut I suffer not a woman to teach, nor to usurp authority over
 silence.
d, then Eve.
ived, but the woman being deceived was in
g she shall be saved in childbearing, if they
iness with sobriety.
 saying, If a man desire the office of a bishop, he
bishop then must be blameless, the husband of one wife,
haviour, given to hospitality, apt to
ch; 3:3 Not given to wine, no striker, not greedy of filthy lucre;
 a brawler, not covetous; 3:4 One that ruleth well his
en in subjection with all gravity; 3:5
or if a man know not how to rule his own house, how shall he take
h of God?)  3:6 Not a novice, lest being lifted up
emnation of the devil.
must have a good report of them which are without;
he snare of the devil.
t the deacons be grave, not doubletongued, not given
lthy lucre; 3:9 Holding the mystery of
e faith in a pure conscience.
let these also first be proved; then let them use the office
nd blameless.
ives be grave, not slanderers, sober,
thful in all things.
ns be the husbands of one wife, ruling their

f a deacon well purchase to
good degree, and great boldness in the faith which is in
e things write I unto thee, hoping to come unto thee shortly:
ong, that thou mayest know how thou oughtest to
 which is the church of the living
he pillar and ground of the truth.
 And without controversy great is the mystery of godliness: God
 flesh, justified in the Spirit, seen of angels,
ed on in the world, received up into
y.
y, that in the latter times some
part from the faith, giving heed to seducing spirits, and
Speaking lies in hypocrisy; having their
conscience seared with a hot iron; 4:3 Forbidding to marry, and
in from meats, which God hath created to be
h believe and know the truth.
very creature of God is good, and nothing to be refused, if
nksgiving: 4:5 For it is sanctified by the word
ut the brethren in remembrance of these things, thou
sus Christ, nourished up in the words of
faith and of good doctrine, whereunto thou hast attained.
and old wives' fables, and exercise thyself
y exercise profiteth little: but godliness is profitable
omise of the life that now is, and of that
ful saying and worthy of all acceptation.
uffer reproach, because we
iving God, who is the Saviour of all men, specially of
These things command and teach.
t no man despise thy youth; but be thou an example of the
nversation, in charity, in spirit, in faith,
ttendance to reading, to exhortation, to
doctrine.
t is in thee, which was given thee by
phecy, with the laying on of the hands of the presbytery.
e things; give thyself wholly to them; that thy
6 Take heed unto thyself, and unto the doctrine; continue in them:
s thou shalt both save thyself, and them that hear
, but intreat him as a father; and the younger
 as mothers; the younger as
 all purity.
 widows indeed.
ve children or nephews, let them learn first to
their parents: for that is good and
table before God.
 widow indeed, and desolate, trusteth in God, and
rayers night and day.
liveth in pleasure is dead while she liveth.
 that they may be blameless.
 any provide not for his own, and specially for those of his
ied the faith, and is worse than an infidel.
e number under threescore years
ng been the wife of one man.
reported of for good works; if she have brought up children,
angers, if she have washed the saints' feet, if
 she have diligently followed every
work.
e: for when they have begun to wax
 against Christ, they will marry; 5:12 Having damnation, because
 their first faith.
y learn to be idle, wandering about from house to
tlers also and busybodies, speaking
s which they ought not.
refore that the younger women marry, bear children,
sion to the adversary to speak
lly.
side after Satan.
man that believeth have widows, let them relieve
arged; that it may relieve them that
widows indeed.
 rule well be counted worthy of double honour,
rd and doctrine.
 saith, Thou shalt not muzzle the ox that
is worthy of his reward.
n elder receive not an accusation, but before two or
that sin rebuke before all, that others also may fear.
God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, and the
lect angels, that thou observe these things without preferring one
doing nothing by partiality.
ands suddenly on no man, neither be partaker of other men's
.
 little wine for thy stomach's
hine often infirmities.
 sins are open beforehand, going before to judgment;
.
some are manifest beforehand; and
at are otherwise cannot be hid.
 as many servants as are under the yoke count their own masters
r, that the name of God and his doctrine be not
ve believing masters, let them not despise them,
her do them service, because they
thful and beloved, partakers of the benefit. These things teach
If any man teach otherwise, and consent not to wholesome words,
ur Lord Jesus Christ, and to the doctrine which is
s proud, knowing nothing, but doting
t questions and strifes of words, whereof cometh envy, strife,
sings, 6:5 Perverse disputings of men of corrupt
 supposing that gain is godliness:
uch withdraw thyself.
 with contentment is great gain.
r we brought nothing into this world, and it is certain we can

e therewith content.
will be rich fall into temptation and a snare, and
sts, which drown men in destruction
erdition.
 the root of all evil: which while some
oveted after, they have erred from the faith, and pierced themselves
any sorrows.
d, flee these things; and follow after
ghteousness, godliness, faith, love, patience, meekness.
t of faith, lay hold on eternal life,
reunto thou art also called, and hast professed a good profession
sses.
ght of God, who quickeneth all
d before Christ Jesus, who before Pontius Pilate witnessed a
That thou keep this commandment without spot,
ur Lord Jesus Christ: 6:15 Which
imes he shall shew, who is the blessed and only Potentate, the
ord of lords; 6:16 Who only hath immortality,
n approach unto; whom no man hath
or can see: to whom be honour and power everlasting. Amen.
are rich in this world, that they be not
highminded, nor trust in uncertain riches, but in the living God, who
hly all things to enjoy; 6:18 That they do good, that
eady to distribute, willing to
e; 6:19 Laying up in store for themselves a good foundation
e, that they may lay hold on eternal life.
mitted to thy trust, avoiding
 vain babblings, and oppositions of science falsely so
essing have erred concerning the faith.
race be with thee. Amen.
nd Epistle of Paul the Apostle to Timothy
by the will of God, according to
ise of life which is in Christ Jesus, 1:2 To Timothy,
 mercy, and peace, from God the Father
d Christ Jesus our Lord.
d, whom I serve from my forefathers with pure
ve remembrance of thee in my
t and day; 1:4 Greatly desiring to see thee, being mindful
 be filled with joy; 1:5 When I call to
emembrance the unfeigned faith that is in thee, which dwelt first in
r Lois, and thy mother Eunice; and I am persuaded that
re I put thee in remembrance that thou stir up the gift of
 the putting on of my hands.
d hath not given us the spirit of fear; but of power, and of
ind.
of the testimony of our Lord, nor of
is prisoner: but be thou partaker of the afflictions of the gospel
 power of God; 1:9 Who hath saved us, and called us
ding to our works, but according to his
wn purpose and grace, which was given us in Christ Jesus before the
10 But is now made manifest by the appearing of our
abolished death, and hath brought life
d immortality to light through the gospel: 1:11 Whereunto I am
, and an apostle, and a teacher of the Gentiles.
suffer these things: nevertheless I am
t ashamed: for I know whom I have believed, and am persuaded that he
p that which I have committed unto him against that day.
of sound words, which thou hast heard of me,
esus.
mmitted unto thee keep by the Holy
which dwelleth in us.
owest, that all they which are in Asia be turned away
s and Hermogenes.
rcy unto the house of Onesiphorus; for he oft
my chain: 1:17 But, when he was
he sought me out very diligently, and found me.
 he may find mercy of the Lord in
y: and in how many things he ministered unto me at Ephesus,

in the grace that is in Christ
2:2 And the things that thou hast heard of me among many witnesses,
 thou to faithful men, who shall be able to teach
e endure hardness, as a good soldier of Jesus Christ.
angleth himself with the affairs of this
life; that he may please him who hath chosen him to be a soldier.
n also strive for masteries, yet is he not crowned,
:6 The husbandman that laboureth must be first partaker of the
der what I say; and the Lord give thee understanding in all
 that Jesus Christ of the seed of David was raised from
spel: 2:9 Wherein I suffer trouble, as an
of God is not bound.
ndure all things for the elect's sakes, that they
ch is in Christ Jesus with eternal

e be dead with him, we shall
th him: 2:12 If we suffer, we shall also reign with him:
ll deny us: 2:13 If we believe not, yet he
.
mbrance, charging them before the
at they strive not about words to no profit, but to the

o God, a workman that needeth
shamed, rightly dividing the word of truth.
ngs: for they will increase unto
odliness.
as doth a canker: of whom is Hymenaeus
d Philetus; 2:18 Who concerning the truth have erred, saying that
is past already; and overthrow the faith of some.
n of God standeth sure, having this
 The Lord knoweth them that are his. And, Let every one that
ist depart from iniquity.
 great house there are not only vessels of gold and of
 of earth; and some to honour, and some to
rge himself from these, he shall be a vessel
the master's use, and prepared
 good work.
ts: but follow righteousness, faith,
ity, peace, with them that call on the Lord out of a pure heart.
 and unlearned questions avoid, knowing that they do
e servant of the Lord must not strive; but be gentle unto
tient, 2:25 In meekness instructing those
re will give them repentance
wledging of the truth; 2:26 And that they may recover
f the devil, who are taken captive by him
in the last days perilous times shall come.
own selves, covetous, boasters,
asphemers, disobedient to parents, unthankful, unholy, 3:3
n, trucebreakers, false accusers, incontinent,
good, 3:4 Traitors, heady,
vers of pleasures more than lovers of God; 3:5 Having a
ing the power thereof: from such turn away.
reep into houses, and lead
women laden with sins, led away with divers lusts, 3:7
e to come to the knowledge of the truth.

Moses, so do these also resist
 men of corrupt minds, reprobate concerning the faith.
 no further: for their folly shall be
ifest unto all men, as their's also was.

ne, manner of life, purpose,
uffering, charity, patience, 3:11 Persecutions,
Antioch, at Iconium, at Lystra;
ecutions I endured: but out of them all the Lord delivered
 that will live godly in Christ Jesus shall suffer
n and seducers shall wax worse and worse, deceiving,
t continue thou in the things which thou hast learned and hast
wing of whom thou hast learned them; 3:15 And that
 holy scriptures, which are able to
thee wise unto salvation through faith which is in Christ Jesus.
re is given by inspiration of God, and is profitable
 correction, for instruction in
ness: 3:17 That the man of God may be perfect, throughly
rks.
 God, and the Lord Jesus Christ, who
l judge the quick and the dead at his appearing and his kingdom;
d; be instant in season, out of season; reprove,
ing and doctrine.
 come when they will not endure sound doctrine;
y heap to themselves teachers,
hing ears; 4:4 And they shall turn away their ears from the
ned unto fables.
all things, endure afflictions, do the work of
y ministry.
e offered, and the time of my departure is
ht, I have finished my course, I have kept
up for me a crown of
 the Lord, the righteous judge, shall give me at
unto all them also that love his
g.
 unto me: 4:10 For Demas hath
, having loved this present world, and is departed unto
alatia, Titus unto Dalmatia.
Luke is with me. Take Mark, and bring him with thee: for he
 the ministry.
 sent to Ephesus.
 left at Troas with Carpus, when thou comest,
specially the parchments.
r the coppersmith did me much evil: the Lord reward him
5 Of whom be thou ware also; for he hath
greatly withstood our words.
 first answer no man stood with me, but all men forsook me:
not be laid to their charge.
thstanding the Lord stood with me, and strengthened me; that
ght be fully known, and that all the Gentiles
f the mouth of the lion.
ord shall deliver me from every evil work, and will
ingdom: to whom be glory for ever and
r. Amen.
 and the household of Onesiphorus.
 Erastus abode at Corinth: but Trophimus have I left at Miletum
y diligence to come before winter. Eubulus greeteth thee,
d Claudia, and all the brethren.
he Lord Jesus Christ be with thy spirit. Grace be with you.
tle of Paul the Apostle to Titus
Paul, a servant of God, and an apostle of Jesus Christ, according
od's elect, and the acknowledging of the truth which
e of eternal life, which God, that
 lie, promised before the world began; 1:3 But hath in due times
d through preaching, which is committed unto me
 our Saviour; 1:4 To Titus, mine
after the common faith: Grace, mercy, and peace, from God the
esus Christ our Saviour.
ause left I thee in Crete, that thou shouldest set in
ting, and ordain elders in every city, as
less, the husband of one
thful children not accused of riot or unruly.
 as the steward of God; not
ot soon angry, not given to wine, no striker, not given
lover of hospitality, a lover of good men,
g fast the faithful word as he
taught, that he may be able by sound doctrine both to exhort
insayers.
y and vain talkers and deceivers,
ly they of the circumcision: 1:11 Whose mouths must be stopped,
ouses, teaching things which they ought not, for
f themselves, even a prophet of their own, said, The
 beasts, slow bellies.
s is true. Wherefore rebuke them sharply, that they
 Not giving heed to Jewish fables, and
mmandments of men, that turn from the truth.
re: but unto them that are defiled
believing is nothing pure; but even their mind and conscience is
hey profess that they know God; but in works they deny him,
isobedient, and unto every good work reprobate.
ch become sound doctrine: 2:2 That
ed men be sober, grave, temperate, sound in faith, in charity,
The aged women likewise, that they be in behaviour as becometh
accusers, not given to much wine, teachers of good
the young women to be sober, to love
r husbands, to love their children, 2:5 To be discreet, chaste,
od, obedient to their own husbands, that the word
Young men likewise exhort to be sober minded.
 pattern of good works: in doctrine
ng uncorruptness, gravity, sincerity, 2:8 Sound speech, that
hat he that is of the contrary part may be
you.
 unto their own masters, and to
em well in all things; not answering again; 2:10 Not
od fidelity; that they may adorn the
rine of God our Saviour in all things.
2:11 For the grace of God that bringeth salvation hath appeared to all
aching us that, denying ungodliness and worldly lusts, we
teously, and godly, in this present world;
the glorious appearing of the
nd our Saviour Jesus Christ; 2:14 Who gave himself for us,
from all iniquity, and purify unto himself a
.
and rebuke with all authority.
 despise thee.
be subject to principalities and powers, to
good work, 3:2 To speak evil of
o be no brawlers, but gentle, shewing all meekness unto all
elves also were sometimes foolish, disobedient,
pleasures, living in malice and
eful, and hating one another.
fter that the kindness and love of God our Saviour toward man
works of righteousness which we have done, but
by the washing of regeneration,
ing of the Holy Ghost; 3:6 Which he shed on us abundantly
Saviour; 3:7 That being justified by his
grace, we should be made heirs according to the hope of eternal life.
 a faithful saying, and these things I will that thou
which have believed in God might be
ul to maintain good works. These things are good and profitable
t avoid foolish questions, and genealogies, and contentions, and
e law; for they are unprofitable and vain.
he first and second admonition
11 Knowing that he that is such is subverted, and sinneth,
lf.
 thee, or Tychicus, be diligent to
nto me to Nicopolis: for I have determined there to winter.
lawyer and Apollos on their journey diligently,

in good works for necessary
ey be not unfruitful.
 with me salute thee. Greet them that love us in the
Amen.
stle to Philemon
 of Jesus Christ, and Timothy our brother, unto
llowlabourer, 1:2 And to our
ia, and Archippus our fellowsoldier, and to the church in
ou, and peace, from God our Father and the
, making mention of thee always in my prayers, 1:5
hich thou hast toward the Lord Jesus,
 toward all saints; 1:6 That the communication of thy faith may
 the acknowledging of every good thing which is in
we have great joy and consolation in thy love, because the
 refreshed by thee, brother.
ore, though I might be much bold in Christ to enjoin thee
 1:9 Yet for love's sake I rather beseech
 and now also a prisoner of

s, whom I have begotten in my
 Which in time past was to thee unprofitable, but now
 1:12 Whom I have sent again: thou
ore receive him, that is, mine own bowels: 1:13 Whom I would
 that in thy stead he might have ministered unto
4 But without thy mind would I do
; that thy benefit should not be as it were of necessity, but
r perhaps he therefore departed for a season, that thou
ver; 1:16 Not now as a servant, but above a
o me, but how much more unto
n the flesh, and in the Lord?  1:17 If thou count me
im as myself.
hee, or oweth thee ought, put that on mine
h mine own hand, I will repay
I do not say to thee how thou owest unto me even thine own
a, brother, let me have joy of thee in the Lord: refresh my
1:21 Having confidence in thy obedience I wrote unto thee, knowing
lso do more than I say.
 prepare me also a lodging: for I trust that through
unto you.
as, my fellowprisoner in Christ Jesus;
24 Marcus, Aristarchus, Demas, Lucas, my fellowlabourers.
ord Jesus Christ be with your spirit. Amen.
 to the Hebrews
y times and in divers manners spake in time past
1:2 Hath in these last days spoken
s by his Son, whom he hath appointed heir of all things, by whom
orlds; 1:3 Who being the brightness of his glory,
on, and upholding all things by the
of his power, when he had by himself purged our sins, sat down on
 the Majesty on high: 1:4 Being made so much better
inheritance obtained a more excellent
e than they.
angels said he at any time, Thou art my Son,
in, I will be to him a Father,
ll be to me a Son?  1:6 And again, when he bringeth in the
orld, he saith, And let all the angels of God
 he saith, Who maketh his angels spirits, and his
 But unto the Son he saith, Thy throne, O God, is for ever and
ighteousness is the sceptre of thy kingdom.
d hated iniquity; therefore God,
 God, hath anointed thee with the oil of gladness above thy
hou, Lord, in the beginning hast laid the foundation of the
are the works of thine hands: 1:11 They shall
all shall wax old as doth a
 And as a vesture shalt thou fold them up, and they shall
the same, and thy years shall not fail.

t any time, Sit on my right
 make thine enemies thy footstool?  1:14 Are they not all
 forth to minister for them who shall be
heirs of salvation?  2:1 Therefore we ought to give the more earnest
ings which we have heard, lest at any time we should let
he word spoken by angels was stedfast, and every
eived a just recompence of reward;
w shall we escape, if we neglect so great salvation; which at
 spoken by the Lord, and was confirmed unto us by
 bearing them witness, both with
d wonders, and with divers miracles, and gifts of the Holy
own will?  2:5 For unto the angels hath he not
 whereof we speak.
tain place testified, saying, What is man, that
 of man that thou visitest him?
madest him a little lower than the angels; thou crownedst him
, and didst set him over the works of thy hands:
bjection under his feet. For in that
ut all in subjection under him, he left nothing that is not put
ow we see not yet all things put under him.
little lower than the angels for
ering of death, crowned with glory and honour; that he by the
aste death for every man.
ecame him, for whom are all things, and by whom are all
ns unto glory, to make the captain of their

ey who are sanctified are all
 which cause he is not ashamed to call them brethren, 2:12
hy name unto my brethren, in the midst of the

him. And again, Behold I and
 which God hath given me.
h then as the children are partakers of flesh and blood,
ook part of the same; that through death he
 death, that is, the devil;
ver them who through fear of death were all their
:16 For verily he took not on him the nature of angels; but he took
 of Abraham.
gs it behoved him to be made like unto his
d faithful high priest in
ng to God, to make reconciliation for the sins of the
e himself hath suffered being tempted, he is able to

s of the heavenly calling,
postle and High Priest of our profession, Christ Jesus;
 that appointed him, as also Moses was
ithful in all his house.
an was counted worthy of more glory than Moses, inasmuch
 house hath more honour than the house.

n; but he that built all

 his house, as a servant, for
 of those things which were to be spoken after; 3:6 But
n house; whose house are we, if we hold
ast the confidence and the rejoicing of the hope firm unto the end.
 (as the Holy Ghost saith, To day if ye will hear his
arts, as in the provocation, in the day
f temptation in the wilderness: 3:9 When your fathers tempted me,
w my works forty years.
I was grieved with that generation, and said, They do
 they have not known my ways.
 sware in my wrath, They shall not enter into my rest.)  3:12
lest there be in any of you an evil heart of
 God.
, while it is called To day; lest any
you be hardened through the deceitfulness of sin.
of Christ, if we hold the beginning of
r confidence stedfast unto the end; 3:15 While it is said, To day if
is voice, harden not your hearts, as in the provocation.
 had heard, did provoke: howbeit not all that
ut with whom was he grieved forty years? was it not with them
e carcases fell in the wilderness?  3:18 And to
enter into his rest, but to them
ieved not?  3:19 So we see that they could not enter in
 Let us therefore fear, lest, a promise being left us of entering
y of you should seem to come short of it.
, as well as unto them: but the
ched did not profit them, not being mixed with faith in them
For we which have believed do enter into rest, as he said, As I
ath, if they shall enter into my rest: although the
undation of the world.
 in a certain place of the seventh day on this wise,
ay from all his works.
place again, If they shall enter into my rest.
that some must enter therein, and
 whom it was first preached entered not in because of unbelief:
eth a certain day, saying in David, To day, after
 day if ye will hear his voice,
t your hearts.
en them rest, then would he not afterward have
remaineth therefore a rest to the people of God.
 his rest, he also hath ceased from
wn works, as God did from his.
 us labour therefore to enter into that rest, lest any man
ple of unbelief.
od is quick, and powerful, and sharper than any
e dividing asunder of soul and
d of the joints and marrow, and is a discerner of the
eart.
e that is not manifest in his sight:
all things are naked and opened unto the eyes of him with whom we
14 Seeing then that we have a great high priest, that is passed into
esus the Son of God, let us hold fast our profession.
h priest which cannot be touched with the
l points tempted like as we
out sin.
dly unto the throne of grace, that we
 obtain mercy, and find grace to help in time of need.
taken from among men is ordained for men in
ffer both gifts and sacrifices
5:2 Who can have compassion on the ignorant, and on them
or that he himself also is compassed with
 ought, as for the people, so also for
mself, to offer for sins.
n taketh this honour unto himself, but he that is called
:5 So also Christ glorified not himself to be made an high priest;
 unto him, Thou art my Son, to day have I begotten
 another place, Thou art a priest for ever
ho in the days of his flesh, when he had offered up prayers and
strong crying and tears unto him that was able to
d in that he feared; 5:8 Though he
 Son, yet learned he obedience by the things which he suffered;
perfect, he became the author of eternal salvation
0 Called of God an high priest after
order of Melchisedec.
ave many things to say, and hard to be uttered,
:12 For when for the time ye ought to be teachers, ye have need that
again which be the first principles of the oracles of
ave need of milk, and not of strong meat.
nskilful in the word of
r he is a babe.
longeth to them that are of full age, even
nses exercised to discern both
vil.
es of the doctrine of Christ, let us
n unto perfection; not laying again the foundation of repentance
nd of faith toward God, 6:2 Of the doctrine of
 and of resurrection of the dead,
eternal judgment.
do, if God permit.
ible for those who were once enlightened, and have
 were made partakers of the Holy
:5 And have tasted the good word of God, and the powers of the
f they shall fall away, to renew them again unto
 themselves the Son of God afresh,
t him to an open shame.
th which drinketh in the rain that cometh oft upon it,
t for them by whom it is dressed,
th blessing from God: 6:8 But that which beareth thorns and
 is nigh unto cursing; whose end is to be
aded better things of you, and things
t accompany salvation, though we thus speak.
orget your work and labour of
 ye have shewed toward his name, in that ye have ministered
inister.
one of you do shew the same diligence to
the full assurance of hope unto the end: 6:12 That ye be not slothful,
s of them who through faith and patience inherit the
 made promise to Abraham, because he could swear by
, 6:14 Saying, Surely blessing I will
ss thee, and multiplying I will multiply thee.
y endured, he obtained the promise.
6 For men verily swear by the greater: and an oath for confirmation
nd of all strife.
ling more abundantly to shew unto the heirs of
sel, confirmed it by an oath: 6:18
y two immutable things, in which it was impossible for God to
strong consolation, who have fled for refuge to
s: 6:19 Which hope we have as an
f the soul, both sure and stedfast, and which entereth into
:20 Whither the forerunner is for us entered,
ver after the order of
1 For this Melchisedec, king of Salem, priest of the most high God,
 returning from the slaughter of the kings, and blessed
am gave a tenth part of all; first being by
nd after that also King of
s, King of peace; 7:3 Without father, without mother,
er beginning of days, nor end of life;
t made like unto the Son of God; abideth a priest continually.
ow great this man was, unto whom even the patriarch
poils.
the sons of Levi, who receive the
of the priesthood, have a commandment to take tithes of the
 law, that is, of their brethren, though they
 But he whose descent is not
 them received tithes of Abraham, and blessed him that had
 without all contradiction the less is blessed of the better.
at die receive tithes; but there he receiveth them,
 liveth.
also, who receiveth tithes, payed tithes
in Abraham.
loins of his father, when Melchisedec met
 by the Levitical priesthood, (for
it the people received the law,) what further need was there
ould rise after the order of Melchisedec, and
n?  7:12 For the priesthood being
, there is made of necessity a change also of the law.
things are spoken pertaineth to another
ribe, of which no man gave attendance at the altar.
ur Lord sprang out of Juda; of which
e Moses spake nothing concerning priesthood.
 for that after the similitude of
edec there ariseth another priest, 7:16 Who is made, not after
commandment, but after the power of an endless
u art a priest for ever after the order of
 a disannulling of the commandment going
before for the weakness and unprofitableness thereof.
ng perfect, but the bringing in of a better
o God.
 an oath he was made priest: 7:21 (For
ose priests were made without an oath; but this with an oath by him
him, The Lord sware and will not repent, Thou art a
 of Melchisedec:) 7:22 By so much was
us made a surety of a better testament.

cause they were not suffered
by reason of death: 7:24 But this man, because he
able priesthood.
ble also to save them to the uttermost that come
veth to make intercession for them.
6 For such an high priest became us, who is holy, harmless,
m sinners, and made higher than the heavens;
igh priests, to offer up
 for his own sins, and then for the people's: for this
 up himself.
n high priests which have infirmity; but the
law, maketh the Son, who is
or evermore.
h we have spoken this is the sum: We have
ght hand of the throne of the
the heavens; 8:2 A minister of the sanctuary, and of the
 Lord pitched, and not man.
ry high priest is ordained to offer gifts and sacrifices:
ity that this man have somewhat also to
ffer.
hould not be a priest, seeing that
are priests that offer gifts according to the law: 8:5 Who serve
nd shadow of heavenly things, as Moses was
ake the tabernacle: for, See,
hat thou make all things according to the pattern shewed to
:6 But now hath he obtained a more excellent ministry, by how much
ediator of a better covenant, which was established
r if that first covenant had been faultless, then should no
for the second.
ith them, he saith, Behold, the days come,
ovenant with the house of
 the house of Judah: 8:9 Not according to the covenant
rs in the day when I took them by the hand
ecause they continued not in
 and I regarded them not, saith the Lord.
ll make with the house of
ose days, saith the Lord; I will put my laws into their
ir hearts: and I will be to them a God, and
they shall not teach every man
our, and every man his brother, saying, Know the Lord: for
the least to the greatest.
ill be merciful to their unrighteousness, and their sins
I remember no more.
th, A new covenant, he hath made the first old. Now
old is ready to vanish away.
erily the first covenant had also ordinances of divine
uary.
de; the first, wherein was the
k, and the table, and the shewbread; which is called the
r the second veil, the tabernacle which is called the
 the golden censer, and the ark of the
venant overlaid round about with gold, wherein was the golden pot
nd Aaron's rod that budded, and the tables of the
rubims of glory shadowing the
of which we cannot now speak particularly.
dained, the priests went always
first tabernacle, accomplishing the service of God.
the high priest alone once every year,
t without blood, which he offered for himself, and for the errors of
8 The Holy Ghost this signifying, that the way into the
made manifest, while as the first
cle was yet standing: 9:9 Which was a figure for the time then
re offered both gifts and sacrifices, that could
perfect, as pertaining to the
 9:10 Which stood only in meats and drinks, and divers
ces, imposed on them until the time of
formation.
n high priest of good things to come, by a
 made with hands, that is to
this building; 9:12 Neither by the blood of goats and
he entered in once into the holy place,
aving obtained eternal redemption for us.
oats, and the ashes of an
ng the unclean, sanctifieth to the purifying of the
 the blood of Christ, who through the
rnal Spirit offered himself without spot to God, purge your
rks to serve the living God?  9:15 And for this
 testament, that by means of death,
he redemption of the transgressions that were under the first
 are called might receive the promise of eternal
estament is, there must also of necessity be the
 a testament is of force after men are dead: otherwise it is
while the testator liveth.
on neither the first testament was dedicated without
had spoken every precept to all the people
of calves and of goats, with
carlet wool, and hyssop, and sprinkled both the book, and
ng, This is the blood of the testament which
reover he sprinkled with blood both the tabernacle, and all the
stry.
 the law purged with blood; and
hedding of blood is no remission.
It was therefore necessary that the patterns of things in the
ified with these; but the heavenly things
ese.
o the holy places made with hands,
are the figures of the true; but into heaven itself, now to
of God for us: 9:25 Nor yet that he should
entereth into the holy place
ith blood of others; 9:26 For then must he often have
 of the world: but now once in the end of
n by the sacrifice of
d as it is appointed unto men once to die, but after this the
ist was once offered to bear the sins of many;
l he appear the second time
nto salvation.
a shadow of good things to come, and not the
th those sacrifices which they
ar by year continually make the comers thereunto perfect.
y not have ceased to be offered? because that
ve had no more conscience of
3 But in those sacrifices there is a remembrance again made of sins
10:4 For it is not possible that the blood of bulls and of goats
ins.
 the world, he saith, Sacrifice and
ing thou wouldest not, but a body hast thou prepared me: 10:6 In
d sacrifices for sin thou hast had no pleasure.
the volume of the book it is written
e,) to do thy will, O God.
hen he said, Sacrifice and offering and burnt offerings
ouldest not, neither hadst pleasure
in; which are offered by the law; 10:9 Then said he, Lo, I come
od. He taketh away the first, that he may establish
ch will we are sanctified through the offering of the
 all.
aily ministering and offering
the same sacrifices, which can never take away sins: 10:12
ad offered one sacrifice for sins for ever,
3 From henceforth expecting
ies be made his footstool.
 one offering he hath perfected for ever them that are
 the Holy Ghost also is a witness to us: for after that
his is the covenant that I will make with
will put my laws into their
n their minds will I write them; 10:17 And their sins and
r no more.
 these is, there is no more offering for
sin.
boldness to enter into the holiest
 blood of Jesus, 10:20 By a new and living way, which he hath
hrough the veil, that is to say, his flesh; 10:21
e house of God; 10:22 Let us draw
th a true heart in full assurance of faith, having our hearts
l conscience, and our bodies washed with pure
profession of our faith without wavering;
 And let us consider one
ke unto love and to good works: 10:25 Not forsaking
ether, as the manner of some is; but
rting one another: and so much the more, as ye see the day
r if we sin wilfully after that we have received the knowledge
remaineth no more sacrifice for sins, 10:27 But a
dgment and fiery indignation, which
 devour the adversaries.
despised Moses' law died without mercy under two or
uch sorer punishment, suppose ye, shall
e be thought worthy, who hath trodden under foot the Son of God, and
he blood of the covenant, wherewith he was sanctified,
ne despite unto the Spirit of grace?
0 For we know him that hath said, Vengeance belongeth unto me, I
aith the Lord. And again, The Lord shall judge his
 thing to fall into the hands of the living God.
e former days, in which, after ye were
luminated, ye endured a great fight of afflictions; 10:33 Partly,
de a gazingstock both by reproaches and afflictions;
ompanions of them that were so used.
:34 For ye had compassion of me in my bonds, and took joyfully the
 goods, knowing in yourselves that ye have in heaven a
ance.
r confidence, which hath great
 of reward.
atience, that, after ye have done the will

 shall come will come, and
.
h: but if any man draw back, my
l have no pleasure in him.
 are not of them who draw back unto perdition; but of them
ng of the soul.
ubstance of things hoped for, the evidence of
e elders obtained a good report.
hrough faith we understand that the worlds were framed by the
things which are seen were not made of things
l offered unto God a more excellent sacrifice than
ss that he was righteous, God
of his gifts: and by it he being dead yet speaketh.
lated that he should not see death; and
as not found, because God had translated him: for before his
s testimony, that he pleased God.
But without faith it is impossible to please him: for he that
lieve that he is, and that he is a rewarder of
:7 By faith Noah, being warned of God of things not seen as yet,
repared an ark to the saving of his house; by the
 became heir of the righteousness
s by faith.
 he was called to go out into a place which
nce, obeyed; and he went out,
 whither he went.
urned in the land of promise, as in a strange
 Isaac and Jacob, the heirs with
he same promise: 11:10 For he looked for a city which hath
er and maker is God.
h also Sara herself received strength to conceive
d when she was past age, because she
ed him faithful who had promised.
 Therefore sprang there even of one, and him as good as dead, so
of the sky in multitude, and as the sand which is by
11:13 These all died in faith, not having received the promises, but
em afar off, and were persuaded of them, and embraced
 were strangers and pilgrims on the
.
eclare plainly that they seek a

ul of that country from whence
out, they might have had opportunity to have returned.
a better country, that is, an heavenly:
herefore God is not ashamed to be called their God: for he hath
 city.
was tried, offered up Isaac: and he
had received the promises offered up his only begotten son, 11:18
id, That in Isaac shall thy seed be called: 11:19
aise him up, even from the dead; from
nce also he received him in a figure.
1:20 By faith Isaac blessed Jacob and Esau concerning things to come.
ith Jacob, when he was a dying, blessed both the sons of
aning upon the top of his staff.
By faith Joseph, when he died, made mention of the departing of
ael; and gave commandment concerning his bones.
 born, was hid three months of his
s, because they saw he was a proper child; and they were not
ommandment.
he was come to years, refused to be called
osing rather to suffer
e people of God, than to enjoy the pleasures of sin
he reproach of Christ greater riches
 the treasures in Egypt: for he had respect unto the recompence of
1:27 By faith he forsook Egypt, not fearing the wrath of the king:
as seeing him who is invisible.
hrough faith he kept the passover, and the sprinkling of blood,
yed the firstborn should touch them.
:29 By faith they passed through the Red sea as by dry land: which
saying to do were drowned.
th the walls of Jericho fell down, after they were
1:31 By faith the harlot Rahab perished not with them that believed
ad received the spies with peace.
 And what shall I more say? for the time would fail me to tell of
rak, and of Samson, and of Jephthae; of David also,
: 11:33 Who through faith subdued
s, wrought righteousness, obtained promises, stopped the mouths
Quenched the violence of fire, escaped the edge of the sword,
made strong, waxed valiant in fight, turned to
11:35 Women received their dead raised to life again: and others were
 accepting deliverance; that they might obtain a better
ers had trial of cruel mockings and
gings, yea, moreover of bonds and imprisonment: 11:37 They were
awn asunder, were tempted, were slain with the
kins and goatskins; being
icted, tormented; 11:38 (Of whom the world was not
s, and in mountains, and in dens and
s of the earth.
ving obtained a good report through faith,
ng provided some better thing
t they without us should not be made perfect.
ompassed about with so great a
itnesses, let us lay aside every weight, and the sin which
 and let us run with patience the race that is
us the author and finisher of our
who for the joy that was set before him endured the cross,
 is set down at the right hand of the throne
endured such contradiction of sinners
inst himself, lest ye be wearied and faint in your minds.
sisted unto blood, striving against sin.

on which speaketh unto you as
en, My son, despise not thou the chastening of the Lord,
buked of him: 12:6 For whom the Lord loveth
whom he receiveth.
astening, God dealeth with you as with sons; for
steneth not?  12:8 But if ye be
hastisement, whereof all are partakers, then are ye bastards,
 Furthermore we have had fathers of our flesh which corrected us,
reverence: shall we not much rather be in subjection
d live?  12:10 For they verily for a few
days chastened us after their own pleasure; but he for our profit,
 partakers of his holiness.
o chastening for the present seemeth to be joyous, but
ward it yieldeth the peaceable fruit of
ighteousness unto them which are exercised thereby.
ands which hang down, and the feeble
s; 12:13 And make straight paths for your feet, lest that which is
ut of the way; but let it rather be healed.
holiness, without which no man
the Lord: 12:15 Looking diligently lest any man fail of the
root of bitterness springing up trouble you,
t there be any fornicator, or
son, as Esau, who for one morsel of meat sold his
how that afterward, when he would have inherited the
 he found no place of repentance, though
he sought it carefully with tears.
8 For ye are not come unto the mount that might be touched, and
re, nor unto blackness, and darkness, and tempest,
, and the voice of words; which voice
y that heard intreated that the word should not be spoken to them
For they could not endure that which was commanded,
 the mountain, it shall be stoned, or
ust through with a dart: 12:21 And so terrible was the sight, that
ceedingly fear and quake:) 12:22 But ye are come unto
 of the living God, the heavenly
m, and to an innumerable company of angels, 12:23 To the
h of the firstborn, which are written in
heaven, and to God the Judge of all, and to the spirits of just men
2:24 And to Jesus the mediator of the new covenant, and
 that speaketh better things than that of
 that speaketh. For if they escaped
ho refused him that spake on earth, much more shall not we
from him that speaketh from heaven: 12:26
 he hath promised, saying,
I shake not the earth only, but also heaven.
signifieth the removing of those
hat are shaken, as of things that are made, that those things
n may remain.
ing a kingdom which cannot be moved, let us
ceptably with reverence and
2:29 For our God is a consuming fire.
3:1 Let brotherly love continue.
e not forgetful to entertain strangers: for thereby some have
awares.
bonds, as bound with them; and them
 suffer adversity, as being yourselves also in the body.
ble in all, and the bed undefiled: but
oremongers and adulterers God will judge.
ovetousness; and be content
ngs as ye have: for he hath said, I will never leave
6 So that we may boldly say, The Lord is my helper, and I will not
all do unto me.
h have the rule over you, who have spoken unto
low, considering the end of their
ation.
rday, and to day, and for ever.
 not carried about with divers and strange doctrines. For it is
he heart be established with grace; not with meats,
at have been occupied therein.
 have an altar, whereof they have no right to eat which serve
:11 For the bodies of those beasts, whose blood is brought into the
e high priest for sin, are burned without the camp.
hat he might sanctify the people with his
13:13 Let us go forth therefore unto him without the camp, bearing his

, but we seek one to come.
 therefore let us offer the sacrifice of praise to God
uit of our lips giving thanks to his name.
e forget not: for with such
d is well pleased.
 have the rule over you, and submit yourselves:
hey that must give account, that
 do it with joy, and not with grief: for that is unprofitable
y for us: for we trust we have a good conscience, in all
estly.
er to do this, that I may be restored
you the sooner.
ace, that brought again from the dead our Lord
eep, through the blood of the
 covenant, 13:21 Make you perfect in every good work to do
 that which is wellpleasing in his sight,
r ever and ever. Amen.
ech you, brethren, suffer the word of exhortation: for
 you in few words.
ur brother Timothy is set at liberty; with whom,
.
ule over you, and all the saints.
of Italy salute you.
h you all. Amen.
tle of James
God and of the Lord Jesus Christ,
twelve tribes which are scattered abroad, greeting.
 joy when ye fall into divers
; 1:3 Knowing this, that the trying of your faith worketh
patience have her perfect work, that ye may be perfect and

 ask of God, that giveth to all
ally, and upbraideth not; and it shall be given him.
, nothing wavering. For he that wavereth
is like a wave of the sea driven with the wind and tossed.
an think that he shall receive any thing of the
 unstable in all his ways.
brother of low degree rejoice in that he is exalted: 1:10
is made low: because as the flower of the
 sun is no sooner risen with a burning heat, but it
ower thereof falleth, and the grace of
e fashion of it perisheth: so also shall the rich man fade away in
2 Blessed is the man that endureth temptation: for when he is
ve the crown of life, which the Lord hath
et no man say when he is tempted, I am tempted of God: for God
th evil, neither tempteth he any man: 1:14 But
wn away of his own lust, and
1:15 Then when lust hath conceived, it bringeth forth sin: and sin,
shed, bringeth forth death.
 err, my beloved brethren.
ood gift and every perfect gift is from above, and cometh
ights, with whom is no variableness, neither
will begat he us with the word of truth, that we
 his creatures.
ved brethren, let every man be swift to hear,
r the wrath of man worketh not
ousness of God.
t all filthiness and superfluity of
tiness, and receive with meekness the engrafted word, which is
uls.
and not hearers only, deceiving your
selves.
the word, and not a doer, he is like
 a man beholding his natural face in a glass: 1:24 For he
eth his way, and straightway forgetteth what
o looketh into the perfect law of liberty, and continueth
orgetful hearer, but a doer of the work, this
1:26 If any man among you seem to be religious, and bridleth not his
ceiveth his own heart, this man's religion is vain.
led before God and the Father is this, To
affliction, and to keep
 from the world.
not the faith of our Lord Jesus Christ, the Lord

ly a man with a gold ring, in
rel, and there come in also a poor man in vile raiment; 2:3
him that weareth the gay clothing, and say unto
 and say to the poor, Stand thou
r sit here under my footstool: 2:4 Are ye not then partial in
ecome judges of evil thoughts?  2:5 Hearken, my
en the poor of this world rich in
and heirs of the kingdom which he hath promised to them that
have despised the poor. Do not rich men oppress
nt seats?  2:7 Do not they
 worthy name by the which ye are called?  2:8 If ye
to the scripture, Thou shalt love thy
ghbour as thyself, ye do well: 2:9 But if ye have respect to
, and are convinced of the law as transgressors.
e whole law, and yet offend in one
 he is guilty of all.
said, Do not commit adultery, said also, Do not kill.
y, yet if thou kill, thou art become a
ansgressor of the law.
, and so do, as they that shall be judged by the law
ll have judgment without mercy, that hath shewed no
nst judgment.
 my brethren, though a man say he hath faith,
m?  2:15 If a brother or sister
 and destitute of daily food, 2:16 And one of you say unto
e ye warmed and filled; notwithstanding ye
dful to the body; what doth it
:17 Even so faith, if it hath not works, is dead, being
ay say, Thou hast faith, and I have works: shew me
 I will shew thee my faith by my

d; thou doest well: the devils
ve, and tremble.
w, O vain man, that faith without works is dead?
stified by works, when he had
ac his son upon the altar?  2:22 Seest thou how faith
y works was faith made perfect?  2:23 And
Abraham believed God, and it
unto him for righteousness: and he was called the Friend
n how that by works a man is justified, and not by
o was not Rahab the harlot justified by works, when
, and had sent them out another way?
 For as the body without the spirit is dead, so faith without

owing that we shall receive
ondemnation.
offend all. If any man offend not in word,
 to bridle the whole body.
we put bits in the horses' mouths, that they may obey us;
hole body.
hich though they be so great, and are
ven of fierce winds, yet are they turned about with a very small
r the governor listeth.
 tongue is a little member, and boasteth great things.
 a little fire kindleth!  3:6 And the tongue
the tongue among our members,
ileth the whole body, and setteth on fire the course of
re of hell.
s, and of birds, and of serpents, and of
things in the sea, is tamed, and hath been tamed of mankind: 3:8 But
 no man tame; it is an unruly evil, full of deadly
e God, even the Father; and therewith curse we
tude of God.
 proceedeth blessing and cursing. My
hren, these things ought not so to be.
3:11 Doth a fountain send forth at the same place sweet water and
 the fig tree, my brethren, bear olive berries?
tain both yield salt water and
3:13 Who is a wise man and endued with knowledge among you? let him
ood conversation his works with meekness of wisdom.
vying and strife in your hearts, glory
t, and lie not against the truth.
This wisdom descendeth not from above, but is earthly, sensual,
or where envying and strife is, there is confusion and every
 the wisdom that is from above is first pure, then peaceable,
e intreated, full of mercy and good fruits,
sy.
 is sown in peace of them that make
.
gs among you? come they not
f your lusts that war in your members?  4:2 Ye lust, and
ire to have, and cannot obtain: ye fight and
ot.
e ye ask amiss, that ye may consume
on your lusts.
ulteresses, know ye not that the friendship of
ver therefore will be a friend of
ld is the enemy of God.
 that the scripture saith in vain, The spirit that
 4:6 But he giveth more grace.
he saith, God resisteth the proud, but giveth grace unto the
yourselves therefore to God. Resist the devil, and he will
aw nigh to God, and he will draw nigh to you. Cleanse your
urify your hearts, ye double minded.
9 Be afflicted, and mourn, and weep: let your laughter be turned to
our joy to heaviness.
elves in the sight of the Lord, and he shall lift you
e of another, brethren. He that speaketh evil of
er, speaketh evil of the law, and
 the law: but if thou judge the law, thou art not a doer of the

to save and to destroy: who
 judgest another?  4:13 Go to now, ye that say, To day or
 such a city, and continue there a year, and
as ye know not what shall be on
w. For what is your life? It is even a vapour, that appeareth
d then vanisheth away.
 ought to say, If the Lord will, we shall live, and do
ow ye rejoice in your boastings: all such rejoicing is evil.
m that knoweth to do good, and doeth it not, to
 rich men, weep and howl for your miseries that shall
ches are corrupted, and your garments are motheaten.
cankered; and the rust of them shall be a
lesh as it were fire. Ye have
sure together for the last days.
hold, the hire of the labourers who have reaped down your
ept back by fraud, crieth: and the cries of
 the ears of the Lord of
Ye have lived in pleasure on the earth, and been wanton; ye have
rts, as in a day of slaughter.
ave condemned and killed the just; and he doth not resist you.
refore, brethren, unto the coming of the Lord.
 the precious fruit of the earth,
h long patience for it, until he receive the early and latter
so patient; stablish your hearts: for the coming of the
rudge not one against another, brethren, lest ye be condemned:
andeth before the door.
rethren, the prophets, who have spoken in the name of
uffering affliction, and of patience.
:11 Behold, we count them happy which endure. Ye have heard of the
 and have seen the end of the Lord; that the Lord is
rcy.
hren, swear not, neither by heaven,
er by the earth, neither by any other oath: but let your yea be
nay; lest ye fall into condemnation.
13 Is any among you afflicted? let him pray. Is any merry? let him
5:14 Is any sick among you? let him call for the elders of the church;
 pray over him, anointing him with oil in the name of the
 of faith shall save the sick, and the Lord
itted sins, they shall be

 and pray one for another,
 healed. The effectual fervent prayer of a righteous man
as was a man subject to like passions as we are, and he prayed
ght not rain: and it rained not on the earth by
nths.
 heaven gave rain, and the earth
forth her fruit.
of you do err from the truth, and one convert
 converteth the sinner from the
his way shall save a soul from death, and shall hide a
The First Epistle General of Peter
1 Peter, an apostle of Jesus Christ, to the strangers scattered
Galatia, Cappadocia, Asia, and Bithynia, 1:2 Elect
f God the Father, through
of the Spirit, unto obedience and sprinkling of the
to you, and peace, be multiplied.
lessed be the God and Father of our Lord Jesus Christ, which
ant mercy hath begotten us again unto a lively
rist from the dead, 1:4 To an
 incorruptible, and undefiled, and that fadeth not away,
, 1:5 Who are kept by the power of God
rough faith unto salvation ready to be revealed in the last time.
greatly rejoice, though now for a season, if need be,
anifold temptations: 1:7 That the trial
f your faith, being much more precious than of gold that perisheth,
ied with fire, might be found unto praise and honour
Jesus Christ: 1:8 Whom having not seen,
e love; in whom, though now ye see him not, yet believing, ye rejoice
eakable and full of glory: 1:9 Receiving the end of your
of your souls.
the prophets have enquired and searched
iligently, who prophesied of the grace that should come unto you:
at, or what manner of time the Spirit of Christ which
 it testified beforehand the sufferings
f Christ, and the glory that should follow.
not unto themselves, but unto us
 minister the things, which are now reported unto you by them
e gospel unto you with the Holy Ghost sent down
s desire to look into.
ird up the loins of your mind, be sober, and hope to
to be brought unto you at the revelation
of Jesus Christ; 1:14 As obedient children, not fashioning yourselves
the former lusts in your ignorance: 1:15 But as he which
o be ye holy in all manner of conversation;
 for I am holy.
the Father, who without respect of persons
ass the time of your
ear: 1:18 Forasmuch as ye know that ye were not
s silver and gold, from your vain
ation received by tradition from your fathers; 1:19 But with
Christ, as of a lamb without blemish and without
ined before the foundation of the
but was manifest in these last times for you, 1:21 Who by him
at raised him up from the dead, and gave him
be in God.
 your souls in obeying the truth through
the Spirit unto unfeigned love of the brethren, see that ye love one
 pure heart fervently: 1:23 Being born again, not of
ruptible, by the word of God, which
h and abideth for ever.
esh is as grass, and all the glory of man as the flower
th, and the flower thereof falleth away:
1:25 But the word of the Lord endureth for ever. And this is the word
gospel is preached unto you.
ore laying aside all malice, and all guile, and hypocrisies,
peakings, 2:2 As newborn babes, desire the
ow thereby: 2:3 If so be ye
hat the Lord is gracious.
oming, as unto a living stone, disallowed indeed of men,
cious, 2:5 Ye also, as lively stones, are
thood, to offer up spiritual
acceptable to God by Jesus Christ.
Wherefore also it is contained in the scripture, Behold, I lay in
er stone, elect, precious: and he that believeth on

s precious: but unto them
dient, the stone which the builders disallowed, the
rner, 2:8 And a stone of stumbling, and
 rock of offence, even to them which stumble at the word, being
nto also they were appointed.
e are a chosen generation, a royal priesthood, an holy
hat ye should shew forth the praises of
im who hath called you out of darkness into his marvellous light;
e past were not a people, but are now the people of
cy, but now have obtained mercy.
early beloved, I beseech you as strangers and pilgrims, abstain
 which war against the soul; 2:12 Having your
s: that, whereas they speak
s evildoers, they may by your good works, which they
he day of visitation.
elves to every ordinance of man for the Lord's sake:
supreme; 2:14 Or unto governors, as unto
them that are sent by him for the punishment of evildoers, and for the
em that do well.
l of God, that with well doing ye may put to
2:16 As free, and not using your
for a cloke of maliciousness, but as the servants of God.
ve the brotherhood. Fear God. Honour the king.
masters with all fear; not only to
od and gentle, but also to the froward.

r conscience toward God
fering wrongfully.
is it, if, when ye be buffeted for your faults, ye
 when ye do well, and suffer for it,
ake it patiently, this is acceptable with God.
led: because Christ also suffered
 leaving us an example, that ye should follow his steps: 2:22
er was guile found in his mouth: 2:23 Who, when
when he suffered, he threatened
committed himself to him that judgeth righteously: 2:24 Who
ins in his own body on the tree, that we, being
teousness: by whose stripes ye were
d.
ay; but are now returned unto the
d and Bishop of your souls.
e, ye wives, be in subjection to your own husbands; that,
 they also may without the word be won by the
they behold your chaste
led with fear.
t not be that outward adorning of plaiting the
putting on of apparel; 3:4 But let
the hidden man of the heart, in that which is not corruptible,
 a meek and quiet spirit, which is in the sight of
fter this manner in the old time the holy women also, who
hemselves, being in subjection unto their own
aham, calling him lord: whose
e are, as long as ye do well, and are not afraid with any
e, ye husbands, dwell with them according to knowledge,
, as unto the weaker vessel, and as being
 your prayers be not
ally, be ye all of one mind, having compassion one of another,
 pitiful, be courteous: 3:9 Not rendering evil for
t contrariwise blessing; knowing that
are thereunto called, that ye should inherit a blessing.
ve life, and see good days, let him refrain
 they speak no guile: 3:11 Let
 evil, and do good; let him seek peace, and ensue it.
rd are over the righteous, and his ears are
f the Lord is against them that

if ye be followers of that
  3:14 But and if ye suffer for righteousness' sake,
d of their terror, neither be troubled;
:15 But sanctify the Lord God in your hearts: and be ready always to
 to every man that asketh you a reason of the hope that
 fear: 3:16 Having a good conscience; that,
vildoers, they may be ashamed
y accuse your good conversation in Christ.
God be so, that ye suffer for
 than for evil doing.
lso hath once suffered for sins, the just for the
 God, being put to death in the
t quickened by the Spirit: 3:19 By which also he went and
 in prison; 3:20 Which sometime were
bedient, when once the longsuffering of God waited in the days of
rk was a preparing, wherein few, that is, eight souls
The like figure whereunto even baptism doth also now save us (not
of the filth of the flesh, but the answer of a good
resurrection of Jesus Christ: 3:22 Who
 gone into heaven, and is on the right hand of God; angels and
rs being made subject unto him.
asmuch then as Christ hath suffered for us in the flesh, arm
th the same mind: for he that hath suffered in
That he no longer should live the
 his time in the flesh to the lusts of men, but to the will of
time past of our life may suffice us to have wrought the
 we walked in lasciviousness, lusts, excess
bominable idolatries: 4:4
ink it strange that ye run not with them to the same
of you: 4:5 Who shall give account to
 that is ready to judge the quick and the dead.
spel preached also to them that are
 that they might be judged according to men in the flesh, but
 in the spirit.
things is at hand: be ye therefore sober, and
ll things have fervent charity among yourselves: for
ude of sins.
 another without grudging.
y man hath received the gift, even so minister the same
wards of the manifold grace of God.
1 If any man speak, let him speak as the oracles of God; if any man
im do it as of the ability which God giveth: that God
d through Jesus Christ, to whom be praise
4:12 Beloved, think it not strange concerning the fiery trial which is
as though some strange thing happened unto you: 4:13 But
e partakers of Christ's sufferings; that,
be glad also with exceeding
If ye be reproached for the name of Christ, happy are ye; for the
nd of God resteth upon you: on their part he is evil
 is glorified.
 suffer as a murderer, or as a thief, or as an
men's matters.
er as a Christian, let him not be ashamed; but

 must begin at the house of
t first begin at us, what shall the end be of them that
  4:18 And if the righteous scarcely be
aved, where shall the ungodly and the sinner appear?  4:19 Wherefore
suffer according to the will of God commit the keeping
l doing, as unto a faithful Creator.
1 The elders which are among you I exhort, who am also an elder, and
he sufferings of Christ, and also a partaker of the
:2 Feed the flock of God which is among
ou, taking the oversight thereof, not by constraint, but willingly;
lucre, but of a ready mind; 5:3 Neither as being lords
ng ensamples to the flock.
 the chief Shepherd shall appear, ye shall receive a crown
 away.
 yourselves unto the elder. Yea, all
ou be subject one to another, and be clothed with humility: for
roud, and giveth grace to the humble.
:6 Humble yourselves therefore under the mighty hand of God, that he
in due time: 5:7 Casting all your care upon him; for he
ober, be vigilant; because your adversary the devil, as a
ut, seeking whom he may devour: 5:9 Whom
resist stedfast in the faith, knowing that the same afflictions are
 your brethren that are in the world.
:10 But the God of all grace, who hath called us unto his eternal
esus, after that ye have suffered a while, make you
settle you.
minion for ever and ever. Amen.
 Silvanus, a faithful brother unto you, as I suppose, I have
ting, and testifying that this is the true grace
he church that is at Babylon, elected together with you,
Marcus my son.
r with a kiss of charity. Peace be with you


stle of Jesus Christ, to them
btained like precious faith with us through the
r Jesus Christ: 1:2 Grace and peace
ltiplied unto you through the knowledge of God, and of Jesus our
g as his divine power hath given unto us all things
iness, through the knowledge of him
hath called us to glory and virtue: 1:4 Whereby are given unto us
nd precious promises: that by these ye might be
ing escaped the corruption that is
 world through lust.
s, giving all diligence, add to your faith virtue;
 to knowledge temperance; and to
ce patience; and to patience godliness; 1:7 And to godliness
d to brotherly kindness charity.
r if these things be in you, and abound, they make you that ye
ren nor unfruitful in the knowledge of our Lord
cketh these things is blind, and cannot see afar
s purged from his old sins.
ore the rather, brethren, give diligence to make your
r if ye do these things, ye shall never
all: 1:11 For so an entrance shall be ministered unto you abundantly
asting kingdom of our Lord and Saviour Jesus Christ.
 negligent to put you always in
ce of these things, though ye know them, and be established

am in this tabernacle, to stir
putting you in remembrance; 1:14 Knowing that shortly I must
acle, even as our Lord Jesus Christ hath shewed
ur that ye may be able after my decease to

y devised fables, when we made
 you the power and coming of our Lord Jesus Christ, but were
jesty.
e Father honour and glory, when there
e such a voice to him from the excellent glory, This is my beloved
m well pleased.
ch came from heaven we heard, when we were with
ave also a more sure word of prophecy; whereunto ye do well
nto a light that shineth in a dark place, until
e in your hearts: 1:20 Knowing this
, that no prophecy of the scripture is of any private
he prophecy came not in old time by the will of man: but
hey were moved by the Holy Ghost.
ut there were false prophets also among the people, even as there
achers among you, who privily shall bring in damnable
rd that bought them, and bring upon
elves swift destruction.
hall follow their pernicious ways; by reason of whom the
 spoken of.
s shall they with feigned words make
handise of you: whose judgment now of a long time lingereth not,
n slumbereth not.
 not the angels that sinned, but cast them down
ains of darkness, to be reserved
gment; 2:5 And spared not the old world, but saved Noah the
er of righteousness, bringing in the flood upon
urning the cities of Sodom and
nto ashes condemned them with an overthrow, making them an
 after should live ungodly; 2:7 And delivered
rsation of the wicked: 2:8 (For
teous man dwelling among them, in seeing and hearing, vexed
 day to day with their unlawful deeds;) 2:9 The
ly out of temptations, and to
 unjust unto the day of judgment to be punished: 2:10 But
ter the flesh in the lust of uncleanness, and
they, selfwilled, they are not
speak evil of dignities.
ngels, which are greater in power and might, bring not
hem before the Lord.
 natural brute beasts, made to be taken and
t they understand not; and
perish in their own corruption; 2:13 And shall receive
s, as they that count it pleasure to riot
shes, sporting themselves
deceivings while they feast with you; 2:14 Having eyes
annot cease from sin; beguiling unstable
souls: an heart they have exercised with covetous practices; cursed
Which have forsaken the right way, and are gone astray,
 the son of Bosor, who loved the wages of
 his iniquity: the dumb ass
 man's voice forbad the madness of the prophet.
r, clouds that are carried with a
; to whom the mist of darkness is reserved for ever.
at swelling words of vanity, they allure
through the lusts of the flesh, through much wantonness, those that
ped from them who live in error.
hile they promise them liberty, they themselves are the servants
 of whom a man is overcome, of the same is he
ter they have escaped the pollutions of the world
 and Saviour Jesus Christ, they are
 entangled therein, and overcome, the latter end is worse with
ing.
em not to have known the way of
ness, than, after they have known it, to turn from the holy
nto them.
them according to the true proverb, The
og is turned to his own vomit again; and the sow that was washed to
n the mire.
loved, I now write unto you; in both which
mbrance: 3:2 That ye may be
e words which were spoken before by the holy prophets,
 the apostles of the Lord and Saviour: 3:3
e in the last days scoffers,
r their own lusts, 3:4 And saying, Where is the promise of
e fathers fell asleep, all things continue as
reation.
e ignorant of, that by the word of God
e heavens were of old, and the earth standing out of the water and
6 Whereby the world that then was, being overflowed
he heavens and the earth, which are
by the same word are kept in store, reserved unto fire against
and perdition of ungodly men.
beloved, be not ignorant of this one thing, that one day is
sand years, and a thousand years as one day.
 his promise, as some men count
; but is longsuffering to us-ward, not willing that any
 should come to repentance.
e day of the Lord will come as a thief in the night; in the
 pass away with a great noise, and the elements
arth also and the works that are
shall be burned up.
at all these things shall be dissolved, what manner
l holy conversation and godliness, 3:12
ooking for and hasting unto the coming of the day of God, wherein the
 on fire shall be dissolved, and the elements shall melt
evertheless we, according to his promise,
rein dwelleth righteousness.
fore, beloved, seeing that ye look for such things, be
d of him in peace, without spot, and
eless.
ffering of our Lord is salvation; even
 our beloved brother Paul also according to the wisdom given unto
unto you; 3:16 As also in all his epistles, speaking
ich are some things hard to be
, which they that are unlearned and unstable wrest, as they
tures, unto their own destruction.
 Ye therefore, beloved, seeing ye know these things before, beware
ing led away with the error of the wicked, fall from
 But grow in grace, and in the knowledge of our Lord and Saviour
im be glory both now and for ever. Amen.


, which we have heard, which we
 with our eyes, which we have looked upon, and our hands have
of life; 1:2 (For the life was manifested, and we
nd shew unto you that eternal life,
 was with the Father, and was manifested unto us;) 1:3 That which
heard declare we unto you, that ye also may have
fellowship is with the Father, and
is Son Jesus Christ.
gs write we unto you, that your joy may be full.
ch we have heard of him, and declare
 you, that God is light, and in him is no darkness at all.
have fellowship with him, and walk in darkness,
ut if we walk in the light, as he
he light, we have fellowship one with another, and the blood of
n cleanseth us from all sin.
say that we have no sin, we deceive ourselves, and the truth
f we confess our sins, he is faithful and just to forgive us our
se us from all unrighteousness.
 we say that we have not sinned, we make him a liar, and his
2:1 My little children, these things write I unto you, that ye sin
ny man sin, we have an advocate with the Father, Jesus Christ
d he is the propitiation for our sins: and not
s of the whole world.
 do know that we know him, if we keep his
w him, and keepeth not his commandments, is a

rily is the love of God
 know we that we are in him.
t saith he abideth in him ought himself also so to walk,
Brethren, I write no new commandment unto you, but an old
from the beginning. The old commandment is
ginning.
 write unto you, which thing is true in
im and in you: because the darkness is past, and the true light now
 He that saith he is in the light, and hateth his brother, is in
l now.
abideth in the light, and there is
ccasion of stumbling in him.
e that hateth his brother is in darkness, and walketh in
whither he goeth, because that darkness hath
 you, little children, because your sins are forgiven
:13 I write unto you, fathers, because ye have known him that is from
. I write unto you, young men, because ye have overcome
o you, little children, because ye have
nown the Father.
to you, fathers, because ye have known him that
en unto you, young men, because ye
rong, and the word of God abideth in you, and ye have overcome
:15 Love not the world, neither the things that are in the world. If
he world, the love of the Father is not in him.
, the lust of the flesh, and the lust
the eyes, and the pride of life, is not of the Father, but is of
 And the world passeth away, and the lust thereof: but he that
d abideth for ever.
n, it is the last time: and as ye have heard that
re there many antichrists; whereby we
w that it is the last time.
ent out from us, but they were not of us; for if they had
 doubt have continued with us: but they went
that they were not all of us.
ye have an unction from the Holy One, and ye know all things.
tten unto you because ye know not the truth, but
e is of the truth.
ut he that denieth that Jesus is the Christ? He is
her and the Son.
 the Son, the same hath not the Father: he that
er also.
in you, which ye have heard from the
nning. If that which ye have heard from the beginning shall remain
shall continue in the Son, and in the Father.
e hath promised us, even eternal

 concerning them that seduce
 But the anointing which ye have received of him abideth in you,
at any man teach you: but as the same anointing
truth, and is no lie, and even as
 taught you, ye shall abide in him.
8 And now, little children, abide in him; that, when he shall
onfidence, and not be ashamed before him at his
is righteous, ye know that every one that
1 Behold, what manner of love the Father hath bestowed upon us, that
alled the sons of God: therefore the world knoweth us

d, and it doth not yet appear
ll be: but we know that, when he shall appear, we shall be
ee him as he is.
 hath this hope in him purifieth himself, even
itteth sin transgresseth also the law: for sin is
3:5 And ye know that he was manifested to take away our sins; and in

ot: whosoever sinneth hath not
neither known him.
 let no man deceive you: he that doeth
ghteousness is righteous, even as he is righteous.
of the devil; for the devil sinneth from
the beginning. For this purpose the Son of God was manifested, that he
y the works of the devil.
 is born of God doth not commit sin; for his seed
in, because he is born of God.
this the children of God are manifest, and the children of the
th not righteousness is not of God, neither he
 For this is the message that ye heard from the beginning, that we
another.
hat wicked one, and slew his brother.
 wherefore slew he him? Because his own works were evil, and his
s.
 world hate you.
ave passed from death unto life, because we love
is brother abideth in death.
ever hateth his brother is a murderer: and ye know that no
fe abiding in him.
 we the love of God, because he laid down his life
 our lives for the brethren.
hoso hath this world's good, and seeth his brother have
owels of compassion from him, how dwelleth
children, let us not love in
r in tongue; but in deed and in truth.
3:19 And hereby we know that we are of the truth, and shall assure our
e him.
, God is greater than our heart, and
eth all things.
art condemn us not, then have we confidence
sk, we receive of him, because we keep his
re pleasing in his sight.
 is his commandment, That we should believe on the name
d love one another, as he gave us
ment.
andments dwelleth in him, and he in

s, by the Spirit which he hath

but try the spirits whether
od: because many false prophets are gone out into the
the Spirit of God: Every spirit that confesseth
esh is of God: 4:3 And every spirit
confesseth not that Jesus Christ is come in the flesh is not of
at spirit of antichrist, whereof ye have heard that
ready is it in the world.
 God, little children, and have overcome them: because
, than he that is in the world.
y are of the world: therefore speak they of the world, and the

heareth us; he that is not of
 not us. Hereby know we the spirit of truth, and the spirit
d, let us love one another: for love is of God; and every
f God, and knoweth God.
eth not knoweth not God; for God is love.
God toward us, because that God
only begotten Son into the world, that we might live through
 love, not that we loved God, but that he loved us, and
itiation for our sins.
 God so loved us, we ought also to love one another.
 any time. If we love one another, God
elleth in us, and his love is perfected in us.
in him, and he in us, because he
en us of his Spirit.
een and do testify that the Father sent the Son to
4:15 Whosoever shall confess that Jesus is the Son of God, God
 he in God.
believed the love that God hath to us. God
elleth in God, and God in him.
ein is our love made perfect, that we may have boldness in the
ause as he is, so are we in this world.

t love casteth out fear:
h torment. He that feareth is not made perfect in
e he first loved us.
 I love God, and hateth his brother, he is a liar:
er whom he hath seen, how can he love
 whom he hath not seen?  4:21 And this commandment have we from
veth God love his brother also.
soever believeth that Jesus is the Christ is born of God: and
 him that begat loveth him also that is begotten
t we love the children of God, when we love
For this is the love of God, that we keep his commandments: and
e not grievous.
orn of God overcometh the world: and this is
 even our faith.
rcometh the world, but he that believeth that
 he that came by water and blood,
sus Christ; not by water only, but by water and blood. And it
areth witness, because the Spirit is truth.
ord in heaven, the Father, the
the Holy Ghost: and these three are one.

s in earth, the Spirit, and
d the blood: and these three agree in one.
the witness of God is greater:
s the witness of God which he hath testified of his Son.
n the Son of God hath the witness in himself:
im a liar; because he believeth
ecord that God gave of his Son.
d this is the record, that God hath given to us eternal life,
is Son.
life; and he that hath not the Son of
 hath not life.
I written unto you that believe on the name of
t ye have eternal life, and that
elieve on the name of the Son of God.
:14 And this is the confidence that we have in him, that, if we ask
ding to his will, he heareth us: 5:15 And if we know
 ask, we know that we have the petitions
that we desired of him.
 see his brother sin a sin which is not unto death, he
 him life for them that sin not unto
h. There is a sin unto death: I do not say that he shall pray for
nrighteousness is sin: and there is a sin not unto death.
ever is born of God sinneth not; but he that is
d that wicked one toucheth him not.
9 And we know that we are of God, and the whole world lieth in
And we know that the Son of God is come, and hath given us an
e may know him that is true, and we are in him
Christ. This is the true God, and
 life.
elves from idols. Amen.
d Epistle General of John
er unto the elect lady and her children, whom I love in
but also all they that have known the
th; 1:2 For the truth's sake, which dwelleth in us, and shall be

, from God the Father, and from
Jesus Christ, the Son of the Father, in truth and love.
at I found of thy children walking in truth,
 the Father.
, lady, not as though I wrote a new
ndment unto thee, but that which we had from the beginning, that
r.
fter his commandments. This is the
dment, That, as ye have heard from the beginning, ye should walk
many deceivers are entered into the world, who confess not
e in the flesh. This is a deceiver and an
at we lose not those things which we have
d.
deth not in the doctrine of
not God. He that abideth in the doctrine of Christ, he
 Son.
and bring not this doctrine, receive
not into your house, neither bid him God speed: 1:11 For he that
eed is partaker of his evil deeds.
 Having many things to write unto you, I would not write with
trust to come unto you, and speak face to face,
he children of thy elect sister greet thee. Amen.
 of John
eloved Gaius, whom I love in the truth.

 thou mayest prosper and be
en as thy soul prospereth.
joiced greatly, when the brethren came and testified of
even as thou walkest in the truth.
I have no greater joy than to hear that my children walk in truth.
hou doest faithfully whatsoever thou doest to the
hich have borne witness of thy
fore the church: whom if thou bring forward on their journey
ou shalt do well: 1:7 Because that for his
ing of the Gentiles.
ught to receive such, that we might be fellowhelpers
nto the church: but Diotrephes, who loveth to have the
iveth us not.
, I will remember his deeds which he doeth,
: and not content therewith,
 he himself receive the brethren, and forbiddeth them that
out of the church.
 not that which is evil, but that which is good.
he that doeth evil hath not seen
1:12 Demetrius hath good report of all men, and of the truth itself:
so bear record; and ye know that our record is true.
ite, but I will not with ink and pen write
tly see thee, and we shall
face. Peace be to thee. Our friends salute thee. Greet

e, the servant of Jesus Christ, and brother of James, to them
y God the Father, and preserved in Jesus Christ,
d peace, and love, be multiplied.
eloved, when I gave all diligence to write unto you of the common
 needful for me to write unto you, and exhort you
for the faith which was once
to the saints.
n men crept in unawares, who were before of
dly men, turning the grace of
o lasciviousness, and denying the only Lord God, and our
I will therefore put you in remembrance, though ye once knew this,
d, having saved the people out of the land of Egypt,
believed not.
kept not their first estate, but left their
rlasting chains under darkness
udgment of the great day.
odom and Gomorrha, and the cities about them in like
 to fornication, and going after strange
flesh, are set forth for an example, suffering the vengeance of
8 Likewise also these filthy dreamers defile the flesh, despise
 evil of dignities.
 archangel, when contending with the devil he
st not bring against him a
tion, but said, The Lord rebuke thee.
:10 But these speak evil of those things which they know not: but
turally, as brute beasts, in those things they
 them! for they have gone in the way of Cain, and ran
alaam for reward, and perished in the
nsaying of Core.
n your feasts of charity, when they feast with
: clouds they are without water,
about of winds; trees whose fruit withereth, without fruit,
by the roots; 1:13 Raging waves of the sea,
stars, to whom is reserved the
of darkness for ever.
so, the seventh from Adam, prophesied of these,
h ten thousands of his saints, 1:15
ecute judgment upon all, and to convince all that are ungodly
ir ungodly deeds which they have ungodly
committed, and of all their hard speeches which ungodly sinners have
 him.
ners, walking after their own lusts;
their mouth speaketh great swelling words, having men's persons in
se of advantage.
ember ye the words which were spoken before of
t; 1:18 How that they told you
ld be mockers in the last time, who should walk after their
:19 These be they who separate themselves, sensual, having not the
But ye, beloved, building up yourselves on your most holy faith,
y Ghost, 1:21 Keep yourselves in the love of God,
 Jesus Christ unto eternal life.
nd of some have compassion, making a difference: 1:23 And others
lling them out of the fire; hating even the garment
ow unto him that is able to keep you from falling, and to
ore the presence of his glory with exceeding
iour, be glory and majesty,
power, both now and ever. Amen.
he Revelation of Saint John the Devine

h God gave unto him, to shew
vants things which must shortly come to pass; and he sent
ngel unto his servant John: 1:2 Who bare
record of the word of God, and of the testimony of Jesus Christ, and
that he saw.
deth, and they that hear the words of this
e written therein: for the
d.
 are in Asia: Grace be unto you,
e, from him which is, and which was, and which is to come; and
ts which are before his throne; 1:5 And from Jesus
ess, and the first begotten of the
and the prince of the kings of the earth. Unto him that loved
m our sins in his own blood, 1:6 And hath made us
s Father; to him be glory and
r ever and ever. Amen.
ometh with clouds; and every eye shall see him, and
d all kindreds of the earth shall wail
cause of him. Even so, Amen.
lpha and Omega, the beginning and the ending, saith the
as, and which is to come, the Almighty.

 companion in tribulation,
gdom and patience of Jesus Christ, was in the isle that
ord of God, and for the testimony of Jesus
he Lord's day, and heard behind me a
t voice, as of a trumpet, 1:11 Saying, I am Alpha and Omega, the
: and, What thou seest, write in a book, and send it
are in Asia; unto Ephesus, and unto
a, and unto Pergamos, and unto Thyatira, and unto Sardis, and
d unto Laodicea.
ee the voice that spake with me. And being
 1:13 And in the midst of the
esticks one like unto the Son of man, clothed with a
girt about the paps with a golden

 like wool, as white as snow;
s were as a flame of fire; 1:15 And his feet like unto fine
d in a furnace; and his voice as the sound of
s right hand seven stars: and out of his mouth
 countenance was as the sun
s strength.
fell at his feet as dead. And he laid his
not; I am the first and the
am he that liveth, and was dead; and, behold, I am alive
ve the keys of hell and of death.
Write the things which thou hast seen, and the things which are,
ch shall be hereafter; 1:20 The mystery of the seven
right hand, and the seven golden
icks. The seven stars are the angels of the seven churches:
cks which thou sawest are the seven churches.
 Ephesus write; These things saith
t holdeth the seven stars in his right hand, who walketh in the
golden candlesticks; 2:2 I know thy works, and thy
w thou canst not bear them which are
: and thou hast tried them which say they are apostles, and are
 them liars: 2:3 And hast borne, and hast patience,
oured, and hast not fainted.
heless I have somewhat against thee, because thou hast left
Remember therefore from whence thou art fallen, and repent, and do
 or else I will come unto thee quickly, and will
place, except thou repent.
 thou hast, that thou hatest the deeds of the
:7 He that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the
m that overcometh will I give to eat of the tree of
the paradise of God.
ngel of the church in Smyrna write; These things
h was dead, and is alive; 2:9 I know
works, and tribulation, and poverty, (but thou art rich) and I
f them which say they are Jews, and are not, but
0 Fear none of those things which thou shalt suffer: behold, the
ome of you into prison, that ye may be tried; and ye
s: be thou faithful unto death, and I
l give thee a crown of life.
at hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the
ometh shall not be hurt of the second death.
in Pergamos write; These things
which hath the sharp sword with two edges; 2:13 I know thy
ellest, even where Satan's seat is: and thou
ied my faith, even in those days
Antipas was my faithful martyr, who was slain among you, where
:14 But I have a few things against thee, because thou hast there
e doctrine of Balaam, who taught Balac to cast a
 of Israel, to eat things sacrificed
 idols, and to commit fornication.
 So hast thou also them that hold the doctrine of the
ate.
nto thee quickly, and will fight
them with the sword of my mouth.
e that hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the
at overcometh will I give to eat of the hidden
ne, and in the stone a new name
which no man knoweth saving he that receiveth it.
church in Thyatira write; These things
ith the Son of God, who hath his eyes like unto a flame of fire, and
ike fine brass; 2:19 I know thy works, and charity, and
 patience, and thy works; and the last to
anding I have a few things against thee, because thou
 which calleth herself a prophetess, to
each and to seduce my servants to commit fornication, and to eat
unto idols.
o repent of her fornication; and she
nted not.
into a bed, and them that commit adultery
hey repent of their deeds.
ill kill her children with death; and all the churches
h searcheth the reins and hearts: and I
ill give unto every one of you according to your works.
and unto the rest in Thyatira, as many as
t known the depths of Satan,
k; I will put upon you none other burden.
d fast till I come.
ercometh, and keepeth my works unto the end, to him
ons: 2:27 And he shall rule them with a
od of iron; as the vessels of a potter shall they be broken to
eceived of my Father.
ive him the morning star.
hath an ear, let him hear what the Spirit saith unto the
the angel of the church in Sardis write; These things
Spirits of God, and the seven stars; I
ow thy works, that thou hast a name that thou livest, and art dead.
ul, and strengthen the things which remain, that are
ound thy works perfect before God.
Remember therefore how thou hast received and heard, and hold
therefore thou shalt not watch, I will come on
know what hour I will come upon
3:4 Thou hast a few names even in Sardis which have not defiled their
 they shall walk with me in white: for they are worthy.
he same shall be clothed in white raiment;
the book of life, but I will
name before my Father, and before his angels.
ar what the Spirit saith unto the
s.
n Philadelphia write; These things
he that is holy, he that is true, he that hath the key of David,
nd no man shutteth; and shutteth, and no man
 I have set before thee an open
 no man can shut it: for thou hast a little strength, and
st not denied my name.
ll make them of the synagogue of Satan, which say they
o lie; behold, I will make them to come
nd worship before thy feet, and to know that I have loved thee.
 hast kept the word of my patience, I also will keep
on, which shall come upon all the world,
to try them that dwell upon the earth.
3:11 Behold, I come quickly: hold that fast which thou hast, that no
rown.
ake a pillar in the temple of my God,
 he shall go no more out: and I will write upon him the name of my
e of the city of my God, which is new Jerusalem, which
om my God: and I will write upon him my
ew name.
him hear what the Spirit saith unto the
hurches.
 church of the Laodiceans write; These
ings saith the Amen, the faithful and true witness, the beginning of
f God; 3:15 I know thy works, that thou art neither cold
 cold or hot.
 art lukewarm, and neither cold nor hot, I
Because thou sayest, I am rich, and increased with goods, and
 and knowest not that thou art wretched, and
ked: 3:18 I counsel thee to buy
d tried in the fire, that thou mayest be rich; and white
be clothed, and that the shame of thy
edness do not appear; and anoint thine eyes with eyesalve, that

ten: be zealous therefore,

ck: if any man hear my voice,
e door, I will come in to him, and will sup with him, and
m that overcometh will I grant to sit with me in my throne,
, and am set down with my Father in his throne.
 hear what the Spirit saith unto the
ches.
old, a door was opened in heaven: and
 first voice which I heard was as it were of a trumpet talking with
 Come up hither, and I will shew thee things which must
mediately I was in the spirit: and, behold, a throne was set
 on the throne.
 to look upon like a jasper and a sardine
t the throne, in sight like
ld.
 four and twenty seats: and upon
s I saw four and twenty elders sitting, clothed in white
heir heads crowns of gold.
of the throne proceeded lightnings and thunderings and
 lamps of fire burning before the throne,
6 And before the throne there was a sea of glass like unto crystal:
t of the throne, and round about the throne, were four
nd behind.
like a lion, and the second beast like a
calf, and the third beast had a face as a man, and the fourth beast
ng eagle.
ach of them six wings about him; and they
ot day and night, saying,
y, LORD God Almighty, which was, and is, and is to
ts give glory and honour and thanks to him that
ver and ever, 4:10 The four and
ders fall down before him that sat on the throne, and worship
ver and ever, and cast their crowns before the
, O Lord, to receive glory and
 power: for thou hast created all things, and for thy
eated.
of him that sat on the throne a book
ten within and on the backside, sealed with seven seals.
ngel proclaiming with a loud voice, Who is
e seals thereof?  5:3 And no
n, nor in earth, neither under the earth, was able to open
k thereon.
 no man was found worthy to open and to
ead the book, neither to look thereon.
5:5 And one of the elders saith unto me, Weep not: behold, the Lion of
 Juda, the Root of David, hath prevailed to open the book,
eals thereof.
, in the midst of the throne and of the four
, stood a Lamb as it had been
ng seven horns and seven eyes, which are the seven Spirits
ll the earth.
the book out of the right hand of him that
had taken the book, the four beasts and four and
 Lamb, having every one of them
d golden vials full of odours, which are the prayers of
g a new song, saying, Thou art worthy to take the
of: for thou wast slain, and hast
d us to God by thy blood out of every kindred, and tongue, and
5:10 And hast made us unto our God kings and
th.
voice of many angels round about
ne and the beasts and the elders: and the number of them was
 thousand, and thousands of thousands; 5:12
 Lamb that was slain to receive
d riches, and wisdom, and strength, and honour, and glory,
d every creature which is in heaven, and on the earth, and
h as are in the sea, and all that are in them,
, and glory, and power, be unto
sitteth upon the throne, and unto the Lamb for ever and ever.
easts said, Amen. And the four and twenty elders
liveth for ever and ever.
 when the Lamb opened one of the seals, and I heard, as
r, one of the four beasts saying, Come and
e horse: and he that sat on him had a
; and a crown was given unto him: and he went forth conquering, and
6:3 And when he had opened the second seal, I heard the second beast
see.
se that was red: and power was given
im that sat thereon to take peace from the earth, and that they
ther: and there was given unto him a great sword.
third seal, I heard the third beast
Come and see. And I beheld, and lo a black horse; and he that sat
 of balances in his hand.
rd a voice in the midst of the four beasts say, A measure
 three measures of barley for a penny; and

eal, I heard the voice of the
t say, Come and see.
and behold a pale horse: and his name that sat on
with him. And power was given unto
ver the fourth part of the earth, to kill with sword, and with
th, and with the beasts of the earth.
:9 And when he had opened the fifth seal, I saw under the altar the
hat were slain for the word of God, and for the
 they cried with a loud voice,
w long, O Lord, holy and true, dost thou not judge and
t dwell on the earth?  6:11 And white
es were given unto every one of them; and it was said unto them,
est yet for a little season, until their
fellowservants also and their brethren, that should be killed as they
be fulfilled.
 had opened the sixth seal, and, lo, there
me black as sackcloth of hair,
on became as blood; 6:13 And the stars of heaven fell unto
 tree casteth her untimely figs, when she is
he heaven departed as a scroll when it is rolled together;
sland were moved out of their places.
:15 And the kings of the earth, and the great men, and the rich men,
captains, and the mighty men, and every bondman, and
 in the dens and in the rocks of the
tains; 6:16 And said to the mountains and rocks, Fall on us, and
ace of him that sitteth on the throne, and from the
 great day of his wrath is come; and
shall be able to stand?  7:1 And after these things I saw four
he four corners of the earth, holding the four
ould not blow on the earth, nor on
a, nor on any tree.
er angel ascending from the east, having the seal
ith a loud voice to the four angels,
hom it was given to hurt the earth and the sea, 7:3 Saying, Hurt
ther the sea, nor the trees, till we have sealed the
oreheads.
 them which were sealed: and there were
ealed an hundred and forty and four thousand of all the tribes of the
srael.
aled twelve thousand. Of the tribe of
ben were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Gad were sealed

lve thousand. Of the tribe of
were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Manasses were

twelve thousand. Of the tribe
e sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Issachar were
7:8 Of the tribe of Zabulon were sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe
e sealed twelve thousand. Of the tribe of Benjamin were
7:9 After this I beheld, and, lo, a great multitude, which no man
all nations, and kindreds, and people, and tongues,
fore the Lamb, clothed with white
and palms in their hands; 7:10 And cried with a loud voice,
r God which sitteth upon the throne, and unto
stood round about the throne, and about the
fore the throne on their faces,
ipped God, 7:12 Saying, Amen: Blessing, and glory, and
d honour, and power, and might, be unto
ur God for ever and ever. Amen.
d one of the elders answered, saying unto me, What are these
hite robes? and whence came they?  7:14 And I
 he said to me, These are they
 out of great tribulation, and have washed their robes, and
blood of the Lamb.
hey before the throne of God, and serve him day
t sitteth on the throne shall dwell
 them.
neither thirst any more; neither shall
e sun light on them, nor any heat.
 For the Lamb which is in the midst of the throne shall feed them,
hem unto living fountains of waters: and God shall
yes.
enth seal, there was silence in
out the space of half an hour.
I saw the seven angels which stood before God; and to them
s.
 at the altar, having a golden
d there was given unto him much incense, that he should
f all saints upon the golden altar which
was before the throne.
e of the incense, which came with the prayers of the
 out of the angel's hand.
ngel took the censer, and filled it with fire of the
rth: and there were voices, and
gs, and lightnings, and an earthquake.
8:6 And the seven angels which had the seven trumpets prepared

 followed hail and fire mingled
d, and they were cast upon the earth: and the third part of
 all green grass was burnt up.
the second angel sounded, and as it were a great mountain
t into the sea: and the third part of the sea
of the creatures which were in
nd had life, died; and the third part of the ships were
third angel sounded, and there fell a great star from
lamp, and it fell upon the third part of
the rivers, and upon the fountains of waters; 8:11 And the name of the
ed Wormwood: and the third part of the waters became
 the waters, because they were made
r.
nd the third part of the sun was
 and the third part of the moon, and the third part of the
art of them was darkened, and the day shone
ht likewise.
rd an angel flying through the midst of
eaven, saying with a loud voice, Woe, woe, woe, to the inhabiters of
eason of the other voices of the trumpet of the three
d!  9:1 And the fifth angel sounded, and
I saw a star fall from heaven unto the earth: and to him was given the
ottomless pit.
ttomless pit; and there arose a smoke out of
ce; and the sun and the air were
 by reason of the smoke of the pit.
 And there came out of the smoke locusts upon the earth: and unto
wer, as the scorpions of the earth have power.
 they should not hurt the grass of
rth, neither any green thing, neither any tree; but only those
he seal of God in their foreheads.
And to them it was given that they should not kill them, but that
rmented five months: and their torment was as the
riketh a man.
ll men seek death, and shall not find it; and
flee from them.
he locusts were like unto horses prepared unto
t were crowns like gold, and their
were as the faces of men.
had hair as the hair of women, and their teeth were as
nd they had breastplates, as it were breastplates of iron; and
ings was as the sound of chariots of many horses
y had tails like unto scorpions, and there were stings in
wer was to hurt men five months.
nd they had a king over them, which is the angel of the
in the Hebrew tongue is Abaddon, but in the

come two woes more hereafter.
the sixth angel sounded, and I heard a voice from the four
r which is before God, 9:14 Saying to the
the four angels which are
eat river Euphrates.
angels were loosed, which were prepared for an hour,
year, for to slay the third part of men.

orsemen were two hundred
d: and I heard the number of them.
 And thus I saw the horses in the vision, and them that sat on
lates of fire, and of jacinth, and brimstone: and
he heads of lions; and out of their
s issued fire and smoke and brimstone.
9:18 By these three was the third part of men killed, by the fire, and
, and by the brimstone, which issued out of their mouths.
 in their mouth, and in their tails: for their
ad heads, and with them they do
9:20 And the rest of the men which were not killed by these plagues
t of the works of their hands, that they should not
ld, and silver, and brass, and stone,
 of wood: which neither can see, nor hear, nor walk: 9:21 Neither
their murders, nor of their sorceries, nor of their
s.
come down from heaven, clothed
ud: and a rainbow was upon his head, and his face was as it
eet as pillars of fire: 10:2 And he had in his
his right foot upon the sea, and
 foot on the earth, 10:3 And cried with a loud voice, as when
hen he had cried, seven thunders uttered their
hunders had uttered their voices, I was about
aven saying unto me, Seal up
 which the seven thunders uttered, and write them not.
 saw stand upon the sea and upon the earth
ware by him that liveth for
, who created heaven, and the things that therein are,
s that therein are, and the sea, and the
things which are therein, that there should be time no longer: 10:7
 of the voice of the seventh angel, when he shall begin
d should be finished, as he hath declared
 the voice which I heard from heaven spake unto me again, and
 little book which is open in the hand of the
 upon the earth.
he angel, and said unto him, Give me the little
 and eat it up; and it shall make
ly bitter, but it shall be in thy mouth sweet as honey.
le book out of the angel's hand, and ate it
ey: and as soon as I had eaten
ly was bitter.
e, Thou must prophesy again before many
eoples, and nations, and tongues, and kings.
ike unto a rod: and the angel
ng, Rise, and measure the temple of God, and the altar, and
in.
 the temple leave out, and measure
; for it is given unto the Gentiles: and the holy city shall
forty and two months.
ive power unto my two witnesses, and they shall
 threescore days, clothed in

the two candlesticks standing
God of the earth.
ill hurt them, fire proceedeth out of their
 if any man will hurt them, he
is manner be killed.
wer to shut heaven, that it rain not in the days of
over waters to turn them to blood, and
 smite the earth with all plagues, as often as they will.
l have finished their testimony, the beast that
 shall make war against them, and
vercome them, and kill them.
heir dead bodies shall lie in the street of the great city,
lled Sodom and Egypt, where also our Lord was
ople and kindreds and tongues and nations shall
d an half, and shall not suffer
d bodies to be put in graves.
 they that dwell upon the earth shall rejoice over them, and
send gifts one to another; because these two
the earth.
nd an half the spirit of life from God
tered into them, and they stood upon their feet; and great fear fell
h saw them.
t voice from heaven saying unto them, Come
n in a cloud; and their
em.
 great earthquake, and the tenth
the city fell, and in the earthquake were slain of men seven
ant were affrighted, and gave glory to the God
s past; and, behold, the third woe cometh
ounded; and there were great voices in
aven, saying, The kingdoms of this world are become the kingdoms of
f his Christ; and he shall reign for ever and ever.
 elders, which sat before God on their
ats, fell upon their faces, and worshipped God, 11:17 Saying, We
O LORD God Almighty, which art, and wast, and art to
to thee thy great power, and hast
.
 thy wrath is come, and the time
ead, that they should be judged, and that thou shouldest give
nts the prophets, and to the saints, and them
and shouldest destroy them which
the earth.
was opened in heaven, and there was seen
in his temple the ark of his testament: and there were lightnings, and
thunderings, and an earthquake, and great hail.
onder in heaven; a woman clothed with
 sun, and the moon under her feet, and upon her head a crown of
And she being with child cried, travailing in

 heaven; and behold a great
aving seven heads and ten horns, and seven crowns upon
ail drew the third part of the stars of heaven, and did
 the dragon stood before the woman which
was ready to be delivered, for to devour her child as soon as it was
And she brought forth a man child, who was to rule all nations
and her child was caught up unto God, and to his
 into the wilderness, where she hath a place
 her there a thousand two
eescore days.
 heaven: Michael and his angels fought
ainst the dragon; and the dragon fought and his angels, 12:8 And
ther was their place found any more in heaven.
 out, that old serpent, called the
 and Satan, which deceiveth the whole world: he was cast out
s angels were cast out with him.
And I heard a loud voice saying in heaven, Now is come
 the kingdom of our God, and the power of
en is cast down, which
e our God day and night.
 overcame him by the blood of the Lamb, and by the word
y loved not their lives unto the death.

ye that dwell in them. Woe to
ers of the earth and of the sea! for the devil is come down
wrath, because he knoweth that he hath but a
on saw that he was cast unto the earth, he
 the man child.
were given two wings of a great eagle, that she
 her place, where she is nourished
time, and times, and half a time, from the face of the serpent.
pent cast out of his mouth water as a flood after the
r to be carried away of the flood.
6 And the earth helped the woman, and the earth opened her mouth,
the flood which the dragon cast out of his mouth.
with the woman, and went to make war
 the remnant of her seed, which keep the commandments of God, and
y of Jesus Christ.
n the sand of the sea, and saw a beast rise up out
nd ten horns, and upon his horns ten
ns, and upon his heads the name of blasphemy.
like unto a leopard, and his feet
 the feet of a bear, and his mouth as the mouth of a lion: and
his power, and his seat, and great authority.
it were wounded to death; and his
wound was healed: and all the world wondered after the beast.
ipped the dragon which gave power unto the beast:
ying, Who is like unto the beast? who
able to make war with him?  13:5 And there was given unto him a
t things and blasphemies; and power was given unto
nths.
lasphemy against God, to blaspheme
me, and his tabernacle, and them that dwell in heaven.
 him to make war with the saints, and to
overcome them: and power was given him over all kindreds, and tongues,

 shall worship him, whose names
ritten in the book of life of the Lamb slain from the
3:9 If any man have an ear, let him hear.
all go into captivity: he that
th the sword must be killed with the sword. Here is the
he saints.
east coming up out of the earth; and he
ad two horns like a lamb, and he spake as a dragon.
he power of the first beast before him,
nd causeth the earth and them which dwell therein to worship the
 deadly wound was healed.
doeth great wonders, so that he maketh fire come down
he sight of men, 13:14 And deceiveth them
hose miracles which he had
 the sight of the beast; saying to them that dwell on
ake an image to the beast, which had the
wound by a sword, and did live.
nd he had power to give life unto the image of the beast, that
st should both speak, and cause that as many as
beast should be killed.
useth all, both small and great, rich and poor, free
 their right hand, or in their
 13:17 And that no man might buy or sell, save he that had
 the beast, or the number of his name.
13:18 Here is wisdom. Let him that hath understanding count the number
: for it is the number of a man; and his number is Six

d on the mount Sion, and with
red forty and four thousand, having his Father's name

 the voice of many waters, and
ce of a great thunder: and I heard the voice of harpers
4:3 And they sung as it were a new song
efore the throne, and before the four beasts, and the elders: and no
n that song but the hundred and forty and four thousand,
he earth.
e not defiled with women; for they are
rgins. These are they which follow the Lamb whithersoever he goeth.
emed from among men, being the firstfruits unto God and
 their mouth was found no guile: for they are without fault
d.
the midst of heaven, having the
ng gospel to preach unto them that dwell on the earth, and to
dred, and tongue, and people, 14:7 Saying with a
ry to him; for the hour of his
s come: and worship him that made heaven, and earth, and the
 of waters.
ther angel, saying, Babylon is fallen, is
 all nations drink of the
th of her fornication.
rd angel followed them, saying with a loud voice, If
his image, and receive his mark in his
rehead, or in his hand, 14:10 The same shall drink of the wine of
 which is poured out without mixture into the cup of
be tormented with fire and brimstone in
he presence of the holy angels, and in the presence of the Lamb:
e of their torment ascendeth up for ever and ever:
ght, who worship the beast and his
 and whosoever receiveth the mark of his name.
saints: here are they that keep the
ndments of God, and the faith of Jesus.

ing unto me, Write, Blessed
which die in the Lord from henceforth: Yea, saith the
om their labours; and their works do
ow them.
 a white cloud, and upon the cloud one
t like unto the Son of man, having on his head a golden crown, and
arp sickle.
e out of the temple, crying with a loud
oice to him that sat on the cloud, Thrust in thy sickle, and reap:
come for thee to reap; for the harvest of the earth is
at on the cloud thrust in his sickle on the earth;
17 And another angel came out of the temple which is in heaven, he
arp sickle.
e out from the altar, which had power over
hat had the sharp sickle,
in thy sharp sickle, and gather the clusters of the
es are fully ripe.
thrust in his sickle into the earth, and gathered
t into the great winepress of the
f God.
den without the city, and blood came
of the winepress, even unto the horse bridles, by the space of a
undred furlongs.
 sign in heaven, great and marvellous, seven
for in them is filled up the
.
ass mingled with fire: and them
gotten the victory over the beast, and over his image, and
the number of his name, stand on the sea of
 And they sing the song of Moses the servant of God, and the song
ng, Great and marvellous are thy works, Lord God
ys, thou King of saints.
 not fear thee, O Lord, and glorify thy name? for thou
ns shall come and worship before thee; for
 And after that I looked, and, behold, the temple of the
y in heaven was opened: 15:6 And the seven
e seven plagues, clothed in
e linen, and having their breasts girded with golden
e four beasts gave unto the seven angels seven
d, who liveth for ever and ever.
nd the temple was filled with smoke from the glory of God, and
no man was able to enter into the temple, till the
s were fulfilled.
eat voice out of the temple saying to the seven
the vials of the wrath of God upon
rth.
d out his vial upon the earth; and
fell a noisome and grievous sore upon the men which had the mark
upon them which worshipped his image.
6:3 And the second angel poured out his vial upon the sea; and it
od of a dead man: and every living soul died in the
l poured out his vial upon the rivers and
d.
ters say, Thou art righteous, O
ch art, and wast, and shalt be, because thou hast judged
e shed the blood of saints and prophets, and thou
or they are worthy.
other out of the altar say, Even so, Lord God
judgments.
ured out his vial upon the sun; and power
e.
t heat, and blasphemed the name of
hich hath power over these plagues: and they repented not to
10 And the fifth angel poured out his vial upon the seat of the
dom was full of darkness; and they gnawed their
med the God of heaven because of
ins and their sores, and repented not of their deeds.
oured out his vial upon the great river
uphrates; and the water thereof was dried up, that the way of the
 might be prepared.
ee unclean spirits like frogs come out of the mouth
outh of the beast, and out of the mouth
f the false prophet.
 the spirits of devils, working miracles, which go
h and of the whole world, to gather
to the battle of that great day of God Almighty.
 Blessed is he that watcheth, and
 his garments, lest he walk naked, and they see his shame.
them together into a place called in the Hebrew
 seventh angel poured out his vial into the air; and
f the temple of heaven, from the throne,
saying, It is done.
e voices, and thunders, and lightnings; and there
as not since men were upon the earth,
mighty an earthquake, and so great.
19 And the great city was divided into three parts, and the cities
ell: and great Babylon came in remembrance before God,
the wine of the fierceness of his wrath.

e mountains were not found.
here fell upon men a great hail out of heaven, every stone
lent: and men blasphemed God because of the
eof was exceeding great.
 came one of the seven angels which had the seven vials,
 unto me, Come hither; I will shew unto thee
itteth upon many waters: 17:2
he kings of the earth have committed fornication, and the
have been made drunk with the wine of her
y in the spirit into the wilderness: and I
beast, full of names of
 seven heads and ten horns.
e woman was arrayed in purple and scarlet colour, and
 stones and pearls, having a golden cup
n her hand full of abominations and filthiness of her fornication:
r forehead was a name written, MYSTERY, BABYLON THE
D ABOMINATIONS OF THE EARTH.
 saw the woman drunken with the blood of the saints, and
yrs of Jesus: and when I saw her, I wondered
 angel said unto me, Wherefore didst thou marvel? I will
he woman, and of the beast that carrieth
her, which hath the seven heads and ten horns.
s, and is not; and shall ascend out
e bottomless pit, and go into perdition: and they that dwell on
der, whose names were not written in the book of
rld, when they behold the beast that
 and is not, and yet is.
is the mind which hath wisdom. The seven heads are seven
man sitteth.
kings: five are fallen, and one is, and the
th, he must continue a short
:11 And the beast that was, and is not, even he is the eighth, and
 and goeth into perdition.
e ten horns which thou sawest are ten kings, which have
 but receive power as kings one hour with
and shall give their power and strength
nto the beast.
ar with the Lamb, and the Lamb shall overcome
ng of kings: and they that are
re called, and chosen, and faithful.
:15 And he saith unto me, The waters which thou sawest, where the
e peoples, and multitudes, and nations, and tongues.
h thou sawest upon the beast, these shall
te and naked, and shall eat
d burn her with fire.
h put in their hearts to fulfil his will, and to
 the beast, until the words of God
be fulfilled.
 thou sawest is that great city, which
igneth over the kings of the earth.
1 And after these things I saw another angel come down from heaven,
wer; and the earth was lightened with his glory.
a strong voice, saying, Babylon the
 is fallen, is fallen, and is become the habitation of devils,
y foul spirit, and a cage of every unclean and
s have drunk of the wine of the wrath of her
h have committed fornication
d the merchants of the earth are waxed rich through the
.
eaven, saying, Come out of her,
, that ye be not partakers of her sins, and that ye receive
18:5 For her sins have reached unto heaven, and God hath remembered

ou, and double unto her double
to her works: in the cup which she hath filled fill to her
 she hath glorified herself, and lived deliciously, so
 her: for she saith in her heart, I sit a
sorrow.
s come in one day, death, and mourning,
nd famine; and she shall be utterly burned with fire: for strong is
o judgeth her.
e earth, who have committed fornication and
l her, and lament for her, when
l see the smoke of her burning, 18:10 Standing afar off for
, saying, Alas, alas that great city Babylon,
thy judgment come.
nts of the earth shall weep and mourn over her;
 any more: 18:12 The merchandise of
 and silver, and precious stones, and of pearls, and fine linen,
lk, and scarlet, and all thyine wood, and all manner
er vessels of most precious wood, and of
brass, and iron, and marble, 18:13 And cinnamon, and odours, and
nkincense, and wine, and oil, and fine flour, and
 horses, and chariots, and slaves,
uls of men.
hy soul lusted after are departed from
ee, and all things which were dainty and goodly are departed from
alt find them no more at all.
 merchants of these things, which were made rich by her,
he fear of her torment, weeping and wailing,
t city, that was clothed in fine
nd purple, and scarlet, and decked with gold, and precious
17 For in one hour so great riches is come to
 the company in ships, and
s many as trade by sea, stood afar off, 18:18 And cried
her burning, saying, What city is like unto
ust on their heads, and cried,
d wailing, saying, Alas, alas that great city, wherein were
ships in the sea by reason of her costliness!

nd ye holy apostles and
 hath avenged you on her.
ighty angel took up a stone like a great millstone, and
g, Thus with violence shall that great city
und no more at all.
 of harpers, and musicians, and of pipers, and
t all in thee; and no craftsman,
oever craft he be, shall be found any more in thee; and the
all be heard no more at all in thee; 18:23 And
 more at all in thee; and the
e bridegroom and of the bride shall be heard no more at all
nts were the great men of the earth; for by thy
.
of prophets, and of saints, and
at were slain upon the earth.
after these things I heard a great voice of much people in
; Salvation, and glory, and honour, and power,
 and righteous are his judgments:
hath judged the great whore, which did corrupt the earth with
hath avenged the blood of his servants at her
leluia And her smoke rose up for ever and
ers and the four beasts fell down and
shipped God that sat on the throne, saying, Amen; Alleluia.
 out of the throne, saying, Praise our God, all
im, both small and great.
ard as it were the voice of a great multitude, and as the
 as the voice of mighty thunderings, saying,
reigneth.
ce, and give honour to him: for the
age of the Lamb is come, and his wife hath made herself ready.
s granted that she should be arrayed in fine linen,
inen is the righteousness of saints.
:9 And he saith unto me, Write, Blessed are they which are called
 supper of the Lamb. And he saith unto me, These are
:10 And I fell at his feet to worship him. And he said unto me, See
 I am thy fellowservant, and of thy brethren that have
hip God: for the testimony of Jesus is the
eaven opened, and behold a white horse; and he that
l and True, and in righteousness he
judge and make war.
 as a flame of fire, and on his head were many
hat no man knew, but he himself.
And he was clothed with a vesture dipped in blood: and his name
of God.
 in heaven followed him upon white
, clothed in fine linen, white and clean.
p sword, that with it he should
 nations: and he shall rule them with a rod of iron: and he
of the fierceness and wrath of Almighty God.
 on his thigh a name written, KING
GS, AND LORD OF LORDS.
an angel standing in the sun; and he cried with a loud
ls that fly in the midst of heaven, Come
and gather yourselves together unto the supper of the great God; 19:18
eat the flesh of kings, and the flesh of captains, and the
 the flesh of horses, and of them that sit on
free and bond, both small and
9:19 And I saw the beast, and the kings of the earth, and their
gether to make war against him that sat on the
0 And the beast was taken, and with him the false prophet that
ore him, with which he deceived them that had
hem that worshipped his image.
 were cast alive into a lake of fire burning with brimstone.
t were slain with the sword of him that sat upon
ut of his mouth: and all the fowls
illed with their flesh.
an angel come down from heaven, having the key of the
ain in his hand.
on the dragon, that old serpent, which is the
usand years, 20:3 And cast him
ottomless pit, and shut him up, and set a seal upon him,
 nations no more, till the thousand years
st be loosed a little season.
I saw thrones, and they sat upon them, and judgment was given
the souls of them that were beheaded for the
God, and which had not
st, neither his image, neither had received his mark
eir hands; and they lived and reigned
h Christ a thousand years.
 rest of the dead lived not again until the thousand years
he first resurrection.
 holy is he that hath part in the first resurrection:
 no power, but they shall be priests of
od and of Christ, and shall reign with him a thousand years.
ousand years are expired, Satan shall be loosed
o out to deceive the nations which
 the four quarters of the earth, Gog, and Magog, to gather them
 the number of whom is as the sand of the sea.
th of the earth, and compassed the
f the saints about, and the beloved city: and fire came down
, and devoured them.
l that deceived them was cast into the lake of fire
and the false prophet are, and shall be
ormented day and night for ever and ever.
nd him that sat on it, from
e earth and the heaven fled away; and there was found no
nd I saw the dead, small and great, stand before God; and the
d another book was opened, which is the book of
of those things which were written
 books, according to their works.
 And the sea gave up the dead which were in it; and death and
 dead which were in them: and they were judged

 the lake of fire. This is the
th.
ritten in the book of life was cast
the lake of fire.
heaven and a new earth: for the first heaven and
and there was no more sea.
ohn saw the holy city, new Jerusalem, coming down from God
as a bride adorned for her husband.
3 And I heard a great voice out of heaven saying, Behold, the
with men, and he will dwell with them, and they
f shall be with them, and be their

rom their eyes; and there
e death, neither sorrow, nor crying, neither shall
former things are passed away.
 he that sat upon the throne said, Behold, I make all things
to me, Write: for these words are true and faithful.
 is done. I am Alpha and Omega, the
ning and the end. I will give unto him that is athirst of the
 of life freely.
h shall inherit all things; and I will be his
But the fearful, and unbelieving, and the abominable, and
rs, and sorcerers, and idolaters, and all
which burneth with fire and
ich is the second death.
 came unto me one of the seven angels which had the
ast plagues, and talked with me,
Come hither, I will shew thee the bride, the Lamb's wife.
 away in the spirit to a great and high
ountain, and shewed me that great city, the holy Jerusalem,
n from God, 21:11 Having the glory of God: and
 precious, even like a jasper
r as crystal; 21:12 And had a wall great and high, and had
 gates twelve angels, and names written
hereon, which are the names of the twelve tribes of the children of
n the east three gates; on the north three gates; on
the west three gates.
l of the city had twelve foundations, and in them the
of the Lamb.
ith me had a golden reed to measure the
ity, and the gates thereof, and the wall thereof.
uare, and the length is as large as the
readth: and he measured the city with the reed, twelve thousand
ngth and the breadth and the height of it are equal.
ll thereof, an hundred and forty and four
, that is, of the angel.
building of the wall of it was of jasper: and the city
ar glass.
the wall of the city were garnished with
all manner of precious stones. The first foundation was jasper; the
e; the third, a chalcedony; the fourth, an emerald;
sixth, sardius; the seventh,
the eighth, beryl; the ninth, a topaz; the tenth, a
acinth; the twelfth, an amethyst.
 And the twelve gates were twelve pearls: every several gate was
the street of the city was pure gold, as it were
saw no temple therein: for the Lord God Almighty and the

sun, neither of the moon, to
 for the glory of God did lighten it, and the Lamb is the
nd the nations of them which are saved shall walk in the light
 of the earth do bring their glory and honour into
 shall not be shut at all by day: for there
hey shall bring the glory and honour of the nations into
ll in no wise enter into it any thing that
mination, or maketh a lie: but
 are written in the Lamb's book of life.

ter of life, clear as crystal,
 out of the throne of God and of the Lamb.
 and on either side of the
re the tree of life, which bare twelve manner of fruits,
y month: and the leaves of the tree were for
d there shall be no more curse: but the throne of God and of
t; and his servants shall serve him: 22:4 And
 shall be in their foreheads.
there shall be no night there; and they need no candle,
or the Lord God giveth them light: and they
And he said unto me, These sayings are faithful and true: and the
oly prophets sent his angel to shew unto his servants
 be done.
blessed is he that keepeth the sayings of
John saw these things, and heard them. And when I had heard
o worship before the feet of the angel which
aith he unto me, See thou do it not: for I am thy
n the prophets, and of them which
e sayings of this book: worship God.
:10 And he saith unto me, Seal not the sayings of the prophecy of
e time is at hand.
ust, let him be unjust still: and he which is
he that is righteous, let him be
s still: and he that is holy, let him be holy still.
ickly; and my reward is with me, to give
every man according as his work shall be.
ng and the end, the first and

ndments, that they may have
tree of life, and may enter in through the gates into the
t are dogs, and sorcerers, and whoremongers, and
oever loveth and maketh a lie.
Jesus have sent mine angel to testify unto you these things in
he root and the offspring of David, and the bright
he Spirit and the bride say, Come. And let him that heareth
that is athirst come. And whosoever will, let

eareth the words of the
book, If any man shall add unto these things, God
at are written in this book: 22:19
 any man shall take away from the words of the book of this
e away his part out of the book of life, and
ngs which are written in this book.
20 He which testifieth these things saith, Surely I come quickly.
 come, Lord Jesus.
ur Lord Jesus Christ be with you all. Amen.
ect Gutenberg EBook of The King James Bible
OK THE KING JAMES BIBLE ***
file should be named 10.txt or 10.zip *****
s formats will be found in:
//www.gutenberg.org/1/10/
ditions will replace the previous one--the old editions
g the works from public domain print editions means that no
s copyright in these works, so the Foundation
 in the United States without
and without paying copyright royalties.  Special rules,
rms of Use part of this license, apply to
g-tm electronic works to
ECT GUTENBERG-tm concept and trademark.  Project
k, and may not be used if you
the eBooks, unless you receive specific permission.  If you
for copies of this eBook, complying with the
eBook for nearly any purpose
tion of derivative works, reports, performances and
 and printed and given away--you may do
ractically ANYTHING with public domain eBooks.  Redistribution is
ademark license, especially commercial
distribution.
SE ***
SE
 OR USE THIS WORK
t Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
sing or distributing this work
her work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
omply with all the terms of the Full Project
his file or online at
g/license).
 of Use and Redistributing Project Gutenberg-tm
g or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
 you have read, understand, agree to
accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
) agreement.  If you do not agree to abide by all
must cease using and return or destroy
l copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your possession.
 fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a Project
d you do not agree to be bound by the
ms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the person or
 paid the fee as set forth in paragraph 1.E.8.
istered trademark.  It may only be
n or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
by the terms of this agreement.  There are a few
roject Gutenberg-tm electronic works
 without complying with the full terms of this agreement.  See
  There are a lot of things you can do with Project
f you follow the terms of this agreement
and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
 paragraph 1.E below.
 Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the Foundation"
ion copyright in the collection of Project
ll the individual works in the
 are in the public domain in the United States.  If an
blic domain in the United States and you are
t claim a right to prevent you from
ng, distributing, performing, displaying or creating derivative
work as long as all references to Project Gutenberg
e that you will support the Project
berg-tm mission of promoting free access to electronic works by
ect Gutenberg-tm works in compliance with the terms of
he Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with
the terms of this agreement by
is work in the same format with its attached full Project
 you share it without charge with others.
here you are located also govern
 can do with this work.  Copyright laws in most countries are in
f change.  If you are outside the United States, check
addition to the terms of this agreement
efore downloading, copying, displaying, performing, distributing or
tive works based on this work or any other Project
on makes no representations concerning
e copyright status of any work in any country outside the United
nless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:
 sentence, with active links to, or other immediate
enberg-tm License must appear prominently
tm work (any work on which the
oject Gutenberg" appears, or with which the phrase "Project
d) is accessed, displayed, performed, viewed,
is for the use of anyone anywhere at no cost and with
ever.  You may copy it, give it away or
e-use it under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included
or online at www.gutenberg.org
If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is derived
main (does not contain a notice indicating that it is
 copyright holder), the work can be copied
States without paying any fees
.  If you are redistributing or providing access to a work
 Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the
he requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1
gh 1.E.7 or obtain permission for the use of the work and the
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or
oject Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
older, your use and distribution
ply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any additional
e copyright holder.  Additional terms will be linked
cense for all works posted with the
ssion of the copyright holder found at the beginning of this work.
 unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
ork, or any files containing a part of this
Project Gutenberg-tm.
py, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
of this electronic work, without
tly displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
iate access to the full terms of the Project
ay convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
prietary or proprietary form, including any
ever, if you provide access to or
ute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format other than
II" or other format used in the official version
enberg-tm web site (www.gutenberg.org),
ou must, at no additional cost, fee or expense to the user, provide a
 of exporting a copy, or a means of obtaining a copy upon
ts original "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other
 the full Project Gutenberg-tm
 specified in paragraph 1.E.1.
Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
ributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
nless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.
le fee for copies of or providing
to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works provided
 a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
ur applicable taxes.  The fee is
d to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he
ate royalties under this paragraph to the
oundation.  Royalty payments
 paid within 60 days following each date on which you
required to prepare) your periodic tax
   returns.  Royalty payments should be clearly marked as such and
 Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the
tion 4, "Information about donations to
    the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation."
nd of any money paid by a user who notifies
in 30 days of receipt that s/he
 not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
quire such a user to return or
oy all copies of the works possessed in a physical medium
use of and all access to other copies of
     Project Gutenberg-tm works.
provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of any
or a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
red and reported to you within 90 days
   of receipt of the work.
 with all other terms of this agreement for free
berg-tm works.
harge a fee or distribute a Project Gutenberg-tm
on different terms than are set
this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing from
rg Literary Archive Foundation and Michael
-tm trademark.  Contact the
 set forth in Section 3 below.
1.F.1.  Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
entify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
reating the Project Gutenberg-tm
on.  Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm electronic
n which they may be stored, may contain
Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate or
scription errors, a copyright or other intellectual
ive or damaged disk or other medium, a
mputer virus, or computer codes that damage or cannot be read by

AMAGES - Except for the "Right
ment or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
e Foundation, the owner of the Project
tenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
ronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
nd expenses, including legal
GREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
 OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
DED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3.  YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
Y DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
DIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
NTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
c work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
y) you paid for it by sending a
xplanation to the person you received the work from.  If you
 physical medium, you must return the medium with
rson or entity that provided you with
 defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in lieu of a
u received the work electronically, the person or entity
oose to give you a second opportunity to
receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund.  If the second copy
fective, you may demand a refund in writing without further
e problem.
ed right of replacement or refund set forth
ed to you 'AS-IS' WITH NO OTHER
S OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT LIMITED TO
ANTIBILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.
1.F.5.  Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
xclusion or limitation of certain types of damages.
 set forth in this agreement violates the
ment, the agreement shall be
to make the maximum disclaimer or limitation permitted by
  The invalidity or unenforceability of any
oid the remaining provisions.
NDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
 agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
tm electronic works in accordance
is agreement, and any volunteers associated with the production,
ribution of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works,
ts and expenses, including legal fees,
at arise directly or indirectly from any of the following which you do
occur: (a) distribution of this or any Project Gutenberg-tm
odification, or additions or deletions to any
y Defect you cause.
rmation about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm
ous with the free distribution of
nic works in formats readable by the widest variety of computers
, old, middle-aged and new computers.  It exists
 of volunteers and donations from
in all walks of life.
nancial support to provide volunteers with the
o reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
nd ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
or generations to come.  In 2001, the Project
 was created to provide a secure
anent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future generations.
he Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation
 can help, see Sections 3 and 4
oundation web page at http://www.pglaf.org.
roject Gutenberg Literary Archive
ion
ive Foundation is a non profit
educational corporation organized under the laws of the
anted tax exempt status by the Internal
evenue Service.  The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
21541.  Its 501(c)(3) letter is posted at
ons to the Project Gutenberg
hive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent
s and your state's laws.
's principal office is located at 4557 Melan Dr. S.
volunteers and employees are scattered
roughout numerous locations.  Its business office is located at
, Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887, email
t links and up to date contact
n can be found at the Foundation's web site and official

  Dr. Gregory B. Newby
ve and Director

 to the Project Gutenberg
e Foundation
ds upon and cannot survive without wide
pread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
r of public domain and licensed works that can be
dable form accessible by the widest
 of equipment including outdated equipment.  Many small donations
e particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
dation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
donations in all 50 states of the United
States.  Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
not solicit donations in locations
we have not received written confirmation of compliance.  To
rmine the status of compliance for any
rticular state visit http://pglaf.org
hile we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
he solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
ed donations from donors in such states who
nternational donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
oncerning tax treatment of donations received from
 laws alone swamp our small staff.
se check the Project Gutenberg Web pages for current donation
.  Donations are accepted in a number of other
ts and credit card donations.
please visit: http://pglaf.org/donate

ject Gutenberg-tm electronic
ofessor Michael S. Hart is the originator of the Project Gutenberg-tm
library of electronic works that could be freely shared
ars, he produced and distributed Project
Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of volunteer support.
enberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
confirmed as Public Domain in the U.S.
less a copyright notice is included.  Thus, we do not necessarily
mpliance with any particular paper edition.
hich has the main PG search facility:
    http://www.gutenberg.org
ite includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
s to the Project Gutenberg Literary
ve Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
l newsletter to hear about new eBooks.(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)(null)